", " separated matches
"-1" is compareable to 0 but allows a non restrictive access which is fater.
"Adobe Photoshop Document Data Block": 8BIM...
"Any newline" might match two characters, but it also might match just one.
"BMS" means "BitMask Size".
"Color Image Quantization for Frame Buffer Display", Proc.
"Frees" a bc_num NUM.
"Managed" code needs this.
"Normal" properties can be printed from tables.
"ORDER" or "GROUP"
"PRAGMA encoding"
"Slow Change".
"VIEW" or "TABLE"
"application error"
"armenian code filter and converter"
"b"   integer argument is printed as binary "c"   integer argument is printed as a single character "d"   argument is an integer "f"   the argument is a float "o"   integer argument is printed as octal "s"   argument is a string "x"   integer argument is printed as lowercase hexadecimal "X"   integer argument is printed as uppercase hexadecimal
"darkstar" is not a recognized authority.
"inf","nan" and maybe other weird ones
"int" is used otherwise.
"like" or "glob" or "regexp"
"long" formats are int formats for us
"new"-style
"new"-style: setting - underscore, 4 chars of count, 4 chars of salt key - unlimited characters
"normal string bind
"null pointer"
"old"-style, "reasonable" invalid salts, UFC-crypt behavior expected
"old"-style, valid salts
"old"-style: setting - 2 chars of salt key - up to 8 characters
"parse error.
"prototype" may be undefined if "scope" isn't set
"rank" function.
"readonly" is not a valid option for the "mode" parameter.
"schema"."table" format
"server error.
"stat" column of stat1 table
"system error"
"temp.tmp" is not good temporary filename.
"transport error
"view" or "table"
"view", "trigger", or "index"
"write-version" value for main db files
'--' indicates end of args if not followed by a known long option name
'.pubkey' for public key file
'Arabic': Script
'Armenian': Script
'Assigned': -
'Bengali': Script
'Bopomofo': Script
'Braille': Script
'Buginese': Script
'Buhid': Script
'C': Major Category
'Canadian_Aboriginal': Script
'Cc': General Category
'Cf': General Category
'Cherokee': Script
'Cn': General Category
'Co': General Category
'Common': Script
'Converter' class for codepage conversions
'Coptic': Script
'Cs': General Category
'Cypriot': Script
'Cyrillic': Script
'Deseret': Script
'Devanagari': Script
'Ethiopic': Script
'Georgian': Script
'Glagolitic': Script
'Gothic': Script
'Greek': Script
'Gujarati': Script
'Gurmukhi': Script
'Han': Script
'Hangul': Script
'Hanunoo': Script
'Hebrew': Script
'Hiragana': Script
'Inherited': Script
'Kannada': Script
'Katakana': Script
'Kharoshthi': Script
'Khmer': Script
'L': Major Category
'Lao': Script
'Latin': Script
'Limbu': Script
'Linear_B': Script
'Ll': General Category
'Lm': General Category
'Lo': General Category
'Lt': General Category
'Lu': General Category
'M': Major Category
'Malayalam': Script
'Mc': General Category
'Me': General Category
'Mn': General Category
'Mongolian': Script
'Myanmar': Script
'N': Major Category
'Nd': General Category
'New_Tai_Lue': Script
'Nl': General Category
'No': General Category
'Ogham': Script
'Old_Italic': Script
'Old_Persian': Script
'Oriya': Script
'Osmanya': Script
'P': Major Category
'Pc': General Category
'Pd': General Category
'Pe': General Category
'Pf': General Category
'Pi': General Category
'Po': General Category
'Ps': General Category
'Runic': Script
'S': Major Category
'Sc': General Category
'Shavian': Script
'Sinhala': Script
'Sk': General Category
'Sm': General Category
'So': General Category
'Syloti_Nagri': Script
'Syriac': Script
'Tagalog': Script
'Tagbanwa': Script
'Tai_Le': Script
'Tamil': Script
'Telugu': Script
'Thaana': Script
'Thai': Script
'Tibetan': Script
'Tifinagh': Script
'Ugaritic': Script
'Yi': Script
'Z' iz not supported anymore and should be replaced with 'z'
'Z': Major Category
'Zl': General Category
'Zp': General Category
'Zs': General Category
'automerge' setting
'documents' values for current csr row
'fields' is reused because the ownership of the strings has been transferred above.
'internal', 'leaf' or 'overflow'
'normal' can be overridden by any other state
'occurrences' values for current csr row
'reloading' and 'finishing' can be overridden by 'terminating'
'reloading' can be overridden by 'finishing'
'sh' if -CIA- or -CH, but not SCH, except SCHW.
'sh' in -TIA- or -TIO- else 'th' before H else T
'ssHandle' is not a struct/union/class member
'unsigned char' is promoted to 'int' when passed through '...'
'yyvs': related to semantic values.
- Because of this, the same XMLRPC data can be serialized into multiple xml vocabularies.
- Calling this with NULL sets as a portable way to sleep with sub-second accuracy is not supported.
- Don't assume there isn't a lookahead just because this state is a consistent state with a default action.
- If this state is a consistent state with a default action, then the only way this function was invoked is if the default action is an error action.
- If you supply file handles, there is no way to distinguish between ready for read/write or OOB, so any set in which the handle is found will be marked as ready.
- In case of PHP_DNS_ANY we use the directly fetch DNS_T_ANY.
- Last solution: average the colors
- NetWare doesn't require first parameter - Allowing LibC to choose the buffer size for now
- Of course, the expected token list depends on states to have correct lookahead information, and it depends on the parser not to perform extra reductions after fetching a lookahead from the scanner and before detecting a syntax error.
- One to One mapping between C structures and actual values, unlike ensor which forces one to understand the arcana of the xmlrpc vocab.
- Various output options, including: xml escaping via CDATA or entity, case folding, vocab version, and character encoding.
- We emulate an or'ed type mask by querying type by type.
- a function to release a userdata struct when it is no longer being managed by the cache  In the event of a cache miss the cache is allowed to grow up to a specified maximum size.
- comprehensive API for manipulation of values
- days after 21st March
- desc is never freed by the server.
- if data dictionary changed between prepare and execute, for example a table used in the query was altered.
- if method or type already exists, it will be replaced.
- if two are equal.
- is synonymous with STDIN
- output option for character encoding.
- output option for verbosity/readability.
- quite speedy compared to implementations written in interpreted languages.
- support for mixed indexed/keyed vector types, making it more compatible with languages such as PHP.
- uglier and more complex than I like to see for API functions.
-- Allocate memory for our phoned_phrase --
-- Parameter checks --
-- The first phoneme has to be processed specially.
-1 for none
-1 for rowid.
-1 for the rowid.
-1 for unknown
-1 is also "true"
-1 means any number
-1 means not set
-1 means not transparent.
-1 means the image is not transparent.
-1 means unlimited
-1 required because we want the last run opcode, not the next to-be-run one.
-i turns on and off interlacing.
-ve means no antialias
...Plus additional ranges in newer Unicode versions...
...only first file examined
..and the length
.length is in bits
/ Iterate the loop again please.
// DESC indices.
/openbasedir/ and /openbasedir are the same directory
/x fill in key field of mydata1.
0 - flag not allowed 1 - flag allowed
0 child nodes
0 for BLOBs
0 for INSERTs
0 for bgColor, nothing gets outside anyway
0 for main database.
0 for no malloc usage
0 for normal table.
0 for read-only
0 for trigger or view.
0 for unused
0 for unused indices
0 if pPage is not a leaf.
0 is used to represent "not a page".
0 means "unknown at compile-time"
0 means GCC is not being used
0 means falls through.
0 means none.
0 means that the vector is too small to hold all the captured substring offsets
0 most pages.
0 normally.
0 otherwise
0 read-only
0 to ignore.
0-based execute iteration value
0-length chain.
0000000000111111111122222222223333333333444444444455555555556666
0123456789 123456789 123456789 123
012345678901234567
0123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123
0200 overflow words.
06/2000 -- danda -- played with expat-ensor from www.ensor.org.
07/2000 -- danda -- wrote new implementation to be compatible with xmlrpc standard and incorporated some ideas from ensor, most notably the separation of xml dom from xmlrpc api.
0: don't free self
0: module 1: schema 2: vtab name 3...: args
0x0 at the end of the scramble and thus last byte in the packet in 5.1 and previous
0x00 - 0x0F
0x02, asn1.h
0x03, asn1.h
0x0301 - 0x0302
0x04, asn1.h
0x05, asn1.h
0x06, asn1.h
0x10 - 0x1F
0x1FFFFFFFFFFFFF
0x20 - 0x2F
0x30 - 0x3F
0x40 - 0x4F
0x40, snmp_impl.h
0x41, snmp_impl.h
0x42, snmp_impl.h
0x43, snmp_impl.h
0x44, snmp_impl.h
0x46, snmp_impl.h
0x47, snmp_impl.h
0x50 - 0x5F
0x5001 - 0x501B
0x5021 - 0x503B
0x5090 - 0x5091
0x5100 - 0x5101
0x5110 - 0x5113
0x60 - 0x6F
0x70 - 0x7F
0x78, asn1.h
0x79, asn1.h
0x7F would be called ASCII text, but many systems might reasonably consider some characters outside this range to be alphabetic, so the file command would call such characters ASCII.
0x80 - 0x8F
0x80, asn1.h
0x80-0x9f,0xE0-0xFF
0x80E3 - 0x80E6
0x81, asn1.h
0x828d - 0x828F
0x8829 - 0x882b
0x90 - 0x9F
0x920B - 0x920D
0x920B in TIFF/EP
0x9211 - 0x9216
0x9F, which ISO-8859 considers to be control characters but the IBM PC and Macintosh consider to be printing characters.
0xA0 - 0xAF
0xA20B  in JPEG
0xB0 - 0xBF
0xC0 - 0xCF
0xD0 - 0xDF
0xE0 - 0xEF
0xF0 - 0xFF
0xFF, or one of the following control characters: backspace, tab, line feed, vertical tab, form feed, carriage return, escape.
0xaa, 0xb5, 0xba are lower case letter, but can't convert.
0xdf, 0xaa, 0xb5, 0xba are lower case letter, but can't convert.
0xdf, 0xb5 are lower case letter, but can't convert.
0xf00 cc code for branches
0xff is legal padding, but if we get that many, something's wrong.
0xff means setting unknown
0xffffffff is never a valid page number
0xxxxxxx is plain ASCII
1 - 31 last destination register
1 - Always have a control head.
1 - The block is a block terminator.
1 - Use unoptimized capturing brackets.
1 Tiny font
1 byte length
1 byte past EOF for this PmaReader
1 byte past end of aAll
1 child node
1 for 'tokenchars', 0 for 'separators'
1 for DESC or 0 for ASC
1 for ROWID tables
1 for STAT3 or STAT4.
1 for UPDATE, 0 for DELETE
1 for WITHOUT ROWID table
1 for tables and indices to be opened
1 for writing.
1 if the conch is held, -1 if lockless
1 if this is an exclusion set.
1 means allocate a new page if space is easily available.
1 means branch is taken.
1 or -1 once known.
1 sec timeout
1 to honor DESC in index.
1 to write.
1 when initialized
1, January 1998, pp 3-30.
1-byte header, 16-byte host id, path
1-byte signed integer
1-byte unsigned integer
1.01 allows roundoff in the next few lines
1.6 st.h doesn't define st_data_t type
1.8.1: remove dependency on jinclude.h
100 for page 1.
100's digit
100ns blocks since 01-Jan-1641
10s by default
10xxxxxx never 1st byte
11 RegionalIndicator
11xxxxxx begins UTF-8
12/13/887605, greater value raises interger overflow
123456789 123456
123456789 123456789
128 is safe here, the specifier in snprintf isn't longer than that
128, 256, 160, 320
16 bit per arg
16 bits should be enough
16 entry table
16-bit mode
1: Acquire a read or write lock
1: file 2: memory 0: default
1: is not POSIX bracket, but no error.
1: root node ending.
1: signature verified, 0: signature does not match, -1: failed signature operation
1: size misses.
1: trimleft  2: trimright  3: trim
1MB is default stack size for 32-bit Windows.
1s timeout if none has been set
1st argument
1st argument to callback
1st argument to the access auth function
1st input operand
1st passed in rcx, 2nd argument passed in rdx, 3rd in r8.
1st passed in rdi, 2nd argument passed in rsi, 3rd in rdx.
1st: 0xa1..0xc6, 2nd: 0x41..0x7a, 0x81..0xfe
1st: 0xc7..0xc8,0xca..0xfe, 2nd: 0xa1..0xfe
2 000 000 000
2 Small font
2 byte code 2nd char
2 byte code first char
2 byte filler
2 child nodes
2 or greater.
2-byte character.
2-byte encoding for max
2-byte signed integer
2-byte unsigned integer
2.0.10: Nick Atty: clip to edges of drawing rectangle, return if no points need to be drawn
2.0.10: before the drawing routines, some code to clip points that are outside the drawing window.
2.0.10: needs a transparent-index check that is still valid if the source is not truecolor.
2.0.12: 65534 indicates truecolor.
2.0.12: 65534 signals a truecolor .gd file.
2.0.12: Slaven Rezic: palette images are not the only images with a simple transparent color setting.
2.0.12: Steven Brown: support a single totally transparent color in the original.
2.0.12: TBB: alpha in the destination should be a component of the result.
2.0.12: a new adaptation from the same original, this time by Barend Gehrels.
2.0.12: detect bad truecolor .gd files created by pre-2.0.12.
2.0.12: signed size.
2.0.12: support truecolor properly in .gd as well as in .gd2.
2.0.12: this is finally a parameter
2.0.13: Bob Ostermann: don't force autohint, that's just for testing freetype and doesn't look as good
2.0.13: reset penf.x.
2.0.14: typo fixed.
2.0.16: Optimization by Ilia Chipitsine -- don't waste time offscreen
2.0.16: Paul den Dulk found an occasion where total can be 0
2.0.16: clip to clipping rectangle, Matt McNabb
2.0.16: clipping rectangle, not image bounds
2.0.18: space was a oor choice for this.
2.0.1: use gdImageSetPixel to do the alpha blending work, or to just store the alpha level.
2.0.1: work around a gcc bug by being verbose.
2.0.21: we don't reallocate memory we don't own
2.0.22: save the APP14 marker to check for Adobe Photoshop CMYK files with inverted components.
2.0.22: very basic support for reading CMYK colorspace files.
2.0.24: inptr must not be incremented until after transparency check, if any.
2.0.28: threadsafe
2.0.2: alpha blending is now on by default, and saving of alpha is off by default.
2.0.5: can't use gdTrueColorGetRed, etc with palette
2.0.5: mode_mono fix from Giuliano Pochini
2.0.5: we should actually return this
2.0.6: valid return
2.0.9, Thomas Winzig: apply simple full transparency
2.0.9: Thorben Kundinger: Maybe the source image is not a truecolor image
2.0.9: fixed by Thomas Winzig
2.05: remap to the palette available in the destination image.
2.0: much easier when the destination is truecolor.
2.1 Calculate how much space we need
2.2 Enlarge the buffer, if needed
2.3 Store the actual data
2.6.1 xsi:type 2.6.2 xsi:nil 2.6.3 xsi:schemaLocation, xsi:noNamespaceSchemaLocation
2000 Jan 0.0.
21 digis, no sign
2: Open cursor 0 for reading
2: full misses
2MB is default stack size for 64-bit Windows.
2byte code 2nd char: 0x80-0xbf
2byte code first char: 0xc2-0xdf
2nd and subsequent times through the loop
2nd input operand
2nd parameter to sqlite3_bind out of range
2nd try: fail if the mod time changed or host id is different, wait  10 sec and try again 3rd try: break the lock unless the mod time has changed.
2x number of WHEN terms
3 Medium bold font
3 byte code 1st char
3 byte code 2nd char
3 byte code 3rd char
3 child nodes
3 integers per phrase instance
3 registers to hold a result row
3-byte character.
3-byte signed integer
3.2.4 deprecates folding support
30..37    01234567
32 bit displacement.
32 bit per arg
32 bits of new offset
32-bit is the default
32768: something big value
3: Open cursor 0 for read/write
3byte code 2nd char: 0:0xa0-0xbf,D:0x80-9F,1-C,E-F:0x80-0x9f
3byte code 3rd char: 0x80-0xbf
3byte code first char: 0xe0-0xef
3byte code first char: 0xf0-0xf4
3rd input operand
3rd parameter must be allowed for compatibility
4 Large font
4 bit per arg
4 byte code 1st char
4 byte code 2nd char
4 byte code 3rd char
4 byte code 4th char
4 byte range: Unicode 16 planes
4 byte range: Unicode BMP
4 bytes or less and value is in the dir entry itself
4 child nodes
4 if pPage is a leaf.
4 is a magic value.
4-byte character.
4-byte integer
4-byte or 8-byte integer
4-byte signed integer
4-byte unsigned integer
4.1 sends 1 byte EOF packet after metadata of PREPARE/EXECUTE but 5 bytes after the result.
40 Bytes should be more than enough for this format string.
42P05 means that the prepared statement already existed.
48..4f    HIJKLMNO
4: "trigger"
4: Push the rowid to the stack
4E00-9FA5 CJK Ideographs.
4byte code 2nd char: 0:0x90-0xbf,1-3:0x80-0xbf,4:0x80-0x8f
4byte code 3rd char: 0x80-0xbf
4byte code 4th char: 0x80-0xbf
4x the size of current chunk in Mem3Block elements
5 Giant font
5 SpacingMark
5-byte and 6-byte characters are not allowed by RFC 3629, and will be rejected by the length test below.
5-byte character.
5.0 doesn't support it.
5.5.x reports 21 as scramble length because it needs to show the length of the data before the plugin name
50..57    PQRSTUVW
512 bits or 64 bytes
5760 bytes, record size 8
59 Temple Place, Suite 330 Boston, MA 02111-1307 USA.
5: Seek the cursor
6-byte character.
6-byte signed integer
60..67    `abcdefg
64 means unset
64-bit only if requested at compile-time
64-bit only: there is no lwau instruction.
64-bit position read from poslist
64-entry table
64K-1 is max XXX
65535 indicates this is a gd 2.x .gd file.
676 different possibilities with 7 or more X's, 26 with 6 or less.
68..6f    hijklmno
7, 6 and 5 are not possible.
70..77    pqrstuvw
8 NULL means undefined and should be ASCII...
8 bit displacement.
8 bit per arg
8-bit sign-extended immediate in jump or call
8-byte alignment of pageSize
8-byte signed integer
8-byte unsigned integer
8.0 or grater supports protorol version 3
83ku - 94ku
85ku - 120ku
85ku - 94ku
89ku - 92ku
:: means 1 or more 16-bit 0 blocks
A "NOT INDEXED" clause was supplied.
A "normal" conditional group.
A "real" property test implies no starting bits, but the fake property PT_CLIST identifies a list of characters.
A "special" INSERT op.
A "useful" side-effect is that the user's scripts can then make similar decisions using stream_get_meta_data.
A '-' character at the end is treated as a literal.
A 32-bit varint is used to store size information in btrees.
A 4-connected neighbor:  pixel above, below, left, or right of a pixel.
A BTREE_SINGLE database is always a temporary and/or ephemeral
A Bison parser, made by GNU Bison 2.7.12-4996.
A Bison parser, made by GNU Bison 3.0.4.
A Cosine windowing function
A DELETE operation.
A MATCH constraint against the "rank" column.
A MATCH constraint against the special column.
A MATCH constraint.
A MATCH operator.
A NULL pointer is put on the end of the list.
A NULL value
A PWL file is personal word file one word per line.
A SELECT statement that supplies values
A SELECT statement that will become the new view
A SELECT statement to use as the data source
A SELECT statement used in place of a table name
A SQLITE_FUNC_CONSTANT or _SLOCHNG function
A Sub-term within the pOrWc
A VACUUM cannot change the pagesize of an encrypted database.
A VDBE address
A WHERE clause term
A WhereTerm under consideration
A Windows DLL is unable to call an arbitrary function in the main executable.
A b-tree rebalance will be required after deleting this entry.
A backreference to group n is returned as negative n.
A backreference within the group that it is referencing behaves in the same way.
A base allocation.
A bit mask of which of the five pipes this instruction is compatible with: X0  0x01 X1  0x02 Y0  0x04 Y1  0x08 Y2  0x10
A bit of a hack, but not a bad one: we see if the handler of the function is actually one that displays "function is disabled" message.
A bit of tricky math here.
A bitfield type for use inside of structures.
A boolean value
A buffer to hold the data for the new record
A buffer to hold the magic header
A by-rowid lookup.
A callout item contains the length of the next item in the pattern, which we can't fill in till after we have reached the relevant point.
A character may be followed by '-' to form a range.
A character outside of the ascii range.
A character with multiple other cases is returned on its own with a special return value.
A class that contains at least one abstract method automatically becomes an abstract class.
A collating sequence
A column in the result set.
A column number within table iCur
A column of pTab
A column-list is terminated by either a 0x01 or 0x00.
A complete hash table is an instance of the following structure.
A completely parsed JSON string
A conditional group with only one branch has an implicit empty alternative branch.
A connection to shared-memory
A core dump is actually more useful.
A count of rows changed
A counter increasing globally across all forks.
A cursor is opened, when more than zero columns returned
A cursor number
A difference in length will leak
A direct lookup on the rowid or docid column.
A failure here could be okay given that the protocol might have been merely unregistered
A failure to match might occur after the group has succeeded, if something later on doesn't match.
A fake index object for the primary key
A fake table from which we get the result set
A fancier test would sometimes let us do this for larger i values.
A fatal error / die occurred during the generator execution.
A few lines below
A file is considered to be ISO-8859 text if its characters are all either ASCII, according to the above definition, or printing characters from the ISO-8859 8-bit extension, characters 0xA0 ...
A flag byte tells whether the bitmap is present, and whether this is a negated class or not.
A flag is set so that the group can be made atomic.
A flag to indicate when processing is finished
A foreign key constraint
A frame is only valid if the page number is creater than zero.
A full-table scan.
A general purpose loop counter
A given callback will only ever be called once, the first time an introspection request is processed after the time of callback registration.
A halakim is 1/1080th of an hour or 3 1/3 seconds.
A hash on key
A header written to the output file with the byte-order-mark and the number of property nodes.
A hidden column in a virtual table
A higher value indicates a better match.
A hyphen followed by a POSIX class is treated in the same way.
A join edge is one for which the predecessor does not immediately dominate the successor.
A large amount of number can be constructed from ORR and MOVx, but computing them is costly.
A list of all open cursors
A list of columns to be indexed
A list of errata for this book has been posted to the sci.crypt newsgroup by the author and is available for FTP.
A lone identifier is the name of a column.
A main database has just been opened.
A malloc must have failed
A mask of which bits have predefined values for each pipeline.
A memory allocation error has occurred
A moment of convenience, a lifetime of compatibility.
A named index with an explicit CREATE INDEX statement
A nested group that is already marked as "could be empty" can just be skipped.
A new SS context does not need to be created with both a Source and a Sink.
A new entry is created in the SrcList even if pTable is NULL.
A new month was started when the new moon was first observed.
A no-op if an error has already occurred
A non-zero result is something that can be returned immediately.
A null pathname is invalid -- POSIX 1003.1 sect.
A number of Perl escapes are not handled by PCRE.
A parameter used by the eDest disposal method
A parse of the cell we are pointing at
A pointer is kept.
A pointer to the first element of the linked list is stored as the "pTrigger" member of the associated struct Table.
A pointer to the linked list of commands to run.
A pointer to the linked list of events to process.
A pointer to the object is used so that not only can any data be used but various kinds of data can be pushed on the same queue if one so wished e.g. various length string literals mixed with pointers to structures or integers etc.
A pointer to this structure will be returned to ocaml and passed in whenever something needs to be done
A position.
A problem turned up with PCRE_PRERELEASE, which is defined empty for production releases.
A range of registers to hold previous output
A real table
A record being sorted
A record to be insert into the new table
A recursion, however, causes an a flag to be set that causes the length of this branch to be ignored.
A region of shared-memory
A regular INSERT, UPDATE or DELETE statement.
A regular table
A repeat minimum of 1 is optimized into some special cases.
A result set
A return of MATCH_SKIP_ARG means that matching failed at SKIP with an argument, and we must check whether that argument matches this MARK's argument.
A return value of 0 indicates success
A return value of 1 indicates that the connection is to be destroyed
A row is being added to the child table.
A row is being removed from the child table.
A rowid/docid conflict.
A running thread
A semicolon
A short program which converts a .png file into a .gd file, for your convenience in creating images on the fly from a basis image that must be loaded quickly.
A significant reduction is made by putting all the names into a single, large string and then using offsets in the table itself.
A simple array of 32-bit masks for lookup.
A single character of affinity
A single column of result
A single constraint term
A single database
A single doclist may span multiple pages.
A single node of parsed JSON
A single term of the WHERE clause
A single token is the base case and the most common case.
A small processing code
A sorting index used to test for distinctness
A source cursor for SORTED_MATCH
A special adder/subtractor for the recursive divide and conquer multiply algorithm.
A special output routine for "multi-character digits."  Exactly SIZE characters must be output for the value VAL.
A square bracket that doesn't match the syntax is treated as a literal.
A struct has key/val pairs.
A sub-query in the FROM clause of a SELECT
A sub-task in the sort process
A subquery used in place of a table name
A successful match means
A syntax error has occurred.
A table being constructed by CREATE TABLE
A table in the database
A table in the database is locked
A table interior node.
A table that describes the SELECT results
A term of the ORDER BY clause
A thread safe initialization.
A three-byte-character lead-byte not followed by two trail-bytes represents itself.
A tolerance has been implemented using GD_EPSILON.
A transaction must be open when this is called.
A transient duplicate expression
A tries to promote to reserved but is blocked by B.
A true recursion implies not fixed length, but a subroutine call may be OK.
A tuple to store the filed
A two-byte-character lead-byte not followed by trail-byte represents itself.
A type code from the record header
A type that is properly aligned for any stack member.
A value of 1 means that auto-possessification is OK.
A value was pulled from the index
A variable-length integer may not be more than 9 bytes long.
A very basic conversion approach, TBB
A virtual meta-value
A virtual opcode for then traps.
A way to specify the location of the php.ini dir in an apache directive
A width value was supplied.
A will strip any trailing whitespace
A zero entry means there is no possessified version.
A zero value means there is no possessified version - in those cases the item in question must be wrapped in ONCE brackets.
A-vs-B comparision jump
A6 is deprecated.
ABLEFTHENDEFERRABLELSEXCEPTRANSACTIONATURALTERAISEXCLUSIVE
ABOVE:  Height enforcement enabled.
AC00-D7A3 Hangul Syllables.
ACM SIGPLAN '90, pp.
ADD" statement.
AE becomes E
AFTER ALL ABOVE FAILED
AIX doesn't have LOG_AUTHPRIV
AIX doesn't have LOG_PERROR
ALGORITHMS  SERIAL DAY NUMBER TO JEWISH DATE  The simplest approach would be to use the rules stated above to find the molad of Tishri before and after the given day number.
ALGORITHMS  The calculations are based on three different cycles: a 400 year cycle of leap years, a 4 year cycle of leap years and a 5 month cycle of month lengths.
ALGORITHMS  The calculations are based on two different cycles: a 4 year cycle of leap years and a 5 month cycle of month lengths.
ALNUM, 3rd and 4th values redundant
AND CONTRIBUTORS ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
ANY LAMP GC  PC  SC ALNUM SPACE PXSPACE WORD CLIST UCNC
API for registering GLOBAL filters
API for registering GLOBAL wrappers
API for registering VOLATILE wrappers
API offered by current FTS version
ARCHITECTURE ASSUMPTIONS: This code used to have some nasty ones, but these have been removed by now.
AS SELECT ..." statement.
ASC or DESC for INTEGER PRIMARY KEY
ASC or DESC on the i-th expression
ASCII character
ASCII exclude '-'
ASCII magic -- try to detect text encoding.
ASCII optimization: quick check to see if the string might be there I realize that 'offset' is 'grapheme count offset' but will work in spite of that
ASCII range token characters
ASCII/UTF-8 coding
ASCIIZ check
ASN_UNSIGNED is the same as ASN_GAUGE
ATTN: key extraction must be the first thing to do...
AUTH TLS not supported try AUTH SSL
AUTOINCREMENT
Abandon the tree walk
Able to support an IN operator
Abort due to constraint violation
Abort the SQL statement with an error
Abort with an error.
Above requires no mutex.
Absolute elements do not take part in that phase.
Absolute index of input segments
Absolute level containing segments
Absolute level just updated
Absolute level number to work on
Absolute level of input segments
Absolute level of segment to modify
Absolute level to delete from
Absolute level to open
Absolute level to repack
Absolute path open
Absolute positioned elements do not take part of the layout, so we don't use them to compute mainContentDim
Absolute registers.
Absolute value of pad_size
Accelerator statistics
Accept a client connection from a server socket, using an optional timeout.
Accept negative position if length of search string can be determined
Acceptable operators
Access authorization function
Access permission denied
Access to Element node is implemented as a convience method
Access to the unixShmNode object is serialized by the caller
Access to the winShmNode object is serialized by the caller
According to POSIX.1-2001
According to Pierre Joye, Windows in some environments per default creates text files, so force binary mode.
According to documentation the only way to get an error is to have out-of-memory on the server-side.
According to earlier standards
According to rfc2965, more specific paths are listed above the less specific ones.
According to spec, this is only recommended, not required.
According to the book "Jewish Calendar Mystery Dispelled" by George Zinberg, the patriarch Hillel II published these rules in 358 A.D.
According to the information I was using, 2 measn meters.
Accumulate each channel
Accumulate results here
Accumulate the error message text here
Accumulate the length for use in the pre-compile phase.
Accumulate the output here
Accumulated output
Acquire a PENDING lock
Acquire a RESERVED lock
Acquire a cryptographic provider context handle.
Acquire a shared lock
Acquire an EXCLUSIVE lock
Acquire the mutex
Acquire the mutex before continuing
Activate ini entries with values from the user config hash
Activate per-dir-system-configuration defined in php.ini and stored into configuration_hash during startup
Activate per-host-system-configuration defined in php.ini and stored into configuration_hash during startup
Activation phrase
Actual allocated length
Actual compile phase
Actual recursions cannot be fixed length, but subroutine calls can.
Actual size of mapped region
Actual size of mapping at pMapRegion
Actually decreases reference count and only frees the storage if reference count is zero.
Actually do the update of the change counter
Actually set new attribute value.
Actually set the symbol.
Actually we compute the coordinates of the center of the corner histogram cell, which are the lower bounds of the volume we care about.
Actually we compute the coordinates of the center of the upper-corner histogram cell, which are the upper bounds of the volume we care about.
Actually we don't need this context anymore after we have enabled SSL on the connection.
Actually, this is pretty much a NO-OP, since the identification system doesn't allow us to discriminate between a positive match, a possible match and a definite non-match.
Adapted from NetBSB libc by Dieter Baron
Adapted from: apptype.c, Written by Eberhard Mattes and put into the public domain  Notes: 1.
Adar I, the month added for leap years, is sometimes referred to as the 13th month, but I have chosen to assign it the number 6 to keep the months in chronological order.
Add  entries from various fields of the obtained parsed_calendar
Add MARK, if available
Add Response element in between.
Add a FD from the fd set
Add a FD to the fd set
Add a FD to to kevent queue
Add a character to the end of the current packet, and if it is 254 characters, flush the packet to disk.
Add a flag to INIT_ARRAY if we know this array cannot be packed
Add a new entry before the current location.
Add a segment iterator for the current contents of the hash table.
Add all SCC entry variables into worklist for narrowing
Add all table columns to the PRIMARY KEY index
Add all the subpatterns to it
Add an array of protocols
Add an entry in sqlite_master for this index
Add an entry to each output position list
Add any overflow cells
Add array element
Add byte for terminal null
Add cells to the start of the page
Add charset on content-type header if the MIME type starts with "text/", the default_charset directive is not empty and there is not already a charset option in there.
Add column type information to this table
Add condition to terminate at NULLs
Add default headers
Add default location
Add dlidx if this many empty pages
Add edition attribute to the hash
Add entry to the chunk, preserving keys if necessary.
Add environment location
Add exception paths
Add extensions
Add fd to new array
Add for any character in the key one byte of the alternate sum.
Add in the fixed length from the table
Add increments of 5 weekdays as a week, leaving the DOW unchanged.
Add it in this case too.
Add it to the set of best so far
Add key again.
Add key for numbers not divisible by 7.
Add key or last result.
Add live range paths
Add number of Cells freed to this counter
Add one to the old schema cookie
Add pPage to the dirty list
Add pVtab to the end of sqlite3.aVTrans
Add predecessors of changed block to worklist
Add registry location
Add salt for numbers not divisible by 3.
Add the "COLLATE" clause to this expression
Add the "eNNN" suffix
Add the PK key for this row to the temporary table
Add the POSIX table or its complement into the main table that is being built and we are done.
Add the character to the temporary buffer.
Add the characters to the defined category.
Add the code if it not 0.
Add the code to the composite property.
Add the code to the defined category.
Add the contents
Add the current term to the interior node tree.
Add the current term to the parent node.
Add the default collation sequence BINARY.
Add the entries to the stat3 or stat4 table.
Add the entry to the main terms index.
Add the entry to the stat1 table.
Add the final chunk if there is one.
Add the fraction part.
Add the function name to our signal table
Add the key string.
Add the last piece to the return value
Add the lower and title case mappings for the upper case character.
Add the match sets to the output array and clean up
Add the new BtShared object to the linked list sharable BtShareds.
Add the new range at the insertion point.
Add the new segment to the output level
Add the opcode to this VM
Add the page to the PGroup LRU list.
Add the piece to the return value
Add the rowid of the row to be deleted to the RowSet
Add the sentinel index which is used by the binary search as the upper bound for a search.
Add the starting values of the context according to FIPS 180-2:6.2.2 step 4.
Add the starting values of the context according to FIPS 180-2:6.3.2 step 4.
Add the table to the in-memory representation of the database.
Add the term to the terms index
Add the upper and lower mappings for a title case character.
Add the upper and title case mappings for the lower case character.
Add these into the running sums, and simultaneously shift the next-line error sums left by 1 column.
Add this character to the class.
Add this many bytes to each in-memory page
Add this many extra columns to the end
Add this option / argument pair to the result hash.
Add to "recursing stack"
Add to return array
Add trailing zeros
Add two 0x00 bytes the end of the buffer.
Add weeks and days
Add with a default set of properties.
Added 7/24/95: support transparent copies
Added by 3.3.13
Added by 3.4.1
Added by 3.5.0
Added by the optimizer.
Added hdpi and vdpi to support images at non-screen resolutions, i.e. 300 dpi TIFF, or 100h x 50v dpi FAX format.
Added support for reading as well as support for 'tell' and 'seek'.
Added to free constructor arguments
Added with non-blocking streams in mind, where this situation is frequent
Adding a new return type is always valid.
Additional 16 bits for server capabilities
Additional HTTP headers
Additional constants for use with loading html
Additional delimiter argument
Additional functions are available for simple rotation or up/downscaling.
Additional headers for NetWare
Additional information associated with pTerm
Additional methods may be added in future releases
Additional records associated with authoritative name servers
Additionally to the index, we also store the variable, to ensure that it is not destroyed during serialization and its pointer reused.
Address at which row is visited
Address of "OP_Rewind iIdxCur"
Address of "loops" counter
Address of "next_row:"
Address of "rows visited" counter
Address of MustBeInt instruction
Address of OP_CreateTable opcode on CREATE TABLE
Address of OP_FkIfZero
Address of OP_OpenEphemeral
Address of OP_OpenEphemeral instruction
Address of OP_OpenEphemeral opcode for tabTnct
Address of a cell
Address of array containing child table row
Address of array containing old row
Address of first `dummy', once known.
Address of header.
Address of initial segment.
Address of jump instruction
Address of jump operation
Address of jump over the delete logic
Address of loop counter
Address of next instruction to return
Address of ptr to next freeblock
Address of regReturn init
Address of rows visited counter
Address of subroutine to manifest a subquery
Address of test for empty pDest
Address of test for empty pSrc
Address of the OP_IfNot opcode
Address of the OP_Jump opcode
Address of the OP_SorterOpen or OP_OpenEphemeral
Address of the OpenEphemeral instruction
Address of the end of the query
Address of the i-th cell
Address of the initialization bypass jump
Address of the next freeblock
Address of the output-A subroutine
Address of the output-B subroutine
Address of the select-A coroutine
Address of the select-A-exhausted subroutine
Address of the select-B coroutine
Address of the select-B-exhausted subroutine
Address of this block.
Address of top of loop
Address of trailer block of previous segment.
Address offset
Address register for select-A coroutine
Address register for select-B coroutine
Address register for the output-A subroutine
Address register for the output-B subroutine
Address size override
Address to jump to for next iteration
Address where integer counter is initialized
Adds a key value to the hashtable.
Adds a number if it does not already exist and returns an index value multiplied by 2.
Adds another key for existing cached script
Adjust PC-relative scaled branch offsets.
Adjust ancestry of this node.
Adjust cached value.
Adjust checksum to count the "chksum" field as blanks.
Adjust downward, as appropriate
Adjust for backwards DST changeover
Adjust for forwards DST changeover
Adjust for zero repeat
Adjust nOut using stat3/stat4 data.
Adjust numbers and allocate storage and initialize fields.
Adjust sum and return.
Adjust the denominator in case of integers and add the number.
Adjust the start of the year.
Adjust to the B.C./A.D.
Advance Pager.journalOff to the start of the next sector.
Advance YYPTR to a properly aligned location for the next stack.
Advance at least as far as this
Advance by one more.
Advance each iterator that currently points to iRowid.
Advance each level to the last entry on the last page
Advance each of the segments to point to the first docid.
Advance each segment iterator until it points to the term zTerm/nTerm.
Advance ecode past the assertion to the start of the first branch, but adjust it so that the general choosing code below works.
Advance ecode past the callout, so it now points to the condition.
Advance iterator at least this far
Advance one byte
Advance pChild until it points to iLast or laster
Advance past the POS_END terminator byte
Advance past the bit map, and act on what follows.
Advance past the item
Advance pixel pointers to next column
Advance the current PmaReader
Advance the iterator for each token in the phrase once.
Advance the iterators until they all point to the same rowid
Advance to a unique first char if there is one.
Advance to new matching position
Advance to next branch
Advance to the next document
Advance to the next name context.
Advance to the next output block
Advance to the next piece.
Advance to the next row to process.
Advance to the next term of the compound
Advance to the position right after the last full match
Advance zCsr to the next token.
Advanced Interface
Affects STR_PTR and TMP1.
Affinity for end of range constraint
Affinity for start of range constraint
Affinity must be the same on all columns
Affinity of the LHS of the IN
Affinity string to return
Affinity to use
Affinity to use for comparison
After all, we're not really supposed to rework JPEGs and write them out again anyway.
After building, copy the resulting file to the folder where your database expects to find its UDFs.
After pStmt has returned SQLITE_DONE
After processing each alternative, restore the offset data and the last captured value.
After that we require an 'm' or something else where 'm' stands for members and anything else should be an array.
After the group has been scanned, all the offsets in the forward reference list for the group are adjusted.
After the maximum size is reached then the least-recently-used element is discarded to make room for the new.
After the options, we require exactly two arguments, which are the pattern, and the subject string.
After this point we are allowed to free the result set, as we have cleaned the line
Again, keep the UTF-8 and UCP stuff separate.
Again, separate the UTF-8 case for speed, and also separate the UCP cases.
Again, we must remember to replicate entries on the forward reference list.
Aggregate column length array
Aggregate finalizer
Aggregate function
Aggregate function with DISTINCT keyword
Aggregate functions are allowed here
Aggregate step
Algorithm does not use IV, even though mode supports it
Aliases for StringPrep
Aliases which have not been applied indicate typos/bugs.
Align limit and max_limit.
Align size to 64-byte boundary
Align to 64-byte boundary
Aligned to 16 byte.
Aligning ovector to even number of sljit words.
Aligning to 8 byte.
All CHECK constraints
All OP_Destroy operations occur on the same btree
All Rights Reserved.
All SQL text past the last semicolon parsed
All UTFs use the same flag bit
All above except SYNCHRONOUS
All advertising materials mentioning features or use of this software must display the following acknowledgement:  This product includes software developed by Softweyr LLC, the University of California, Berkeley, and its contributors.
All advertising materials mentioning features or use of this software must display the following acknowledgement: This product includes software developed by the University of California, Berkeley and its contributors.
All arguments are complex addressing modes, and it is a binary operator.
All assertions used not to be repeatable, but this was changed for Perl compatibility.
All backends
All bits are set.
All blank field
All branches are non-empty
All branches in the assertion failed to match.
All but the final copy start a new nesting, maintaining the chain of brackets outstanding.
All can be handled by the same code.
All captured slots were filled in
All cells begin balanced
All centennial years are leap years in the Julian calendar.
All characters are checked against the other side.
All characters are stored.
All collating sequences
All colors within a histogram cell will be mapped to the same colormap entry, namely the one closest to the cell's center.
All conditions meet
All duplicates are adjacent
All elements are stored on a single doubly-linked list.
All enums used by the uchar APIs.
All fields above are zeroed when the cursor is allocated.
All filesystem writes are atomic
All foreign keys by referenced table name
All functions that may be used in uncaught exception handlers must be final and must not throw exceptions.
All information about this parse
All jumps have target.
All key sizes are valid
All keys are integers
All keys from this input segment have been transfered to the output.
All lists are dynamic.
All marker codes start with this
All matches found
All memory allocations sizes are rounded up to a power of 2.
All mutexes are required for schema access.
All nFrom paths at the previous level
All non-degenerate affine transforms are invertible.
All offsets for this column have been gathered.
All operations move the code pointer forward.
All optimizations
All other entries are added into either configuration_hash or active ini section array
All other licensing and usage conditions are those of the PHP Group.
All other types, encode as normal
All output needs to be distinct
All pages have been processed exactly once
All pages of the b-tree have been visited.
All phrases currently point to the same row.
All prior WhereLoops are order-distinct
All ram filesystem writes are atomic
All recursions were so wrapped in the past, but it no longer happens for non-repeated recursions.
All rights reserved.
All set, let's do it.
All space belongs to this allocation.
All states beyond this must be 'body' states.
All structure fields are set to zero before returning.
All subsequent molads can be calculated from this starting point by adding the length of a lunar cycle.
All symbols defined below should begin with yy or YY, to avoid infringing on user name space.
All table that pExpr might refer to
All tables in the FROM clause
All tables indexed by name
All that is required is a straight hash-lookup.
All the allocations succeeded.
All the encoding functions are set to NULL right now, since all the encoding is currently done internally by expat/xmltok.
All the operations are synchronous.
All the rest should always be initialized to zero
All threads share a single random number generator.
All triggers associated with a single table form a linked list, using the pNext member of struct Trigger.
All triggers indexed by name
All unixShm objects pointing to this
All we have to do here is incorporate our knowledge of the percentage of this pixel that is really "lit" by pushing the alpha value up toward transparency in edge regions.
All winShm objects pointing to this
All's well that ends well.
All-in-one: Since we use the JIT compiler only from here, we just include it.
Alloc a power of two greater or equal to nExpr
Allocate 'Fsnotify.events'
Allocate Floyd-Steinberg workspace if necessary.
Allocate Floyd-Steinberg workspace if we didn't already.
Allocate Floyd-Steinberg workspace.
Allocate a MultiSegReader for each token in the expression.
Allocate a VDBE
Allocate a bitvec to use to store the set of pages rolled back
Allocate a buffer in which to accumulate data
Allocate a buffer large enough for an Fts3Cursor structure.
Allocate a cursors for the main database table and for all indices.
Allocate a mutex
Allocate a new WhereLoop to add to the end of the list
Allocate a new page.
Allocate a page.
Allocate a thread local storage slot for the thread "stack"
Allocate additional space if needed
Allocate an instance of struct Wal to return.
Allocate and fill in the error_limiter table
Allocate and initialize the hash-table used to store tokenizers.
Allocate and populate the Fts3Table structure.
Allocate and populate the array of LcsIterator objects.
Allocate and populate the array to return.
Allocate and populate the context object.
Allocate and zero the storage for the quotient.
Allocate any page
Allocate buffers
Allocate cache slot to speed-up run-time class resolution
Allocate cursors for Current, Queue, and Distinct.
Allocate cursors numbers for Queue and Distinct.
Allocate directly 256 because it's easier to allocate a bit more than update max length even for text columns.
Allocate enough memory so that even if each character is quoted, we won't run out of room
Allocate exact page if possible
Allocate list cell
Allocate match sets array and initialize the values.
Allocate memory block
Allocate memory for it
Allocate memory for the destination buffer for normalization
Allocate memory for the ping
Allocate memory for the regex stack on the real machine stack.
Allocate nArg registers to martial the arguments to VUpdate.
Allocate or grow the PendingList as required.
Allocate readers for this expression
Allocate required output space
Allocate required registers.
Allocate sessionpool out of persistent memory
Allocate shared memory
Allocate space for a new decomposition.
Allocate space for a new sqlite3_backup object...
Allocate space for both the pJournal and pMaster file descriptors.
Allocate space for key
Allocate space for storing pointers to input arrays and sort flags.
Allocate space for the WalIterator object.
Allocate space for the cursor, filter and writer objects
Allocate space for the new multi-seg-iterator.
Allocate space for the new sqlite3_shm object.
Allocate space for the new unixShm object.
Allocate space for the output.
Allocate space for the previous row
Allocate space for the result objects.
Allocate space to hold the change in document sizes
Allocate stack for the callback, which grows the stack.
Allocate storage for the completed colormap, if required.
Allocate storage for the temporary storage mval.
Allocate temporary space used by the merge-sort routine.
Allocate temporary storage.
Allocate temporary working space.
Allocate that sorting index now.
Allocate the Fts5Bm25Data object
Allocate the Input buffer front-end.
Allocate the JPEG palette-storage
Allocate the Output buffer front-end.
Allocate the SegmentWriter structure
Allocate the TriggerPrg and SubProgram objects.
Allocate the array of TermOffset iterators.
Allocate the buffers used by this operation.
Allocate the buffers.
Allocate the destination buffer
Allocate the hash table if it has not already been allocated
Allocate the histogram/inverse colormap storage
Allocate the iterator
Allocate the new vtab object and parse the configuration
Allocate the output buffer --- it will be released when done with image
Allocate the parsing context
Allocate the pool handle
Allocate the result now as it is needed for the reading of metadata
Allocate the result set array
Allocate the space required for the Stat4Accum object
Allocate the sqlite data structure
Allocate the sqlite3_index_info structure
Allocate the sqlite3_vtab structure
Allocate the string memory.
Allocate thread-local storage slot for g.
Allocate workspace for box list
Allocated array
Allocated but not connected or there was failure when trying to connect with pre-allocated connect.
Allocated cursor
Allocated entries
Allocated index object
Allocated size for registers must be divisible by 8.
Allocated size of aVTrans
Allocated size of apCell, szCell, aFrom.
Allocated size of buffer z in bytes
Allocated size of zTerm buffer
Allocated space not yet assigned
Allocated stack size.
Allocates an ocaml value in the shared heap.
Allocates in the shared heap.
Allocates the necessary number of zval slots to keep the rope
Allocating stack, returns with PCRE_ERROR_JIT_STACKLIMIT if fails.
Allocation Manager
Allocation failed.
Allocation granularity on Windows is typically 64 KB.
Allocation inside RUNs implemented using linked list of free elements.
Allocation is valid
Allocation type code
Allow PHP 5.3 branch to be used in PECL for 5.x compatible builds
Allow digits after R to specify a specific group number.
Allow escaping of  ``relations''
Allow for transparency
Allow infinity precision
Allow text overrides
Allowed values for Column.colFlags:
Allowed values for sqlite3_userauth.authLevel
Almost the same as in php_fstat.
Almost the same as in php_if_fstat.
Alpha blending should result in compositing against red.
Alpha/Numeric Quoting
Already detected repeat.
Already know there are no Implicit Result Sets
Already set up
Already setup for this key.
Already thrown the error if VDBE alloc failed
Also NDIG must be reasonable smaller than NUM_BUF_SIZE.
Also an error
Also consider the unlikely of possibility of a write block
Also contains the offset of control head.
Also do block compression with an adaptive reset, whereby the code table is cleared when the compression ratio decreases, but after the table fills.
Also lowercases them.
Also move the environment to make additional room.
Also mutex, for redundancy
Also not an assert for the same reason
Also note that entries are collated in alphabetic order on key.
Also separate the UCP code, which can be the same for both UTF-8 and single-bytes.
Also sorry to break the enum principles here, BC...
Also the initial delay before the first retry.
Also update the corresponding structure record.
Also use trailing slash if this is absolute
Also we'd have to make that one argument passed by reference.
Also, N1 is assumed to be larger than N2.
Also, given xmlrpc-epi API/architecture, it's likely that we don't have a methodname for the response, so we have to check that.
Also, on reads, we may get this condition on an EOF.
Also, the beginning of a year varied from one culture to another - not all accepted January as the first month.
Also, this function is implemented using reference counting.
Also, today's epoch, 1 A.D.
Also, unset the offsets for the matched string.
Also, when compiling for Virtual Pascal, things are done differently, and global variables are not used.
Altered source versions must be plainly marked as such, and must not be misrepresented as being the original software.
Alternate addrEofA if B is uninitialized
Alternately, it could walk the entire vector, but that could be quite slow for very large lists.
Alternative data destination
Alternatively, if bExtend is true, extend the file.
Alternatively, if maximizing, find the maximum number of characters and work backwards.
Although libicu offers iterator functions, they are not used here: libicu does iterate irrespective of array indices.
Although pcre_internal.h does itself include pcre.h, we explicitly include it here before pcre_internal.h so that the PCRE_EXP_xxx macros get set appropriately for an application, not for building PCRE.
Although some clever things could be done here, "NOT IMM" does not worth the efforts.
Although the value is, strictly, in characters, we treat it as bytes to avoid spending too much time in this optimization.
Although this software can handle dates all the way back to 4713 B.C., such use may not be meaningful.
Although this software can handle dates all the way back to 4714 B.C., such use may not be meaningful.
Although we will cope with a later change in dither_mode, we do not promise to honor max_memory_to_use if dither_mode changes.
Always RTREE_GEOMETRY_MAGIC
Always a simple operation.
Always add a new error instead.
Always available.
Always exactly one alternative.
Always leave the database loaded
Always map the code to itself.
Always restore the mark setting
Always set in non-unicode case.
Always set the minlength value in the block, because the JIT compiler makes use of it.
Always set to avoid warning
Always successful.
Always the first entry
Always update the timestamp on the old file
Always uses one arg
Always zero histogram
Amount of contiguous space which would be required to satisfy the maximum stack demand to date.
Amount of payload held locally, not on overflow
Amount of space allocated in zText
Amount of usable space on each page
Amount to increment deferred counter by
Amount to pop the stack
An 'x' is allowed.
An ACCEPT is effectively an ALT.
An EBADF error means that the shared library has not opened the descriptor yet.
An FTS3_EVAL_XX constant
An FTS5_CONTENT value
An INDEXED BY clause specifies a particular index to use
An IPv6 enclosed by square brackets is a valid hostname
An OE_ code for handling a NOT NULL constraint
An ORDER BY or GROUP BY clause to resolve
An ORDER/GROUP BY clause of more than 63 terms cannot be optimized
An SQL statement being run
An SQL table corresponding to zName
An SQLITE_ status code is returned.
An SQLITE_MISUSE error occurred
An SQLITE_NOMEM error.
An additional grant of patent rights can be found in the PATENTS file in the same directory.
An additional method that can be provided by data source modules is the resync_to_restart method for error recovery in the presence of RST markers.
An array entry
An array has only index values.
An array of root pages numbers for individual trees
An array of sets of matches for each subpattern after a global match
An array to hold ranges for combining classes.
An ascii-range separator character.
An assertion fails if the two counts do not match.
An automatic index created by a PRIMARY KEY or UNIQUE constraint
An empty option name.
An engine for executing database bytecode
An entry in the input array
An ephemeral table
An error code is returned.
An error has occurred.
An error message
An error occurred.
An error occurs while attempting a rollback.
An exception was thrown in the lexer, don't throw another in the parser.
An exclusive process lock is held
An existing page in the cache
An exponent is allowed.
An exponent is not allowed until there has been at least one digit.
An expression being tested
An expression from the ORDER BY clause
An extension does not necessarily have a version number
An implied index of the table
An in-memory journal file should only ever be appended to.
An index associated with pTab
An index being inserted or updated
An index of zero will return a zero length string.
An index on pSrc
An index to being analyzed
An index we are evaluating
An input number that is greater than this value, if followed by a legal input character, is too big.
An instance of struct TriggerStep is used to store a single SQL statement that is a part of a trigger-program.
An integer primary key.
An internal node.
An internal query
An invalid journal file cannot be rolled back.
An non-ascii-range character.
An older segment is considered larger.
An open database
An operand of a comparison operator
An optimization.
An option value of 1 removes vertical space and 2 removes underscore.
An ordinary table or view name in the FROM clause
An oversized q is possible when quorem is called from bigcomp and
An sp-back edge: mark as irreducible.
An unrecognized directive.
An unused file descriptor
Analyze all of the subexpressions.
Analyze the right-child page of internal pages
And XOR with the next 8 characters of the key.
And a length of the server scramble in one byte
And add it to the output array
And an in-memory journal.
And carry flag as well.
And if we were originally supposed to be blocking, let's reset the socket to that.
And many do not understand the "LL" notation.
And never try to change the state of exceptions and never implement anything that gives the user anything to accomplish this.
And now, just to make sure things don't run too fast.
And of course this will affect backup programs
And other similarly odd results.
And since it can be determined whether the year is a leap year by simple division, the lengths of Adar I and II can be easily calculated.
And so forth.
And so on up the tree.
And swap arguments.
And that the final byte of the doclist is 0x00.
And the BLOB type is first.
And the array itself.
And the masses rejoiced.
And to delete index entries
And vice-versa.
And we add the strings at the end.
And we apply the position
And we recursively call the layout algorithm for this child
And what is supposed to go as user interaction, error log, etc.
And when running a test binary via adb shell, it's easy to miss logcat.
And, ensure that the referenced method is resolvable, too.
And, even if it is not, it should not be too much slower.
Android-L and M bionic's pthread implementation differ significantly, and can change any time.
Angle in radians
Annex B.2 of ISO 8601 gives examples where the decimal fractions are not preceded by a "0".
Another SELECT immediately to our left
Another branch follows.
Another recently proposed change in the leap year rule is to make years that are multiples of 4000 not a leap year, but this has never been officially accepted and this rule is not implemented in these algorithms.
Answer will not fit into single packet
Any changes made to the database are reverted by SQLite.
Any decent C compiler will add the constants at compile
Any deferred constraint violations have now been resolved.
Any existing mapping is discarded.
Any kind of inner or cross join
Any more and we start to sacrifice performance.
Any number of callbacks may be registered at any time.
Any of the WHERE_COLUMN_xxx values
Any other return is an error.
Any other return is either a match, or some kind of error.
Any reqchar setting must remain unchanged after any kind of repeat.
Any return code other than NOMATCH is an error.
Any unrecognized conversion type
Any value greater than 1 indicates that there is more than one character.
Anything before the first 0x01 is col 0
Anything else counts 1
Anything else does not or need not match a character.
Anything else is an error
Anything else is just an item with no data, but possibly a flag.
Anything else is variable length
Anything other than NOMATCH causes the entire assertion to fail, passing back the return code.
Anything other than NOMATCH is passed back.
Anyway, we don't have that state info, thus we use Response as a heuristic.
Apache will generate REDIRECT_STATUS, Netscape and redirect.so will generate HTTP_REDIRECT_STATUS.
Apache will load, unload and then reload a DSO module.
Apparently invariant, left over from compress
Apparently, implementations are supposed to know the type of action based on state, which strikes me as a bit lame.
Append JSON content here
Append N bytes from zIn onto the end of the JsonString string.
Append NULL to the end of the string
Append a new column value, if necessary
Append a single character
Append a term to the output segment.
Append cells to the end of the page
Append content to the JSON parse
Append data to the wal-index.
Append iDelta
Append length in bits and transform
Append nodes to complete path if not NULL
Append position iPos to the output
Append the current configuration cookie
Append the current string
Append the data to the string buffer.
Append the name of the path for element i to pStr
Append the new position offset
Append the new serialized varint to the end of the list.
Append the node to this object
Append the pgidx to the page buffer.
Append the position lists
Append the position-list data to the output
Append the prefix-compressed term and doclist to the buffer.
Append the rest of the pattern
Append the rest of the pattern after the closing brace
Append the result to the return value.
Append the rowid to the output
Append the table key to the end of the index.
Append the varints
Append to this JSON string
Append to this SrcList.
Append to this buffer
Append version, passes, digest length, and message length
Appends any supported element to the end of the collection
Apple Roman
Apple Unicode
Apply locks to this open shared-memory segment
Apply rule 1 after the others because it can cause an additional delay of one day.
Apply rules 2, 3 and 4.
Apply the requested affinity to all inputs
Apply trans sid if sid cookie is not set
Applying the inverted matrix will restore the original values.
Appropriate locking method
Approximate number of tokens in snippet
Arch dependent
Architectures which can shift addresses left by 2 bits with no extra cost
Architectures with no complicated addressing modes supported
Area memory mapped
Args are in reverse order
Argument checking features.
Argument count
Argument extraction and printing.
Argument is forbidden
Argument is mandatory
Argument parsing API -- andrei
Argument passed to comparison function
Argument set
Argument to SQLITE_FCNTL_PRAGMA
Argument to parse
Argument to pass to function
Argument to pass to xBusyHandler
Argument to pass to xNotify
Argument to profile function
Argument to the function
Argument to the progress callback
Argument to the thread
Argument to the trace function
Argument to xStress
Argument to xTask
Argument to xUnlockNotify
Argument token
Argument:   the error number Returns:    pointer to the error string
Argument: pointer to the compile data block Returns:  0 if all went well, else an error number
Argument: ptrptr         points to the pattern position pointer negptr         points to a boolean that is set TRUE for negation else FALSE ptypeptr       points to an unsigned int that is set to the type value pdataptr       points to an unsigned int that is set to the detailed property value errorcodeptr   points to the error code variable Returns:         TRUE if the type value was found, or FALSE for an invalid type
Argument: the address of the base frame Returns:  nothing
Arguments are in their appropriate registers.
Arguments are not checked.
Arguments are swapped.
Arguments for SQLITE_PRINTF_SQLFUNC
Arguments for printf format string
Arguments for the indexing scheme
Arguments of yyformat.
Arguments to agg function
Arguments to currently executing user function
Arguments to rank function
Arguments to table-valued-function
Arguments to the format string
Arguments to the unlock callback
Arguments to userland function
Arguments:   none Returns:     pointer to the contiguous block of data
Arguments:  c opcode Returns:    base opcode for the type
Arguments: argument_re      points to compiled code extra_data       points extra data, or NULL what             what information is required where            where to put the information Returns:           0 if data returned, negative on error
Arguments: c           the character data        points to the flag byte of the XCLASS data Returns:      TRUE if character matches, else FALSE
Arguments: cd           the compile data block name         the name to add length       the length of the name groupno      the group number Returns:       nothing
Arguments: code           current code pointer ptr            current pattern pointer cd             pointers to tables etc Returns:         new code pointer
Arguments: code         pointer to the start of the group skipassert   TRUE if certain assertions are to be skipped Returns:       pointer to the first significant opcode
Arguments: code         the compiled regex stringname   the name of the capturing substring ovector      the vector of matched substrings Returns:       the number of the first that is set, or the number of the last one if none are set, or a negative number on error
Arguments: code        points to start of expression utf         TRUE in UTF-8 / UTF-16 / UTF-32 mode Returns:      pointer to the opcode for OP_RECURSE, or NULL if not found
Arguments: code        points to start of expression utf         TRUE in UTF-8 / UTF-16 / UTF-32 mode number      the required bracket number or negative to find a lookbehind Returns:      pointer to the opcode for the bracket, or NULL if not found
Arguments: code        points to start of search endcode     points to where to stop utf         TRUE if in UTF-8 / UTF-16 / UTF-32 mode cd          contains pointers to tables etc.
Arguments: code        points to the byte code utf         TRUE in UTF-8 / UTF-16 / UTF-32 mode cd          static compile data base_list   the data list of the base opcode Returns:      TRUE if the auto-possessification is possible
Arguments: cvalue     the character value buffer     pointer to buffer for result - at least 6 pcre_uchars long Returns:     number of characters placed in the buffer
Arguments: group      points to the start of the group adjust     the amount by which the group is to be moved utf        TRUE in UTF-8 / UTF-16 / UTF-32 mode cd         contains pointers to tables etc.
Arguments: optionsptr        pointer to the option bits codeptr           points to the pointer to the current code point ptrptr            points to the current pattern pointer errorcodeptr      points to error code variable firstcharptr      place to put the first required character firstcharflagsptr place to put the first character flags, or a negative number reqcharptr        place to put the last required character reqcharflagsptr   place to put the last required character flags, or a negative number bcptr             points to current branch chain cond_depth        conditional nesting depth cd                contains pointers to tables etc.
Arguments: preg        points to a structure for recording the compiled expression pattern     the pattern to compile cflags      compilation flags Returns:      0 on success various non-zero codes on failure
Arguments: previous_callout   points to previous callout item ptr                current pattern pointer cd                 pointers to tables etc Returns:             nothing
Arguments: ptr          pointer to possible newline type         the newline type endptr       pointer to the end of the string lenptr       where to return the length utf          TRUE if in utf mode Returns:       TRUE or FALSE
Arguments: ptr          pointer to possible newline type         the newline type startptr     pointer to the start of the string lenptr       where to return the length utf          TRUE if in utf mode Returns:       TRUE or FALSE
Arguments: ptr        points to the first letter len        the length of the name Returns:     a value representing the name, or -1 if unknown
Arguments: start_bits    points to the bit map p             points to the character caseless      the caseless flag cd            the block with char table pointers utf           TRUE for UTF-8 / UTF-16 / UTF-32 mode Returns:        pointer after the character
Arguments: what             what information is required where            where to put the information Returns:           0 if data returned, negative on error
Arm v7 specific instructions.
Arne Jorgensen.
Arrange for convenient computation of quotients: shift left if necessary so divisor has 4 leading 0 bits.
Arranging for additional bytes to be discarded before reloading the input buffer is the application writer's problem.
Array element to populate
Array encode
Array encode/decode
Array for holding numbers.
Array for named subpatterns
Array for subpatterns
Array index starts from 0
Array indicating modified columns
Array of "seen instance" flags
Array of Fts3SegReader objects
Array of Fts5DlidxWriter objects
Array of OP_Once flags for parent frame
Array of PmaReaders to merge data from
Array of SegReader objects
Array of Vdbe cursors for parent frame
Array of WHEN terms
Array of WhereLoop objects implementing this path
Array of active savepoints
Array of all phrases
Array of arguments
Array of arguments for Fts5Config
Array of cell sizes
Array of cells
Array of cells and sizes
Array of characters to make exceptions
Array of child nodes
Array of collation sequence names for index
Array of column names
Array of column names for fts3 table
Array of expression tokens and costs
Array of flags, set on NOT NULL columns
Array of flags, set on target PK columns
Array of hash slots
Array of indexes for this table
Array of integers that becomes the BLOB
Array of jump instruction addresses
Array of mapped shared-memory regions
Array of marks for PREG_PATTERN_ORDER
Array of memory cells for parent frame
Array of mxSample Stat4Sample objects
Array of nArg CREATE VIRTUAL TABLE args
Array of nCol best samples
Array of nLevel level objects
Array of nodes containing the parse
Array of objects.
Array of offset to rowid fields
Array of opcodes for sub-program
Array of overflow page numbers
Array of page numbers.
Array of parsed cells
Array of phrase freq.
Array of phrase pointers
Array of registers where record is assembled
Array of remaining idx values
Array of replacement values
Array of rootpage numbers for tables to be checked
Array of segment iterators
Array of segments.
Array of shared library handles
Array of size nPhrase
Array of sub-lists
Array of sub-vdbes
Array of subpattern offsets
Array of subprograms
Array of tables to search
Array of target column types
Array of term hash entries to scan
Array of trailing arguments
Array of unquoted target column names
Array of values to insert
Array to populate
Array to sort entries of
Array used to calculate phrase freq.
Array used to collect a decomposition before adding it to the decomposition table.
Array used to collect case mappings before adding them to a list.
ArrayAccess
ArrayIterator specific
ArrayObject specific
Arrays as well as tables can however be accessed by numerical index, with table keys readable ex post.
Arrays to hold the mapping of codes to numbers.
Arrival here can only mean there is something seriously wrong in the code above or the OP_xxx definitions.
As Firebird and InterBase are developed independently, functionality might be different between the two branches in future versions.
As PCRE1 is now in maintenance only mode, we finesse the bug by allowing more memory always.
As PHP strings have length inside, this function makes not much sense in the context of PHP, to be called as separate function.
As a contributor, you agree to allow your code to be used under both.
As a last resort, return a non-persistent connection.
As a result, only the day number of the start of the year is required.
As a result, the call to xUndo may not fail.
As a result, we need to allocate our own TLS space while preserving the existing TCB that has been setup via librthread.
As a sanity check when loading from a file
As a special exception, you may create a larger work that contains part or all of the Bison parser skeleton and distribute that work under terms of your choice, so long as that work isn't itself a parser generator using the skeleton or a modified version thereof as a parser skeleton.
As a user of this code you may choose to use it under either license.
As a varint.
As all the PCRE_ERROR_xxx values are negative, we can use 0 and 1.
As an optimization, omit trailing SQLITE_AFF_BLOB affinities.
As before, show substrings stored in the output vector by number, and then also any named substrings.
As disgusting as on the darwin/386, darwin/amd64.
As in "NEAR/nNear".
As it happens, the "NOT" versions of these opcodes are used at present only for ASCII characters, so they could be omitted from this list.
As it happens, the pending terms table is always empty here.
As it is passed to us, we should not clean it ourselves.
As long as it's the case, it's just the constant limit.
As long as you retain this notice you can do whatever you want with this stuff.
As of curl 7.11.1 this is no longer defined inside curl.h
As per the RFC, automatically redirected requests MUST NOT use other methods than GET and HEAD unless it can be confirmed by the user
As said, precision could be lost.
As some of the text is of unknown length, we can't use a table of offsets.
As the PDO emulation does not return it, we skip it as well
As the bits take less space in the protocol than the numbers they represent, we don't have enough space in the packet buffer to overwrite inside.
As the buffers have been freed, we should go back to PREPARED
As the code stands, it will do the right thing for R,G,B and B,G,R orders.
As the tile image can contain the same color as the color to fill.
As there is only one, we can use tail recursion to avoid using another stack frame, except when there is unlimited repeat of a possibly empty group.
As these are otherwise illegal sequences, we don't break anything by recognizing them.
As they come as bit mask, we have to convert it to human-readable representation.
As time goes by, we may be able to get more clever at doing this.
As we don't have a list of which groups are referenced, we cannot do this selectively.
Ascii for "J"
Ascii value 4 is actually EOT character which is not defined anywhere in the LibC or else we can use instead of hardcoded 4.
Ask for everything
Assembled sorter record
Assert captures then.
Assert is failed.
Assert is successful.
Assert that P3 is a valid memory cell.
Assert that operands are never NULL
Assert that the caller has been consistent.
Assert that the caller has opened the required transaction.
Assert that the p1 parameter is valid.
Assert that the upper layer has set one of the "file-type" flags.
AssertNot is successful.
Assertion brackets.
Assertion expected
Assertion failure occures if an invalid argument is passed.
Assign a bit from the bitmask to every term in the FROM clause.
Assign a cost of 1.0.
Assign argvIndex values to each constraint in use.
Assign cursor numbers to the table and all its indices.
Assign the digits.
Assign the next variable number
Assign the number and clean up.
Assign the value.
Assign to prod and clean up the number.
Assigned value is never used
Assigning to YYVAL unconditionally makes the parser a bit smaller, and it avoids a GCC warning that YYVAL may be used uninitialized.
Associated FTS5 index
Associated database connection
Associated database handle
Assume 32-bit assignment is atomic
Assume an indexed expression can always yield a NULL
Assume content-length 0 - read the next
Assume largest possible
Assume max 6 digits
Assume single column records only
Assume some uncommitted DML occurred
Assume the stream is temporarily or permanently out of data
Assume they want to commit whatever is outstanding
Assumed in this encoding, mb-trail bytes don't mix with single bytes.
Assumed sector size during rollback
Assumes len is a multiple of 4.
Assumes len is a multiple of 8.
Assumes that the DLL will not be found
Assumes valid UTF-8 for PCRE_UTF8.
Assumption: PSIZE is a power of 2.
Assumptions: Chars are 8 bits long.
Astronomical functions
At EOF already
At EOF, write the rest of the buffer.
At any parenthesis level, the length value can be used to test if anything has been compiled at that level.
At compile time, the class is simply eliminated.
At least 1 color must be allocated
At least by Perl 5.18 this changed so as not to insert the binary zero.
At least confirmed for: OSF1 V4.0 878
At least for glibc6.1
At least in 5.1.15 and 5.1.14, 5.1.11 is immune.
At least one character must be matched from this opcode.
At least one non-EOL character following, so don't need to encode ws.
At least one portion of this open_basedir is less restrictive than the prior one, FAIL
At least one single char sets the bit and stops
At least this one VM is active
At least three characters are required.
At most siz-1 characters will be copied.
At one point this code was not commented out.
At present, PCRE supports only NLTYPE_FIXED, which gets handled without these functions, NLTYPE_ANYCRLF, and NLTYPE_ANY.
At present, just one of these tables is actually needed.
At start of char run
At the end of compiling, code is still pointing to the start of the group, while tempcode has been updated to point past the end of the group.
At the end the chain is reversed.
At the end we or the result into the bit map that is being built.
At the moment the pointer size is always equal to sljit_sw.
At the moment, I am unsure.
At the moment, the size of pcre_study_data is fixed.
At the moment, we just drop it on the floor
At the outermost level, this function fails unless the result is SSB_DONE.
At the start of the loop, c contains the first byte of the character.
At this point all signals are blocked, so there is no race.
At this point argc can only be between 6 and PS_NUM_APIS
At this point curN contains the 7/16 error value to be propagated to the next pixel on the current line, and all the errors for the next line have been shifted over.
At this point pParent may have at most one overflow cell.
At this point there should not be a Go signal handler installed for SIGIO.
At this point this is probably a keyword.
At this point we can freely use all registers.
At this point we can freely use all temporary registers.
At this point we have only arcs that lies within a quadrant - map this to first quadrant...
At this point we have the character's bytes in mcbuffer, and the length in mclength.
At this point we know the final size and margin of the element.
At this point we know the final size of the element in the main dimension
At this point, "diff" is zero iff the correct and buggy algorithms produced exactly the same result.
At this point, pWLoop is a candidate to be the next loop.
At this point, rrc will be one of MATCH_ONCE or MATCH_NOMATCH.
At this point, the return is converted into MATCH_NOMATCH so that previous backup points can be taken.
At this point, we will need additional characters from the string to proceed.
At this point, we're done if there is not more HDF name space to traverse
Atomic brackets
Atomic groups
Atomic sub-patterns and assertions can always auto-possessify their last iterator.
Attach the explanation to this Vdbe
Attach the hook to this database
Attach the hook to this db handle
Attach the temporary database as 'vacuum_db'.
Attempt the match
Attempt to allocate enough memory to hold all of the arguments and a trailing NULL
Attempt to delete the file
Attempt to extend file to this size
Attempt to leave results in this register
Attempt to locate an existing hash entry
Attempt to omit tables from the join that do not effect the result
Attempt to store the results in register "target".
Attempt to write a readonly database
Attribute with no content in it's text node
Auth callback return code
Authenticated as a normal user
Authenticated as an administrator
Authentication Switch Response
Authentication not yet checked
Author/Date:  jcar 20/9/96 History:
Author: CJH
Authorization context
Authorization denied
Authorization to use the function
Authorize the subquery
Automatic indexes
Automatically detect SLJIT_MIPS_R1
Automatically expire on reset
Automatically generated.
Aux data pointer
Auxiliary data storage
Auxiliary database format error
Auxiliary functions needed by objects of 'Collator' class
Auxiliary functions needed by objects of 'IntlDateFormatter' class
Auxiliary functions needed by objects of 'MessageFormatter' class
Auxiliary functions needed by objects of 'NumberFormatter' class
Auxiliary functions needed by objects of 'Spoofchecker' class
Auxiliary functions needed by objects of 'Transliterator' class
Available backtrace slots
Available by default.
Available memory locations begin here
Available since 7.10.6
Available since 7.10.7
Available since 7.10.8
Available since 7.11.0
Available since 7.11.2
Available since 7.12.0
Available since 7.12.2
Available since 7.12.3
Available since 7.13.0
Available since 7.14.1
Available since 7.15.0
Available since 7.15.1
Available since 7.15.2
Available since 7.15.3
Available since 7.15.4
Available since 7.15.5
Available since 7.16.0
Available since 7.16.1
Available since 7.16.2
Available since 7.16.3
Available since 7.16.4
Available since 7.17.0
Available since 7.17.1
Available since 7.18.0
Available since 7.18.2
Available since 7.19.0
Available since 7.19.1
Available since 7.19.3
Available since 7.19.4
Available since 7.19.6
Available since 7.20.0
Available since 7.21.0
Available since 7.21.2
Available since 7.21.3
Available since 7.21.4
Available since 7.21.6
Available since 7.22.0
Available since 7.24.0
Available since 7.25.0
Available since 7.25.1
Available since 7.28.0
Available since 7.30.0
Available since 7.31.0
Available since 7.32.1
Available since 7.33.0
Available since 7.34.0
Available since 7.36.0
Available since 7.37.0
Available since 7.38.0
Available since 7.39.0
Available since 7.40.0
Available since 7.41.0
Available since 7.42.0
Available since 7.43.0
Available since 7.44.0
Available since 7.45.0
Available since 7.46.0
Available since 7.47.0
Available since 7.48.0
Available since 7.49.0
Average nEq values for keys not in aSample
Average number of tokens in each row
Average size of database rows, in pages
Avoid compiler warning
Avoid confusion from exponents so large that e might overflow.
Avoid const warning with old versions
Avoid failure state as much as possible.
Avoid leaking memory if malloc has failed.
Avoid memory leak when malloc fails
Avoid soft deadlock: do not read if there is nothing to read from sockets and pipes.
Avoid sprintf, as that infringes on the user's name space.
Avoid this problem by forcing a call to malloc here, before we ever call malloc.
Avoid_Underflow
B instructions.
B-Tree Database
B67 also points to the stack segment linkage control area, which is what we are really interested in.
BC behavior
BC for clever users - Deprecate me
BC with older php scripts and zlib wrapper
BEGIN difference between normal normal fetch and _c
BEGINNING OF THE SMALL OBJECTS PAGE We keep all the small objects in this page.
BEL BS HT LF VT FF CR
BELOW: Height enforcement off
BETWEENOTNULLIKECASCADELETECASECOLLATECREATECURRENT_DATEDETACH
BIG NOTE : THIS EMITS AN COMPILATION WARNING UNDER ZE2 - handle_function_call deprecated.
BIT fields are specially handled.
BLOB returned by geometry function
BRAPOSZERO occurs before a possessive bracket group.
BRAZERO does the bracket, but carries on.
BRAZERO, BRAMINZERO and SKIPZERO occur just before a bracket group, indicating that it may occur zero times.
BS2000 has only a few fields in the rusage struct
BS2000 uses the EBCDIC char set instead of ASCII
BSD-derived systems set errno correctly Solaris returns -1 from getsockopt in case of error
BTALLOC_EXACT, BTALLOC_LT, or BTALLOC_ANY
BTree containing table to open
BUG: currently, this only prints something if there is a value...
BUG: if user is running in silent mode and hits an error at the driver level when they use the PDO methods to call up the error information, they may get bogus information
BUG: should also map here accented letters used in non
BUG: we determine request or response type using presence of "Response" in element name.
BUGS - horribly slow lookups.
BUGS Currently does little or no validation of xml.
BUGS There is currently no way to cleanup the global server gracefully.
BUGS there must be some.
BUT, to get into this branch of code, the name is too long, so we don't care.
BYTES READ: 12
BYTES READ: 3
BYTES READ: 4
BZip2 Resource Pointer
Back out changes but do no rollback transaction
Back pointer of the same list
Back the buffer up
Background color.
Background thread, if any
Backing up through an atomic group
Backreference number
Backreferences and subroutine calls are treated in the same way: we find the minimum length for the subpattern.
Backslash may introduce a single character, or it may introduce one of the specials, which just set a flag.
Backtrack path: match failed.
Backtrack path: match is required.
Backup executor globals
Backup handle
Backup process error code
Backup to previous group
Backward/Forward bit is fixed
Bad UTF-8 sequences are converted to valid Tcl_UniChars and processing continues.
Bad character set, but the user wants us to press on.
Bad compressed data stream
Bad connection - remove from pool
Bad_float_h
Bail if the queue is empty or if we are already playing the queue
Bail out early in this case.
Bail out if an unexpected error occurred.
Bail out if it's not an object.
Bail out if we can't recover
Balance the tree.
Base 10 only.
Base class - must be first
Base class used by SQLite core
Base class.
Base cursor number
Base reg of Mod R/M is literal 0x00
Base reg of Mod R/M is literal 0x01
Base register
Base register for data coming from SELECT
Base register holding constraint values
Base register of data during check constraints
Base register where results are written
Base64 is useful for transferring binary data, such as an image.
Based on "Hacker's Delight"
Based on GD.pm code by Lincoln Stein for interfacing to libgd.
Based on IANA registry at the time of writing this code
Based on IANA registry at the time of writing this code This array lists the preferred values for the grandfathered tags if applicable This is in sync with the array LOC_GRANDFATHERED e.g. the offsets of the grandfathered tags match the offset of the preferred  value
Based on ext/standard/image.c
Based on netpbm fixes by Alan Cox.
Based on the public domain algorithm found at http://www.isthe.com/chongo/tech/comp/fnv/index.html
Basic codeunit error handling
Basic ripemd function
Basically the ocaml headers and the mac headers are redefining the same types.
Basically, the class is instantiable.
Be compatible with libmysql.
Because IPK never has AFF_TEXT
Because RSA_PKCS1_OAEP_PADDING is used there is a restriction on the passwd_len.
Because converting to double and back to long can lead to losing precision we need second variable.
Because it has already been copied.
Because of OP_RECURSE, the data are not necessarly known in compile time, thus we need a dynamic restore mechanism.
Because of the reference counting the user can't delete the strings the variables point to.
Because of the way auto-callout works during compile, a callout item is inserted between OP_COND and an assertion condition.
Because only the bound variables can point to our internal buffers, then separate or free only them.
Because someone thought this was a good place to put timeval.
Because the sets are unaligned, we need to perform byte comparison here.
Because this intermediate value only needs 36 to 37 bits and the other numbers are constants, the process has been reduced to just a few steps.
Because we are moving code along, we must ensure that any pending recursive references are updated.
Because we can use one of the bytes of the length after we shifted as NUL termination.
Before OP_ACCEPT there may be any number of OP_CLOSE opcodes, to close any currently open capturing brackets.
Before PCRE 8.34, we had to preserve the VT bit if it was previously set by something earlier in the character class.
Before checking for a possessive quantifier, we must skip over whitespace and comments in extended mode because Perl allows white space at this point.
Before doing so, we have to insert the character for the previous code.
Before it is called, the partially compiled regex must be temporarily terminated with OP_END.
Before populating the accumulator registers, clear the column cache.
Before running the loop, check for UTF-8 and whether CRLF is a valid newline sequence.
Before we can access the substrings, we must extract the table for translating names to numbers, and the size of each entry in the table.
Begin a loop that will extract all source rows in GROUP BY order.
Begin a transaction and increment the schema cookie.
Begin a transaction for database iDb.
Begin aggregate queries without GROUP BY:
Begin file alter.c
Begin file analyze.c
Begin file attach.c
Begin file auth.c
Begin file backup.c
Begin file bitvec.c
Begin file btmutex.c
Begin file btree.c
Begin file btree.h
Begin file btreeInt.h
Begin file build.c
Begin file callback.c
Begin file complete.c
Begin file ctime.c
Begin file date.c
Begin file dbstat.c
Begin file delete.c
Begin file expr.c
Begin file fault.c
Begin file fkey.c
Begin file fts3.c
Begin file fts3.h
Begin file fts3Int.h
Begin file fts3_aux.c
Begin file fts3_expr.c
Begin file fts3_hash.c
Begin file fts3_hash.h
Begin file fts3_icu.c
Begin file fts3_porter.c
Begin file fts3_snippet.c
Begin file fts3_tokenize_vtab.c
Begin file fts3_tokenizer.c
Begin file fts3_tokenizer.h
Begin file fts3_tokenizer1.c
Begin file fts3_unicode.c
Begin file fts3_unicode2.c
Begin file fts3_write.c
Begin file fts5.c
Begin file func.c
Begin file global.c
Begin file hash.c
Begin file hash.h
Begin file hwtime.h
Begin file icu.c
Begin file insert.c
Begin file journal.c
Begin file json1.c
Begin file keywordhash.h
Begin file legacy.c
Begin file loadext.c
Begin file main.c
Begin file malloc.c
Begin file mem0.c
Begin file mem1.c
Begin file mem2.c
Begin file mem3.c
Begin file mem5.c
Begin file memjournal.c
Begin file msvc.h
Begin file mutex.c
Begin file mutex.h
Begin file mutex_noop.c
Begin file mutex_unix.c
Begin file mutex_w32.c
Begin file notify.c
Begin file opcodes.c
Begin file opcodes.h
Begin file os.c
Begin file os.h
Begin file os_common.h
Begin file os_setup.h
Begin file os_unix.c
Begin file os_win.c
Begin file os_win.h
Begin file pager.c
Begin file pager.h
Begin file parse.c
Begin file parse.h
Begin file pcache.c
Begin file pcache.h
Begin file pcache1.c
Begin file pragma.c
Begin file pragma.h
Begin file prepare.c
Begin file printf.c
Begin file random.c
Begin file resolve.c
Begin file rowset.c
Begin file rtree.c
Begin file rtree.h
Begin file select.c
Begin file sqlite3.h
Begin file sqlite3ext.h
Begin file sqlite3rbu.c
Begin file sqlite3rbu.h
Begin file sqliteInt.h
Begin file sqliteLimit.h
Begin file sqliteicu.h
Begin file status.c
Begin file table.c
Begin file threads.c
Begin file tokenize.c
Begin file treeview.c
Begin file trigger.c
Begin file update.c
Begin file utf.c
Begin file util.c
Begin file vacuum.c
Begin file vdbe.c
Begin file vdbe.h
Begin file vdbeInt.h
Begin file vdbeapi.c
Begin file vdbeaux.c
Begin file vdbeblob.c
Begin file vdbemem.c
Begin file vdbesort.c
Begin file vdbetrace.c
Begin file vtab.c
Begin file vxworks.h
Begin file wal.c
Begin file wal.h
Begin file walker.c
Begin file where.c
Begin file whereInt.h
Begin file wherecode.c
Begin file whereexpr.c
Begin filters function
Begin generating code.
Begin reading at this offset
Begin reading this far into payload
Begin rotate function
Begin scanning through hash table entries.
Begin scannning through the ephemeral table.
Begin the database scan
Begin the database scan.
Begin the search at this node
Begin with this column of pList
Begin writing at this offset into the file
Beginning here are the reduction cases.
Beginning in 2.0.12 truecolor is indicated by the initial 2-byte signature.
Beginning of shared memory
Beginning of the body of this loop
Beginning of the header.
Begins a ripemd128 operation, writing a new context.
Begins a ripemd160 operation, writing a new context.
Begins a ripemd256 operation, writing a new context.
Begins a ripemd320 operation, writing a new context.
Begins an MD4 operation, writing a new context.
Begins an MD5 operation, writing a new context.
Begins an SHA1 operation, writing a new context.
Begins an SHA224 operation, writing a new context.
Begins an SHA256 operation, writing a new context.
Begins an SHA384 operation, writing a new context.
Begins an SHA512 operation, writing a new context.
Behave like without the Accelerator
Behavioral bits.
Bell filter, default radius 1.5
Best case scenario, user behaved
Best choice for natural merge cut-off.
Best index found so far
Best match found so far
Best score of columns checked so far
Best snippet score found so far
Best to avoid the whole thing.
Best-Fit Search
Beware of this difference.
Beware that SHOW statements bypass the PS framework and thus they send no metadata at prepare.
Beware, if the data has been truncated, the final CR could have been followed by a LF.
Bias search to the high end
Big 5 mapping: use "JIS-8 half-width katakana" coding from 8-bit characters.
Big-endian salt values
BilinearFixed, BicubicFixed and nearest implementations are rewamped versions of the implementation in CBitmapEx http://www.codeproject.com/Articles/29121/CBitmapEx-Free-C-Bitmap-Manipulation-Class Integer only implementation, good to have for common usages like pre scale very large images before using another interpolation methods for the last step.
Binary operations
Binary operator
Binary representation of iNew
Binary search bounds
Bind object
Bind the current output segment id to the index-writer.
Bind the rbu_rowid value to column _rowid_
Bind the stream to a local address
Bind to a local IP address.
Binding to these vars invalidates VM
Bison version.
Bit Field Type
Bit values for PgHdr.flags
Bit values for the JsonNode.jnFlag field
Bitmap of additional columns
Bitmap of columns used for indexing
Bitmap representation
Bitmask identifying table iTab
Bitmask of FROM clause terms referenced by pExpr
Bitmask of all WhereLoop objects in this path
Bitmask of all indexable tables in the clause
Bitmask of other loops that must run first
Bitmask of phrases already covered
Bitmask of phrases covered by snippet
Bitmask of schema verified databases
Bitmask of tables referenced by pExpr
Bits are numbered starting with 1.
Bits for 0xc4 - 0xc8
Bits for 0xc9 - 0xff
Bitvec of pages already played back
Bitvec to ensure pages played back only once
Bizarre case
Blob value for "root" field
Block "to" now defines "var" via the pi statement, so add it to the "def" set.
Block SIGIO in this thread to make it more likely that it will be delivered to a goroutine.
Block all signals to the exception handler thread
Block containing newline information
Block id for new block
Block id of child node to descend to
Block id of first leaf node
Block number of first allocated block
Block number of last allocated block
Block size for compression algorithm
Block size: 0 - The block is a free_block, with a different size member.
Blockmode cipher
Blocks allocated for leaf nodes
Bonus points if the text encoding matches
Boolean constants
Boolean operators
Boolean parameters.
Boolean properties.
Borrowed from SYS/SOCKET.H
Both II and III resolve hash collisions via linear probing.
Both X and Y have COLLATE operators.
Both are UTF16, but with different byte orders
Both are immediates.
Both arguments are registers.
Both ascending and descending are possible.
Both calls and BPr instructions shall not pass this point.
Both cannot be switched on.
Both data and keys are compared by using user-supplied callbacks.
Both for OP_COND, OP_SCOND.
Both for ppc-32 and ppc-64.
Both formats are cool
Both of these can be found by considering only the corners of the box.
Both or neither are NULL
Both parameters are optional.
Both sides of the comparison are columns.
Both size flags cannot be switched on.
Both tRNS and true alpha are supported.
Both tables must have the same INTEGER PRIMARY KEY
Both the request and the response may consist of arbitrarily long, arbitrarily nested values.
Both values must be blobs.
Both values overflowed and have the same sign, so a numeric comparison would be inaccurate
Bottom of the rowid change constraint check
Bounce call to sigpanic through asm that makes it look like we call sigpanic directly from the faulting code.
Bounding box coordinates
Bounding box for pNode
Bounds of global page cache memory
Bounds of source pixels window
Boutell almost a simple global replace from T.
Boxes themselves can be contained within "super-boxes".
Braced expressions count 0
Braces are required because the
Brackets should always be closed
Brackets with fixed upper repeat limits are compiled as a number of copies, with the optional ones preceded by BRAZERO or BRAMINZERO.
Branch instructions are expesive for all CPUs, so we avoid taken branches on the matching path.
Branch to ARM code is not optimized yet.
Branch to Thumb code has not been optimized yet.
Brand new connection: Init and update the next_ping in the connection
Break intentionally missing
Break out of alternation loop
Break out of for loop
Break out when the end-tag is found
Break the loop
Break the loop if the pattern is anchored or if we have passed the end of the subject.
Breakup of pTerm into subterms
Brigades will dispose of their buckets
Bring in standard I/O and string manipulation functions
Bring in the gd library functions
Bring it back
Bringing initial option settings outside can help speed up starting point checks.
Brush image
Btree cursor used for pIndex
Btree cursor used for pTab
Btree database to read cookie from
Btree handle holding this lock
Btree page of current entry
Btree this cursor belongs to
Btree to change journal mode of
Btree with currently open write transaction
Buffer containing current poslist
Buffer containing leaf data
Buffer containing next term
Buffer containing page data
Buffer containing page-index
Buffer containing position list
Buffer containing poslist
Buffer containing prefix to match
Buffer containing previous term
Buffer containing previous term on page
Buffer containing previous term written
Buffer containing root node
Buffer containing segment interior node
Buffer containing serialized structure
Buffer containing term
Buffer containing token
Buffer for error messages, and its allocated size.
Buffer for matchinfo data
Buffer in which to assemble leaf page
Buffer in which to assemble pgidx
Buffer of at least nBuf bytes
Buffer overflow attack
Buffer remaining input
Buffer size
Buffer to append to
Buffer to assemble frame-header in
Buffer to assemble wal-header in
Buffer to deserialize from
Buffer to fold text into
Buffer to gobble string/bareword from
Buffer to load WAL header into
Buffer to load terms into
Buffer to merge doclists in
Buffer to read data from
Buffer to read position list from
Buffer to serialize record into
Buffer to use for loading pages
Buffer to write page data to
Buffer to write to
Buffer used for any other block
Buffer used to hold a poslist
Buffer used to hold most recent term
Bug 51086, Berkeley DB 4.8.26
Bug in libxml prevents a next in certain cases when positioned on end of element
Build CFG, Step 1: Find basic blocks starts, calculate number of blocks
Build CFG, Step 2: Build Array of Basic Blocks
Build CFG, Step 3: Calculate successors
Build CFG, Step 4, Mark Reachable Basic Blocks
Build a brand new string with the expanded token
Build a mapping from subpattern numbers to their names.
Build argument list
Build environment pair list
Build the Trigger object
Build the fractional part.
Build the persistent_script structure.
Build the special-case PHP_SELF variable for the CGI version
Build the special-case PHP_SELF variable for the CLI version
Build the whole number.
Build up text to return here
Build-time default
Building a VDBE program
Building an imposter table
Builds on Solaris x86.
Bulk memory used by pcache-local
Bump the 'curx' and 'cury' to point to the next pixel
Bump the current X position
Bundles should be aligned modulo this number of bytes.
Busy callback
Busy handler for eMode2
Busy handler timeout, in msec
But don't leave a totally empty module because some compilers barf at that.
But don't make them a single int bitfield
But for maximum safety, mutexes should be enabled.
But generally, doing both brings us on the safe track at least in NTS build.
But it preserves the Mem.zMalloc memory allocation.
But just read the header of a zero-length byte, don't read the body, there is no such.
But let's have it for completeness.
But looking at the Cannon powershot's files, inches is the only sensible value.
But make pCellData point to the lower bound.
But many SQL implementations do.
But node pLeft sometimes already has a node number.
But not on unix.
But please keep this copyright notice.
But seems it happens in extreme cases or doesn't.
But that could change.
But that functionality is no longer supported.
But that is impossible.
But the FuncDefs for built-in functions are read-only.
But the caller cannot free this memory directly.
But they make a real mess on VT100-style displays if they're not paired properly, so we are probably better off not calling them text.
But they might for a corrupt database.
But this does not work on VxWorks.
But this is adapted to present re.c.
But this method is used as a last resort.
But we don't support COM_FIELD_LIST anymore, thus this should not happen
But we want the maximum correction applied to a pixel to be much less, otherwise obviously wrong pixels will be created.
But, according to The Encyclopedia Judaica, Hillel II may have only published the 19 year rule for determining the occurrence of leap years.
But, on Unix, the "commit" is implicit.
By Authors:  Spencer W.
By default darwin/arm processes start in "/".
By default use a full table scan.
By default we have a tree of only one node
By default, for compatibility with Perl, they are treated as literals.
By default, the default C locale is used rather than what the building user happens to have set.
By default, this is enabled and an isolated heap will be created to store all allocated data.
By scanning and tokenizing the content table.
By this means we can handle the group by iteration rather than recursion, thereby reducing the amount of stack needed.
By use of various functions in this module the caller can create stacks, queues, lists, doubly linked lists, sorted lists, indexed lists.
Byte and multibyte cases
Byte available in aRow
Byte of unused space on each page
Byte offset at which to write
Byte offset of blob in cursor data
Byte offset of end of current token
Byte offset of end of token within input text
Byte offset of token within input text
Byte offset to previous journal header
Byte offset within current leaf
Byte order is little-endian
Byte-length of string zStop
Bytes at zTerm
Bytes buffered before opening the file
Bytes consumed per cell
Bytes content per ovfl page
Bytes in pPage beyond the header
Bytes in string, or negative
Bytes of PMA space required
Bytes of content in pCell
Bytes of content, or number of sub-nodes
Bytes of data
Bytes of data available in buffer
Bytes of data in aData
Bytes of data stored in pFd
Bytes of data to read
Bytes of header sector written
Bytes of leaf data in segment
Bytes of leaf page data so far
Bytes of local payload
Bytes of memory required
Bytes of memory required to allocate the new cache
Bytes of new data
Bytes of padding needed to make 64 bytes
Bytes of payload
Bytes of payload on final overflow page
Bytes of payload on this page
Bytes of payload stored locally
Bytes of prefix compression for term
Bytes of reserved space at the end of each page
Bytes of runtime space required for sub-program
Bytes of space allocated at pSpace
Bytes of space at aAlloc
Bytes of space for iSerial as varint
Bytes of space required
Bytes of space to allocate
Bytes of space to allocate at pRet
Bytes of space to allocate for this node
Bytes of space to allocate here
Bytes of temp space
Bytes of unused space on this page
Bytes of valid data so far
Bytes of zTitle to save.
Bytes remaining to copy
Bytes required to hold all column names
Bytes required to hold database name
Bytes required to hold table name
Bytes to allocate for PCache
Bytes to allocate for each journal fd
Bytes to allocate segment root node
Bytes to append to the prefix
Bytes to copy from previous term
Bytes to read from disk
Byteswap an mmap'ed file if needed
C and Z groups are the farthest two groups.
C flag must be restored.
C'est la Linux.
C-style comments
C4 CM C4 CM
C4 CM C4 CM C4
C4 CM C4 CM C4 CM
C4CM : pair of "C4 CM"
CALENDAR OVERVIEW  Julius Caesar created the calendar in 46 B.C.
CALENDAR OVERVIEW  The French republican calendar was adopted in October 1793 during the French Revolution and was abandoned in January 1806.
CALENDAR OVERVIEW  The Gregorian calendar is a modified version of the Julian calendar.
CALENDAR OVERVIEW  The Jewish calendar is based on lunar as well as solar cycles.
CAML_BA_CHAR
CASE variable will be deleted later by FREE, so we can't optimize it
CASE_FOLD_IS_APPLIED_INSIDE_NEGATIVE_CCLASS
CCS_COMPLETE
CFG back references management
CHANGED VERSION::PHP7 Changed the refCount to 2 since internally Zend engine increments RefCount value by 1
CHAR opcodes are used for exacts whose count is 1.
CHARSET_EBCDIC
CHECK-DAG: libswiftSpriteKit.dylib CHECK-DAG: libswiftUIKit.dylib CHECK-DAG: libswiftCore.dylib CHECK: Flawless victory
CHECK_EXTRA_REGS migh overwrite these values.
CJK Ideograph Extension A
CJK Ideograph Extension B
CLASS, NCLASS, XCLASS
CLIENT_CONNECT_WITH_DB should have been set
CM C4 CM C4
CM C4 CM C4 CM
CM C4 CM C4 CM C4
CM C4 CM C4 CM C4 CM
CM CM C4 CM
CM CM C4 CM C4
CM CM C4 CM C4 CM
CM CM C4 CM C4 CM C4
CM CM CM C4
CM CM CM C4 CM
CM CM CM C4 CM C4
CM CM CM C4 CM C4 CM
CM CM CM C4 CM C4 CM C4
CMC4 : pair of "CM C4"
COALESCE and JMP_SET result can't be null
COLLATE ...
COLLATE function from an ORDER BY clause term
COLLATE, AS, or UNLIKELY
COM reference count
COMMIT disables the bumpalong, but otherwise behaves as NOMATCH.
COMMIT, SKIP, PRUNE, and an uncaptured THEN cause the whole assertion to fail to match, without considering any more alternatives.
COMPILE_DL_LIBXML
COMPILE_DL_WDDX
COMPILE_DL_XML
COMPILE_PCRE16
COMPILE_PCRE8
COM_CHANGE_USER
COM_CHANGE_USER is broken in 5.1.
COM_ENABLE_SSL
COM_FIELD_LIST is broken and has premature EOF, thus we need to hack here and in mysqlnd_res_meta.c
COM_INIT_DB
COM_PROCESS_KILL
COM_QUERY and COM_EXECUTE handle the responses themselves
COM_READ_HANDSHAKE
COM_REAP_RESULT
COM_REFRESH
COM_SET_OPTION
COM_SHUTDOWN
COM_STATISTICS
COM_STMT_CLOSE
COM_STMT_EXECUTE
COM_STMT_FETCH
COM_STMT_PREPARE
COM_STMT_RESET
COM_STMT_SEND_LONG_DATA
COM_STMT_SEND_LONG_DATA doesn't acknowledge with an OK packet
COM_module_ptr,
CONFLICTCROSSCURRENT_TIMESTAMPRIMARYDEFERREDISTINCTDROPFAIL
CONSTANTCONDITION
CONST_PERSISTENT is ok here
CONTINUE and BREAK addresses
CONVERSIONS for SCM_RIGHTS
CONVERSIONS for cmsghdr
CONVERSIONS for if_index
CONVERSIONS for integers
CONVERSIONS for msghdr
CONVERSIONS for sockaddr
CONVERSIONS for struct in6_pktinfo
CONVERSIONS for struct ucred
CP932 first char
CPU clock count at start of opcode
CPU description section
CR or LF or HTAB or null
CRPLUS, CRMINPLUS
CRQUERY, CRMINQUERY
CRRANGE, CRMINRANGE
CRSTAR, CRMINSTAR
CR_Armenian
CR_Assigned
CR_Bopomofo
CR_Buginese
CR_Canadian_Aboriginal
CR_Cherokee
CR_Cyrillic
CR_Devanagari
CR_Ethiopic
CR_Georgian
CR_Glagolitic
CR_Gujarati
CR_Gurmukhi
CR_Hiragana
CR_Inherited
CR_Katakana
CR_Kharoshthi
CR_Linear_B
CR_Malayalam
CR_Mongolian
CR_NEW_STMT_METADATA makes the statement unusable
CR_New_Tai_Lue
CR_Old_Italic
CR_Old_Persian
CR_Syloti_Nagri
CR_Tagbanwa
CR_Tifinagh
CR_Ugaritic
CSE1 from below
CSE2 from below
CSS_ALIGN_FLEX_END
CURLE_PARTIAL_FILE is returned by HEAD requests
CURRENT_DATE
CURRENT_TIME
CURRENT_TIMESTAMP
CWD and include_path don't matter for absolute file names and streams
Cache configuration parameters.
Cache flush for POWER architecture.
Cache flush for PowerPC architecture.
Cache is valid if this matches Vdbe.cacheCtr
Cache iterator functions if ArrayIterator or derived.
Cache lines are usually 32 byte aligned.
Cache miss..
Cache of doclist for this phrase.
Cache of overflow page locations
Cache of the server supported datatypes, initialized in handle_factory
Cache that currently owns this page
Cache that owns this page
Cache the chunk_size to avoid recalling OCILobGetChunkSize
Cache the pointer so we do not have to do OCIContextGetValue repeatedly
Cached next search point
Calculate "in" and "out" sets
Calculate TS belonging to UTC 00:00 of the current day
Calculate an IDF for each phrase in the query
Calculate arm rol.
Calculate correction for DST change over, but only if the TZ type is ID and it's the same
Calculate final scale.
Calculate it.
Calculate key length
Calculate n -- the u and v split point in digits.
Calculate nLeafEst.
Calculate number of bits we are expecting
Calculate output length and upper bound while processing
Calculate r2r1 / HALAKIM_PER_DAY.
Calculate size of a.
Calculate size of b.
Calculate sub results ...
Calculate the average document length for this FTS5 table
Calculate the byte count needed and pad the property counts array to a 4-byte boundary.
Calculate the estimated cost based on the flags set in idxFlags.
Calculate the first block to use in the output segment
Calculate the initial guess.
Calculate the length in bytes and the checksum of zMaster
Calculate the local space size on the stack.
Calculate the month and day of month.
Calculate the number of quotient digits.
Calculate the quotient digit guess.
Calculate the required memory size
Calculate the return value, which is the maximum ovector value.
Calculate the size of the offsets array, and allocate memory for it.
Calculate the sum of the private machine words.
Calculate the time of the starting molad for this metonic cycle.
Calculates the byte length of the next character.
Call / return instructions
Call Graph initialization.
Call ICU get
Call ICU variant
Call a Go function that will call a C function to send us a SIGIO.
Call all extensions RSHUTDOWN functions
Call all extensions post-RSHUTDOWN functions
Call constructor
Call destructors
Call is always patchable on sparc 32.
Call is expected to fail
Call limit reached.
Call method specified in request
Call php signal handler - Note that we do not report errors, and we ignore the return value
Call static reflection::export
Call the parser to process a CREATE TABLE, INDEX or VIEW.
Call the user's traceback function and then call sigtramp.
Call the userland function
Call the xCreate method for that table.
Call this SETUP-INVARIANT
Call this routine when reloading pages
Call to try make a page clean
Call to try to make pages clean
Call tsrm_realpath
Call unserialize callback
Callback for SELECTs
Callback for expressions
Callback function
Callback function to invoke
Callback function to invoke for phrases
Callback implementation user data
Callback info
Callback information
Callback pointers
Callback return code
Callback routine requested an abort
Callback to check the date.timezone only when changed increases performance
Called by SQLite to clean up pUser
Called by each new OS thread to bind its EXC_BAD_ACCESS exception to mach_exception_handler_port_set.
Called by the IJG JPEG library upon encountering a fatal error
Called during startup to register a UDF with SQLite
Called from runtime.SetCgoTraceback.
Called once per process to initialize a mach port server, listening for EXC_BAD_ACCESS thread exceptions.
Called only by OP_MaxPgcnt
Called to check a condition assertion
Called when the ctor was terminated by an exception
Calling function guarantees this much
Calling thread context
Calls catch_exception_raise.
Calls the dtor of the previous context if there is one
Can be NULL
Can be empty, or anything.
Can be null despite NOT NULL constraint
Can be removed once support for ocaml-4.01 is dropped
Can be removed, when we remove the ini setting
Can not use port/port.h macros as this is a c file
Can perform an operation using at most 1 instruction.
Can't cd to empty string
Can't determine a first byte now
Can't reestablish the shared lock.
Can't right-pad 0's on integers
Can't support UCP unless PCRE has been compiled to include the code.
Can't support UTF unless PCRE has been compiled to include the code.
Can't trust HUGE_VAL
Can't use CHECK_PARTIAL because we don't want to update eptr in the soft partial matching case.
Can't use gmp_unary_opl here, because mpz_sgn is a macro
Cancel any pending results
Candidate for the LIKE optimization
Candidate unixInodeInfo object
Candidate values for BtLock.eLock
Cannot EXPRDUP_REDUCE this Expr
Cannot be a escaped string
Cannot be both MEM_Int and MEM_Real at the same time
Cannot be encoded.
Cannot have C without B
Cannot have triggers on a virtual table.
Cannot insert into a read-only table.
Cannot optimize overly large ORDER BYs
Cannot transition directly from MEMORY to WAL.
Canonical filename
Canonical name of each register.
Canonicalize array elements
Canonicalize the loc_range
Capitalize the first latter of the error message
Capture match offsets: yes/no
Captures may have happened
Capturing brackets
Capturing brackets cannot be optimized if callouts are allowed.
Capturing brackets has a pre-allocated space.
Carry from low to high
Carry on at this level
Carry on with next
Carry on with next branch
Carry on with non-JIT matching.
Cascade the changes
Case 1:  Reset the single schema identified by iDb
Case 1:  The table is a virtual-table.
Case 1: DELETE
Case 2: INSERT
Case 2: UPDATE
Case 3:  We have an inequality comparison against the ROWID field.
Case 4: A scan using an index.
Case 6:  There is no usable index.
Case-sensitive LIKE-type function
Caseful comparisons
Caseful matches, or not one of the multicase characters.
Catch relative paths in c:file.txt style.
Catch unrecognized opcodes so that when new ones are added they are not forgotten, as has happened in the past.
Cause a token to be read.
Cause p to be overwritten by pTemplate
Causes schema cookie check after an error
Caveat programmer.
Cc Cf Cn Co Cs Ll Lm Lo Lt Lu Mc Me Mn Nd Nl No Pc Pd Pe Pf Pi Po Ps Sc Sk Sm So Zl Zp Zs
Cell content
Cell extends past end of page
Cell index within the node
Cell pCell is destined for new sibling page pNew.
Cell to insert into rtree
Cells of the Hashtable
Cells stored on pPg
Cells to delete
Certificate contexts used for server-side SNI selection
Chain list of read-only data ptrs.
Chain not specified.
Chain of simple selects to delete
Chances are good that this is retrieving something from within the phar archive
Change a page number.
Change easily now, with a macro, could be made compilastion dependable.
Change in the number of documents
Change options at this level, and pass them back for use in subsequent branches.
Change test type
Change the journal mode.
Change the type of test
Change this structure only by using the routines below.
Change to WRITER_LOCKED state.
Change-list for UPDATE, NULL for DELETE
Changed ternary operator to an if/else so that additional comparisons can be done on the ssl_method property
Changed to my_bool in MySQL 5.1.
Changes list for any UPDATE OF triggers
Changes list if ON UPDATE CASCADE
Changes the signal mask of the calling thread
Changes whenever database content changes
Changes whenever database file changes
Changes with each schema change.
Channel libxml file io layer through the PHP streams subsystem.
Char has only one other case, or UCP not available
Character before the next significant one.
Character bitsets can also be compared to certain opcodes.
Character class where all the information is in a bit map: set the bits and either carry on or not, according to the repeat count.
Character classes.
Character comes in TMP1.
Character iIn was the close quote.
Character is valid under RFC 2279, but 4-byte and 5-byte characters are excluded by RFC 3629.
Character iterators, which are not inside a repeated bracket, gets a private slot instead of allocating it on the stack.
Character that has the set
Characters to treat as exceptions
Characters.
Check 3rd and 4th bytes for 0x80.
Check 3rd, 4th, and 5th bytes for 0x80.
Check 3rd-6th bytes for 0x80.
Check a UTF-8 string if required.
Check a class for variable quantification
Check access level
Check again, the original check might have not known the protocol name
Check all the tables.
Check and see if the server even sent a xml document
Check any rowid-less pages that occur before the current leaf.
Check blocksize
Check btree cell sizes on load
Check cell size
Check collision
Check config setting for default timezone
Check current's
Check destination file
Check flags
Check for -g
Check for Infinity and NaN
Check for JMPZNZ with same cond variable
Check for Nan and Infinity
Check for PHP_INI_SCAN_DIR environment variable to override/set config file scan directory
Check for SERVER_STATUS_MORE_RESULTS if needed
Check for a "special" INSERT operation.
Check for a decomposition.
Check for a pattern than can match an empty string, so that this information can be provided to applications.
Check for a supported opcode, and load its properties.
Check for a test for recursion in a named group.
Check for additional textual data
Check for an Implicit Result Set on this statement handle
Check for attempt to redeclare interface constants
Check for authorization to create an index.
Check for back reference
Check for class alias
Check for complete coverage of the page
Check for conditions that warrant removal of the hash entry
Check for correct numbers.
Check for denormal case.
Check for deprecated directives
Check for dynamic properties
Check for ending label on the next line
Check for error during recursion and if found, bail.
Check for errors in the format string.
Check for explicit anchoring
Check for global one-time settings at the start of the pattern, and remember the offset for later.
Check for grandfathered first
Check for immediate foreign key violations.
Check for integer primary key out of range
Check for key annihilation.
Check for locking consistency
Check for mismatched parenthesis
Check for mutual recursion
Check for namespace constant
Check for newline
Check for one of the special errors
Check for open captures before ACCEPT and convert it to ASSERT_ACCEPT if in an assertion.
Check for open colors at the end, so we can reduce colorsTotal and ultimately BitsPerPixel
Check for overflow
Check for overflow - bug 61065
Check for overflow.
Check for override
Check for overrun
Check for quantifiers after a class.
Check for range
Check for repeating a recursion without advancing the subject pointer.
Check for special case that d is a normalized power of 2.
Check for stream wrapper
Check for too many substrings condition.
Check for traits and proceed like with interfaces.
Check for unserialize callback
Check for valid number and count digits.
Check for validity of input parameters
Check for variable references only
Check for xbithack in this case.
Check if TZ is set
Check if a precision was specified
Check if a thread in this process holds such a lock
Check if a width was specified
Check if an existing function is being overridden or deleted.
Check if any child key columns are being modified.
Check if any parent key columns are being modified.
Check if data must be read/written to/from the btree page itself.
Check if disp_loc_name passed , if not use default locale
Check if function with given name exists.
Check if it is an FTS4 special argument.
Check if keep-alive connection is still opened
Check if locale was changed and change it back to the value in startup environment
Check if passed filename contains directory separators
Check if php_ini_file_name is a file and can be opened
Check if request to the same host
Check if script may be stored in shared memory
Check if the current doclist ends on this page.
Check if the current entries really are a phrase match
Check if the guy tries to do a -: kind of flag
Check if the index cursor is past the end of the range.
Check if the iterator is now at EOF.
Check if the main database is a zipvfs db.
Check if the output file is full or if the input has been exhausted.
Check if the path is too long so we can give a more useful error message.
Check if the requested address space is free
Check if the requested node is already in the hash table.
Check if the root node now has exactly one child.
Check if the temp table already contains this key.
Check if the user is trying to define the internal pseudo constant name __COMPILER_HALT_OFFSET__
Check if there exists a MATCH constraint - even an unusable one.
Check if there is a previous value to deallocate
Check if this is a recursive CTE.
Check if this is a tokenizer specification
Check if this is to be a periodic sample.
Check if this phrase descends from an OR expression node.
Check if we already know which method we're calling
Check if we got NULL
Check if we have a CDF file
Check if we have a tar file
Check if we have reached max_persistent.
Check if we need to decode utf-8 parser output to another encoding
Check invalid chars for POSIX regex
Check module dependencies
Check next Implicit Result Set
Check origin file
Check persistent connections and do the necessary actions if needed.
Check return type compatibility, but only if the prototype already specifies a return type.
Check return value.
Check sanity of left child page for internal pages
Check section 6 of rfc 822 http://www.faqs.org/rfcs/rfc822.html
Check session ID existence for use_strict_mode support.
Check that MEMDB implies noSync.
Check that a start_offset points to the start of a UTF character.
Check that all undefined public option bits are zero
Check that each phrase in the nearset matches the current row.
Check that flags is exactly equal to PHP_EXPUNGE or zero
Check that one of SQLITE_SYNC_NORMAL or FULL was passed
Check that the CTE name is unique within this WITH clause.
Check that the Go code saw SIGIO.
Check that the array is in order and contains no duplicate entries.
Check that the blob is roughly the right size.
Check that the column is not part of an FK child key definition.
Check that the first field in the block is the magic number.
Check that the hwm handling hasn't gone wrong.
Check that the internal nodes of each segment match the leaves
Check that the list really is sorted now.
Check that the new column is not specified as PRIMARY KEY or UNIQUE.
Check that the optional printf format in description matches the type of the magic.
Check that the other successor of the from block does not dominate all other predecessors.
Check that the page exists
Check that the pointer pOld points to a valid, non-free block.
Check that the request matches the signature
Check that the sort worked
Check that the two values are in the correct order.
Check that the virtual-table is not already being initialized
Check that there isn't an ORDER BY without a LIMIT clause.
Check that this node should not be FTS5_TERM
Check that this pattern was compiled in the correct bit mode
Check that value is actually a blob.
Check that zKey/nKey is larger than the largest key the candidate
Check the APP1 for Exif Identifier Code
Check the alternative branches in turn - the matching won't pass the KET for an assertion.
Check the alternative branches in turn - the matching won't pass the KET for this kind of subpattern.
Check the base for scale digits.
Check the basedir
Check the content overflow list
Check the exponent for scale digits and convert to a long.
Check the exponent for scale digits.
Check the header for a few cases that we have special support for in SAPI
Check the integrity of overflow pages.
Check the integrity of the freelist
Check the modulus for scale digits.
Check the next character by Unicode property.
Check the next two values for correctness.
Check the path
Check the second level cache
Check the terminator
Check there is enough space to append a new entry.
Check third byte for 0x80.
Check threshold value
Check to make sure that the opened file is not outside of allowable dirs.
Check to make sure the sqlite_stat1 table exists
Check to make sure we are not going to go past the ExifLength
Check to see if a unixShmNode object already exists.
Check to see if another process is holding the dead-man switch.
Check to see if flattening is permitted.
Check to see if the new index entry will be unique
Check to see if the new rowid already exists in the table.
Check to see if the range is in reverse order.
Check to see if this back reference is recursive, that it, it is inside the group that it references.
Check to see if this declare is preceeded only by declare statements
Check to see if this is EOL whitespace.
Check to see if this is the last character in the set, in which case it is not a range and we should add the previous character as well as the dash.
Check to see if we need to back up because we only got a sign or a trailing x after a 0.
Check to see if we need to back up because we saw a trailing 'e' or sign.
Check to see if we need to simulate an interrupt.
Check to see if we should honor DESC requests on index columns
Check to see the left operand is a column in a virtual table
Check to see what HTTP status was sent
Check top bits in the second byte
Check we have remaining characters.
Check whether TMP1 contains a newline character.
Check whether cache entry has expired and rescan if it is
Check whether the current request was referred to by an external site which invalidates the previously found id.
Check whether we can get rid of some of the deleted entries which are unused.
Check zero.
Check_FLT_ROUNDS
Checked before the virtual table is created
Checking configure timezone
Checking flags and updating ovector_start.
Checking for permitted and forbidden duplicates has already been done.
Checking that we did the maths correctly.
Checking zero-length iteration.
Checkpoint and close the log.
Checkpoint information in wal-index
Checkpoint sequence counter in the wal-header
Checks for any conflicts regarding the output handler to start
Checks for constructors only if they are declared in an interface, or explicitly marked as abstract
Checks for runs when THRESHOLD/2 pairs compare with same sense.
Checks if it is a newline.
Checks if the provides resource is a stream and if it provides a file descriptor
Checks whether a partial matching is occurred.
Checks whether the base and the current opcode have a common character, in which case the base cannot be possessified.
Checks whether the code points to an opcode that can take part in auto- possessification, and if so, fills a list with its properties.
Checksum based on FTS index contents
Checksum based on contents of indexes
Checksum does not match
Checksum failed.
Checksum for wal-header
Checksum of last frame in log
Checksum of string zMaster
Checksum on the header content
Checksum over all prior fields
Checksum used for sanity checking
Checksum value to return
Child Terminate
Child has no more instances to examine
Child nodes.
Child page number
Child table contain "REFERENCES" keyword
Child terminate
Choices include no escaping, entity escaping, or CDATA sections.
Chomp all segments opened by this cursor
Choose branch according to the condition
Choose split point along selected axis, and update box bounds.
Choose which axis to split the box on.
Christ, School
Christopher J.
Chunk of wal-index containing header
Chunk size configured by FCNTL_CHUNK_SIZE
Circular reference
Clamp the offset..
Clamping to allow for rounding errors above
Class constants
Class declaration must not extend traits or interfaces
Class entries
Class entry pointers
Class must not extend a final class
Class name is stored as a string, we might also get "self" or "parent" - For "self", simply use the function scope.
Class object properties
Classes with traits are handled exactly the same, no early-bind here
Clean  up and report errors.
Clean all parts that can contain run-time data
Clean output bind
Clean param bind
Clean the module
Clean up and return
Clean up and return the number of elements in the stack
Clean up and return the number of values in the stack
Clean up and return the number.
Clean up and return.
Clean up before exiting
Clean up child processes upon exit
Clean up class name var entry
Clean up old array entry
Clean up opened resources.
Clean up temporary storage.
Clean up the WHERE clause constructed above.
Clean up the allocated argv and environ if applicable.
Clean up the rbu_tmp_xxx table for the previous table.
Clean what we copied last time
Cleans out all the data on a pipe.
Cleanup expired session data.
Cleanup static data for functions and arrays.
Cleanup zstr to hold utf16 string.
Clear any prior statistics
Clear flags from pages of the page cache
Clear interlace.
Clear it otherwise.
Clear out the array
Clear out the array that was passed in.
Clear out the hash table
Clear the AA_opacity array behind us.
Clear the TEMP schema separately and last
Clear the buffer for the intermediate result so that people attaching to processes or reading core dumps cannot get any information.
Clear the expired config
Clear the extra-lines buffer
ClearSilver Templating System  This code is made available under the terms of the ClearSilver License.
Client Functions
Client data for xCreate/xConnect
Close all cursors opened via this handle.
Close all database connections
Close all handles to avoid a deadlock
Close all of the cursors that were opened by sqlite3WhereBegin.
Close all tables
Close all tables opened
Close any open statement handles.
Close any rollback journal previously open
Close cursor, needed for doing multiple selects
Close now, free_reference will try, if we are last, but that's not a problem.
Close resource, but keep it in resource list
Close the cursors open on the table and its indexes.
Close the open database handle and VFS object.
Close the read transaction here.
Close the transaction, if one was opened.
Close the underlying file handle
Close with last statement close
Closing highlight
Closing the handle.
Closure object
Closures are immutable objects
Closures can be rebound to a different scope
Coalesced Instance Iterator
Code AFTER triggers
Code an OP_Expire.
Code constant expressions that where factored out of inner loops
Code for the character type
Code for the non-UTF-8 case for minimum matching of operators other than OP_PROP and OP_NOTPROP.
Code in "finally" blocks may modify temorary variables.
Code originally from ext/sockets
Code shared with single character types
Code that appears at the end of the integrity check.
Code the OP_Affinity opcode if there is anything left to do.
Code the OP_Program opcode in the parent VDBE.
Code the SELECT statements to our left
Code the SELECTs to our left into temporary table "tab1".
Code the current SELECT into temporary table "tab2"
Code the current SELECT statement
Code the trigger program into the sub-vdbe.
Code unit is being skipped
Codes ERR1 to ERR5
Coding style component
Coding style default
Collapse multiple stars.
Collating sequence for each term of the key
Collating sequence for the result set
Collating sequence must be the same on all columns
Collating sequence name
Collating sequence to be reindexed, or NULL
Collating sequence to on a column
Collating sequence to use on this term
Collating sequence with native encoding, or NULL
Collating sequence.
Collating sequences are not used.
Collation and sort-order information
Collation sequence name
Collator has no usable clone semantics - ucol_cloneBinary/ucol_openBinary require binary buffer for which we don't have the place to keep
Collect "def" and "use" sets
Collect 'global' stats as well as local
Collect arguments into local variables
Collect bit depth info
Collect extensions with request startup/shutdown handlers
Collect garbage.
Collect internal classes with static members
Collect results from the searches
Collect the case mappings.
Collect the code.
Collect the codes of the decomposition.
Collect the offsets for the properties.
Collects the calls until the function is not created.
Color indexes
Color not in use
Colset to filter on
Column 1 sets bit 1.
Column affinity
Column cache
Column containing best snippet
Column counter
Column currently being processed
Column expressions
Column for entry to add
Column index
Column index on lhs of IN operator
Column into which text is being inserted
Column is part of the primary key
Column name
Column names
Column names corresponding to IDLIST.
Column names for INSERT
Column names to return
Column number
Column number in the sorting index
Column number of LHS
Column number of matching column on the left
Column number of matching column on the right
Column number within the source table
Column numbers
Column of index to match
Column of last value written
Column of table to populate aTerm for
Column on left-hand side of constraint
Column ref to child table
Column snippet is extracted from
Column term appears in
Column that is the INTEGER PRIMARY KEY
Column to extract
Column to extract from poslist
Column to filter on
Column to match on.
Column to return position list for
Column to scan for
Column to search
Column token must occur in
Column-list terminator
Columns etc.
Columns for imposter table
Columns in the other table
Columns in this table that point to other table
Columns that change in an UPDATE statement
Combination of OP_EXACT and OP_POSSTAR or OP_POSUPTO
Combine the op_type with the repeat_type
Combined size of cells placed on i-th page
Come here from code above that handles a named recursion
Comes from the master Walking the table
Coming in OpenSSL 1.1 ...
Commands and events are passed back and forth between the main thread and the run loop thread using two lockless linked lists.
Comment out this non used function.
Comment section
Comment to improve readability
Commented out for now
Commented out until future discussion
Commit by deleting journal file
Commit by truncating journal
Commit by zeroing journal header
Common case: early out without every having to acquire a mutex
Common code for all repeated single character type matches.
Common code for all repeated single-byte matches.
Common code for all repeated single-character matches.
Common features
Common functions
Common part of zend_add_literal and zend_append_individual_literal
Commutative unsigned operations.
Compare against this WhereLoop
Compare b/d with s0
Compare function to use
Compare it against 9223372036854775808.
Compare magnitudes.
Compare pReadr1 and pReadr2.
Compare size with this KeyInfo
Compare the strings using ICU.
Compare this many columns
Compare two bc numbers.
Compare two left-aligned numbers: the first to have a different value wins.
Compares a filename or pathname to a pattern.
Comparing signed and unsigned
Comparison affinity to use
Comparison function
Comparison information for duplicate removal
Comparison information for merging rows
Comparison of term and split-key
Comparison result if keys are equal
Compatibility definitions
Compatibility with old code that looked in .mime
Compilation failed: print the error message and exit
Compile a SELECT statement for this cursor.
Compile pattern and display a warning if compilation failed.
Compile regex or get it from cache.
Compile time client version
Compile with main function
Compile-time default
Compiled items are thrown away as soon as possible, so that a fairly large buffer should be sufficient for this purpose.
Compiled regex
Compiled regular expression
Compiled variables
Compiled version of zSql
Compilers are dumb and don't understand that noreturn means that the function does NOT need a return value...
Compilers may complain that mem1.u.i is potentially uninitialized.
Complete SELECT tree
Complete information about the WHERE clause
Complete log message
Complete text of a module argument
Complete text of the cell
Completely delete zend_resource, if not referenced
Completely initialize event data to prevent valgrind reports
Completely mirror the forward direction.
Completes the Copy command
Component registration
Compose and prepare an SQL statement to loop through the content table
Composite sort order
Composition exclusion table stuff.
Compound SELECTs that have an ORDER BY clause are handled separately.
Compress request
Compute Dominators Tree
Compute Sun's ecliptical coordinates
Compute Variable Liveness
Compute alternate SHA256 sum with input KEY, SALT, and KEY.
Compute alternate SHA512 sum with input KEY, SALT, and KEY.
Compute d of 12h local mean solar time
Compute data dependencies
Compute error fractions to be propagated to adjacent pixels.
Compute first digit of b/d.
Compute local sidereal time of this moment
Compute mean elements
Compute mlo -- check for special case that d is a normalized power of 2.
Compute number of bytes mod 128
Compute number of bytes mod 64
Compute only a unique prefix of the key
Compute representation error for this pixel
Compute the CCD width, in milimeters.
Compute the RHS.
Compute the Sun's apparent radius, degrees
Compute the complete text of the CREATE VIRTUAL TABLE statement
Compute the complete text of the CREATE statement
Compute the cutoff value between legal numbers and illegal numbers.
Compute the diurnal arc that the Sun traverses to reach
Compute the limit registers
Compute the message schedule according to FIPS 180-2:6.2.2 step 2.
Compute the message schedule according to FIPS 180-2:6.3.2 step 2.
Compute the representative color for each box, fill colormap
Compute the size of the data block for storing the compiled pattern.
Compute time when Sun is at south - in hours UT
Compute true coordinates of update box's origin corner.
Compute true coordinates of update box's upper corner and center.
Compute true longitude and radius vector
Computed column name as a token
Computes a color in im's color table that is part way between the background and foreground colors proportional to the gray pixel value in the range 0-NUMCOLORS.
Computes a postorder numbering of the CFG
Computes dominator tree using algorithm from "A Simple, Fast Dominance Algorithm" by Cooper, Harvey and Kennedy.
Computes the Sun's ecliptic longitude and distance
Concat script_name and path_info into php_self
Concatenation stack.
Concats two affine transforms together, i.e. the result will be the equivalent of doing first the transformation m1 and then m2.
Concretely, if you try to add a key/value pair that is already in the table the data structure is left unmodified.
Condition assertion
Condition is always true or false
Condition that must be true
Condition: AL.
Conditional block always has at most one alternative.
Conditional block does not.
Conditional blocks always have an additional alternative, even if it is empty.
Conditional group
Conditional group: compilation checked that there are no more than two branches.
Conditional instructions
Conditional skipped
Conditionally this LIKE operator term
Configuration cookie
Configuration cookie value
Configuration object
Configuration object to update
Configure the OP_TableLock instruction
Configure the number of columns.
Configure the text that the regular expression operates on.
Configured "cache_size" value
Configured FCNTL_MMAP_SIZE value
Configured by FCNTL_CHUNK_SIZE
Configured cache size
Confirm the cur_opt range
Conflict algorithm.
Conflict resolution algorithm
Conflict resolution algorithms.
Conflict resolution strategy
Connect to a remote address
Connect to a remote host using an interruptible connect with optional timeout.
Connect to a socket using an interruptible connect with optional timeout.
Connect to server
Connecting free blocks together if possible.
Connection handle
Connection holding shared memory
Connection is read only
Connection mutex
Connection shared memory
Connection that caused SQLITE_LOCKED
Connection to notify of malloc failures
Connection to watch for unlock
Connection/Login Timeout
Connections and result manupulate
Connections from one process only
Consider alpha in the foreground color itself to be an upper bound on how opaque things get, when truecolor is available.
Consider each alternative branch.
Consider each argument in turn.
Consider static variable or MINIT in future.
Consider tokens with this root node
Consistency check
Constant "b" from BM25 formula
Constant "k1" from BM25 formula
Constant expression is reusable
Constant expressions
Constant factoring
Constant inputs give a constant output
Constantly allocating and deallocating brings nothing.
Constants for MD5Transform routine.
Constants for NodeType - cannot define common types to share with dom as there are differences in these types
Constants for Parser options
Constants for SHA256 from FIPS 180-2:4.2.2.
Constants for SHA512 from FIPS 180-2:4.2.3.
Constants with IN operators
Constants without IN operator
Constraining operation
Constraint handling.
Constraint operator
Constraint type
Constraint value.
Construct a new Expr object from a single identifier.
Construct an expression node for a unary postfix operator
Construct an expression node for a unary prefix operator
Construct the Index object to describe this index
Construct the WhereLoop objects
Construct the schema tables.
Constructor for the json_each virtual table
Constructors only have prototype if they are defined by an interface but it is the compilers responsibility to take care of the prototype.
Container of this cell
Containing WITH clause, or NULL
Containing the current node entry.
Contains aggregate functions
Contains one or more aggregate functions
Contains the branches of a failed condition.
Contains the function entry.
Content for INT, REAL, and STRING
Content is raw, not JSON encoded
Content is unread
Content of the new cell
Content of the node, as should be on disk
Content of this chunk
Content size or sub-node count
Content to be checksummed
Content to be written
Content-Length header given and non-zero
Contents of master journal file
Contents of table pTab
Context argument for xBusyHandler
Context for active vtab connect/create
Context for returning result/error
Context for the sanity check
Context object for fts5ParseTokenize
Context object for function invocation
Context object for new user-function
Context object passed to callback
Context of the fixation
Context permits overwriting file, so we just delete whatever's there in preparation
Context pointer for xChunk callback
Context pointer for xCreate/xConnect
Context that contains this SELECT
Context used to resolve WHERE clause
Continual stores does not cause data dependency.
Continuations above that level are skipped as, if we see one, it means that the continuation that controls them - i.e, the lower-level continuation preceding them - failed to match.
Continuations at the current level are processed as, if we see one, there's no lower-level continuation that may have failed.
Continuations below that level are processed as, if we see one, it means we've finished processing or skipping higher-level continuations under the control of a successful or unsuccessful lower-level continuation, and are now seeing the next lower-level continuation and should process it.
Continue as from after the group, updating the offsets high water mark, since extracts may have been taken.
Continue down into children
Continue for next alternative
Continue from after a successful assertion, updating the offsets high water mark, since extracts may have been taken during the assertion.
Continue the loop for a later or duplicate name
Continue to the normal backtrack.
Continue to use the global error handle as the connection is closed when an error occurs
Continue with current branch
Continue with next branch
Continues a ripemd128 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues a ripemd160 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues a ripemd256 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues a ripemd320 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues an MD4 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues an MD5 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues an SHA1 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues an SHA224 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues an SHA256 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues an SHA384 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continues an SHA512 message-digest operation, processing another message block, and updating the context.
Continuing where we left off in btmutex.c
Continuing where we left off in fts3.c
Continuing where we left off in fts3Int.h
Continuing where we left off in loadext.c
Continuing where we left off in main.c
Continuing where we left off in mutex_w32.c
Continuing where we left off in os.h
Continuing where we left off in os_common.h
Continuing where we left off in os_unix.c
Continuing where we left off in os_win.c
Continuing where we left off in pager.c
Continuing where we left off in pragma.c
Continuing where we left off in sqlite3rbu.c
Continuing where we left off in sqliteInt.h
Continuing where we left off in status.c
Continuing where we left off in tokenize.c
Continuing where we left off in vdbe.c
Continuing where we left off in vdbe.h
Continuing where we left off in wherecode.c
Contirbution information for a single pixel
Contributed by Tilera Corporation.
Control does not reach here.
Control gets here if there has been an error, or if the overall match attempt has failed at all permitted starting positions.
Control never gets here
Control never reaches here
Control never reaches here by falling through, only by a goto for all the error states.
Control never reaches here.
Control reaches here for the various types of "no match at this point" result.
Control reaches here only if one of the items is a small character list.
Convenient short-hand
Conversion buffer
Conversion paradigm
Conversion to double is to see if value is too big for a long.
Conversion to number failed.
Convert "PRAGMA journal_mode" into "PRAGMA main.journal_mode"
Convert LONG constants to DOUBLE
Convert a floating point number to a string formats 'f', 'e' or 'E'.
Convert a number NUM to a long.
Convert a numbers to a string.
Convert a string containing C character escapes.
Convert an integer VAL to a bc number NUM.
Convert and copy the JIT offset vector to the offset_vector array.
Convert cell coordinates to update box ID
Convert character code to glyph index
Convert currency to UTF-16.
Convert current hash item from UTF-16LE to UTF-8.
Convert current hash item from UTF-8 to UTF-16LE and save the result to utf16_buf.
Convert current hash item from UTF-8 to UTF-16LE.
Convert days to hours at once
Convert display locale name from UTF-16 to UTF-8.
Convert error codes into error strings
Convert fname from UTF-8 to Windows-friendly UTF-16.
Convert given attribute value to UTF-16.
Convert given pattern to UTF-16.
Convert given string to UTF-16.
Convert given symbol to UTF-16.
Convert into array
Convert normalized string from UTF-16 to UTF-8.
Convert num to a base X number where X is a power of 2.
Convert num to its decimal format.
Convert only if we have enough space.
Convert parsed currency to UTF-8 and pass it back to caller.
Convert path to unix format
Convert possessive ONCE brackets to non-capturing
Convert soap xml dom to XMLRPC_REQUEST
Convert soap xml dom to XMLRPC_VALUE, sans request info.
Convert source string from UTF-8 to UTF-16.
Convert string to utf8.
Convert strings in the specified array back to UTF-8.
Convert strings in the specified array from UTF-8 to UTF-16.
Convert strings to bc numbers.
Convert the combining class code from decimal.
Convert the connection into a zombie and then close it.
Convert the filename to the system encoding.
Convert the final space to a newline when logging to file.
Convert the image src to a grayscale image
Convert the inverted S-boxes into 4 arrays of 8 bits.
Convert the string to UTF-16.
Convert timezone to UTF-16.
Convert to a real julian day number.
Convert to ascii
Convert to equatorial rectangular coordinates - x is unchanged
Convert to final encoding
Convert to lower case for case-insensitive comparison
Convert to milliseconds
Convert to spherical coordinates
Convert to string, just the time to pick the 1st byte
Convert to the normal beginning of the year.
Convert to upper case
Convert to utf8 then.
Convert transliterator id to UTF-16
Convert ubuf to UTF-8 and try text soft magic
Converting HEX char to INT value
Converting from GMT time to local time
Converting from local time to GMT time
Converts a Unix timestamp value into broken down time, in GMT
Convinient way to handle error messages from the SMTP server.
Cookie data
Cookie value for main db files
Cookie value to store
Cookies are preferred, because initially cookie and get variables will be available.
Cool, but some flaws.
Coordinate decoded
Coordinate value convert to a double
Coordinate value converted to a double
Coordinates of node or entry to check
Copied from upstream's libgd
Copy Btree meta values
Copy COUNT objects from SRC to DST.
Copy PHP interned strings from PHP process memory into the shared memory
Copy all the necessary stuff from shared memory to regular memory, and protect the shared script
Copy any modified values to callers copy of variant
Copy array, so the in-place modifications will not be visible to the callback function
Copy as many bytes as will fit
Copy code of reachable blocks into a single buffer
Copy data from the log to the database file.
Copy data from this buffer to the file
Copy entry from i1
Copy entry from i2
Copy global to_free list into local list
Copy in the original argument variables
Copy into shared memory
Copy of BtShared.maxLocal or BtShared.maxLeaf
Copy of BtShared.minLocal or BtShared.minLeaf
Copy of SubProgram.token
Copy of flags byte
Copy of idxNum search parameter
Copy of input using utf-16 encoding
Copy of pOrig
Copy of pStr1 - RHS of LIKE/GLOB operator
Copy of the SELECT that implements the view
Copy of update mask used with pUpdate
Copy only the drive name
Copy only the share name
Copy options
Copy over the row data
Copy over the sequence table
Copy pages from the log to the database file
Copy path portion in place to avoid memory leak.
Copy remainder and add enclosing quote
Copy remaining data to buffer
Copy src to string dst of size siz.
Copy the b-tree node content from page pFrom to page pTo.
Copy the beginning of the string.
Copy the color bounds to the new box.
Copy the comment
Copy the data from the source page into the destination page.
Copy the environment variables in preparation for the spawn call
Copy the filename and any query parameters into the zFile buffer.
Copy the first part of user declarations.
Copy the home directory
Copy the integer value to the output buffer
Copy the key, shifting each character up by one bit and padding with zeros.
Copy the limit of allowed recursions.
Copy the new ACL entry from config
Copy the original array
Copy the overflow cells from pRoot to pChild
Copy the remaining input hash entries to the output hash
Copy the result of the function into register P3
Copy the second part of user declarations.
Copy the source image.
Copy the value.
Copy to YYRES the contents of YYSTR after stripping away unnecessary quotes and backslashes, so that it's suitable for yyerror.
Copy up to the end of the string or /
Copying the result back into shared memory
Copyright 1998-2007 The OpenLDAP Foundation.
Copyright 2000 Epinions, Inc.
Copyright 2001 Epinions, Inc.
Copyright 2001-2004 Brandon Long All Rights Reserved.
Copyright 2003-2004 Brandon Long All Rights Reserved.
Core code generator functions.
Core conversion workhorses
Coroutine supplying data
Correct answer
Correct offset for error
Correct that as best we can: assume it's at least 1 MB.
Correct the offset
Correct this if it is the case.
Corresponding column number in the eq-class
Cosine filter, default radius 1
Cost multiplier for using this table
Cost of running each loop
Cost of running iterator
Cost of running this subquery
Could be name define, else bad
Could easily be further generalized to work with objects.
Could match an empty string
Could mean that the key container does not exist, let try again by asking for a new one.
Could not find an existing table or index to use as the RHS b-tree.
Could not retrieve or send the file this data will only be sent to us after connection on the data port was initiated.
Could use shutdown to free the main cwd but it would just slow it down for CGI
Could-be-empty unlimited repeat group
Count down to first I/O error
Count leading zeroes.
Count named back references.
Count non-delimiter characters.
Count of matched subpatterns
Count of the number of search attempts
Count rows changed by INSERT,
Count the digits.
Count the number of digits.
Count the number of terms in the query
Count the token characters
Count the tokens in this AND/NEAR cluster.
Counter  Provides a counter intended to be increasing over the lifetime of the program including all forks.
Counter incremented each transaction
Counter to limit the number of searches
Counter to prevent infinite loop of reprepares
Counter variable
Counting column references
Courtesy of F J Franklin.
Cover a protocol design error: error packet does not contain the server status.
Cover protocol error: COM_STMT_SEND_LONG_DATA was designed to be quick and not sent response packets.
Covering index scans
Covers 0, 1, and unlimited
Create GROUP ACL
Create Socket
Create USER ACL
Create a SrcList structure containing the child table.
Create a cursor to hold the database open
Create a divider cell to insert into pParent.
Create a gd-format image from the JPEG-format INFILE.
Create a label to jump to when we want to abort the query
Create a list of user columns for the content table
Create a list of user columns for the virtual table
Create a lowercased header for all the searches so we're finally case insensitive when searching for a pattern.
Create a new auxiliary function
Create a new dummy file slot within a writeable phar for a newly created file
Create a new entry if true
Create a new one if necessary.
Create a new pager cache.
Create a new savepoint structure.
Create a new test statement, which we will prepare, but if anything fails, we will scrap it.
Create a new thread
Create a new tokenizer
Create a new watch for a given path
Create a process group
Create an ICU message formatter.
Create an ICU number formatter.
Create an array of entries of each section
Create an empty hash object.
Create an event with the info from FSEvents
Create an implicit NOT operator.
Create and initialize output hash
Create and register 'Collator' class.
Create and register 'IntlDateFormatter' class.
Create and register 'IntlException' class.
Create and register 'Locale' class.
Create and register 'MessageFormatter' class.
Create and register 'Normalizer' class.
Create and register 'NumberFormatter' class.
Create and register 'Spoofchecker' class.
Create and register 'Transliterator' class.
Create bufers
Create byte sequence P.
Create byte sequence S.
Create compositions from decomposition data
Create imm by 1 inst.
Create imm by 2 inst.
Create intermediate result.
Create linked lists of SSA variables for each SCC
Create multidimension array - recursion function
Create new database
Create new databases in format 1
Create new empty database
Create new entry if true and does not otherwise exist
Create new execution context.
Create new object
Create object
Create object to hold return table
Create or open a phar for writing
Create or open a zip-based phar for writing
Create other tables
Create output image, 256 by 256 pixels, true color.
Create output image.
Create session ID.
Create the COM wrapper for this sink
Create the DELETE statement to write to the target PK b-tree
Create the INSERT statement to write to the target PK b-tree
Create the OCI environment separate for each connection
Create the SELECT statement to read keys from data_xxx
Create the SELECT statement to read keys in sorted order
Create the automatic index
Create the content table
Create the custom VFS.
Create the destination temporary table if necessary
Create the homogeneous session pool - We have different session pools for every different username, password, charset and dbname.
Create the imposter table used to write to this index.
Create the indirection array.
Create the new column data
Create the new element we want to insert
Create the rbu_tmp_xxx table and the triggers to populate it.
Create the rootpage for the index using CreateIndex.
Create the session pool's env
Create the statement to insert index entries
Create the whole "CREATE TABLE" statement to pass to SQLite
Create this filter
Create transient tab and store like SRT_Table
Create uninitialized SSA variables for each CV
Create, bind socket and start listen on it
Create/Connect to the underlying relational database schema.
Create/Remove/Update image thumbnails.
Create/Update exif headers.
Create/open the named mutex
Created 1991.
Created and expanded in order as the characters are encountered.
Created using CREATE INDEX
Creates a new file, only if it does not already exist.
Creates a read lock for SHM access
Creates an index in data_transfer_insts array.
Creates array of compositions from decomposition array
Creating a virtual table invokes the authorization callback twice.
CubicConvolution filter, default radius 3
CubicSpline filter, default radius 2
Curl Lock constants
Curl Multi Constants
Curl SSL Constants
Curl Share constants
Curl file handle options
Curl linked list options
Curl nullable string options
Curl private option
Curl proxy constants
Curl url option
Curl version constants
Current 'end' value
Current 'pos' value
Current 'rowid' value
Current 'start' value
Current 'token' value
Current FTS5 configuration
Current OR clause term
Current UNION ALL term of the other query
Current WITH clause, or NULL
Current WhereLoop being processed.
Current algorithm: by population for first half, then by volume.
Current algorithm: longest scaled axis.
Current algorithm: split at halfway point.
Current authentication level
Current block id
Current block image
Current branch chain
Current byte index in zPattern
Current byte index in zString
Current bytes of pending data
Current character
Current checkout, including internal fragmentation
Current depth of the r-tree structure
Current docid
Current error code
Current implementation of prepared statements can't send result set metadata for these queries on prepare stage.
Current index
Current index in aLeft
Current index in aRight
Current index in output buffer
Current index is unique
Current insert batch
Current leaf data
Current leaf page number
Current lock held on database file
Current name is a substring
Current node image
Current node image to append to
Current number of allocations
Current number of cells in pNode
Current number of distinct checkouts
Current number of samples
Current number of savepoints
Current number of stack segments.
Current number of users of this structure
Current offset in pgidx
Current offset in position list
Current offset into pData
Current offset within position list
Current operation
Current ordered scan item
Current outermost WITH clause
Current overflow page number
Current page of the b-tree
Current parent of p
Current parse context
Current position
Current position in the array
Current position in the hashtable
Current position list
Current position where a THEN must jump.
Current read buffer
Current read offset
Current rolling back, so do not spill
Current row as a Stat4Sample
Current rowid
Current side of the stack
Current size of database file
Current size of node in bytes
Current size of wal-index file
Current stack segment address.
Current stack segment size.
Current state number
Current state of incremental merge
Current state, using numbers defined in header comment
Current term
Current term read from page
Current token number of document
Current total stack size.
Current tree root
Current value
Current value of 'col' column
Current value of 'term' column
Current value of the system call
Current write is a delete
Current write offset in the journal file
Currently always set to 1
Currently always set to 2
Currently executing extension function
Currently iOff points to the first byte of a varint.
Currently in a VACUUM
Currently in a positive assert.
Currently in recurse or negative assert.
Currently you cannot denote that the function can accept less arguments than num_args
Currently, there's no way to determine how many rows can be fetched from a cursor.
Currently, this is the only way to correctly initialize an event buffer.
Cursor assigned to each bit
Cursor containing term and doclist
Cursor for table associated with pIdx
Cursor for the canonical data btree
Cursor for the first index
Cursor for this UNIQUE index
Cursor from which column data is extracted
Cursor is pointing ot the last entry
Cursor number for current WhereLoop
Cursor number for ephemeral table
Cursor number for the sorter
Cursor number for the table
Cursor number from which to take column data
Cursor number of LHS
Cursor number of cursor that does not need seeking
Cursor number of pseudo-table
Cursor number of the first index
Cursor number of the sorting index
Cursor number of the source table
Cursor number of the subquery
Cursor number of the temporary table holding result
Cursor number to use
Cursor object
Cursor object to populate
Cursor of table holding data.
Cursor of table to get the new rowid
Cursor of the RHS table
Cursor of the canonical data source
Cursor open on index being analyzed
Cursor open on the btree to be searched
Cursor pointing at blob row
Cursor pointing at record to retrieve.
Cursor pointing to a table row
Cursor pointing to entry to read from
Cursor returned by porterOpen
Cursor returned by simpleOpen
Cursor snippet is being generated from
Cursor that data will be read from
Cursor that holds the new sorter
Cursor to create snippet for
Cursor to iterate through node
Cursor to iterate through zInput
Cursor to receive the page, or NULL
Cursor to retrieve value from
Cursor to scan b-tree
Cursor to scan for
Cursor to table into which insert is written
Cursor used for virtual table scan
Cursor used to iterate through aDoclist
Cursor used to read input data
Cursor variable
Cursors are destroyed using the xClose method.
Cursors from source and destination
Cursors in the equivalence class
Cursors that are not yet positioned
Cursors will behave like a bit different, but mostly like old-API unbuffered and thus will populate this array with value.
Custom compaction filter
Custom filter policy
Custom merge operator
Custom preg options
Custom rank function
Custom rank function args
Cut edge points to fit in filter window in case of spill-off
Cut out the 16 bit from immediate.
Cut the allocated space into a free and a used block.
Cut the link between the connection structure and the time_t structure allocated within the OCI session
Cut the search len from haystack, equals to REG_STARTEND
D800-DFFF Surrogates.
DB Page containing root of this index
DBCS first char
DBCS lead byte
DBSETLDBNAME is only available in FreeTDS 0.92 or above
DBSETLSECURE
DBSETLVERSION
DEBUG and TESTING functions
DECLARE EXTERNAL FUNCTION EXEC_PHP BLOB, INTEGER BY DESCRIPTOR, SMALLINT RETURNS PARAMETER 2 ENTRY_POINT 'exec_php' MODULE_NAME 'php_ibase_udf'  The function will return 1 if execution succeeded and 0 if an error occurred.
DEDICATION This file is dedicated to my dog, Unix, also known as Yun-chan and Unix J.
DEFAULT_FONTPATH and PATHSEPARATOR are host type dependent and are normally set by configure in config.h.
DEFAULT_MAX_DENSITY is the default for the largest we allow the average number of items per bin before increasing the number of bins  DEFAULT_INIT_TABLE_SIZE is the default for the number of bins allocated initially
DEFINE - always false
DEFINE group contains more than one branch
DELETE operations
DELETE statement
DELETE, or UPDATE and return
DELETE_CONTENT
DELETE_DOCSIZE
DES Fallback
DES style hashes
DIFF_KEY is subset of DIFF_ASSOC.
DISTINCT keyword not used
DISTINCT operates on these
DISTINCT using indexes
DNREF, DNREFI
DOCUMENT_ROOT should also be defined at this stage..but better check it anyway
DOMException Codes
DRCP: connection_class is an attribute of a connection
Darwin 1986-1995.
Data Format
Data actually written
Data associated with this element
Data beyond this point must be rescanned after resumption, so move it to the front of the buffer rather than discarding it.
Data beyond this point will be regenerated after resumption, so do not write it out when emptying the buffer externally.
Data dependencies macros
Data for current page of this level
Data for the current row, if all on one page
Data for the entry is nil.
Data for this leaf
Data from the btree layer
Data is coming from a SELECT or from a multi-row VALUES clause.
Data is compared by using a user-supplied callback.
Data is contained within "boxes".
Data retrieval
Data space required for this record
Data to write
Data type for this column
Data type mismatch
Data will be discarded anyway...
Data yet to be written
Database Name   NULL
Database Name   Table Name
Database connection
Database connection associated with this table
Database connection currently using this Btree
Database connection for malloc errors
Database connection for reporting malloc problems
Database connection malloc context
Database connection to notify of OOM errors
Database connection to read from
Database containing the table being updated
Database containing the trigger
Database corruption
Database corruption.
Database currently in use
Database file handle
Database file holding the shared memory
Database file path
Database filename UTF-8 encoded
Database handle
Database handle doing sort
Database handle.
Database header content
Database holding shared memory
Database holding shared-memory
Database holding the object
Database holding the shared memory
Database idx for pTab
Database in which module is registered
Database in which the table lives
Database in which to run SQL
Database is always well-formed
Database is closed
Database is empty
Database is open
Database key for encryption extension
Database link resource, use default transaction.
Database lock protocol error
Database name
Database name or NULL
Database number
Database number to create the table in
Database of the table
Database only autoinc table
Database page number for frame
Database page number to read data for
Database page size
Database page size in bytes.
Database page-size
Database page-size in bytes
Database pages read
Database schema being analyzed
Database schema version number for this file
Database size after this commit
Database size before freeing
Database structure for this iterator
Database that contains the table
Database the cursor belongs to, or -1
Database to be rekeyed
Database to detach at end of vacuum
Database to write to
Database was empty at trans start
Date at which to calculate offset
Datetime encode/decode
Db containing fts5 table
De-reference and close our copy of the shared memory handle
Deadlock detected.
Deal with UTF characters that take up more than one character.
Deal with capturing
Deal with directionality codes introduced in Unicode 3.0.
Deal with it.
Deal with the remainder.
Deal with this madness by typedeffing 'safeboolean' to 'boolean' if HAVE_BOOLEAN is already set, because this is the test that libjpeg uses.
Deallocate page if true
Deallocates any cached error strings.
Debug EXPLAIN QUERY PLAN
Debug listings of VDBE programs
Debug print SQL as it executes
Debug support
Debug traces.
December 4, 1999  Ported to libgd by Pierre Joye.
Decide the max_value: the max.
Decide whether some text looks like UTF-8 with BOM.
Decide whether some text looks like UTF-8.
Decimal point is allowed.
Declarations for Floyd-Steinberg dithering.
Declarations for functions in fkey.c.
Declarations for functions used only in this file.
Declare 'Collator' class properties.
Declare 'IntlDateFormatter' class properties.
Declare 'Locale' class properties.
Declare 'MessageFormatter' class properties.
Declare 'Normalizer' class properties.
Declare 'NumberFormatter' class properties.
Declare 'Transliterator' class properties
Declare 'index' which will point to sort key in sort key buffer.
Declare and initialize constant integer 'isDirect'.
Declare our image pointer
Declare the table schema to SQLite.
Decode 'B' encoded data
Decode 'q' encoded data
Decode each operand, sign extending, etc.
Decode octal number
Decode the arguments passed through to this function.
Decode the page just read from disk
Decode the position list tail at the start of the page
Decode the three function arguments
Decoded coordinates
Decoded structure object
Decoding  Quoted-printable string.
Decoding the needs_control_head in framesize.
Decoding value of parameter
Decomposition into subterms
Decomposition of the WHERE clause
Decomposition of the entire WHERE clause
Decompress option
Decompress response
Decrement error limit
Decrement the count of locks against this same file.
Decrement the free-list count by 1.
Decrement the shared lock counter.
Decrement the usage count.
Decrement to avoid overflow.
Decrementing the opline to pretend the exception happened during the YIELD opcode.
Deep, not shallow copies
Default ON CONFLICT policy
Default ON CONFLICT policy for trigger steps
Default ON CONFLICT policy for triggers
Default Settings
Default callback handlers
Default case.
Default column to query
Default compare for most architectures.
Default if no digits
Default is now UTF-8
Default is still text.
Default is to use client-side session pool
Default language
Default length
Default locking-mode for attached dbs
Default lookaside buffer count
Default lookaside buffer size
Default mmap_size setting
Default not possessive quantifier
Default number of rounds if not explicitly specified.
Default number of rounds.
Default number of tokens in snippet
Default page size
Default return value, in case of an error
Default schema
Default session id char validation function allowed by ps_modules.
Default single-char op codes
Default to HTTP 1.0
Default to global filters only
Default to global wrappers only
Default to the current year if year parameter is not given
Default tokenizer module
Default value
Default value for the new column
Default value of this column
Default value used for initialization, for pacifying older GCCs or non-GCC compilers.
Default values for second and subsequent columns need to match.
Default values must be the same for all columns
Default variable settings
Default/Implicit properties
Default: "1.0"
Default: black.
Defaut case
Defer all FK constraints
Defer right-most ORDER BY of a compound
Defer to CryptGenRandom on Windows
Deferred search tokens, if any
Deferred seek
Deferred token object for this token
Deferred tokens are not taken into account.
Define our magic string to mark salt for SHA256 "encryption" replacement.
Define our magic string to mark salt for SHA512 "encryption" replacement.
Define the storage for the packet accumulator
Define the trailing position accordingly.
Define these in the PHP7 tree to make merging easy process
Defined at the top of this function
Defined in this way, GMST0 will increase with about 4 min a
Defines for debugging purposes.
Definitions to allow mutual recursion
Deinitialize the memory allocator
Deinitilaise module globals
Delay closure destruction until its invocation
Delete a row from a main table b-tree
Delete a row from an aux.
Delete after closing if true
Delete aliases to phar's that got kicked out of the global table
Delete all indices associated with this table.
Delete all parts those are not in the "parts" attribute
Delete all rows.
Delete any TriggerPrg structures allocated while parsing this statement.
Delete any auxdata allocations made by the VM
Delete any foreign keys attached to this table.
Delete any triggers created to implement actions for this FK.
Delete entries for this table or index
Delete everything from the shadow tables.
Delete existing record, then do INSERT or UPDATE
Delete flag makes the iterator delete the current element on next
Delete immutable arrays moved into SHM
Delete list entry
Delete on close
Delete refcount and destruct if needed.
Delete session data.
Delete shared-memory if true
Delete the Table structure itself.
Delete the cell in question from the leaf node.
Delete the first value
Delete the hash table and return the error code.
Delete the image from memory.
Delete the index and table entries.
Delete the index entries associated with the current record.
Delete the index records
Delete the last value
Delete the master journal file.
Delete the persistent connection
Delete the row
Delete this when closing file
Delete with VDBE
Deleted OK.
Deleting this row means the whole table is empty.
Delimiter character to be quoted
Delta to apply to the pattern
Dependancies
Dependencies
Deprecated for public use.
Depth of a subtree
Depth of condition subpatterns
Depth of node containing pCell
Depth of the SAVEPOINT stack
Depth of the tree so far
Dequoted copy of token p
Dequoted name of collation sequence
Derived from zFile if 0
Describes tag values
Description of content to append
Description of segment
Description of the record
Description of the table we are reading from
Descriptor for buffer area
Desired amount of reserved space per page
Desired maximum mmap size
Desired number of arguments.
Desired snippet length
Desired text encoding
Despite MSDN has documented it won't to, the length returned by GetFinalPathNameByHandleA includes the length of the null terminator.
Despite having a 'handle' mechanism like gdb, lldb will not allow a SIGSEGV to pass to the running program.
Despite the spec, the xml-rpc list folk want me to send an empty params element
Destination b-tree file
Destination check.
Destination database handle
Destination database name
Destination for SELECT on rhs of INSERT
Destination for coroutine A
Destination for coroutine B
Destination is palette based
Destination journal mode
Destination of SELECT results
Destination page size
Destination to place the compressed data into
Destroy CFG
Destroy SSA
Destroy all op arrays
Destroy old array, add new one
Destroy palette based temporary image.
Destroy phar's in shutdown, here we don't care about aliases
Destroy stream hashes
Destroy super-globals
Destroy the input bind
Destroy translation table
Destroy value without using GC: When opcache moves arrays into SHM it will free the zend_array structure, so references to it from outside the op array become invalid.
Destroy zvals
Destruct reflector which is no longer needed
Destructor for BtShared.pSchema
Destructor for Mem.z - only valid if MEM_Dyn
Destructor for a jsonEachCursor object
Destructor for mysqli entries in free_links/used_links
Destructor for pUser
Destructor for pUserData
Destructor for the aux data
Destructor for the codec
Destructor for the data
Destructor for the extra data
Destructor for the string
Destructor function
Detach the ORDER BY clause from the compound SELECT
Detach this backup from the source pager.
Detect a pid change and reset the PRNG.
Detect double qoutes
Detect fixed iterations first.
Detect quoted length and if we should use binary encoding
Detect wrong format of " inside of escaped string
Detects if the character and its othercase has only 1 bit difference.
Detects if the character has an othercase.
Determine a "mid" point and adjust to make sure the mid point is at the beginning of a case mapping triple.
Determine a "mid" point and adjust to make sure the mid point is at the beginning of a range pair.
Determine a "stack measure" for an arbitrary ADDRESS.
Determine default SSL configuration file
Determine how many bytes of data to read.
Determine how many of the segments actually point to zTerm/nTerm.
Determine how many rows have changed.
Determine how much file is left.
Determine how much time we've taken so far.
Determine if doclists may be loaded from disk incrementally.
Determine if socket is using a protocol with one of the default registered socket stream wrappers
Determine if the number already exists.
Determine if we need to parse the file or show the source
Determine the BM25 score for the current row.
Determine the actually nearest colors.
Determine the auto-incr-merge setting if unknown.
Determine the maximum amount of space required.
Determine the number of integers in the buffer returned by this call.
Determine the number of phrases in the query
Determine the number of the cell within the stack, given the address of the cell.
Determine the type of a table.
Determine what state that goes to, based on the state we popped back to and the rule number reduced by.
Determine what to return
Determine where to place temporary files.
Determine whether or not this is a transaction savepoint.
Determine whether we should code this trigger
Determine which colormap entries are close enough to be candidates for the nearest entry to some cell in the update box.
Determine which nop opcode is used for padding and should be skipped.
Determine which, if any, tokens in the expression should be deferred.
Development versions may be changed from build to build
Device characteristics
Device number
Device sector size
Did not find .mgc, restore q
Did parent received exit signals SIG_TERM/SIG_INT/SIG_QUIT
Didn't have a type, totally guess here
Die on hard timeout
Different WHERE clauses
Different collating sequences
Different columns indexed
Different conflict resolution strategies
Different expressions in the index
Different identity, we need a new impersontated token as well
Different number of columns
Different sort orders
Different systems want the buffer padded differently
Different versions of libjpeg use either 'jboolean' or 'boolean', and some platforms define 'boolean', and so forth.
Digest authentication
Digits are usually 0-9, so it is worth to optimize them.
Digits prior to the decimal point
Direct lookup by rowid or docid.
Direction unknown.
Directory sync needed
Disable RLB as we mostly have single-connection pools
Disable database changes
Disable external authentication on Windows as Impersonation is not yet handled.
Disable file:// if open_basedir are used
Disable logging, use exit status'es and related variabled to detect errors
Disable lookaside memory allocation
Disable mutex on connections
Disable mutex on core
Disable nuisance warnings on Borland compilers
Disable possible output compression for images
Disable realpath cache if an open_basedir is set
Disable the API redefinition in sqlite3ext.h
Disable the message box for assertions.
Disabled functions support
Disabled if not using stat3
Disables and re-enables match
Disabling is an optimization.
Disallow automatic indexes
Disallow both ON and USING clauses in the same join
Disallow making an inherited method abstract.
Disallow these chars outside option values
Disaster would follow.
Disble writing again
Discard numbers over the limit to avoid modulo bias
Discard pTemplate
Discard parse errors thrown during tokenization
Discard segments that do not contain our argument address.
Discard stack segments which do not contain the target address.
Discard the candidate path from further consideration
Discard the contents of the cache
Discard the contents of the pending-terms hash table.
Discard the results.
Discard the scheme and authority segments of the URI.
Discard the shifted token.
Discarded digits make delta smaller.
Disgusting.
Dispatched by RINIT and by php_session_destroy
Dispatched by RSHUTDOWN and by php_session_destroy
Display 'On' for other SAPIs instead of STDOUT or STDERR
Display a warning if we encounter an unknown modifier.
Display all of the WhereLoop objects
Display all terms of the WHERE clause
Displaying them is always clutter.
Dithering, 256 colors.
Ditto for the local variables
Diurnal arc
Divide a fixed by a fixed
Divider cells in pParent
Division by zero results in an exception, so it doesn't need any special handling
Do FK constraint checks.
Do FK processing.
Do a binary search with 5 steps
Do a comparison.
Do a double word increment.
Do a quick self-test.
Do a read of 1 byte
Do actual optimizations
Do actual packing
Do actual unpacking
Do additional sanity checking on the page in this case.
Do an integrity check on each database file
Do appropriate checks on the content.
Do appropriate processing given the current state.
Do as much as possible w/o blocking
Do bounds checking for size parameter.
Do constraint checks.
Do correction to upper limb, if necessary
Do each round.
Do extra syncs of the journal for robustness
Do format conversion placing the output in buffer
Do full auto-vacuum
Do implicit use_result and then flush the result
Do initialization.
Do key permutation and split into two 28-bit subkeys.
Do lazy initialization for buffered results.
Do no file locking
Do no further checking in the pre-compile phase.
Do no locking
Do not allow EXCLUSIVE locks.
Do not allow any cells smaller than 4 bytes.
Do not allow any kind of write-lock on a read-only database
Do not allow memory allocation
Do not allow non-admin users to modify the schema arbitrarily
Do not analyze the TEMP database
Do not attempt to change the page size for a WAL database
Do not bother with a bulk allocation if the cache size very small
Do not break Hangul syllable sequences, the rules for which are: L may be followed by L, V, LV or LVT LV or V may be followed by V or T LVT or T may be followed by T 4.
Do not break after Prepend characters.
Do not break before SpacingMarks.
Do not break before extending characters.
Do not call it before copying, otherwise a reference may be leaked.
Do not code
Do not code a test for this constraint
Do not copy the destructor
Do not create a trigger on a system table
Do not create or use a rollback journal
Do not delete from this cursor
Do not delete the master journal file.
Do not delete the table until the reference count reaches zero.
Do not display old-style inherited constructors
Do not do auto-vacuum
Do not do the INSERT or UPDATE
Do not edit
Do not enforce check constraints
Do not ever re-use any error number, because they are documented.
Do not gather statistics on system tables
Do not gather statistics on views or virtual tables
Do not issue error messages if true
Do not load data from disk
Do not modify it by hand.
Do not move this de-initialization.
Do not move this initialization.
Do not need to test for a HAVING clause.
Do not open write-ahead-log files
Do not optimize this for speed.
Do not output
Do not output error when restoring ini options.
Do not populate the overflow cache.
Do not print out fnops, unless everything is an fnop, in which case we will print out just the last one.
Do not proceed to the next term in the segment.
Do not reclaim the symbols of the rule which action triggered this YYABORT or YYACCEPT.
Do not reclaim the symbols of the rule which action triggered this YYERROR.
Do not reclaim the symbols of the rule whose action triggered this YYABORT or YYACCEPT.
Do not reclaim the symbols of the rule whose action triggered this YYERROR.
Do not remove the casts below.
Do not save the results anywhere
Do not save this cursor
Do not search for an unused file descriptor on vxworks.
Do not spill the cache when non-zero
Do not sync the journal if true
Do not try to close prototype streams
Do not try to use skip-scan if true
Do not use a rollback journal
Do not use an index-only search
Do not use it for new code.
Do not use prefix index
Do not use the 4 neighbors implementation with small images
Do not write content to disk
Do nothing here.
Do nothing if table already exists
Do nothing if the other case range is within the original range.
Do nothing with input, just skip it
Do nothing, just backward compatibility
Do nothing, the connection will be brutally closed and the server will catch it and free close from its side.
Do nothing.
Do recursive multiplies and shifted adds.
Do some black magic with the NT security API.
Do some initial calculations
Do some paranoid checks for potential integer overflow.
Do some paranoid checks to avoid integer overflow.
Do the actual manipulation of the life board in C.
Do the actual replacement and put the result back into subject_str for further replacements.
Do the actual sort magic - bada-bim, bada-boom.
Do the b-tree integrity checks
Do the binary search.
Do the binding once she does it.
Do the calculation.
Do the commit only if all databases successfully complete phase 1.
Do the comparison
Do the conversion
Do the following math as float intermediately, and round to ensure that Polygon and FilledPolygon for the same set of points have the same footprint.
Do the multiply
Do the tar test first, because if the first file in the tar archive starts with a dot, we can confuse it with an nroff file.
Do the translation from PHP's internal PHP_EXPUNGE define to c-client's CL_EXPUNGE
Do this upfront so that connection close on an error would know that this is a session pool connection.
Do this zero or more times.
Do we have placeholders but no bound params
Do whatever the default action is
Doc comment has been appended as last element in ZEND_AST_PROP_ELEM ast
Docid for current row.
Docid for entry to add
Docid of most recently inserted document
Docid of row being written
Docid of the row pCsr points to
Docid to add or remove data from
Docid to bind for SQL_SELECT_DOCSIZE
Docid to read size data for
Doclist data
Doclist is assembled here
Doclist to iterate through
Doclists hold docids and associated token positions.
Docs in descending rowid order
Docs say FSEventStreamCreate copies the fields out of this context, so it doesn't need to be long lived
Document store
Document term appears in
Document text to extract snippet from
Documents in table
Does not affect registers.
Does not change the other bits.
Does not check STR_END.
Does not check begin.
Does not check for a previously opened phar in the cache.
Does not exist, add a new entry
Does not modify registers.
Does nothing for other platforms
Does the table have a rowid
Doesn't look like text at all
Doesn't require sorting
Doing both moves pPage to the front of the dirty list.
Doing nothing at all also makes NORMAL the default.
Dollar endonly.
Don't accept h and hh modifiers.
Don't allow access, but don't generate an error
Don't allow changing it in htaccess
Don't attempt in pre-compile phase
Don't attempt to call function
Don't block if we can't complete...
Don't bother checking again
Don't check the return value so that this works both from a job control shell and from a shell script.
Don't count the variadic argument
Don't destroy entry, because the row destroy will decrease the refcounter.
Don't duplicate result, saves one emalloc.
Don't execute REFCURSORS or Implicit Result Set handles
Don't free bbuf.is_null for FETCH_RESULT since we have allocated is_null and buf in one block so we free only buf, which is the beginning of the block.
Don't free now, let the result be usable.
Don't free ustr cause it's set in zstr without copy.
Don't give them the default one though since they already said they didn't want it.
Don't include Rzero in the match set, to avoid triggering needlessly on 'prefetch' instrs.
Don't increment.
Don't leave anything around in vm they could use.
Don't loop indefinitely in non-blocking mode if no data is available
Don't put MAGIC constant - it likely points to a file within MSys tree
Don't set a timeout on startup, only per-request
Don't skip blanks.
Don't try this at home.
Don't try to be clever and save effort on exclusive ones - in some locales things may be different.
Don't try to destroy implicitly opened transaction from list...
Don't update is_ref, or we will leak during conversion
Don't use stkp after PUSH.
Don't use this, it is wrong for little endian encodings.
Don't waste our time if it's empty
Done with the mutex
Done, break out of for loop
Dot terminates it because of POSIX form  where dot precedes the codepage except for variant
Double binding of the same zval, make a copy
Double precision constants.
Double quoted '"' string ends
Double quoted '"' string start
Double shifts needs to be performed.
Double the spawn rate for the next iteration
Double to fixed point
Doubled ref number
Draw the styled, brushed line
Driver template for the LEMON parser generator.
Driver will replace this with other type if not possible.
Drop STR_PTR for greedy plus quantifier.
Drop STR_PTR for non-greedy plus quantifier.
Drop all triggers associated with the table being dropped.
Drop and reload the internal table schema.
Drop any table triggers from the internal schema.
Drop duplicates, except CC
Drop frames until we reach STACK_TOP.
Drop into cache
Drop pages with this pgno or larger
Drop the AT_FIRST_YIELD flag
Drop the WAL write-lock, if any.
Drop the cell from the parent page.
Drop the final space when logging to syslog.
Drop the shadow tables
Drop the stack frame.
Drop the table and index from the internal schema.
Drop the temporary PENDING lock
Drop this bracket_backtrack.
Dummy PS module function
Dummy argument used with tokenizer
Dummy for value 0
Dummy function to follow the old API
Dummy implementations for Windows, because Windows doesn't support Unix-style signal handling.
Dummy variable
Dummy variables
Dump any newly flushed data to the read buffer
Dump contents of Node
Duplicate named group recursion test
Duplicate named group used test
Duplicate named pattern back reference
Duplicate names exist
Duplicate of trigger WHEN expression
Duplicate subject string for repeated replacement
Duplicate the command as processing downwards will modify it
Duplicate the token as impersonated token
Duplicates are scattered
Duplication means that a little unnecessary work is done when checking, but this keeps things much simpler because they can all use the same code.
During compilation, the "first char" settings from forward assertions are discarded, because they can cause conflicts with actual literals that follow.
Dynamically allocated strings.
E000-F8FF Private Use Area.
EACCES is like EAGAIN during locking operations, but not any other time
EAM   - It's worse than that.
EAM DEBUG - Newer versions of libfree2 make it easier by defining encodings
EBCDIC coding
ENABLE_CONDITIONALS
ENABLE_GD_TTF
ENCODING: The first element is the size stored in bytes, the rest is the data.
ENCODING: The highest 2 bits are unused.
END OF THE SMALL OBJECTS PAGE
END difference between normal normal fetch and _c
END metaphone
END_GENERATED
ENTRY POINT for conversions
EOCD64 locator is before EOCD, so leave place for it
EOF or error.
EOF packet is since 4.1 five bytes long, but we can get also an error, make it bigger.
EOF when i equals or exceeds this value
EOS after separators only
EPSV failed, let's try PASV
EQ seeks only - no range seeks
EQP id of left-hand query
EQP id of right-hand query
EQP output string
ERROR : this is not a valid value
ERROR:  bad checksum
ERROR:  insert command gives an output larger than predicted
ERROR: copy command not terminated by ','
ERROR: copy exceeds output file size
ERROR: copy extends past end of input
ERROR: generated size does not match predicted size
ERROR: insert count exceeds size of delta
ERROR: unknown delta operator
ERROR: unterminated delta
ESC : ISO-2022-JP-2004
ESC : Softbank Emoji
ESTALE is not defined on Interix systems
EUC-JP kanji string
EUI-64 format: Four hexadecimal digits separated by dots.
EV: R-19803-45884
EV: R-30323-21917
EV: R-33326-45252
EV: R-40812-03570
EV: R-46199-30249
EVIDENCE-OF: R-12976-22893 Value is the integer 0.
EVIDENCE-OF: R-18143-12121 Value is the integer 1.
EVIDENCE-OF: R-24078-09375 Value is a NULL.
EXTENSION FUNCTIONS
E_ERROR raised for security reason.
Each BTree is identified by the index of its root page.
Each RUN is allocated as a single or few following pages.
Each call returns the next one, updating the start address.
Each call to this function appends a single varint to a list.
Each class is formed from a base map, with an optional addition or removal of another map.
Each core filter has its own radius
Each entry in this list occupies LINK_SIZE bytes, so even when LINK_SIZE is 4 there is plenty of room for most patterns.
Each entry is three values long, one value for each color component.
Each freeblock is at least 4 bytes in size.
Each key/value binding is unique, but a key can have multiple value bound to it.
Each linked list is only prepended to by one thread and only cleared by the other thread.
Each map is 32 bytes long and the bits run from the least significant end of each byte.
Each of these tests, if it succeeds, will leave the text converted into one-unichar-per-character Unicode in ubuf, and the number of characters converted in ulen.
Each one can be either an array or a sort flag which follows an array.
Each page cache is an instance of the following object.
Each range has a combining class which means each entry is a 3-tuple.
Each real token shifted decrements this.
Each row extracted from Queue is output to pDest.
Each row relates to one of PCRE's special properties such as ALNUM or SPACE or WORD.
Each semaphore actually consists of three semaphores allocated as a unit under the same key.
Each stack pointer address is followed by the size of the data in use in that stack, in bytes.
Each table contains data for 128-255 symbols from ASCII table.
Each time round the loop, save the current subject position for use when the group matches.
Each trigger present in the database schema is stored as an instance of struct Trigger.
Each uploaded file has its own array.
Each will handle 12 bits of the S-box input.
Early return if there is not enough space.
Easter as the number of days after 21st March
Eat any UTF-8 BOM we find in the first 3 bytes
Eat leading and trailing double quotes
Eat leading and trailing single quotes
Eat leading whitespace
Eat trailing semicolons
Eat trailing whitespace
Eats up list1 in runs of increasing order, list2 in a corresponding linked list.
Eccentric anomaly
Eccentricity of Earth's orbit
Edge forward in the string...
Edit this page
Effective size of the main journal
Either "ORDER" or "GROUP", as appropriate
Either "tbl" or "idx"
Either DELETE or UPDATE.
Either NULL or the char after a newline
Either SQLITE_ATTACH or SQLITE_DETACH
Either X and Y both have COLLATE operator or neither do
Either an error, or no such table.
Either chngPk or chngRowid
Either or both argument may be NULL.
Either or both may be NULL.
Either the parent node or NULL
Either way, assume that the journal is hot.
Either way, we have an error.
Either we already exported a stream or the socket came from an import, just return the existing stream
Element has children, thus a vector, or "compound type" in soap-speak.
Elements are compared by user supplied function.
Elements of the linked list at Vdbe.pAuxData
Eliminate unreachable basic blocks
Else insert an UPTO if the max is greater than the min, again preceded by the character, for the previously inserted code.
Else returns 0 on success.
Else there's some kind of shambles
Else this is a rollback operation, playback the specified savepoint.
Else use the unmodified path
Else we have a capturing group.
Else will try to reuse lookahead token after shifting the error token.
Else, if we got bytes back, check for possible errors.
Else, we verify that the given object is an instance of the class.
Emit E_DEPRECATED for PHP 4 constructors
Emit a warning so that the end-user will know that they should try something else
Emit the necessary instructions.
Empty classes are allowed in JavaScript compatibility mode.
Empty instruction.
Empty name is a shorthand for MARK
Empty output segment.
Empty packet after MYSQLND_MAX_PACKET_SIZE packet.
Empty packet will be sent and this loop will end.
Empty response
Empty statements are not allowed prior to a declare
Empty string has length of 0, encoded in 1 byte.
Empty string, return as empty stream
Empty the output buffer --- called whenever buffer fills up.
Empty/null string is meaningless
Emulation of the Unix signal SIGSEGV.
Enable PCRE JIT compiler
Enable automatic indexes
Enable checks for parsed files
Enable debugging if requested.
Enable load_extension
Enable mutex on connections
Enable mutex on core
Enable recursive triggers
Enable server-side SNI
Enable server-side handshake renegotiation rate-limiting
Enable the entity loader by default.
Enable the lookaside-malloc subsystem
Enable to check that the allocation could destroy temporaries.
Enable trans sid by modifying flags
Enabling traces.
Enabling verbose error messages.
Encode Unicode string as UTF-8, returning pointer to character after end of string, or NULL if an invalid character is found.
Encode mod/rm byte.
Encode the database
Encoding -- determine the character encoding of a text file.
Encoding T1 of 'B' instruction
Encoding T1 of 'BL' instruction
Encoding T2 of 'B' instruction
Encoding T3 of 'B' instruction
Encoding T4 of 'B' instruction
Encoding declarations must already be handled during parsing
Encoding did not change
Encoding for the data
Encoding is handled from the encoding property set on the document
Encoding of z.
Encoding selection
Encoding the byte.
Encoding to use
Encrypt one block, BF_N is hardcoded here.
Encrypt the key with itself.
End JavaScript handling
End Rotate function
End Section Filters
End Section filters declarations
End Single-Threaded
End Unix Pthreads
End Win32 Threads
End filters function
End for loop over the format string
End mark for a varint
End non-truncate path
End of 1-char optimization
End of Codestream
End of POSIX syntax handling
End of XCLASS
End of a chunked request
End of a group, repeated or non-repeating.
End of all fetches
End of alter.c
End of analysis
End of analyze.c
End of attach.c
End of auth.c
End of back ref handling
End of backslash handling
End of backup.c
End of bitmap class handling
End of bitvec.c
End of branch
End of btmutex.c
End of btree.c
End of btree.h
End of btreeInt.h
End of buffer
End of build.c
End of callback.c
End of cell-pointer array
End of class handling
End of complete.c
End of ctime.c
End of date.c
End of dbstat.c
End of delete.c
End of dftables.c
End of dropping frames.
End of expr.c
End of fault.c
End of fetch
End of file
End of first segment of main-journal records
End of fkey.c
End of fts3.c
End of fts3.h
End of fts3Int.h
End of fts3_aux.c
End of fts3_expr.c
End of fts3_hash.c
End of fts3_hash.h
End of fts3_icu.c
End of fts3_porter.c
End of fts3_snippet.c
End of fts3_tokenize_vtab.c
End of fts3_tokenizer.c
End of fts3_tokenizer.h
End of fts3_tokenizer1.c
End of fts3_unicode.c
End of fts3_unicode2.c
End of fts3_write.c
End of fts5.c
End of func.c
End of function
End of global.c
End of hash.c
End of hash.h
End of hwtime.h
End of icu.c
End of input
End of insert.c
End of interior node buffer
End of journal.c
End of json1.c
End of keywordhash.h
End of legacy.c
End of line reached
End of literal character handling
End of loadext.c
End of loop to find second and subsequent matches
End of main loop
End of main.c
End of malloc.c
End of mem0.c
End of mem1.c
End of mem2.c
End of mem3.c
End of mem5.c
End of memjournal.c
End of msvc.h
End of mutex.c
End of mutex.h
End of mutex_noop.c
End of mutex_unix.c
End of mutex_w32.c
End of name
End of non-SHM dependent initializations
End of notify.c
End of opcodes.c
End of opcodes.h
End of option value
End of os.c
End of os.h
End of os_common.h
End of os_setup.h
End of os_unix.c
End of os_win.c
End of os_win.h
End of othercase range
End of packet header
End of pager.c
End of pager.h
End of parse.c
End of parse.h
End of pcache.c
End of pcache.h
End of pcache1.c
End of pcre_chartables.c
End of pcre_compile.c
End of pcre_config.c
End of pcre_exec.c
End of pcre_fullinfo.c
End of pcre_get.c
End of pcre_globals.c
End of pcre_jit_compile.c
End of pcre_maketables.c
End of pcre_newline.c
End of pcre_ord2utf8.c
End of pcre_printint.src
End of pcre_refcount.c
End of pcre_study.c
End of pcre_tables.c
End of pcre_valid_utf8.c
End of pcre_version.c
End of pcre_xclass.c
End of pcredemo.c
End of pcreposix.c
End of pragma.c
End of pragma.h
End of prepare.c
End of printf.c
End of processing for this SELECT
End of random.c
End of replacement string
End of resolve.c
End of rowset.c
End of rtree.c
End of rtree.h
End of section
End of section or an option offset
End of select.c
End of sqlite3.h
End of sqlite3ext.h
End of sqlite3rbu.c
End of sqlite3rbu.h
End of sqliteInt.h
End of sqliteLimit.h
End of sqliteicu.h
End of status.c
End of switch
End of table.c
End of the 'extern "C"' block
End of the PRAGMA switch
End of the ephemeral table scan.
End of the input string
End of the loop
End of the loop over all rowids/primary-keys.
End of the overrideable system calls
End of the pattern, either real or forced.
End of the strings.
End of threads.c
End of token.
End of tokenize.c
End of treeview.c
End of trigger.c
End of try_next loop
End of update.c
End of utf.c
End of util.c
End of vacuum.c
End of vdbe.c
End of vdbe.h
End of vdbeInt.h
End of vdbeapi.c
End of vdbeaux.c
End of vdbeblob.c
End of vdbemem.c
End of vdbesort.c
End of vdbetrace.c
End of vtab.c
End of vxworks.h
End of wal.c
End of wal.h
End of walker.c
End of where.c
End of whereInt.h
End of wherecode.c
End of whereexpr.c
End offset of token
End pointer of the first line.
End section: Filters
End stupid hack
End subpattern
End switch over the format type
End temporary aliases
End the database scan loop.
End the loop over all WhereLoops from outer-most down to inner-most
End the virtual table scan
Ends a ripemd128 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends a ripemd160 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends a ripemd256 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends a ripemd320 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends an MD4 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends an MD5 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends an SHA1 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends an SHA224 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends an SHA256 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends an SHA384 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Ends an SHA512 message-digest operation, writing the the message digest and zeroizing the context.
Enforce foreign key constraints
English only
Enhancements: A future improvement would be the option of multiple "cursors" so that multiple locations could occur in the one queue to allow placemarkers and additional flexibility.
Enlarge the buffer.
Ennumeration and lookup
Ensure adequate test coverage
Ensure no two columns have identical names: keep generating new names until we find one that is unique.
Ensure return value is a value
Ensure that if we're calling a private function, we're allowed to do so.
Ensure that if we're calling a protected function, we're allowed to do so.
Ensure that the PCREPOSIX_EXP_xxx macros are set appropriately for compiling these functions.
Ensure that the preferred method is actually available.
Ensure that v is greater than zero
Ensure that we haven't overridden a private function and end up calling the overriding public function...
Ensure the database schema has been loaded
Ensure the table name matches database name and that the table exists
Ensure there is enough workspace for forward references before copying them.
Ensures that we're allowed to call a private method.
Ensures that we're allowed to call a protected method.
Enter STATIC_MASTER mutex
Enter offset lookup state
Enter section data lookup state
Enter the mutexes
Entry point.
Entry points for the DB engine
Entry, exit
Ephemeral table holding all primary key values
Ephemeral table used for DISTINCT processing
Ephemeral table used to enforce DISTINCT
Eponymous table for this module
Equality constraint on the langid column
Erase the old PNG.
Ergo, although the code below looks incorrect, it's actually right.
Error Container
Error Occurred
Error already raised
Error and awaiting close
Error checking
Error code from db file unlock operation
Error code from journal finalization operation
Error code from system call errors
Error code returned by ICU function
Error code returned by the function.
Error condition
Error encountered while fetching the value
Error if hit end of pattern
Error if integer primary key greater than this
Error in retriving data
Error information
Error inspection
Error is less than an ulp
Error is less than half an ulp -- check for special case of mantissa a power of two.
Error levels
Error message
Error message as part of the result set, not good but we should not hang.
Error message codes for OP_Halt
Error message for circular references
Error message prefix
Error message stored here
Error message text, if an error occurs
Error message written here
Error messages
Error messages will be written here
Error messages written here
Error msg written here
Error number
Error occurred, but it still closed
Error offset
Error on empty input string
Error on negative offset
Error or EOF
Error reporting is already done by stream code
Error returns are externally defined PCRE_ERROR_xxx codes, which are all negative.
Error state.
Error string
Error token number
Error: could not load JIT functions.
Error: first report in this thread is method exit
Errors accumulate here
Escape " characters
Escape ' and enclose in '...'
Escape ' characters
Escape double quoted string contents
Escaped anything counts 1
Escaped properly
Escapes that need further processing, or are illegal.
Especially useful for base64 and datetime strings
Essentially what we now have is a set of tokens each consisting of a hexadecimal number followed by a separator character.
Essentially, we are waiting for the socket to become writeable, which means that all pending data has been sent.
Establish a read-lock on the table at the shared-cache level.
Estimate the average row size for the table and for all implied indices
Estimate the metonic cycle number.
Estimated average row size in bytes
Estimated cost of using this index
Estimated number of output rows
Estimated number of result rows
Estimated number of rows generated by this path
Estimated number of rows in this table
Estimated number of rows returned
Estimated output rows per loop
Estimated rows in table - from sqlite_stat1 table
Estimated rows returned by this scan
Estimated size of each table row in bytes
Estimated size of this column.
Evaluate subqueries as coroutines
Evaluate the current GROUP BY terms and store in b0, b1, b2...
Evaluate the equality constraints
Evaluate the expression and insert it into the temp table
Even for zero size payload we have to send a packet
Even if any illegal encoding is detected the result may contain a list of parsed encodings.
Even if pVal also contains NULL values.
Even if the match is empty, we need to reset the control head.
Even if the whole file is valid UTF-8 sequences, still reject it if it uses weird control characters.
Even if we don't know its exact size yet, we already know the padding, border and margin.
Even in the case the payload is evenly divisible by this value, the last packet will be empty, namely 0 bytes.
Even that has never been tested according to DB.
Even though any XCLASS list is now discarded, we must allow for its memory.
Even with the enabled per thread locale, localeconv won't check any locale change in the master thread.
Event counters from parent frame
Every class contains at least two characters.
Every code point has a grapheme break property which is one of the ucp_gbXX values defined in ucp.h.
Every lock should have a corresponding unlock.
Every thread initializes with a stack of size INIT_TOP_STACK.
Every user-visible function in PHP should document itself in the source
Everything above is part of the evaluation phase.
Everything checks out, set it
Everything else after.
Everything else is PPC-64 only.
Everything is OK.
Everything was consumed.
Exact encoding match
Exact half-way case:  apply round-even rule.
Exact match, prefer
Exactly one of regOld and regNew should be non-zero.
Example: "c2chars/nints" will return an object with fields chars1, chars2, and ints.
Example: the row for WORD contains ucp_L, ucp_N, ucp_P, ucp_Po.
Except when the whole stack frame must be saved.
Exception occurred on previous callback.
Exception throwing macro
Exclude from ctime.c
Exclude variables that can't be narrowed
Excludes all non-ASCII in either mode
Execute only once.
Execute prepared SQL statement.
Execute the regular expression.
Execute the statement to insert the record.
Execute this as SQL on the same database.
Executed commands will run through cmd.exe.
Executed, but the user hasn't started to fetch This will clean also the metadata, but after the EXECUTE call we will have it again.
Execution options
Exif Attribute Information
Existence of VDBE checked by caller
Existing WITH clause, or NULL
Existing colset object
Existing index ASCENDING
Existing index DESCENDING
Existing nearset, or NULL
Exit point for the then opcodes of this alternative.
Exit the mutexes and free the backup context structure.
Exit, the rest of the connect is in a different protocol.
Exotic types are handled as string also.
Expand all decompositions by recursively decomposing each character in the decomposition.
Expand the current pattern
Expand the nassign buffer.
Expanded data destination object for stdio output
Expanded data source object for gdIOCtx input
Expected number of pages in the list
Expected pointer map parent page number
Expected pointer map type
Expected size of the BLOB
Expensive, but the only way that produces an acceptable result: mix down to a palette based temporary image.
Explicit use of the CROSS keyword
Exponentional notation.
Export the constants provided by Facebook's build system to ocaml-land, since their FFI only allows you to call functions, not reference variables.
Exported by mysqlnd_ps_codec.c
Exported functions:
Expose Collator constants to PHP scripts
Expose DateFormat constants to PHP scripts
Expose ICU error codes to PHP scripts.
Expose IDN constants to PHP scripts.
Expose Locale constants to PHP scripts
Expose Normalizer constants to PHP scripts
Expose NumberFormatter constants to PHP scripts
Expose Spoofchecker constants to PHP scripts
Expose so we can display diagnostics
Expr in which substitution occurs
Expr list from which to derive column names
Expr struct EXPR_REDUCEDSIZE bytes only
Expr struct EXPR_TOKENONLYSIZE bytes only
Expr to test.
Expression contains one or more errors
Expression defining the new record number
Expression encoding the function
Expression for MATCH queries
Expression for a single result column
Expression list contaning only pSelectRowid
Expression list to resolve.
Expression list to search
Expression node to test
Expression of which pNode is a part
Expression opcode
Expression pPhrase belongs to
Expression text
Expression that pNear is a part of
Expression to be appended.
Expression to consider
Expression to initialize phrases in
Expression to iterate phrases of
Expression to pass to authorization callback
Expression to resolve.
Expression tree height of current sub-select
Expression used to recompute the rowid
Expression we are trying to match
Expressions defining the result set
Extend an existing range.
Extend downwards
Extend input
Extend string if needed
Extend the gl_pathv member of a glob_t structure to accommodate a new item, add the new item, and update gl_pathc.
Extend the last range.
Extend the logical size if we seek beyond EOF.
Extend the stack our own way.
Extend upwards
Extended errors
Extended floating point R/M field with opcode
Extension loading should only be enabled for when we attempt to load
Extension to which this belongs
Extension versionnumber
Extra argument
Extra bytes append to each in-memory page
Extra content
Extra data associated with the callback
Extra data for callback
Extra data passed into the callback
Extra dependencies on LEFT JOIN
Extra information associated with the page
Extra initialization needed
Extra prerequesites for using this table
Extra space after the Index object
Extra space associated with each page
Extra space on the end of pIdx
Extra table options.
Extra validation
Extra value.
Extra verbose when with __TEST
Extra zero bytes to append to pData
Extract a leaf from the trunk
Extract all files
Extract charset encoding
Extract encoding from string
Extract remaining digits.
Extract snippet from this column
Extract text
Extract the int value, ignore the fraction.
Extract the overloaded session_mode parameter into valid Oracle credential and session mode values
Extract the rowid or primary key for the current row
Extract the value into this register
Extract the values to be compared.
Extract this operand and return it.
Extract unencoded text from string
Extracted Key value
Extracting bit difference info.
F and G are optimized compared to their RFC 1321 definitions for architectures that lack an AND-NOT instruction, just like in Colin Plumb's implementation.
F if before H else P
F, G, H and I are basic MD5 functions.
F, G, H and I are basic SHA1 functions.
F900-FA2D Han compatibility.
FAILURE / SUCCESS
FALL THROUGH ...
FALLTHROUGH
FALSE - The DBG_ calls won't be traced, TRUE - will be traced
FASYNC under Solaris
FE30h CJK Compatibility Forms
FETCH_GLOBAL_LOCK instructs FETCH_W to not free the name_node operand, so it can be reused in the following ASSIGN_REF, which then frees it.
FETCH_LIST on a string behaves like FETCH_R on null
FF, GG, HH, and II transformations for rounds 1, 2, 3, and 4.
FIX ME ADD CLONE STUFF
FIXME - Work out proto_num here
FIXME This doesn't give microseconds as in Unix case, and the resolution is in system ticks, 10 ms intervals.
FIXME handle crash
FIXME the idea of checking to see if our connection is already persistent is good, but it adds a lot of overhead to non-persistent connections.
FIXME: Be smarter about indexes that use expressions
FIXME: I need to have this somehow handled if USE_SAPI is defined, because cgi will also be interfaced in USE_SAPI
FIXME: Implement request source
FIXME: Implement session source
FIXME: Read file names and sort them to prevent non-determinism.
FIXME: Resetting vars are required when session is stop/start/regenerated.
FIXME: Should not be fatal
FIXME: This does not work with Sybase, but environ will
FIXME: This doesn't cope with bzip2
FIXME: Use the openssl constants instead of enum.
FIXME: We allocate more than we need here
FIXME: better regex must be used
FIXME: convert to string
FIXME: how to pass method name if style is SOAP_DOCUMENT
FIXME: magical
FIXME: make this work for win32
FIXME: move declarations
FIXME: not sure why this is needed but removing it breaks tests
FIXME: numeric string
FIXME: provide more detailed information about the field type, field size and array dimensions
FIXME: some locale free implementation is really required here,,,
FIXME: support for more opcodes
FIXME: the rest of body is ignored
FIXME: there might be binary data
FIXME: tile: we could pregenerate this.
FK constraints this VM
FLATFILE_REPLACE
FMUL use FC as src2
FNV-1 hash each octet in the buffer
FNV-1 hash each octet of the buffer
FOR BC reasons, this will always perform and then print
FPU status register
FROM clause
FROM clause cannot contain a subquery
FROM clause does not contain a real table
FROM clause element to resolve
FROM clause is not a view
FROM clause must have exactly one term
FROM clause not a virtual table
FROM clause of subquery
FROM clause of the outer query
FROM clause pLvl reads data from
FROM clause term being analyzed
FROM clause term being coded
FROM clause term being indexed
FROM clause: A list of all tables to be scanned
FROM entries not usable at this level
FROM is not a subquery or view
FROM subqueries have Table metadata
FROM t1 EXCEPT SELECT ...
FROM t2 ORDER BY ..
FROMFULLGLOBYIFISNULLORDERESTRICTRIGHTROLLBACKROWUNIONUSING
FTP won't give us a valid mode, so approximate one based on being readable
FTS Cursor handle
FTS Table handle
FTS Table pointer
FTS cursor handle
FTS index object
FTS index to query
FTS table handle
FTS virtual table handle
FTS3 Cursor
FTS3 Cursor object
FTS3 cursor object
FTS3 table cursor
FTS3 table handle
FTS3 table snippet comes from
FTS3 vtab object
FTS5 Configuration
FTS5 Configuration object
FTS5 backend
FTS5 backend object
FTS5 backend to iterate within
FTS5 configuration
FTS5 global object for this database
FTS5 mask for idxFlags
FTS5INDEX_QUERY_XXX flags
FTS5_AND node to advance
FTS5_PLAN_XXX value
FTS5_STMT_XXX constant
FTS5_STRING node this phrase is part of
FTS5_STRING or FTS5_TERM node
FTS5_STRING, AND, OR or NOT
FTS5_VOCAB_COL or ROW
FTSQUERY_PHRASE expression
FULLWIDTH APOSTROPHE
FULLWIDTH BROKEN BAR
FULLWIDTH CENT SIGN
FULLWIDTH HYPHEN-MINUS
FULLWIDTH MACRON
FULLWIDTH NOT SIGN
FULLWIDTH POUND SIGN
FULLWIDTH QUOTATION MARK
FULLWIDTH REVERSE SOLIDUS
FULLWIDTH TILDE
FULLWIDTH YEN SIGN
F_UNLCK, F_RDLCK, or F_WRLCK
Factor out constant terms
Fail for a valid opcode that implies no starting bits.
Fail the operation and rollback the transaction
Fail to open empty path
Failed to compile, or error while post-processing
Failed to find the required lock.
Failed to open the file for read/write access.
Failed to write file to disk
Failing to match means the assertion is true.
Fails on a lookaside memory leak
Failure either means it doesn't exist or it's a directory and this server fails on listing directory sizes
Failure to do this would result in crashes in error scenarios
Failure to set the bits in the InJournal bit-vectors is benign.
Failure will leave zkeyval alone which will land us on the final else block below which is to append the value as next_index
Fake system time in seconds since 1970.
Fall back to creating a generic socket stream
Fall back to sendmail_from php.ini setting
Fall through
Fall through for the RTREE_EQ case
Fall through into OP_AggStep
Fall through into OP_Function
Fall through into OP_Halt
Fall through into OP_Rewind
Fall through into the next case
Fall through to the next case, OP_String
Fall through with a digit less than 8
Fall through.
Fall thru into the default case
Fall thru into the next case
Fall-through
Fallback to "string" filter
Fallback to UTC
Fallback to the default filter
Fallback to the normal code path if an unsupported flag is set.
Fallback token
False for ASC.
False for SCAN.
False for a read lock
False for index b-trees
False for overflow page list
False for pseudo-table or vtab
False otherwise.
False to clear lock
False to disable new lookaside allocations
False to omit journal
False_ if error occurred.
Fast decoding a UTF-8 character type.
Fast decoding a UTF-8 character.
Fast loads and stores.
Fast loads/stores.
Fast path for looking up the resources for the current thread.
Fast, but limited size.
Faster than pcre_uchar
Feed this result into the outter hash
Fetch  values from the incoming array
Fetch by Row: array will contain one sub-array per query row
Fetch by columns: array will contain one sub-array per query column
Fetch collator object.
Fetch jit auto globals used in the script before execution
Fetch metadata from Postgres system catalogue
Fetch options
Fetch the ctx hash value
Fetch the error information
Fetch the info entry for the field
Fetch the integer off the end of the index record
Fetch the object.
Fetch the timestamp from the UCalendar
Fetch the typelibrary and use that to look things up
Fetching non-WSDL mode options
Few of the cell counts will overflow, and clamping those that do overflow to the maximum value will give close- enough results.
Fewer features
Field containing pattern end
Field containing pattern start
Field containing processed string end
Field containing processed string start
Fields below are only available in SQLite 3.8.2 and later
Fields below are only available in SQLite 3.9.0 and later
Fields in sorter record
Fifth parameter is an unsigned character
Figure out how many bytes are required by this new entry
Figure out how many columns of data are supplied.
Figure out how many memory cells we will need then allocate them.
Figure out how many new bytes are in this term
Figure out how many records are in the journal.
Figure out if this is a leaf or an internal node.
Figure out the dayofweek for y-1-1
Figure out the db that the trigger will be created in
Figure out the effective temporary directory.
Figure out the name of the primary key index for the current table.
Figure out the node size to use.
Figure out the page-size for the database.
Figure out the root-page that the lock should be held on.
Figure out the rowid of the new row.
Figure out the size of the output
Figure out the total size of the current row in tokens.
Figure out the type of table this step will deal with.
Figure out what action to take in case of a rowid collision
Figure out where to write the new Expr structure.
Figure out whether to use 1, 2, 4, 6 or 8 bytes.
Figure this out later
File Implementing the shared memory system for Hack.
File descriptor for database
File descriptor for database pTo
File descriptor for main journal
File descriptor for sub-journal
File descriptor object
File descriptor open on db file
File descriptor to close
File descriptor to write to
File format to use for encoding
File handle
File handle for WAL file
File handle for the database file
File handle from CreateFileMapping
File handle from winOpen
File handle here
File handle object
File handle open on target db
File handle to write to
File handle we are reading from
File is a reparse point.
File is in the right directory
File name for write-ahead log
File offset to begin writing at
File opened that is not a database file
File path associated with error
File to read from
File to write into
File upload stopped by extension
File upload successful
File-name for the master journal
File-system block size
Filename as passed to xOpen
Filename in OS encoding
Filename in UTF-8 encoding
Filename map destructor
Filename might have query parameters
Files only.
Files save handler checks/create save_path directory and setup ps_files data.
Files save handler closes open files and it's memory.
Files save handler should be used as reference implementations of session save handlers.
Files save handler supports splitting session data into multiple directories.
Filesystem type name
Fill dtable with character encodings.
Fill ib_link and trans with the correct database link and transaction.
Fill in any forward references that are required.
Fill in length of a previous callout, except when the next thing is a quantifier or when processing a property substitution string in UCP mode.
Fill in the Pager.zFilename and Pager.zJournal buffers, if required.
Fill in the abNotindexed array
Fill in the azColumn array
Fill in the header.
Fill in the ket
Fill in the new data
Fill in the payload size
Fill in the ping_auto_globals_mask for the new script.
Fill in the terminating state and check for disastrous overflow, but if debugging, leave the test till after things are printed out.
Fill in the zName and zDb fields of the vtab structure.
Fill in this structure
Fill the automatic index with content
Fill the index with data and reparse the schema.
Fill the input buffer --- called whenever buffer is emptied.
Fill the inverse-colormap entries in the update box that contains
Fill up the buffer with client data.
Filter is not attached to a chain, or chain is somehow not part of a stream
Filter out attempts to run UPDATE or DELETE on contentless tables.
Filter used with cursor pCsr
Filters are cleaned up by the streams they're attached to
Filters will dispose of their brigades
Final block of segment
Final cleanup
Final leaf to traverse
Final number of cells on page
Finalize all SQL statements
Finalize the journal file.
Finally apply defaults from config file
Finally check session id for dangerous characters Security note: session id may be embedded in HTML pages.
Finally clean
Finally,  rollback pages from the sub-journal.
Finally, jump back to the beginning of the executable code.
Finally, sync the database file.
Finally, the character type table.
Finally, we keep going until we got data, and an SSL_ERROR_NONE, unless we had an error.
Finally, we pad on the right.
Find SCC entry points
Find T definition points
Find a dirty page to write-out and recycle.
Find a node to store this cell in.
Find a reasonable color
Find a set of variables which are used outside of the block where they are defined.
Find all instances of carriage returns or line feeds and replace them with spaces.
Find an empty slot and replace it
Find an existing tokenizer
Find an unused temporary register.
Find and open actual ini file
Find beginning of salt string.
Find cached config entry: If not found, create one
Find default filter
Find end of next segment, copy tentatively to pathend.
Find if Y M D falls in YearNumber Y, WeekNumber 1 through 53
Find if Y M D falls in YearNumber Y-1, WeekNumber 52 or 53
Find implemented methods - SessionHandlerInterface
Find next finally block
Find or create the best match
Find our first letter
Find out how many processes are using this semaphore.
Find out if the previous and current characters are "word" characters.
Find out what action to take in case there is a uniqueness conflict
Find out what flags are present
Find out which shared locks are already held by sibling connections.
Find pairs with same sense.
Find smaller child
Find starting text node
Find the balanced brace
Find the best snippet of nFToken tokens in column iRead.
Find the class entry
Find the close bracket so we can overallocate the set.
Find the closest colormap entry for each cell in the update box, given the list of candidate colors prepared by find_nearby_colors.
Find the column for which info is requested
Find the end of dst and adjust bytes left but don't go past end
Find the end of the year.
Find the existing id
Find the first character that has an other case.
Find the first occurrence of find in s, ignore case.
Find the first two PmaReaders to compare.
Find the firstest rowid any synonym points to.
Find the iHash'th table
Find the lowest cost path.
Find the maximum compressed chunk size.
Find the minimum length of subject string.
Find the molad of Tishri closest to this date.
Find the named savepoint.
Find the next possible pointer head.
Find the next row in the Queue and output that row
Find the parent table of this foreign key.
Find the root of the NEAR expression
Find the sibling pages to balance.
Find the soap object and assign
Find the splittable box with the largest color population
Find the square root using Newton's algorithm.
Find the start of the next token.
Find the start of the year.
Find the value object that holds the new rowid value.
Find token for encoding
Find token for end of encoded data
Find variables that may be only LONG or DOUBLE
Finder function name
Finding the first day of the year is the most difficult part.
Finds the expansion factor, i.e. the square root of the factor by which the affine transform affects area.
Finds the slot corresponding to the key in a hash table.
Finish committing the transaction to the destination database.
Finish the digest.
Finish the loop through table entries that match term pOrTerm.
Finish unless -g was given
Finish up at the end of each pass.
Finite column numbers
Fire BEFORE or INSTEAD OF triggers
Fire any BEFORE UPDATE triggers.
Firebird allows SQL statements up to 64k, so bail if it doesn't fit
Firebird only requires single quotes to be doubled if string lengths are used
Firebird users should use the aliases, so future InterBase-specific changes will not affect their code
First 256 symbols are for conversion from koi8-r to corresponding charset, second 256 symbols are for reverse conversion, from charset to koi8-r.
First FILE_START event, initializing data
First Mem address for previous GROUP BY
First Mem address for storing current GROUP BY
First Mem of result set
First PmaReader to compare
First WhereLoop to compare
First absolute level for iLangid/iIndex
First allowable cell index
First allowable cell or freeblock offset
First arg to busy callback
First arg to comparison function
First arg to pass to pApi functions
First argument to compare function
First argument to disposal method
First argument to link function is the target and hence should go to frompath Second argument to link function is the link itself and hence should go to topath
First argument to the function
First argument to xCodec...
First byte code.
First byte encodes the length
First byte in the packet is the field count.
First byte is ERROR_MARKER on error, but otherwise is starting byte of encoded sequence for length.
First byte of available memory space
First byte of buffer to write
First byte of cell content area
First byte of gap between cell pointers and cell content
First byte of the Cell
First byte of the cell content area
First byte of the locking range
First byte of token
First byte past allocated memory
First byte past end of available space
First byte past the iStart buffer
First byte to be locked
First cell is 0
First cell to delete
First char after - keep uppercase
First char keep uppercase
First char must be alphanumeric
First character of input text
First check for parentheses nested too deeply.
First check to see if the LHS is contained in the RHS.
First color allocated is background.
First comes the lower casing table
First convert the string to UTF-16.
First convert the strings to UTF-16.
First convert the x509 struct back to a DER encoded buffer and let Windows decode it into a form it can work with
First copy the longer fraction.
First copy the root, then field by field adjust the pointers
First deal with comments.
First directory starts at offset 8.
First disjunct
First doclist
First element
First element already in pEntry
First field to be combined into the record
First in linked list of saved aux-data
First in list of all aux.
First in list of all open cursors
First in list of all tokenizer modules
First increment the byte count.
First index cursor
First initialize the descriptor Notice that if no length is given, we initialize buf_end to the highest possible address.
First inspected character for partial matching.
First instruction of interior of the loop
First instruction:
First is zero
First key to write
First leaf page number in segment
First leaf to traverse
First list contains canonical mappings, second also includes compatibility mappings.
First list to merge
First lock to acquire or release
First look for an exact match
First memory cell containing the PRIMARY KEY
First namecontext in the list
First of nPk memory cells holding PRIMARY KEY value
First of nPk registers holding PRIMARY KEY value
First of real indices on the table
First operand
First page of the database
First page of the overflow chain
First page of the sector pPg is located on.
First part of index name.
First part of the name of the table or view
First pass calculates a safe size for the pretty print version
First pass, or a non-duplicated name.
First position in position-list
First register holding data before packing
First register holding data to be sorted
First register in VUpdate arg array
First register in a range holding values to insert
First register in temporary register block
First replace any existing entry.
First rowid on leaf iLeafPgno
First run uses custom filter, second run uses bloom filter
First search for a match amongst the application-defined functions.
First search the list for an existing lock on this table.
First separate the bound variables, which point to the result set, then destroy the set.
First skip the bit map if present.
First sorted list to be merged
First term on new page
First time through the loop
First token in coalesced phrase instance
First token of best snippet
First token of current snippet
First token of snippet
First token to include
First try to append the term to the current node.
First try to decide what to do without reference to lookahead token.
First try to find another RBU vfs lower down in the vfs stack.
First varint to store in hint
First we determine the argument type.
First we have the histogram data structure and routines for creating it.
First we have to extract the count of named parentheses from the pattern.
First we pad on the left.
First we set PCRE_NOTEMPTY_ATSTART and try the match again at the same point.
First, 510 dates from a table in "Jewish Calendar Mystery Dispelled" were calculated and compared to the table.
First, compare signs.
First, ensure the minimum number of matches are present.
First, find the function
First, look past the end of the item to see if there is repeat information following.
First, sort out the command line.
First, the terminals, then, starting at YYNTOKENS, nonterminals.
First, try to get user-specific magic file
First, we lookup by abbreviation only
First-Fit Search
Fish out the optional data from the extra_data structure, first setting the default values.
Fits if negative.
Fits in a 64-bit signed integer.
Fix in 1.3: count a vertex only once
Fix items to this schema
Fix this now if it is the case.
FixHeaderField
Fixed by Mao Morimoto 2.0.16
Fixed point to double
Fixed point to float
Fixed point to integer
Fixer object
Flag c as a length
Flag parameters, such as SF_Distinct
Flag variables
Flagging options
Flags are keept in volatile registers.
Flags are kept in volatile registers.
Flags associated with this schema
Flags does not set: BIN_IMM_EXTS unnecessary.
Flags for Fts5IndexQuery
Flags for OP_Once
Flags for determining allowed stream crypto methods
Flags for sub-WHERE clause
Flags for the fsync
Flags passed through to VFS open
Flags passed through to the VFS
Flags that describe this loop
Flags this file descriptor was opened with
Flags this file was opened with
Flags to enable/disable optimizations
Flags to use to sync header writes
Flip the starting bit in the negative case.
Flip type bit for the XORI below.
Flipped and lower case tables.
Float to fixed point
Float to string conversion may be affected by current locale setting.
Floating or exponential, depending on exponent.
Floating point R/M field with opcode
Floating point operators
Floating point status register.
Floating point sum
Floating point value
Floating point.
Flood fill: doesn't do much on a continuously variable tone jpeg original.
Flood with light blue.
Flush all currently outstanding nodes to disk.
Flush all output buffers
Flush buffer
Flush everything.
Flush if anything is left and unbuffered set
Flush the hash table to disk if required
Flush the last leaf page to disk.
Flush the last word.
Flush the packet to disk, and reset the accumulator
Fold to lower case
Following are some macros around the "workhorse" function __daylen__
Following if block primarily used for inserting nodes created via createElementNS
Follows parameter metadata, we have just to skip it, as libmysql does
Fonts can be used across multiple images
For 11 and above, the session pool has its own mechanism for doing so for purity NEW connections.
For ALT, we continue with the next alternative, but we have to arrange that the final result from subpattern is SSB_CONTINUE rather than SSB_DONE.
For BC we have to check whether the key is numeric and use it like this
For COND brackets, we wrap the whole thing in a possessively repeated non-capturing bracket, because we have not invented POS versions of the COND opcodes.
For DOCID_CMP macro
For EUC-JP.
For FTS5_STRING - cluster of phrases
For Go, this means we cannot generate a panic, which cannot be recovered, and so tests fail.
For HTTP/1.0 conforming clients
For HTTP/1.1 conforming clients
For IN operators or if an error occurs, the return value is 0.
For KET, return SSB_CONTINUE: if this is the top level, that indicates failure, but after a nested subpattern, it causes scanning to continue.
For LC_MESSAGES
For MATCH_MATCH, the group has matched, so we restart it with a new subject starting position, remembering that we had at least one match.
For MATCH_NOMATCH, carry on with the alternatives, as usual.
For MS SqlServer compatibility
For MS Visual Studio and Symbian OS, there are problems in initializing these variables to non-local functions.
For MySQL compatibility
For O the error has to be thrown in __wakeup.
For ON UPDATE, construct the next term of the WHEN clause.
For ONCE brackets, that's all we need to do.
For ONCE_NC
For ONEPASS, no need to store the rowid/primary-key.
For OP_BRA and OP_BRAMINZERO.
For OP_ONCE.
For ORDER BY, column number in result set
For PS, we leave them in Prepared state
For SCI you encode the S, then have to remember to skip the C.
For SQL_SUCCESS, the length is in vallen.
For STRING expressions, the near cluster
For UNUSED dst.
For XCLASS items
For a BITVEC_SZ of 512, this would be 34,359,739.
For a DEFINE group, required and first character settings are not relevant.
For a NOT node, this array always contains 2 entries.
For a ZERODATA table, the pData and nData are both ignored.
For a duplicate or later name, carry on.
For a duplicated named group, OP_DNREF and OP_DNREFI are used.
For a forward assertion, we take the reqchar, if set.
For a much better antialiased result, the affine function is recommended.
For a non-repeating atomic group that includes captures, establish a backup point by processing the rest of the pattern at a lower level.
For a non-repeating ket, just continue at this level.
For a recursion/subroutine call, if its end has been reached, which implies a backward reference subroutine call, we can scan it.
For a repeated Unicode property match, there are two extra bytes that define the required property.
For a rowid table, initialize the RowSet to an empty set
For a single, positive character, get the value into mcbuffer, and then we can handle this with the normal one-character code.
For a table with implicit rowids, append "old._rowid_" to the list.
For a two-way OR, attempt to implementation case 2.
For a user friendly message about environment setup
For a varray this is the maximum length of the array
For added safety, we only leave -_.
For all aliases with an explicit class name, resolve the class now.
For all other records, zero.
For an XCLASS there is always some additional data
For an anchored pattern, or an unanchored pattern that has a first char, or a multiline pattern that matches only at "line starts", there is no point in seeking a list of starting bytes.
For an anchored pattern, we use the "required byte" only if it follows a variable length item in the regex.
For an ordinary non-repeating ket, just continue at this level.
For anchored or unanchored matches, there may be a "last known required character" set.
For any other minimum, carrying on will result in NOMATCH.
For anything else, we wrap the entire repeated item inside OP_ONCE brackets.
For anything other than nomatch or partial match, just return the code.
For assigning database names to pTable
For astronomical as well as ceremonial reasons, the start of a new year may be delayed until a day or two after the new moon causing years to vary in length.
For binary data it is truncated to fieldsize bytes.
For byte_sequence_compare.
For capturing groups we have to check the group number back at the start and if necessary complete handling an extraction by setting the offsets and bumping the high water mark.
For caseless UTF-8 mode when UCP support is available, check whether this character has more than one other case.
For chaining headers.
For char data, the length of the returned string will be longreadlen - 1
For columns use the column name name
For comparing with previous entry
For compatibility reason, implemeted interface is not checked
For compatibility we just ignore this setting.
For compatibility with MS SQL Server
For compatibility with auto-callouts, we allow a callout to be specified before a condition that is an assertion.
For conditions of distribution and use, see the accompanying README file.
For conditions that are assertions, check the syntax, and then exit the switch.
For connection option
For convenience, we use the same bit definitions as in chartables: 0x04   decimal digit 0x08   hexadecimal digit Then we can use ctype_digit and ctype_xdigit in the code.
For custom operations on an rbuVfs-file.
For debugging use only:
For descending pending seg-readers only
For description of Comp see Q_Sort.
For detecting the page size.
For digits or letters, do an initial lookup in a table.
For each CTE in the WITH clause....
For each aggregate function
For each bit set in fixed_bit_masks, what the value is for this instruction.
For each color in colormap, find: 1.
For each color selected by find_nearby_colors, compute its distance to the center of each cell in the box.
For each column used in source tables
For each cursor required, also allocate a memory cell.
For each entry in the regex array, get the entry
For each entry in the search array, get the entry
For each expression in the list
For each found increment the counter.
For each length, check that the remaining bytes start with the 0x80 bit set and not the 0x40 bit.
For each matching starting delimiter, we increment nesting level, and decrement it for each matching ending delimiter.
For each pipe, find an instruction that fits.
For each subject entry, convert it to string, then perform replacement and add the result to the return_value array.
For each subpattern, insert it into the appropriate array.
For each subpattern, insert it into the subpatterns array.
For each subsequent argument, make it a reference, increase refcount, and add it to the end of the array
For err msgs.
For every character in the password add the entire password.
For example 'inifile' uses this to allow faster access when the key was already found using firstkey/nextkey.
For example, '1 12:59:10' is read the same as '1 day 12 hours 59 min 10 sec'.
For example, Britain converted in 1752, The USSR in 1918 and Greece in 1923.
For example, if an exception was thrown in a function and when the function's local variable destruction results in a destructor being called.
For example:
For final END opcode
For hard partial matching, we then return immediately.
For image rotations, the optimized versions have a lazy antialiasing for the edges of the images.
For insert, update etc.
For iterating through doclist index
For iterating through indexes
For iterators.
For jddayofweek
For jdmonthname
For lengths its absolutely safe.
For looping over PmaReader objects
For looping over all elements of the table
For looping over all siblings
For looping over bytes of pCell
For looping over existing elements
For looping over existing file IDs
For looping over expression in a list
For looping over indices
For looping over indices of the table
For looping over pList
For looping over pages
For looping over result columns
For looping over sibling connections
For looping over tables in pDb
For looping over tables in pSrc
For looping through SELECT statements
For looping through nTerm phrase terms
For looping through segments
For many things, we may have leading zeros in a number NUM.
For metasequences that actually match a character, we disable the setting of a first character if it hasn't already been set.
For more details see the comment where this table is used.
For more info on the specification and history, see http://www.xmlrpc.org.
For mutual recursions we keep a chain on the stack.
For negated classes, we build the map as usual, then invert it at the end.
For net-snmp prior to 5.4
For newline before label
For non-COND brackets, we modify the BRA code and use KETRPOS.
For non-duplicate names, give an error if the number is duplicated.
For non-fixed-length newline cases,
For non-possessive ONCE brackets, all we need to do is to set the KET.
For now, if you're binding output columns, it's better to use LAZY or BOUND fetches if you want to shave off those cycles
For now, this only reverts archive comment changes.
For now, we impose an arbitrary limit to avoid runaway swapping when large files are passed thru.
For now, we just bail if we get a mustUnderstand header intended for us.
For now, we return with a failure code to prevent the underlying file's details from being used instead.
For numbers that are too large to represent as a long, this function returns a zero.
For opcode without a special possessified version, wrap the item in ONCE brackets.
For options used by XMLRPC_VALUE funcs that otherwise do not have parameters for options.
For other groups, scan the branches.
For pcretest program.
For people running under terminal services, GetWindowsDirectory will return their personal Windows directory, so lets add the system windows directory too
For platforms with incomplete ANSI defines.
For position independent code, t9 must contain the function address.
For possible first char
For possible last char
For read, if the entry is marked unmodified, it is assumed that the file pointer, if present, is opened for reading
For recode 3.5
For rmin and rmax iterators.
For scanning through pCell
For session-pool using connections, the underlying connection is released to its session pool.
For shared-cache mode
For sizes 2 through MX_SMALL, inclusive
For some opcodes, there are special alternative opcodes for this case.
For some reason you have to re-enable this callback every bloody time
For some reason, the macros don't work properly if an expression is given as the argument to RRETURN when the heap is in use.
For stack depth measure.
For storing the record being decoded
For temporary filename, if necessary.
For testing
For testing purposes, we can assume that any existential is Any, since we won't be looking at any witness tables that follow the container.
For testing, remove later.
For the back references, the values are negative the reference number.
For the cross dim, we add both sides at the end because the value is aggregate via a max function.
For the default locale php.ini setting
For the local hostname obtained via gethostname which is different from the dns-related MAXHOSTNAMELEN constant above
For the moment, this source module just uses the default resync method provided by the JPEG library.
For the purpose of this function, 'word' is defined as a locale dependent string containing alphabetic characters, which also may contain, but not start with "'" and "-" characters.
For the purposes of this routine, disable the mutex
For the specifics of the algorithm, see http://wiki.php.net/rfc/rounding
For the target the exact string given by the user must be used, relative or not, existing or not.
For them, possessive_quantifier is always FALSE at this stage.
For these machines you must define RIGHT_SHIFT_IS_UNSIGNED.
For this implementation we'll use the highest depth encountered.
For this purpose, the lunar cycle is assumed to be 29 days 12 hours and 793 halakim.
For this reason the direct basedir check against the glob query is senseless on windows.
For this reason the prefix is rather better cut off.
For this reason, it is simplest to treat this case separately, as otherwise the code gets far too messy.
For this reason, we need to restore the working value and also the values of the final offsets, in case they were set by a previous iteration of the same bracket.
For this reason, we will put it inside this file after the stop function.
For this reason, xclass gets set TRUE above when uchar_classdata is emptied, and that's why this code is the way it is here instead of just doing a test on class_uchardata below.
For tiled fill, the use of a flag buffer is mandatory.
For tracing reduce actions, the names of all rules are required.
For traits self etc refers to the using class, not the trait itself
For traits this check is delayed until after trait binding
For use by application
For use by application VFS
For use by built-in VFS
For use by extension VFS
For use with loading xml
For write modes close data stream first to signal EOF to server
For z/OS, config.h is forced
Force UID and PWD to be set in the DSN
Force an SQLITE_TOOBIG error.
Force compaction
Force config.h in z/OS
Force fmt to a valid value since we don't return anything.
Force greedy
Force next pass to zero the color index table
Force skipping escape sequences on windows due to the ambiguity with path backslashes
Force xDisconnect calls on all virtual tables
Forcefully null terminate the filename.
Forces SQLITE_CORRUPT return below
Foreign key constraint
Foreign key for which pTab is the child
Foreign key index for pFKey
Foreign key to find index for
Foreign key to get action for
Forever loops are also detected at runtime, so those that occur in conditional subpatterns will be picked up then.
Form 1:  Analyze everything
Form 2:  Analyze the database or table named
Form 3: Analyze the fully qualified table name
Form the KeyInfo object from this ExprList
Form the initial difference increments
Format output string
Format string
Format string for SQL
Format the number using a fixed-length buffer.
FormatMessage returns 0 on failure.
Formatting escapes and wrapping text in a string before printing it.
Forms a linked list of all cursors
Formulate the zContentExprlist text
Fortunately this doesn't actually matter in practice.
Fortunately this is really a rare case
Fortunately too, there is general agreement that codes 0x00 through 0x3F represent control characters, 0x41 a nonbreaking space, and the remainder printing characters.
Fortunately, SEEK_SET is defined to be zero by the standard.
Fortunately, no need to shift.
Forward Declaration
Forward Declarations
Forward declaration
Forward declaration of methods
Forward declarations
Forward declarations of structures.
Forward definitions.
Forward reference
Forward references
Forward references to VFS helper methods used for memory mapped files
Forward references to VFS helper methods used for temporary files
Forward references to VFS methods
Forward references to internal structures
Forward references to structures used for WAL
Forward search if possible.
Found a character that has a single other case.
Found a non empty slot
Found a wp with the same name.
Found no documentation how the defined behaviour is when this function fails
Found the named subpattern.
Found trailing ws.
Found verb, exit loop
Four byte sequence.
Fourth byte
Fourth parameter is passed 0.
Fourth parameter is passed the value 2.
Fragment number
Frame size of the current alternative.
Frame to read
Frame to read from WAL file
Free GC buffer.
Free Memory
Free a mutex
Free a prior allocation
Free all memory and close all files.
Free allocated data belonging to a glob_t structure.
Free allocated memory
Free allocated structure
Free any SQLite statements used while processing the previous object
Free any old pages that were not reused as new pages.
Free any outstanding Savepoint structures.
Free any prepared statements held
Free blocks must be in ascending order.
Free closure object
Free global list
Free haystack
Free header entry
Free here what should not be seen by the next script
Free is possible because the user could have lost reference.
Free last row's zvals
Free memory allocated for DNS records.
Free object contents, but don't free objects themselves, so they show up as leaks
Free objects
Free page blocks
Free previous message if any
Free shutdown functions
Free soap headers
Free space for next result
Free temporary memory and return success
Free the STR_PTR.
Free the buffer for the token groups.
Free the connection p
Free the m object and return SQLITE_CORRUPT.
Free the others.
Free the position-lists accumulated for each deferred token above.
Free the previous value and save the new one
Free the processed event
Free this when deleting the vdbe
Free up as much memory as possible from the page cache
Free up the array of auxiliary databases
Free-list trunk page
FreeBSD and DragonFly floating point precision fix
FreeBSD sucks
FreeTDS hack
Freetype 2.1 or better
Freetype 2.1.3 or better
Frequent case.
From "Hacker's Delight"
From ANALYZE: Est.
From SLJIT point of view, this is not an issue.
From appnote.txt: This entry in the Local header MUST include BOTH original and compressed file size fields.
From http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/UTF16
From release 8.34 is is also correct for Perl space, because Perl added VT at release 5.18.
From this opcode
From this the length of the year can be determined and thus the length of each month.
From this, construct a list of files/directories that are "in" the directory represented by dir
Fsync at this offset
Fsync the WAL header if true
Fts3 cursor for current query
Fts3 table cursor
Fts3 table handle
Fts3MultiSegReader to modify
Fts3SegReader object to return
Fts5 Backend to iterate within
Fts5 context
Fts5 index object
Fts5 table object
Fts5Storage object
Fudge the offset values to achieve this, unless we're already at the end of the string.
Fudge the value of "called" so that when it is inserted as an offset below, what it actually inserted is the reference number of the group.
Full path to database file
Full pathname of this file
Full scan via index
Full table scan
Full text of the relevant licenses is included below.
Full-text index
Full-text index search
Full-text search using a MATCH operator on a non-docid column.
Full-text search using a MATCH operator.
Full-text table
Full-text table handle
Fully expand all decompositions before generating the output file.
Fully qualified names are always default refs
Function Return Code
Function arguments
Function arguments array
Function arguments that may change
Function call context
Function call was converted into builtin instruction
Function called for non-persistent connections.
Function context
Function context - put error messages here
Function definition
Function for logging
Function has WSDL description
Function has no WSDL description
Function local variables
Function name
Function result
Function return value
Function to call when busy
Function to invoke on each commit
Function to possibly overload
Function to reinitialize pages
Function used to reclaim memory
Function/Class/Method definitions
Function: gdAffineEqual Determines whether two affine transformations are equal.
Function: gdAffineFlip Flip an affine transformation horizontally or vertically.
Function: gdAffineIdentity Set up the identity matrix.
Function: gdAffineInvert Find the inverse of an affine transformation.
Function: gdAffineRectilinear Determines whether the affine transformation is axis aligned.
Function: gdAffineRotate Set up a rotation affine transform.
Function: gdAffineScale Set up a scaling matrix.
Function: gdAffineShearVertical Set up a vertical shearing matrix, columns are untouched.
Function: gdAffineTranslate Set up a translation matrix.
Function: gdImageThresholdCrop Crop an image using a given color.
Function: gdTransformAffineCopy Applies an affine transformation to a region and copy the result in a destination to the given position.
Function: gdTransformAffineGetImage Applies an affine transformation to a region and return an image containing the complete transformation.
Function: getPixelInterpolated Returns the interpolated color value using the default interpolation method.
Functions exported from Go.
Functions to support testing and debugging.
Functions used only by user authorization logic
Functions used to configure a Pager object.
Functions used to manage pager transactions and savepoints.
Functions used to obtain and release page references.
Functions used to query pager state and configuration.
Functions used to truncate the database file.
Functions using locale lowercase: zend_binary_strncasecmp_l zend_binary_strcasecmp_l zend_binary_zval_strcasecmp zend_binary_zval_strncasecmp string_compare_function_ex string_case_compare_function Functions using ascii lowercase: zend_str_tolower_copy zend_str_tolower_dup zend_str_tolower zend_binary_strcasecmp zend_binary_strncasecmp
Functions whose might need modification for all new supported opcodes: next_opcode check_opcode_types set_private_data_ptrs get_framesize init_frame get_private_data_copy_length copy_private_data compile_matchingpath compile_backtrackingpath
Further calls to 'VirtualAlloc' will "commit" pages, meaning they will be bound to physical memory.
Further modified for PHP
Future revisions and derivatives of this source code must acknowledge Facebook Inc.
GC for closed generators doesn't need an allocated buffer
GC must be done after read
GC must be done before reading session data.
GC would cause such a reference in the root buffer.
GCC workaround for invalid code generation with -O2.
GCC works hard to eliminate a seemingly unnecessary call to malloc, so we actually use the memory we allocate.
GD 2.0 supports 8 bits of color resolution per channel and 7 bits of alpha channel resolution.
GD 2.0 supports RGBA truecolor and will read and write truecolor PNGs.
GD2 image format types
GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
GIF Image compression - modified 'compress'  Based on: compress.c - File compression ala IEEE Computer, June 1984.
GIF Specific routines
GIF terminator
GIFCOMPR.C       - GIF Image compression routines  Lempel-Ziv compression based on 'compress'.
GLOB is always case sensitive.
GLOBALS hijack attempt, reject parameter
GLOBALS protection
GLOB_MAGCHAR: Set in gl_flags if pattern contained a globbing character.
GLOB_NOMAGIC: Same as GLOB_NOCHECK, but it will only append pattern if it did not contain any magic characters.
GLOB_NOMATCH
GLOSSARY  dehiyyot         The set of 4 rules that determine when the new year starts relative to the molad.
GMST is then the sidereal time at Greenwich at any
GNU Unix Standard tar archive
GNU libc documentation states the following: If the information about the type of the file is easily available non-directories will be rejected but no extra work will be done to determine the information for each file.
GOTO label for end of CASE stmt
GOTO label for next WHEN clause
GOVERNMENT USE: If you are acquiring this software on behalf of the U.S.
GREGORIAN CALENDAR
GROUPBY cover of ORDERBY
Gamma is ignored, and there is no support for text annotations.
Garbage collector
Gcc gets the wrong answer for NaN/0 unless both sides are NaN.
General DEFINEs
General Help Topics
General Implementation Functions
General case, use recursion.
General heap allocations
General version.
Generate a single row of result
Generate a subroutine that will reset the group-by accumulator
Generate auto-index WhereLoops
Generate code for all sub-queries in the FROM clause
Generate code for an unconditional jump to instruction iDest
Generate code for the left and right SELECT statements.
Generate code into this VDBE
Generate code into this VM
Generate code into this virtual machine
Generate code that deals with a rowid collision
Generate code that executes if the new index entry is not unique
Generate code that runs whenever the GROUP BY changes.
Generate code to destroy the database record of the trigger.
Generate code to handle collisions
Generate code to implement the subquery
Generate code to remove the index and from the master table
Generate code to this VDBE
Generate ilim digits, then fix them up.
Generate loop termination code.
Generate new record numbers semi-randomly
Generate or use a private key
Generate the case mapping data.
Generate the code to do the search.
Generate the combining class data.
Generate the composition data.
Generate the ctype data.
Generate the decomposition data.
Generate the header
Generate the number data.
Generate the subroutine return
Generated by re2c 0.13.5
Generated by re2c 0.13.5 on Thu Aug 13 10:30:11 2015
Generated by re2c 0.13.5 on Thu Aug 13 10:30:12 2015
Generated by re2c 0.14.3
Generated by re2c 0.15.3
Generates a warning - but it always works
Generating CHECK constraints or inserting into partial index
Generating code for the first alternative.
Generating code.
Generation counter.
Generator return types are handled separately
Generic Aggregated conversions
Generic pointer
Get a NULL terminated version of the new table name.
Get a bit from CR, all other bits are zeroed.
Get a list of all dirty pages in the cache, sorted by page number
Get a token with the impersonated user.
Get all notices
Get an EXCLUSIVE lock on the database file.
Get an appropriate name for the column
Get and print the digits of the fraction part.
Get arguments and do error checking
Get argv from the global symbol table.
Get astronomical twilight
Get best match possible.
Get character value, increment pointer
Get civil twilight
Get constant option value
Get current entry
Get current strength and return it.
Get entry and increase reference count
Get everything else as option/offset value
Get function parameters and do error checking
Get function parameters and do error-checking.
Get hex value
Get locale by specified type.
Get methodname.
Get nautical twilight
Get necessary buffer size first
Get necessary output buffer size
Get next char
Get next character in the pattern
Get next piece if no limit or limit not yet reached and something matched
Get number of entries in the input hash
Get number of septets
Get number option value as string
Get of new value in array
Get option name
Get our own host name
Get output buffer and send as fault detials
Get performance boost if reporting is switched off
Get request time
Get rest as section/offset value
Get rid of C:, if exists
Get rid of macros.
Get rid of this when OpenBSD has proper support for PT_TLS.
Get save handlers
Get serializer handlers
Get shared locks at the system level, if necessary
Get size of security buffer.
Get sort key, reallocating the buffer if needed.
Get status of next character
Get status of previous character
Get sun up/down and transit
Get temporary file name
Get the PIPE_BUF from pathconf
Get the URI of the current script so that we can set the base directory in libxml
Get the VDBE program ready for execution
Get the actual size of the TokenUser structure
Get the arg if we haven't already.
Get the argument count
Get the arguments and check for errors
Get the boundary
Get the conversion type modifier
Get the current used size of the three stacks, in elements.
Get the database meta information.
Get the delimiter and display a warning if it is alphanumeric or a backslash.
Get the digits of the integer part and push them on a stack.
Get the disp_value for the given locale
Get the element we want to insert before
Get the error code from SSL, and check to see if it's an error or not.
Get the exclusive locks at the system level.
Get the field width
Get the final character and fall through
Get the first element now
Get the first value and copy it into the return value
Get the header
Get the indexed version instead of the normal one.
Get the keyword value for each keyword
Get the keywords
Get the last notice
Get the last value and copy it into the return value
Get the local shared locks
Get the memory.
Get the next element
Get the position of the constant.
Get the precision
Get the results of the thread
Get the single byte that remains after the file type indentification
Get the size of the index entry.
Get the squares of the lengths of the segemnts AC and BC.
Get the target
Get the time, if they want it
Get the timezone, if they want it
Get the usage count.
Get the write lock.
Get things going.
Get type of the previous char, and put it to LOCALS1.
Get value of parameter
Get weight of this magic entry, for sorting purposes.
Get/Create intermediate arrays for multidimensional arrays
Get/create the semaphore.
GetDiskFreeSpaceEx is only available in NT and Win95 post-OSR2, so we have to jump through some hoops to see if the function exists.
GetVersionEx was first deprecated in Win8.1.
Gets its class name from 1st column
Gets the contents of the BLOB b and offers it to Zend for parsing/execution
Gets the next CRLF terminated line from the input buffer.
Give an error if there's back reference to a non-existent capturing subpattern.
Give the new cursor an identifier of P1.
Give the userfilter class a hook back to the stream
Give user a chance to reallocate the stack.
Given a bucket, returns a version of that bucket with a writeable buffer.
Given a character, set its first byte's bit in the table, and also the corresponding bit for the other version of a letter if we are caseless.
Given a key, returns the list of values bound to it.
Given a pointer to the shared memory address space, initializes all the globals that live in shared memory.
Given a set of bundle bits and a specific pipe, returns which instruction the bundle contains in that pipe.
Given a type-library, merge it into the current engine state
Given a year, find the number of the first day of that year and the date and time of the starting molad.
Given an OCaml string, returns the 8 first bytes in an unsigned long.
Given this approach, we need to skip ahead to the end of the encoded word.
Giving the size of struct sockaddr_un here and relying on the nul termination of sun_path does not work for paths in the abstract namespace.
Global Colormap
Global SSL config
Global context for this function
Global data dependencies
Global error handling.
Global shared lock memory for the file
Global storage
Global storage initialization
Globals Macros
Go N letters back.
Go and actually compress the data
Go get the next char in the class
Go round the loop again
Go through input array and add keys to the return array
Go through input array and add values to the return array
Go through the input array
Go through the string and quote necessary characters
Go through the whole list, stopping if you find a match.
Goes one character back.
Got a good connection - update next_ping and get out of ping loop
Government and others acting in its behalf permission to use and distribute the software in accordance with the terms specified in this license.
Grab and send back every cookie
Grab the cookie value
Grab the first fully transparent entry, if any, as the value of the simple-transparency index, mostly for backwards binary compatibility.
Grab the grouping data out of the array
Grab the index number and argc parameters
Grab the monetary grouping data out of the array
Grab the value part, except for an 'x' reln.
Grab the write lock on the log file.
Grabs the events that are ready to be processed from the linked list and clears the list
Graphic Control Extension
Graphic character.
Grave-accent quoted symbols used by MySQL
Gregorian Calendar
Group name must start with non-digit
Group: Transform
Groupid for the file
Grow buffer to hold this bucket if need be.
Grow the buffer
Grow the buffer if required.
Grow the output buffer if required.
Grow the sqlite3.aVTrans array if required
Growth rate for stack allocated by the OS.
Guaranteed by the code generator
Guard against putting a key/val pair into an array vector
Guard word for sanity
Guess should start at 1.
Guess since FTP won't expose this information
H if before a vowel and not after C,G,P,S,T
HACK: allow setting of this node by passing an empty name
HACK: use output encoding for now
HALFWIDTH IDEOGRAPHIC COMMA
HALFWIDTH IDEOGRAPHIC FULL STOP
HALFWIDTH KATAKANA MIDDLE DOT
HALFWIDTH KATAKANA SEMI-VOICED SOUND MARK
HALFWIDTH KATAKANA VOICED SOUND MARK
HALFWIDTH KATAKANA-HIRAGANA PROLONGED SOUND MARK
HALFWIDTH LEFT CORNER BRACKET
HALFWIDTH RIGHT CORNER BRACKET
HANDLE_TAG copies the HTML Tag and checks whether we have that tag in our table.
HASH_INT, _POINTER, _STRING, _BINARY
HASH_KEY_IS_STRING
HAS_MCAST_EXT
HAVE_ADABAS
HAVE_ALLOCA
HAVE_ALPHASORT
HAVE_BIRDSTEP
HAVE_BOOLEAN
HAVE_DAYLIGHT
HAVE_DBMAKER
HAVE_DEVPOLL
HAVE_DTRACE
HAVE_FREETYPE
HAVE_FULL_DNS_FUNCS
HAVE_GD_FREETYPE
HAVE_GD_JPG
HAVE_GD_PNG
HAVE_GD_WEBP
HAVE_GETPGID
HAVE_GETRLIMIT
HAVE_GETRUSAGE
HAVE_GETSID
HAVE_HASH_EXT
HAVE_HUGE_CODE_PAGES
HAVE_INET_NTOP
HAVE_INET_PTON
HAVE_KQUEUE
HAVE_LDAP_SASL
HAVE_LIBEXPAT
HAVE_LIBFREETYPE
HAVE_LIBINTL
HAVE_LIBPNG
HAVE_LIBREADLINE
HAVE_LIBWEBP
HAVE_LOCALTIME_R
HAVE_MBREGEX
HAVE_MBSTRING
HAVE_MSCOREE_H
HAVE_NEECACHE
HAVE_OCI8_DTRACE
HAVE_OPCACHE_FILE_CACHE
HAVE_PG_CONFIG_H
HAVE_SCANDIR
HAVE_SELECT
HAVE_SETITIMER
HAVE_SETRLIMIT
HAVE_SIGACTION
HAVE_SQLDATASOURCES
HAVE_SQL_EXTENDED_FETCH
HAVE_SYSVSEM
HAVE_SYSVSHM
HAVE_SYS_SDT_H
HAVE_TM_ISDST
HOST sections
HOWEVER: when the subject string is very, very long, searching to its end can take a long time, and give bad performance on quite ordinary patterns.
HOWMANY specifies the maximum offset libmagic will look at this is currently hardcoded in the libmagic source but not exported
HTTP Authentication
HTTP POST may contain form data to be processed into variables depending on given content type
HTTP/1.0 or earlier
Hack for buggy IIS that sets incorrect PATH_INFO
Halt if out of errors
Halt the sub-program.
Han-daku-ten
Handle  grandfathered languages
Handle POSIX class names.
Handle a capturing bracket, other than those that are possessive with an unlimited repeat.
Handle a literal character.
Handle a number
Handle a real character class.
Handle a recursively called group.
Handle a single character that has more than one other case.
Handle all other cases when the coding is UTF-8
Handle an atomic group that does not contain any capturing parentheses.
Handle any leading odd-sized chunks
Handle any remaining bytes of data.
Handle arguments
Handle capturing bracket
Handle data type of LONG
Handle different types of newline.
Handle edge case.
Handle empty array
Handle exact repetitions.
Handle extra flags for this index, if not NULL
Handle for accessing memory mapping
Handle for accessing the blob returned here
Handle for accessing the file
Handle format arguments if any
Handle grandfathered languages
Handle it better way.
Handle literal characters
Handle long data
Handle multibyte character matching specially here.
Handle negative integers in a single step.
Handle negative offset
Handle non-enclosure field
Handle one file or directory.
Handle open on database file
Handle other cases with/without an argument
Handle other special cases if you like
Handle partial matches - disable any mark data
Handle possessive capturing brackets with an unlimited repeat.
Handle possessive quantifiers.
Handle recursion
Handle repeated back references
Handle repeated back references.
Handle repeats after a class or a back reference
Handle request method
Handle single-char matchers
Handle single-char non-literal matchers
Handle single-character metacharacters.
Handle singletons
Handle special case write when we're returning the entire transfer
Handle start of quoted string
Handle that must hold lock
Handle the Perl-compatible cases
Handle the case of a single charater - either with no UTF support, or with UTF disabled, or for a single character UTF character.
Handle the case of the codes matching and simply replace the number that was there before.
Handle the error in user space
Handle the following special cases: 1.
Handle the optional arguments
Handle the other opcodes
Handle the special case of adding another range on the end.
Handle the special case of extending the range on the end.
Handle the various field types.
Handle to return
Handle updating of the required and first characters for other types of group.
Handle width and height style attributes
Handler for basedirs that end with a /
Handles both invalid and empty cases.
Handles properly formed UTF-8 characters between 0x01 and 0x7F.
Handles, amongst others, "nfs".
Handling bracketed expressions is probably the most complex part.
Handling capturing brackets and alternatives.
Hankaku Kana
Has a child
Has anything matched
Has no GROUP BY clause
Has no INDEXED BY clause
Has no LIMIT clause
Has no NOT INDEXED clause
Has no WHERE clause
Hash Registry Access
Hash doesn't exist so it must have been an invalid protocol scheme
Hash of page content
Hash of the name
Hash score: 182
Hash slot index
Hash table containing tokenizers
Hash table for fast lookup by key
Hash table for functions
Hash table for in-memory data
Hash table iterator
Hash table key
Hash table of all pages.
Hash table of connection functions
Hash table of in-memory nodes.
Hash table of tokenizers
Hash table representation
Hash table to query
Hash table to search
Hash the supplied password
Hash value for the element
Hashing function for the aHash representation.
Have a good day.
Have a match, so insert the code in order.
Have to increase the number, so we can send correct number back.
He was a dear friend, and I miss him terribly.
Head back to Friday if we stop on the weekend.
Head item on backtrack.
Head of in-memory chunk-list
Head of the last recursion.
Header Fields
Header in shared memory
Heap storage space
Heap that might have been lookaside
Heavy optimization for situations where input string is 1 byte long
Heckbert-style quantizers vary a good deal in their policies for choosing the "largest" box and deciding where to cut it.
Height of sub-tree rooted at pCell
Height of the tree headed by this node
Height of this node in tree
Hell, I'm trying it.
Help Codicils
Help on Commands
Help the compiler to know that.
Helper function used to add an associative array of warnings and errors to a zval
Helper function used to store the latest found warnings and errors while parsing, from either strtotime or parse_from_format.
Helper function.
Helper variables
Hence "Unsafe".
Hence it has its own case.
Hence the 1000's.
Hence the default is now to store 32 bits per Long.
Hence the definition of zeroreqchar and zerofirstchar outside the main loop so that they can be accessed for the back off.
Hence the name.
Hence we adjust the constant term to 0.1760912590558.
Here LOCALS1 has already been zeroed.
Here are the marker codes of interest in this program.
Here be strings
Here comes the error no
Here comes the reason
Here is the full add routine that takes care of negative numbers.
Here is the full subtract routine that takes care of negative numbers.
Here is the loop...
Here is what we do to obtain the number's magnitude: a.
Here we add to the key the parent script directory, since fopen_wrappers from version 4.0.7 use current script's path in include path too.
Here we aren't sure we would store it, but we will need it further anyway.
Here we call the headers_complete callback.
Here we check to see if it's alright to ourselves to be unloaded.
Here we clean up any resources we allocated.
Here we go through the input arguments and parse them.
Here we have the following tables: _cyr_win1251   - for windows-1251 charset _cyr_iso88595  - for iso8859-5 charset _cyr_cp866     - for x-cp866 charset _cyr_mac       - for x-mac-cyrillic charset
Here we only compute the number of bytes.
Here we set the check info.
Here we should close all statements.
Here, add it to the list of ini files read
Here, the modular division first probe is gives way to a faster exclusive-or manipulation.
Hermite filter, default radius 1
Heshvan has 29 days
Heshvan has 30 days
Hi my name is Dave and I like to make things as confusing as possible, thus I will throw in this 'data' element where it absolutely does not belong just so that people cannot code arrays and structs in a similar and straight forward manner.
High accuracy coordinate
High water info
High water mark of stack.
Highlight-mask for snippet
Highwater mark for nCurrent
Highwater mark for nOut
Hint Zend how many elements we will have in the hash.
Hint blob to append to
Hint number of segments
Hint to COMDB2
Hit unclosed bracket
Holding area for temporary registers
Holds a set of subpatterns after a global match
Holds list of subpatterns
Holds results of studying
Holds the available server ALPN protocols for negotiation
Honor_FLT_ROUNDS
Hope the C compiler is smart enough.
Hopefully the cast fixes that.
Hopefully this problem will be discovered during testing.
Host database connection
Hour and minutes
How aggressive at syncing data to disk
How many elements to get
How many letters to skip because an eariler encoding handled multiple letters
How many levels of subquery
How many pads do we need
How many seg-readers to advance
How many times to run PHP scripts before dying
How much extra memory is needed
How often to do a periodic sample
How to allocate space.
How to compare records
How to deal with SELECt result
How to dispose of results
How to dispose of the results
How to dispose of the results.
How to handle constraint errors
How to write to Queue
However a comment was received about space saving - maybe the guy linked all the modules rather than using a library - so we include a condition to cut out the tables when not needed.
However authinfo and env are cached
However control may currently be delegated to another generator.
However expected is that MINIT is enough in most cases.
However explicitly setting the value to 0 ensures the first value.
However some might still be in use so even after this clean-up we need to skip entries marked is_deleted.
However, Perl changed at release 5.18, so PCRE changed at release 8.34.
However, RMATCH isn't like a function call because it's quite a complicated macro.
However, YYFAIL appears to be in use.
However, by keeping a bitmap of the first 31 back references, we can catch some of the more common cases more precisely.
However, conversion tables frequently map 0x00-0x1F to the respective C0 code points.
However, doing that would require us to create an xmlrpc value from the php array, which is rather expensive, especially if it was a big array.
However, if neither NUM nor ASSOC is set we will free memory cleanly and won't leak.
However, if the -L option is given, set the locale from the LC_xxx environment variables.
However, if the group was entered as a result of checking a previous iterator, this is not possible.
However, if the magic number is equal to REVERSED_MAGIC_NUMBER we return with PCRE_ERROR_BADENDIANNESS, which means that the pattern is likely compiled with different endianness.
However, if the number of possible capturing brackets is small, use a block of store on the stack, to reduce the use of malloc/free.
However, if we end up without a first char setting for an unanchored pattern, it is worth scanning the regex to see if there is an initial asserted first char.
However, in JavaScript compatibility mode, the length passed is zero.
However, in Perl's warning mode, a warning is given, so PCRE now faults it as it is almost certainly a mistake on the user's part.
However, in both cases the category contains more characters than the specials that are defined for the property being tested against.
However, in future that may change, so we include them here so as not to leave a gotcha for a future maintainer.
However, in order to accommodate the version of this code that uses an external "stack" implemented on the heap, it is easier to declare them all here, so the declarations can be cut out in a block.
However, in the pre-compile phase, class_uchardata gets emptied to prevent workspace overflow, so it only if the very last character in the class needs XCLASS will it contain anything at this point.
However, it calls memory allocation and freeing functions via the four indirections below, and it can optionally do callouts, using the fifth indirection.
However, it is also included in the compilation of dftables.c, in which case the macro DFTABLES is defined.
However, it is created first, so we have to allow memory for it.
However, it is not identical.
However, it seems that this can be very slow on some operating systems.
However, it won't be unregistered until the script ends.
However, normally we don't expect an error message, thus we continue.
However, that leads to a large number of relocations when a shared library is dynamically loaded.
However, that's not true, as if max_allowed_packet_size is smaller than the chunk being sent to the server, the latter will complain with an error message.
However, the MSDN docs state that there is a flags parameter, and my VC6 won't link unless the code uses the version with 4 parameters.
However, the bit map we are constructing is for byte values.
However, the format of 5-byte and 6-byte characters is still checked.
However, the functions and classes exported by the module will not be available until the module is 'reloaded'.
However, the list is correct for canonical LR with one exception: it will still contain any token that will not be accepted due to an error action in a later state.
However, the matching is different.
However, the resulting error message is misleading if the real problem is an empty input file, so we handle that case specially.
However, the syntax has been checked to ensure that the ...
However, there is an option that disables these, for testing and for ensuring that all callouts do actually occur.
However, this can be changed by setting the PCRE_UCP option.
However, this can happen only at top level - if we are within parentheses, the starting BRA will still be present.
However, this function just burn CPU cycles if the stack is large enough.
However, this is not permitted in this case.
However, this uses a lot more stack, so in 8.20, atomic groups that do not contain any captures generate OP_ONCE_NC, which can be handled in the old, less stack intensive way.
However, we assume that what we are passed is a compiled regex.
However, we can give a message for this error
However, we cannot do this when the assertion contains subroutine calls, because they can be forward references.
However, we do need to adjust any OP_RECURSE calls inside the group that refer to the group itself or any internal or forward referenced group, because the offset is from the start of the whole regex.
However, we do the appropriate tests here so that overlong sequences get diagnosed, and also in case there is ever an option for handling these larger code points.
However, we want to be able to timeout any user-supplied shutdown functions, so pretend we are not in a signal handler while we are calling these
However, we want to make sure that the insteadof declaration is consistent in itself.
However, when a metadata call is done, we need to calculate max_length.
However, with the change of recursive back references to be atomic, we have to look for the number so that this state can be identified, as otherwise the incorrect length is computed.
However, you don't know it in advance, so it must always be called.
Human readable error text
Hybrid exponential search/linear search merge sort with hybrid natural/pairwise first pass.
I added 15 extra bytes for safety.
I assume these types are not applicable to arrays, and were mentioned erroneously.
I changed it to only consider routeable addresses as valid.
I consider this is a bug.
I could find no way of detecting that a macro is defined as an empty string at pre-processor time.
I do not know the significance of the constant 0xf000.
I doubt that "lint" will like this much.
I exclude vertical tab because it never seems to be used in real text.
I have chosen to use the spellings found in the Encyclopedia Judaica.
I have given them names, to make them stand out more clearly.
I have yet to find a specific date when the current set of rules were known to be in use.
I only describe the parts that I am sure about.
I opted to disallow the characters that would result in a parse error when preprocessing of the input stream.
I probably could have just used strlen...
I simply fixed things to get them working for now.
I still use the compareAndSwap to assert this invariant though.
I suppose I could have been using a character pointer instead of accesssing the array directly...
I think encoding and options should be arguments of this function.
I think that SetStmtOption is of little use, since most of those can only be specified before preparing/executing statements.
I think that the description in 'asdef' is out of date.
I think this is a bad design in general even if it has some reasons.
I very much doubt you can see it.
I was writing for Unix, so I just let it call itself recursively.
I would appreciate it if you give credit where it is due and keep your modifications in the public domain as well, but I don't require that in order to let you place this code and any modifications you make under a license of your choice.
I would support a wider range of dates, but I have not been able to find an authoritative definition of when leap years were to have occurred.
I'll fix it when I decied how to support user defined types.
I'll opt to apply to XHTML 1.0 the same rules as for XML 1.0.
I'm assuming a chord-rule at the moment.
I'm leaving it in place for people who can live with the limitations, which I only found out about after I had implemented it anyway.
I've also made it reentrant and made a number of other changes.
I've generalized GMST0 as well, and define it
I.e., the caller must still be able to filter directories out.
I.e.: unused literals can belong to branches, which can be encoded as B or BL.
I/O error: lastErrno set by seekAndRead
I/O methods on journal files
I386/486 - Disassembler and related functions
IB has a strange way of handling VARCHAR arrays.
IBM extension
ICC_SET is the same as SET_FLAGS.
ICU ResourceBundle has no clone implementation
ICU break-iterator object
ICU library collation object
ID of current select for EXPLAIN output
IDF for each phrase
IDN functions
IDs have been resolved to COLUMNs
IEEE 802 format: Six hexadecimal digits separated by colons.
IEEE 802 format: Six hexadecimal digits separated by hyphens.
IEEE floating point
IFD pointer
IIS is always making things more difficult.
IMAP prefetch text when fetching header
IMMEDIATEJOINSERTMATCHPLANALYZEPRAGMABORTVALUESVIRTUALIMITWHEN
IMP: R-00293-64994
IMP: R-03371-37637
IMP: R-04300-56712
IMP: R-04460-53386
IMP: R-04780-55815
IMP: R-07272-22309
IMP: R-11148-40995
IMP: R-11967-56545
IMP: R-12275-61338
IMP: R-14450-37597
IMP: R-15569-63625
IMP: R-20520-54086
IMP: R-22934-25134
IMP: R-24505-23230
IMP: R-25361-16150 This function is omitted from SQLite by default.
IMP: R-26507-47431
IMP: R-26835-10964
IMP: R-29431-39229
IMP: R-29538-34987
IMP: R-31275-44060
IMP: R-33038-09382
IMP: R-37514-35566
IMP: R-38091-32352
IMP: R-38219-53002
IMP: R-42420-56072
IMP: R-42790-23372
IMP: R-44911-55124
IMP: R-47871-25994
IMP: R-48725-32206
IMP: R-49053-54554
IMP: R-51414-32910
IMP: R-51463-25634
IMP: R-51689-46548
IMP: R-51971-34154
IMP: R-52476-28732
IMP: R-53341-35419
IMP: R-54100-20147
IMP: R-54466-46756
IMP: R-57884-37496
IMP: R-59593-21810
IMP: R-61914-48074
IMP: R-61949-35727
IMP: R-63666-48755
IMP: R-64479-57858
IMP: R-65497-44594
IMPORTANT: On some systems it is required that RESBUF is correctly aligned for a 32 bits value.
IN Loop terminator.
IN NO EVENT SHALL THE AUTHOR BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OR ANY DAMAGES WHATSOEVER RESULTING FROM LOSS OF USE, DATA OR PROFITS, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, NEGLIGENCE OR OTHER TORTIOUS ACTION, ARISING OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE USE OR PERFORMANCE OF THIS SOFTWARE.
IN NO EVENT SHALL THE AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
IN NO EVENT SHALL THE AUTHORS OR DISTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE TO ANY PARTY FOR DIRECT, INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF THE USE OF THIS SOFTWARE, ITS DOCUMENTATION, OR ANY DERIVATIVES THEREOF, EVEN IF THE AUTHORS HAVE BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.
IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COMPUTING RESEARCH LAB OR NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
IN NO EVENT SHALL THE CONTRIBUTORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER DEALINGS WITH THE SOFTWARE.
IN NO EVENT SHALL THE UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA BE LIABLE TO ANY PARTY FOR DIRECT, INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, INCLUDING LOST PROFITS, ARISING OUT OF THE USE OF THIS SOFTWARE AND ITS DOCUMENTATION, EVEN IF THE UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.
IN PARTICULAR, NEITHER THE AUTHOR NOR LUCENT MAKES ANY REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND CONCERNING THE MERCHANTABILITY OF THIS SOFTWARE OR ITS FITNESS FOR ANY PARTICULAR PURPOSE.
IN operator used as a loop
IN operator used for membership test
IN/OUT An error handle
IN/OUT Pointer to array of length of data fetched
IN/OUT bytes toread/read
IN/OUT chars toread/read
IN/OUT handle to the requested SQL query
IN/OUT pointer to a buffer
IN/OUT pointer to a pointer to a define handle
IN/OUT: Checksum value
IN/OUT: Current offset
IN/OUT: Current structure of index
IN/OUT: Decrement if row is deleted
IN/OUT: Docid pointer
IN/OUT: Error code
IN/OUT: First token of snippet
IN/OUT: Incr.
IN/OUT: Increment this value by PMA size
IN/OUT: Integer value
IN/OUT: Iterator pointer
IN/OUT: Lastest rowid seen so far
IN/OUT: Left input list
IN/OUT: List to sort
IN/OUT: Mask of phrases seen
IN/OUT: Mask of tokens to highlight
IN/OUT: Output pointer
IN/OUT: Page content -area pointer
IN/OUT: PendingList structure
IN/OUT: Point to read varint from
IN/OUT: Pointer into buffer
IN/OUT: Pointer into position-list buffer
IN/OUT: Pointer to PendingList struct
IN/OUT: Pointer to position list
IN/OUT: Pointer to poslist
IN/OUT: Pointer to string buffer
IN/OUT: Position list
IN/OUT: Preallocated output buffer
IN/OUT: Previous value written to list
IN/OUT: Probe record
IN/OUT: Right hand input list
IN/OUT: Right input list
IN/OUT: Right/output doclist
IN/OUT: SQLITE_OPEN_XXX flags
IN/OUT: SegmentNode handle
IN/OUT: SegmentWriter handle
IN/OUT: Stucture of index
IN/OUT: The WHERE clause to add to
IN/OUT: True after first int written
IN/OUT: Value read from position-list
IN/OUT: error code
IN: Left hand input list
IN: Pointer to the SQLiteThread structure
IN: Size of poslist in bytes
INDIRECT element may point to UNDEF-ined slots
INFNAN_CHECK
INFRINGES ON USER NAME SPACE
INPUTS RESULT XMLRPC_VALUE.
INPUTS XMLRPC_VALUE of type xmlrpc_vector RESULT Next XMLRPC_VALUE in vector, or NULL if at end.
INPUTS XMLRPC_VALUE target of query RESULT data type of value as enumerated by XMLRPC_VALUE_TYPE_EASY xmlrpc_type_none if not a value.
INPUTS fault_code     application specific error code.
INPUTS id        The id of the vector, or NULL type      New type of vector as enumerated by XMLRPC_VECTOR_TYPE RESULT XMLRPC_VALUE  The new vector, or NULL on failure.
INPUTS id        id of the new value, or NULL s         The desired new binary value len       The length of s, or NULL.
INPUTS mem    memory to free RESULT void NOTES Useful for OS's where memory must be free'd in the same library in which it is allocated.
INPUTS none RESULT pointer to global server, or 0 if error.
INPUTS request -- previously allocated request struct RESULT XMLRPC_VALUE -- pointer to error value stored, or NULL NOTES This is a private function for usage by internals only.
INPUTS request -- previously allocated request struct error   -- previously allocated error code or struct RESULT XMLRPC_VALUE -- pointer to value stored, or NULL NOTES This is a private function for usage by internals only.
INPUTS server     The XMLRPC_SERVER the method is registered with callName   the method to find RESULT previously registered XMLRPC_Callback, or NULL NOTES Typically, this is used to determine if a requested method exists, without actually calling it.
INPUTS target    The target vector ...
INPUTS value     The target XMLRPC_VALUE s         The desired new binary value len       The length of s, or NULL.
INPUTS value     The xml value who's ID we will set.
INSERT STACK UNION HERE
INSERT or UPDATE operations
INSERT_CONTENT
INST_NAME - CONDITIONAL remove this flag.
INTERSECT_KEY is subset of INTERSECT_ASSOC.
INTL: ISO digit
IOW, both opaque pixels and transparent pixels will be mapped into the transparent entry.
IP and port conversion box
IPTC International Press Telecommunications Council
IPv4 address
IPv6 address
IPv6 ancillary data
IS AWARE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.
ISO Unicode
ISO-2022-JP-2004
Id of this connection with its winShmNode
Id of this connection within its unixShmNode
Ideal number of tokens to shift forward
Identifier escape.
Identifiers have been resolved
Identify Bison output.
Identify column names if results of the SELECT are to be output.
Identify loops.
Identify reducible and irreducible loops
Identify the output register
Identity function, used to suppress warnings about constant conditions.
Idx of column in child table
If "hitend" is set afterwards, remember the first starting point for which a partial match was found.
If "previous" is set and it is not at the start of the work space, move it back to there, in order to avoid filling up the work space.
If -s has been specified, treat character special files like ordinary files.
If 2nd param is NULL, use internal row counter to access next row
If EP_FromJoin, the right table of the join
If I add more options, it would make sense to create a nice static struct and loop over it.
If JIT support was compiled and requested, attempt the JIT compilation.
If JSON or PATH is malformed, throw an error.
If MALLOC is undefined, malloc will be invoked directly -- and assumed always to succeed.
If MATCH_SKIP_ARG reaches this level it means that a MARK that matched the SKIP's arg was not found.
If N is out of range, return 0.
If NO_EMPTY flag is set
If NULL use PRIMARY KEY
If NULL, use the default
If P5 is zero, then the cursor is left in an undefined state.
If PCRE is configured with --enable-rebuild-chartables, this happens automatically.
If PCRE_NEVER_UTF is set, remember it.
If QUALITY is in the range 0-100, increasing values represent higher quality but also larger image size.
If REG_NOSUB was specified at compile time, the PCRE_NO_AUTO_CAPTURE flag will be set.
If REQUEST_BODY_FILE variable not available - read post body from fastcgi stream
If SAPI does not want to ignore all ini files OR an overriding file/path is given.
If SNI is explicitly disabled we're finished here
If SPACE is non-zero, we must output one space before the number.
If SQLExecDirect executes a searched update or delete statement that does not affect any rows at the data source, the call to SQLExecDirect returns SQL_NO_DATA.
If TEMP was specified, then the trigger name may not be qualified.
If USE_SIGN is false, just compare the magnitudes.
If WHERE_ONETABLE_ONLY is set, index cursor number
If YYTABLE_NINF, syntax error.
If `WriteFail` fails, that's probably because the pipe is full, or closed.
If a EXPO is not an integer, only the integer part is used.
If a HAVING clause is present, then there must be a GROUP BY clause.
If a NUM2 is not an integer, only the integer part is used.
If a charset is added, the string will be re-allocated and the new length is returned.
If a child of a vector is free'd first, results are undefined.
If a conditional group has only one branch, there is a second, implied, empty branch, so just skip over the conditional, because it could be empty.
If a connect on a existing handle is performed and mysql_flags is passed which doesn't CLIENT_COMPRESS, then we need to overwrite the value which we set based on saved_compression.
If a continuation matches, we bump the current continuation level so that higher-level continuations are processed.
If a copy is made, the original bucket is delref'd.
If a decimal point/exponent is found, it's a double.
If a finally block was found we jump directly to it and resume the generator.
If a malloc fails, this function may return NULL.
If a memory allocation error occurs, NULL is returned.
If a mutex is required for normal operation, allocate one
If a peer_fingerprint match is required this trumps peer and peer_name verification
If a prior error occurred, report that error again.
If a rollback is needed, then do the rollback.
If a temporary file is requested, it is not opened immediately.
If a transaction is active, commit it.
If a transaction is open, roll it back.
If a transaction is still open on the Btree, roll it back.
If aborted via timer expiration, don't try to call any unixODBC function
If all arrays are empty we don't need to do anything.
If all the seg-readers are at EOF, we're finished.
If already in the error state, this function is a no-op.
If an ACCEPT was previously encountered, use the length that was in force at that time, and pass back the shortest ACCEPT length.
If an IO error occurs, return an error code.
If an OOM error occurs, NULL is returned.
If an OOM error occurs, set the error code in p.
If an OOM occurs, set to SQLITE_NOMEM
If an error does occur, an SQLite error code is returned.
If an error has already occurred, this is a no-op
If an error occurred above, free the  Pager structure and close the file.
If an error occurs while doing so, ignore it.
If an error occurs, return an SQLite error code.
If an error occurs, we jump here
If an exception was thrown in the generator we have to internally rethrow it in the parent scope.
If an existing TriggerPrg could not be located, create a new one.
If an existing hash entry cannot be found, create a new one.
If an unqualified name is a function/const alias, replace it.
If an unqualified name is an alias, replace it.
If any actual data is acquired, retval will be set to appropriate type
If any data is consumed, we cannot rely upon the existing read buffer, as the filtered data must replace the existing data, so invalidate the cache
If any do, return SQLITE_BUSY right away.
If any named groups were found, create the name/number table from the list created in the first pass.
If any one branch matches, the assertion is true.
If any row exist in the result set, record that fact and abort.
If any variables are passed, make sure they are all passed by reference
If anybody is still using OS/2, they will have to put it back manually.
If aspell was installed using installer, we should have a key pointing to the location of the dictionaries
If backslash is at the end of the pattern, it's an error.
If base directory is specified, then the key will be ignored, and instead the portion of the current value minus the base directory will be used  Returned is an array mapping phar index to actual file added
If base is a power of 2, the returned value will always be exact.
If bind_one_parameter was used, but not everything was bound and nothing was fetched, then some `zv` could be NULL
If both allow_ipv4 and allow_ipv6 flags flag are used, then the first dot or colon determine the format
If both args are strings AND either of args is not numeric string then use ICU-compare.
If both iA1 and iB1 are non-zero, overflow will result
If both left and right are defined, then use left.
If both methods are private do not enforce a signature
If both these operations are successful, proceed.
If browser_name is omitted or null, HTTP_USER_AGENT is used.
If buf is not the complete file, apptype can incorrectly identify the exe type.
If caseless matching is required, scan the range and process alternate cases.
If changing the record number, delete the old record.
If checking an assertion for a condition, return MATCH_MATCH.
If cli primary file has shabang line and there is a prepend file, the `start_lineno` will be used by prepend file but not primary file, save it and restore after prepend file been executed.
If compiled with SQLITE_WIN32_MALLOC on Windows, we will use the various Win32 API heap functions instead of our own.
If compiling with GCC 2, this file's not needed.
If connection is bad, try to reconnect.
If creating a temp table, the name may not be qualified.
If daemonize, the calling process will die soon and the master process continues to initialize itself.
If delete_old_session is set to true, remove the old session.
If delimiters should be captured
If do_bind is true, update any bound columns.
If document cloned we want a new document proxy
If either opcode is a small character list, set pointers for comparing characters from that list with another list, or with a property.
If either operand is NULL then the result is false.
If either operand is NULL then the result is true.
If element is not a resource, skip it
If field is NULL and HAS DEFAULT, should be skipped
If file doesn't look like any sort of text, give up.
If firstchar was previously set, convert the subpattern's firstchar into reqchar if there wasn't one, using the vary flag that was in existence beforehand.
If firstline is TRUE, the start of the match is constrained to the first line of a multiline string.
If foreign-keys are disabled, this function is a no-op.
If format of 1 is specified, then the function will return an array containing all the words found inside the string.
If format of 2 is specified, then the function will return an associated array where the position of the word is the key and the word itself is the value.
If has a ns and a str_type then index it
If how is SHUT_RD,  further receptions will be disallowed.
If how is SHUT_RDWR,  further  receptions and transmissions will be disallowed.
If how is SHUT_WR, further transmissions will be disallowed.
If input table has column "rbu_rowid"
If insufficient space is available, return NULL.
If isIgnoreErrors is true, then a table is being dropped.
If it can't find anything, we have to give up.
If it could, we must look outwards for branches at other levels, stopping when we pass beyond the bracket which is the subject of the recursion.
If it does match, we reset that variable to the current subject position and return MATCH_SKIP.
If it does, then that is what is used.
If it exists, we pass the data immediately back to the caller.
If it fails then it tries to glob the rest of the pattern and returns.
If it fails, we do not change the array.
If it fails, we return uninitialized.
If it has multiple other cases, return its case offset value.
If it has not already been created, create the rbu_state table
If it has, return early.
If it is END it's the end of the outer call.
If it is a recursion, just skip over it.
If it is a resource, than its a stream resource
If it is a stream that does not have a context assigned, it will create and assign a context and return that.
If it is a string or blob, try to convert it to a double.
If it is indeed it then loop once more, then to_be_sent will become 0, left will stay 0.
If it is not working, it's not Thomas G.
If it is not, return SQLITE_ERROR.
If it is not, return with PCRE_ERROR_BADMAGIC.
If it is open, sync the journal file before calling UnlockAndRollback.
If it is set, allow the name with a different number, but continue scanning in case this is a duplicate with the same number.
If it is set, jump to instruction P2.
If it is the year following a leap year and the molad occurs on Monday at or after 9:32:43 and 1/3 sec, Tishri 1 must be delayed.
If it is we must truncate.
If it overflowed, fill field with max value.
If it starts with the magic string, then skip that
If it succeeds then it invokes globexp1 with the new pattern.
If it was a capturing subpattern, check to see if it contained any recursive back references.
If it was compressed, then the fp does not refer to the original file
If it's ALT it is an alternation in a nested call.
If it's a forward reference subroutine call, we can't.
If it's not a backwards reference, the dummy number will do.
If it's not a resource its a string containing the filename to open
If it's not a signed or unsigned number, treat it as a name.
If it's not available, we just use GetDiskFreeSpace
If it's not, there isn't much we can do at this point.
If it's the same image, mapping is NOT trivial since we merge with greyscale target, but if pct is 100, the grey value is not used, so it becomes trivial.
If it's the same image, mapping is trivial
If its bigger than 4 bytes, the dir entry contains an offset.
If its not a string then nothing to do.
If jit for auto globals is enabled we will have to ping the used auto global variables before execution
If just tried and failed to reuse lookahead token after an error, discard it.
If ket is not OP_KETRMAX, this code path is executed after the jump to alternative_matchingpath.
If last members of struct lconv equal CHAR_MAX, no grouping is done
If leaving WAL mode, close the log file.
If limit is positive only limit number of components is returned.
If lines need to be skipped, do it here.
If loading from memory, set the base reference uri for the document
If loading from memory, we need to set the base directory for the document
If loading from memory, we need to set the base directory for the document but it is not apparent how to do that for schema's
If local is true, it reads a local header instead of a central directory entry.
If lookbehind, check that this branch matches a fixed-length string, and put the length into the OP_REVERSE item.
If madvise is available, we release the unnecessary space.
If mapping failed, close the shared memory handle and erase it
If matching is caseless, upper and lower are converted to alpha.
If maximizing, advance up to the maximum number of matching characters, until eptr is past the end of the maximum run.
If maximizing, find the longest possible run, then work backwards.
If maximizing, find the longest string and work backwards
If mimetype is unchanged, 0 is returned.
If minimizing, keep testing the rest of the expression and advancing the pointer while it matches the class.
If minimizing, keep trying and advancing the pointer
If minimizing, we have to test the rest of the pattern before each subsequent match.
If n1 has more digits then n2, we now do that subtract.
If nArg is -2, then createFlag must be 0.
If nBest is still 0, then the index must be empty.
If nLoop is zero, then there are no FROM terms in the query.
If nRowEst is zero and there is an ORDER BY clause, ignore it.
If nTruncate is non-zero, this is a commit record.
If necessary, remove sample iMin to make room for the new sample.
If needed, this code will make deep copies of argv and environ and return these to the caller for further use.
If negative, it is a relative backreference.
If negative, reduce the rule which number is the opposite.
If negative, reduce the rule whose number is the opposite.
If neither 'a' or 'm' follows we have an error.
If new chunk, create and initialize it.
If new session or something weird happned
If new_cache_expire is given, the current cache_expire is replaced with new_cache_expire
If new_cache_limited is given, the current cache_limiter is replaced with new_cache_limiter
If new_location is not specified or null then SoapClient will use endpoint from WSDL file.
If newid is given, the session id is replaced with newid
If newname is given, the module name is replaced with newname
If newname is given, the save path is replaced with newname
If newname is given, the session name is replaced with newname
If no ':' on the line, add to previous line
If no SNI cert array is specified we're finished here
If no YMD specified, assume 2000-Jan-01
If no alias was passed in, then it can match either and be valid
If no callback, the result will be an array, consisting of current entries from all arrays.
If no collation is found, leave an error message.
If no data has been written to disk, then do not do so now.
If no database changes have been made, return early.
If no destructor action specified: do nothing
If no encoder function was specified, return the data as-is.
If no error happened returns false.
If no error has occurred, return the calculated score.
If no error occurred, set the output variables.
If no errors occur, SQLITE_OK is returned.
If no match is found, search the built-in functions.
If no match, return 0.
If no newline options were set, find the default newline convention from the build configuration.
If no peer name was specified we use the autodetected url name in client environments
If no pending lock has been acquired, then acquire it
If no previous first byte, set it from this character, but revert to none on a zero repeat.
If no result bind, do nothing.
If no starting bytes were found, and the minimum length is zero, and JIT compilation fails, abandon the extra block and return NULL, unless PCRE_STUDY_EXTRA_NEEDED is set.
If no test above fails then the indices must be compatible
If no value is specified, all of the headers are removed.
If no zContent option was specified, fill in the default values.
If non-NULL, bulk memory to hold pList
If non-NULL, points to sqlite3_vtab.base.zErrmsg.
If non-zero free this temporary register
If non-zero, increment the row change counter
If non-zero, last token to include
If non-zero, replace first 4 bytes with this value
If none of the above worked, then we fail.
If not NULL, blob handle to read node
If not NULL, info on how to process DISTINCT
If not NULL, info on how to process ORDER BY
If not NULL, only analyze this one index
If not NULL, the master journal name
If not NULL: boolean for each table and index
If not a forward reference, and the subpattern is still open, this is a recursive call.
If not already recovering from an error, report this error.
If not an address, then try to resolve it as a hostname
If not at start, find it
If not building as part of the core, include sqlite3ext.h.
If not called from the resource dtor, remove the stream from the resource list.
If not fully qualified and not an alias, prepend the current namespace
If not in RBU_STAGE_OAL, allow this call to pass through.
If not matched, restore the previous mark setting.
If not reached end of pattern on success, there's an excess bracket.
If not specified, the sort flags defaults to PHP_SORT_ASC and PHP_SORT_REGULAR accordingly.
If not, call this corruption.
If not, do nothing, leaving the EXACT alone.
If not, return FALSE.
If not, see if we can set the PCRE_STARTLINE flag.
If not, we broke out after a match.
If not, we return a non-zero value.
If not, we still carry on, because there may be ranges that start below 256 in the additional data.
If nothing is set at run time, whatever was used at compile time applies.
If oci_old_close_semantics is set, we artificially bump up the refcount and decremented only at request shutdown.
If offset before start
If offset is greater than offset_top, it means that we are "skipping" a capturing group, and that group's offsets must be marked unset.
If offsets should be captured
If one has been configured, invoke the rollback-hook callback
If one is encountered it is simply skipped.
If one is found, it is returned.
If one of these fault codes is received, the description string will automatically be prefixed with a standard error string and 2 newlines.
If one subtracts 'size' from the end of the segment, one has the address of the first word of the segment.
If one value is NULL, it is less than the other.
If one value is a number and the other is not, the number is less.
If one value is a string and the other is a blob, the string is less.
If one was specified, code the WHEN clause.
If only 2 instrs, and in Y-mode, insert a nop.
If only everything were that easy...
If only existence check is made, return now
If op1 is scalar, UNSET_DIM and UNSET_OBJ have no effect, so we can keep the previous ranges.
If opening a non-empty database, check the text encoding.
If overflow, return zero.
If p1 is at EOF
If p2 is at EOF
If pFrom contains ephemeral data, a copy is made.
If pNew is still NULL, try to create an entirely new mapping.
If pNode is a leaf node, this is a rowid.
If pNode is the root node, return -1.
If pSchema is NULL, then return -1000000.
If pSpace is already 8-byte aligned, nOff should be zero.
If pTab is really a view, make sure it has been initialized.
If pVtab is already in the aVTrans array, return early
If palette is true, we convert from truecolor to palette at the end, to test gdImageTrueColorToPalette and see file size/ quality tradeoffs.
If parent_ce is not NULL then it inherits from parent_ce If parent_ce is NULL and parent_name isn't then it looks for the parent and inherits from it If both parent_ce and parent_name are NULL it does a regular class registration If parent_name is specified but not found NULL is returned
If partial is true, partial matches are allowed at the end of the buffer.
If path_translated is NULL, terminate here with a 404
If persistent_helper is unable to process a pconnection because of a refcount, the processing would happen from np-destructor which is called when refcount goes to zero - php_oci_pconnection_list_np_dtor
If ping applicable
If positive, it is an absolute backreference.
If positive, shift that token.
If possible, the upper layer will call it.
If previous was a bracket group, we may have to replicate it in certain cases.
If previous was a character or negated character match, abolish the item and generate a repeat item instead.
If previous was a recursion call, wrap it in atomic brackets so that previous becomes the atomic group.
If pszEst is not NULL, store an estimate of the field size.
If reached the chunk size, add it to the result array, and reset the pointer.
If reading entire image is requested, read the rest of the data.
If refsign is not negative, it means we have a number in recno.
If regex is an array
If replace is an array and not a callable construct
If replace is an array.
If req_char is set, we know that that character must appear in the subject for the match to succeed.
If requested, convert from truecolor to palette.
If required, populate the overflow page-list cache.
If result of assert is unused, result of check is unused as well
If resulting string turns out to be shorter than input string, we simply copy the input and return.
If return_value is not null, store values into it according to HOW.
If running in direct mode, write the contents of page 1 to the file.
If running outside of VTune remove the remark.
If scope is NULL then the function is global and thus parent does not make any sense.
If scope is NULL then the function is global and thus self does not make any sense  - For "parent", use the function scope's parent.
If script is found then validate_timestamps if option is enabled
If script was not found or invalidated by validate_timestamps
If search is an array
If seconds is not set to null, build the timeval, else we wait indefinitely
If session data storage does not need to update timestamp, it should return SUCCESS simply.
If session then update session hash with new object
If set, call the external function that checks for stack availability.
If shared memory could not be created, then close the mutex and fail
If shifting by a negative amount, shift in the other direction
If size was given take minimum of len and size
If so and if "sign" is non-zero, which indicates that there was a non-benign sign extension, this means that we have a collision between the correctly computed hash for this password and a set of passwords that could be supplied to the buggy algorithm.
If so, add it.
If so, and there are active VMs, return busy.
If so, do so.
If so, generate a special OP_NOTPROP item instead of OP_NOTI.
If so, generate a special OP_PROP item instead of OP_CHARI.
If so, it needs to jump back to the matching path eventually.
If so, return early.
If so, set the EOF flag.
If so, set the database to 1.
If so, the constraint has failed.
If so, this is an error.
If so, try to remove a few timed-out connections.
If so, use that as name, and type as an attribute.
If so, we generate a different opcode.
If so, we must wrap it in atomic brackets.
If someone has defined alloca as a macro, there must be some other way alloca is supposed to work.
If someone is completely sure that everything is fine, he can switch it off.
If something has matched
If something is wrong, you might want to restore data from last backup
If something matched
If split_length is specified, break the string down into chunks each split_length characters long.
If sqlite3BtreeDropTable was called on page 1.
If ssb is NULL then someone is misbehaving
If still no ini file found, search for php.ini file in search path
If storage does not need manual GC, it may return SUCCESS simply.
If str is not numeric string return number zero.
If study option was specified, study the pattern and store the result in extra for passing to pcre_exec.
If subpatterns array has been passed, fill it in with values.
If successful, SQLITE_OK is returned.
If successful, return 0.
If successful, return SQLITE_OK.
If that changes, this place will need some rework.
If that doesn't work, make a new memory block and copy.
If that fails, try it as an SUS integer type if it begins with "d" or as an SUS string type if it begins with "s".
If that fails, try it as an SUS integer type.
If that was the last leaf node, break out of the loop
If that's less than best-so-far, update best distance and color number.
If the Hash table is full, resize it
If the QUERY_SCAN flag is set, all other flags must be clear.
If the SID constant exists, destroy it.
If the TS is lower than the first transition time, then we scan over all the transition times to find the first non-DST one, or the first one in case there are only DST entries.
If the UPTO is just for 1 instance, we can use QUERY instead.
If the WAL is not empty, return the size of the database.
If the ZVAL is null then it should be bound as that
If the above was an under estimate, increment the cycle number until the correct one is found.
If the allocation succeeded, populate the new object.
If the argument has no default value and no typehint, it is possible to pass less arguments than the function expects
If the array is sparse, then the gaps will be filled with NULL variants
If the assertion has a quantifier that allows zero repeats we must skip over the BRAZERO.
If the bracket is followed by a quantifier with zero repeat, we have to back off.
If the branch contains OP_RECURSE, the result is -3 because there may be forward references that we can't check here.
If the buffer turned out to be too small then allocate another buffer dynamically and use it to format the number.
If the bundle is invalid, split it in two.
If the bundle is valid as is, perform the encoding and return 1.
If the c-client library adds other options and the value for this one conflicts, simply make PHP_EXPUNGE higher at the top of this file
If the character is more than one byte long, we can set firstchar only if it is not to be matched caselessly.
If the child node is now at EOF, so is the parent AND node.
If the class contains characters outside the 0-255 range, a different opcode is compiled.
If the command failed, output an explanation.
If the condition is false, skipping the first branch takes us past the end of the item if there is only one branch, but that's exactly what we want.
If the connection is in WAL mode, this call is a no-op.
If the conversion to a gmp number fails, the macros return false.
If the current leaf page is full, flush it to disk.
If the cursor already points to the last entry, this is a no-op.
If the cursor cache is stale, bring it up-to-date
If the cursor does not yet have a statement handle, obtain one now.
If the cursor is not at EOF, read the next character
If the database is not initialized, it is initialized now.
If the db handle must hold the connection handle mutex here.
If the decimal precision guaranteed by FP arithmetic is higher than the requested places BUT is small enough to make sure a non-zero value is returned, pre-round the result to the precision
If the descriptor being freed is the end-most one allocated, then the descriptor_count is reduced so a future descriptor can reuse the hash table index.
If the ending delimiter is not found, display a warning.
If the ending matches this...
If the entry fits our requirements
If the estimated length exceeds the really used length, mark the extra allocated memory as unaddressable, so that any out-of-bound reads can be detected.
If the event is method entry/exit, check that in the current mode VTune is allowed to receive it
If the exception was thrown during a function call there might be arguments pushed to the stack that have to be dtor'ed.
If the exec call supplied NULL for tables, use the inbuilt ones.
If the expression has got more back references than the offsets supplied can hold, we get a temporary chunk of working store to use during the matching.
If the file does not already exist, this will fail.
If the file exists, it fails.
If the file is a temp-file has not yet been opened, open it now.
If the file was opened successfully, read the schema for the new database.
If the filename starts with "." or "/", the path is ignored.
If the first digit is 8 or 9, Perl used to generate a binary zero byte and then treat the digit as a following literal.
If the first part of a qualified name is an alias, substitute it.
If the first temporary PMA file has not been opened, open it now.
If the flex share of remaining space doesn't meet min/max bounds, remove this child from flex calculations.
If the free-list must be searched for 'nearby'
If the function returned an error, throw an exception
If the generator has been closed, it can only hold on to three values: The value, key and retval.
If the generator is already closed throw the exception in the current context
If the given buffer is not large enough to hold the data, the return value is the buffer size,  in characters, required to hold the string and its terminating null character.
If the given bugger is not large enough to hold the data, the return value is the buffer size,  in characters, required to hold the string and its terminating null character.
If the group is preceded by OP_BRAZERO, convert this to OP_BRAPOSZERO.
If the im-pointer points to a brand new image, the cache gives out bogus colorindexes.
If the index is 0xffff, then there are no nodes for the property.
If the input day is in the first two months, we want the molad at the start of the year.
If the input day is in the fourth to last months, we want the molad at the end of the year.
If the input day is in the third month, it doesn't matter which molad is returned, because both will be required.
If the input is not a keyword, TK_ID is returned.
If the iterator is not at a real match, skip forward until it is.
If the length is negative, it means the reference is unset in non-Java-compatible mode.
If the length of the reference is zero, just continue with the main loop.
If the load failed, it must not be a PNG file.
If the locale is grandfathered, stop, no variants
If the log is not already open, open it now.
If the match fails at the newline, later code breaks this loop.
If the match should not be empty
If the maximum is 1 or unlimited, we just have to stick in the BRAZERO and do no more at this point.
If the maximum is greater than 1 and limited, we have to replicate in a nested fashion, sticking OP_BRAZERO before each set of brackets.
If the maximum is limited, it replicates the group in a nested fashion, remembering the bracket starts on a stack.
If the maximum is not zero or one, set it to 1.
If the maximum is unlimited, insert an OP_STAR.
If the maximum is unlimited, set a repeater in the final copy.
If the maximum is unlimited, we use OP_PLUS.
If the minimum equals the maximum, we are done.
If the minimum is greater than zero, replicate the group as many times as necessary, and adjust the maximum to the number of subsequent copies that we need.
If the minimum is zero, mark it as possessive, then unset the possessive flag when the minimum is 0 or 1.
If the minimum is zero, we can continue at the same level without recursion.
If the molad occurs on or after noon, Tishri 1 must be delayed.
If the month is 1 or 2, the calculation is simple addition to the first of the year.
If the month is 4 to 7, it is considered whether it is a leap year and then simple subtraction from the beginning of the following year is used.
If the name is duplicated, add one to the opcode to change CREF/RREF into DNCREF/DNRREF and insert appropriate data values.
If the name is not found, leave the value of recno as 0 for a forward reference.
If the next entry is going to be too big for the code size, then increase it, if possible.
If the next month is invalid, then we need to try the first month of the next year, bearing in mind that the next year after 1 BCE is actually 1 AD and not 0.
If the number of captured subpatterns on this run is less than the total possible number, pad the result arrays with empty strings.
If the octal value is greater than 377, the least significant 8 bits are taken.
If the offset vector is bigger, malloc is used.
If the opcode is not a repeated character type, it returns with the original value.
If the operator is UNION ALL, then duplicates are allowed.
If the optional parameter is set to true, return the phar:// URL to the currently running phar
If the options are changed during the branch, the pointer is used to change the external options bits.
If the options ended with ':' we are heading into a nested group with possible change of options.
If the original bucket has a refcount of 1 and owns its buffer, then it is returned unchanged.
If the output is destined for a temporary table, open that table.
If the pager is in the error state, return an error immediately.
If the parameter is named, it will be removed and correctly disposed of by the hash_update call that follows
If the parent is NULL then the class does not extend anything and thus parent does not make any sense, either.
If the pattern was studied, a minimum subject length may be set.
If the pattern was successfully studied with JIT support, run the JIT executable instead of the rest of this function.
If the pixel is transparent, we assign it the palette index that will later be added at the end of the palette as the transparent index.
If the previous match was for an empty string, we are finished if we are at the end of the subject.
If the proper action on seeing token YYTOKEN is to reduce or to detect an error, take that action.
If the range is given as strings, generate an array of characters.
If the reference is to a completed group, we need to detect whether this is a recursive call, as otherwise there will be an infinite loop.
If the regex permits duplicate names, the first substring that is set is chosen.
If the reneg_limit_callback returned true don't auto-close
If the shared-memory file has not yet been opened, open it now.
If the size has changed, and this child has children we need to re-layout this child
If the skip extends beyond the data currently in the buffer, the buffer can be marked empty so that the next read will cause a fill_input_buffer call that can suspend.
If the socket was originally blocking, set it back.
If the start value lies in the current range, then simply set the new end point of the range to the end value passed as a parameter.
If the statement completed successfully, invoke the profile callback
If the stream buffer contains more data than the caller requested, we can also avoid that costly step and simply return that data.
If the stream ctx disables SNI we're finished here
If the stream position is not at the start, we need to force the stdio layer to believe it's real location.
If the stream was fopencookied, we must NOT touch anything here, as the cookied stream relies on it all.
If the subpattern has no firstchar, set "none" for the whole branch.
If the subroutine is a forward reference, we can't deal with it until the end of the pattern, so return -3.
If the syscall fails, we are doomed.
If the target encoding was unknown, fail
If the target encoding was unknown, or no decoder function was specified, return the UTF-8-encoded data as-is.
If the thread was impersonating already, this function uses that impersonation context.
If the title case character is empty, then make it the same as the upper case.
If the title case character is not present, then make it the same as the upper case.
If the underlying stream operations block when no new data is readable, we need to take extra precautions.
If the useJournal flag is clear, the journal-mode must be "OFF".
If the user didn't specify a width or height, and it has not been set by the container, then we set it via the children.
If the user does have a later shutdown function which needs the session then tough luck.
If the value in "options" is zero, it just means we have found all possible matches, so the loop ends.
If the workspace had to be expanded, free the new memory.
If the zval is not a GMP instance, then we try to convert the value to a temporary gmp number using convert_to_gmp.
If then_trap is not NULL, this structure contains the real then_trap for the backtracking path.
If there are any codes in the temporary decomposition array, then add the character with its decomposition.
If there are any write-transactions at all, invoke the commit hook
If there are entries to insert..
If there are flexible children in the mix, they are going to fill the remaining space
If there are no alternatives, it points to the end of the group.
If there are no matches, set the Node.bEof flag to indicate EOF.
If there are no more deletegated values, resume the generator after the "yield from" expression.
If there is a back-edge to "to" this may result in non-minimal SSA form.
If there is a doclist-index
If there is a doclist-index, check that it looks right.
If there is a matching node and we're at the end of the HDF name, then we update the value of the node
If there is a result set, it follows.
If there is a second table, add or remove it as required.
If there is a set first byte for the group, and we have not yet set a "required byte", set it.
If there is an ID and strict mode, verify existence
If there is buffered data available, we check for a EOL.
If there is data, jump to P2
If there is just one branch, we must not make use of its firstchar or reqchar, because this is equivalent to an empty second branch.
If there is no ID, use session module to create one
If there is no original file, or if we can't read the DACL, we'll use the default security descriptor.
If there is no such term in the index, the iterator is set to EOF.
If there is no transition time, we pick the first one, if that doesn't exist we return NULL
If there is not, return SQLITE_OK.
If there is only one branch in a condition, the implied branch has zero length, so we don't add anything.
If there is space in the offset vector, save the current subject position in the working slot at the top of the vector.
If there is space in the offset vector, set any unused pairs at the end of the pattern to -1 for backwards compatibility.
If there is space, set up the whole thing as substring 0.
If there isn't enough space in the offset vector, treat this as if it were a non-capturing bracket.
If there was no match we are going to append the pattern if GLOB_NOCHECK was specified or if GLOB_NOMAGIC was specified and the pattern did not contain any magic characters GLOB_NOMAGIC is there just for compatibility with csh.
If there was no return value then just execute the query
If there was no return value then just skip fetching
If there were no changes, this block is skipped.
If there's no first char and the pattern was studied, there may be a bitmap of possible first characters.
If there's no object associated then there's nothing to dispose of
If there's nothing to read, wait in 10ms periods.
If there's only one element, then it's bigger than the content and needs its own line
If they actually want to perform the conversion, we need to switch the memory stream to a tmpfile stream
If they are the same, zero is returned.
If they are zero, they must not be registers.
If this array still has elements, add the current one to the parameter list, otherwise use null value.
If this fails, we cannot continue.
If this function fails, close the mcrypt module to prevent crashes when further functions want to access this resource
If this group is at or above the current highwater mark, ensure that any groups between the current high water mark and this group are marked unset and then update the high water mark.
If this happens, return SQLITE_IOERR_RDLOCK.
If this happens, return non-zero.
If this has to be a scalar SELECT.
If this image is the result of alpha channel blending, it will not contain an interesting alpha channel itself.
If this is a "NEAR" keyword, check for an explicit nearness.
If this is a DELETE or UPDATE operation, remove the old record.
If this is a commit, update the wal-index header too.
If this is a conditional bracket, check that there are no more than two branches in the group, or just one if it's a DEFINE group.
If this is a new term, query for it.
If this is an EXPLAIN, skip this step
If this is an INSERT or UPDATE operation, insert the new record.
If this is called we are either in a TIFFs thumbnail or a JPEG where we cannot handle it
If this is not a view, open the table and and all indices
If this is not the first branch, the first char and reqchar have to match the values from all the previous branches, except that if the previous value for reqchar didn't have REQ_VARY set, it can still match, and we set REQ_VARY for the regex.
If this is not the first segment, 'pseg' will be nonzero.
If this is the first branch, the firstchar and reqchar values for the branch become the values for the regex.
If this is the first code for this property list, just add it and return.
If this is the first thing in the branch, there can be no first char setting, whatever the repeat count.
If this item is right at the start of the pattern, the options can be abstracted and made external in the pre-compile phase, and ignored in the compile phase.
If this line is _longer_ than MAXLINELEN, remember it.
If this message is triggered you should increase the ZEND_MMAP_AHEAD value in the zend_streams.h file
If this pixel is transparent, we want to assign it to the special transparency color index past the end of the palette rather than go through matching / dithering.
If this program is fiddling signals just when the test program sends the signal, the signal may be delivered to a Go thread which will break this test.
If this results in a NOMATCH return, pass MATCH_ONCE back to the original OP_ONCE level, thereby bypassing intermediate backup points, but resetting any captures that happened along the way.
If this table is used instead of the above one, some of the special cases for the NEL character can be taken out of the code.
If this was a group that remembered the subject start, in order to break infinite repeats of empty string matches, retrieve the subject start from the chain.
If this was an atomic group and there are no capturing groups within it, generate OP_ONCE_NC instead of OP_ONCE.
If this was page 1, then restore the value of Pager.dbFileVers.
If true, LHS of IN operator is a rowid
If true, bias the search to the high end
If true, create page if it does not exist already
If true, jump if either operand is NULL
If true, pretend pTab contains all NULL values
If true, retrieve from the btree key, not data.
If true, skip the first field
If true, store 0 for segment size
If true, write dlidx to disk
If types of arguments have to be checked
If user asks for ordered dither, give him F-S.
If user requests interlace, translate that to progressive JPEG
If using custom function, copy result to the buffer and clean up.
If value is not specified cookie is removed.
If we are at the end of a nested substitution, revert to the outer level string.
If we are at the end of a scan line, set curx back to the beginning If we are interlaced, bump the cury to the appropriate spot, otherwise, just increment it.
If we are at the end of an assertion group or a non-capturing atomic group, stop matching and return MATCH_MATCH, but record the current high water mark for use by positive assertions.
If we are at the end of an internal nested string, revert to the outer string.
If we are at the end of the subject, give up immediately.
If we are drawing this AA, then redraw the border with AA lines.
If we are going to print something, make sure that we have a separator first.
If we are going to print something, we'll need to print a blank before we print something else.
If we are in a UTF mode, it may be a multi-unit literal character.
If we are in a negated POSIX class within a non-negated overall class, characters with code points greater than 255 must all match.
If we are in the pre-compile phase, accumulate the length used for the previous cycle of this loop.
If we are not at the pattern start, reset the greedy defaults and the case value for firstchar and reqchar.
If we are not in a pool, we cannot expand this name now
If we are returning a large unsigned value, we have to convert it back to a string since PHP only supports signed values.
If we are returning a single result, just do it.
If we are the only user, then take this opportunity to set the max.
If we are too close to the start to move back, this match function fails.
If we are using XPG specifiers, make sure that we grow to a large enough size.
If we backed up to a THEN, check whether it is within the current branch by comparing the address of the THEN that is passed back with the end of the branch.
If we can't find the required character, break the matching loop, forcing a match failure.
If we cloned a document then we must create new doc proxy
If we come here, output unbound LONG and/or BINARY column data to the client
If we didn't get any error, then let's return it to PHP.
If we didn't, then this is unexpected.
If we do it after free_reference/dtor then we might crash
If we don't have free slots in the buffer, allocate a new one and set it's address to GC_ROOT_BUFFER_MAX_ENTRIES that have special meaning.
If we end up here we didn't find a position for "charset_token", so we need to set it to the start of the yet unextracted data.
If we end up here, we should report an error back to the DB engine, but that's not possible.
If we find that a given named parameter has been used twice, we will raise an error, as we can't be sure that it is safe to bind multiple parameters onto the same zval in the underlying driver
If we get here, they have the same number of integer digits.
If we get this far, it means we need to compute the table names.
If we get to the end of the branch, check the length against that of the other branches.
If we got any data, don't worry about it.
If we had a pure transparency color, add it as the last palette entry.
If we had a thumbnail in a SUB_IFD we have ANOTHER image in NEXT IFD
If we have HOWMANY bytes, it indicates that the data might have been truncated, probably even before this function was called.
If we have Unicode property support, we can use it to test the other case of the character, if there is one.
If we have a redirect_url then our script_filename and script_name point to the php executable
If we have a timeout to check, figure out how much time has elapsed since we started.
If we have a timeout, we switch to non-blocking mode for the duration of the operation, using select to do our waits.
If we have already a handler, release it
If we have any lock, then the lock file already exists.
If we have determined that we need to deviate from the correct algorithm, flip bit 16 in initial expanded key.
If we have fewer than 2 bytes, give up.
If we have found the required character, save the point where we found it, so that we don't search again next time round the loop if the start hasn't passed this character yet.
If we have just passed a CR and the newline option is ANY or ANYCRLF, and we are now at a LF, advance the match position by one more character.
If we have matched a delimiter
If we have matched an empty string, fail if not in an assertion and not in a recursion if either PCRE_NOTEMPTY is set, or if PCRE_NOTEMPTY_ATSTART is set and we have matched at the start of the subject.
If we have matched an empty string, mimic what Perl's /g options does.
If we have more than 2 NOPS then JMP over them
If we have not found this recursion on the forward reference list, adjust the recursion's offset if it's after the start of this group.
If we have not seen this color before, find nearest colormap
If we have not seen this color before, find nearest colormap entry
If we have not yet set a firstchar in this branch, take it from the subpattern, remembering that it was set here so that a repeat of more than one can replicate it as reqchar if necessary.
If we have something like C:
If we have tried all the alternative branches, the assertion has failed.
If we haven't matched any alternatives in any iteration, check to see if a previous iteration matched.
If we haven't read everything
If we haven't registered a server_context yet, then don't bother flushing.
If we hit ALT or KET, it means we haven't found anything mandatory in this branch, though we might have found something optional.
If we hit a bracket or a positive lookahead assertion, recurse to set bits from within the subpattern.
If we hit an unclosed bracket, we return "empty" - this means we've struck an inner bracket whose current branch will already have been scanned.
If we meet some day, and you think this stuff is worth it, you can buy me a beer in return.
If we might modify it, we continue to scan the tag, otherwise we simply copy the complete HTML stuff to the result buffer.
If we previously had a firstchar, but it doesn't match the new branch, we have to abandon the firstchar for the regex, but if there was previously no reqchar, it takes on the value of the old firstchar.
If we previously set PCRE_NOTEMPTY_ATSTART after a null match, this is not necessarily the end.
If we reach something we don't understand, it means a new opcode has been created that hasn't been added to this code.
If we reach the end of the pattern without matching, display a warning.
If we reach this point, flattening is permitted.
If we reach this point, it means the two subterms can be combined
If we reach this point, that means the transformation is required.
If we reach this point, the frame is valid.
If we see any continuations at a higher level, process them.
If we see whitespace in the format, skip whitespace in the string.
If we set a first char from the group, and didn't set a required char, copy the latter from the former.
If we succeed, we return non-zero and the NetWare Loader will leave us up, otherwise we fail to load and get dumped.
If we succeeded in making the shared memory handle, map it.
If we time out, or we have an error report that back to PHP
If we were called via fclose, the cookie_closer unsets the fclose_stdiocast flags, so we can be sure that we only reach here when PHP code calls php_stream_free.
If we're going to overwrite the argv area, count the available space.
If we're in compile time, in practice, it's quite possible that we'll never reach this class declaration at runtime, so we shut up about it.
If we're out of colors, go for the closest color
If we've a valid pointer, return the SMTP server response so the error message contains more information
If we've found a possible browser, we need to do a comparison of the number of characters changed in the user agent being checked versus the previous match found and the current match.
If work was actually accomplished...
If x is text, then we actually count UTF-8 characters.
If xclass_has_prop is false and class_one_char is 1, we have the first single character in the class, and there have been no prior ranges, or XCLASS items generated by escapes.
If you change the logic here, please also update the error message in ps_modules appropriately
If you change this value then also change bug24640.phpt.
If you declare any globals in php_enchant.h uncomment this:
If you define some other weird order in jmorecfg.h, you'll get compile errors until you extend this logic.
If you don't pass a namespace uri, then you can't set a prefix
If you specify textaddr, a text-printable version of the address will be emalloc'd and returned.
If you subtract pseg from the current end of the stack, you get the address of the previous stack segment's end.
If you try to add a key bound to a new value, the binding is added, the old binding is not removed.
If you use this software in a product, an acknowledgment in the product documentation would be appreciated but is not required.
If you want do find memleaks in this module, compile libxml2 with --with-mem-debug and uncomment the following line, this will tell you the amount of not freed memory and the total used memory into apaches error_log
If you want to use this code to quantize a non-RGB color space, you'll probably need to change these scale factors.
If your stack is a linked list of frames, you have to provide an "address metric" ADDRESS_FUNCTION macro.
If z is a NULL pointer, set pMem to contain an SQL NULL.
If zName is NULL, the upper layer is requesting a temp file.
If: - unbuffered result - first row has not been read - last_row has been read
Ignore COLLATE or affinity on this tree
Ignore DESC
Ignore IFD2 if it purportedly exists
Ignore TEMP and :memory: databases
Ignore and just look for RBRACE
Ignore extra
Ignore libxml warnings during WSDL parsing
Ignore non-alphas
Ignore pushed registers and SLJIT_LOCALS_OFFSET when computing the aligned local size.
Ignore schema errors
Ignore silently
Ignore size specifier.
Ignore terms with these prereqs
Ignore the MSVC warning about no initializer
Ignore the error.
Ignore these
Ignore this option altogether.
Ignore trailer headers
Ignore trailing dot
Ignore wal frames before this one
Ignored by the IDNA2003 implementation.
Ignores `locale' stuff.
Illegal use of this function
Illegal value to initialize
Image and tile size
Images with an alpha channel are only able to resolve down to '1/128th opaque' instead of '1/256th', and this conversion is also automatic.
Images with more than 8 bits per channel are reduced to 8 bits.
Immediate access.
Immediate caching is not supported as it would be an operation on constant arguments.
Immediate is prefered as second argument by most architectures.
Immediate operand.
Implement logic from libxml xmlTextConcat to add suport for comments and PI
Implement the main merge loop
Implement this by temporarily adjusting end_subject so that we stop scanning at a newline.
Implementation for palette images can be done at a later point.
Implemented as a co-routine
Implements Jenkins's one-at-a-time hashing algorithm as presented on http://www.burtleburtle.net/bob/hash/doobs.html.
Implements a UNIQUE constraint
Implied first min-heap entry
Important: 's_headers_almost_done' must be the last 'header' state.
Impose the anti-aliased drawing on the image.
Imposter table name
In 4.1 we use CLIENT_SECURE_CONNECTION and thus the len of the buf should be passed
In 8 bit mode, this must always be TRUE.
In 8 bit, non-UTF mode, OP_CLASS and OP_NCLASS are the same.
In 8.13, the code was changed as below for ONCE, so that backups pass through the group and thereby reset captured values.
In ARM instruction words.
In ARM, we don't need to touch the arguments.
In CGI mode, we consider the environment to be a part of the server variables
In HTML5, entities may take up to 33 bytes
In May 2006, when it was observed to cause compiler warnings about unused values, I took it out again.
In PPC, we don't need to touch the arguments.
In Perl, unescaped square brackets may also appear as part of class names.
In UTF-8 mode we can only do this properly if Unicode properties are supported.
In UTF-8 mode, STAR, MINSTAR, POSSTAR, QUERY, MINQUERY, POSQUERY, UPTO, MINUPTO, and POSUPTO and their caseless and negative versions may be followed by a multibyte character.
In UTF-8 mode, for characters greater than 127, we can only do the caseless thing when Unicode property support is available.
In UTF-8 mode, long characters have their length in c, with the UTF_LENGTH bit as a flag.
In UTF-8 mode, opcodes that are followed by a character may be followed by a multi-byte character.
In UTF-8 mode, the bits in a bit map correspond to character values, not to byte values.
In UTF-8 mode, we can only do a direct setting for bytes less than 128, as otherwise there can be confusion with bytes in the middle of UTF-8 characters.
In UTF8 mode, the result is in characters rather than bytes.
In Unicode, there are 8-bit characters that have alternate cases that are greater than 255 and vice-versa.
In Unix-like environments, if PCRE is installed in your standard system libraries, you should be able to compile this program using this command: gcc -Wall pcredemo.c -lpcre -o pcredemo If PCRE is not installed in a standard place, it is likely to be installed with support for the pkg-config mechanism.
In Y format we must always have something in Y2, since it has no fnop, so this conveys that Y2 must always be used.
In a "traditional" environment, the tables will only recognize ASCII characters anyway, but in at least one Windows environment, some higher bytes bits were set in the tables.
In a phar.zip or phar.tar archive, the default stub is used only to identify the archive to the extension as a Phar object.
In addition, an uppercase "T" character MUST be used to separate date and time, and an uppercase "Z" character MUST be present in the absence of a numeric time zone offset.
In addition, the proxy is now able to handle properties of COM objects that smell like PHP arrays.
In all case we no longer have a previous item.
In all cases the repeat_max now specifies the number of additional copies needed.
In all cases they are in the order in which they appear in the pattern.
In all cases, when you get here, the value and location stacks have just been pushed.
In all other cases only one of them was specified, and that can goes to TMP1.
In all other cases we loop through the available transtion times to find the correct entry
In all other cases, tempcode will be pointing to the repeat opcode, and will be less than code, so the value of len will be greater than 0.
In an affine transform composed of scaling, rotation, shearing, and translation, returns the amount of scaling.
In any case, it's not unsigned.
In any case, values larger than INT_MAX for a chunk size make no sense.
In any event, remove the block from the chain.
In applications that need to be able to suspend compression due to input not being available yet, a FALSE return indicates that no more data can be obtained right now, but more may be forthcoming later.
In applications that need to be able to suspend compression due to output overrun, a FALSE return indicates that the buffer cannot be emptied now.
In both ASC and DESC order.
In both cases, a zero repeat forces firstchar to "none".
In both cases, backtracking will then try other alternatives, if any.
In both cases, the original bucket is unlinked from its brigade.
In both phases, for recursions, we can now go to the code than handles numerical recursion.
In case an error occurs
In case it's sensitive
In case never set
In case of IS_LONG we do nothing, it is ok, in case of string, we just need to set current_type.
In case of an error, we should have place to put it
In case of ucp_Cf, we overwrite the result.
In case previously set by assertion
In case the blob is ever cast to text
In case the blob is ever converted to text
In case the child is absolutely positionned and has a top/left/bottom/right being set, we override all the previously computed positions to set it correctly.
In case the cursor has been used before, clear it now.
In case this callback is called from include_once, require_once or it's a main FastCGI request, the key must be already calculated, and cached persistent script already found
In case this cursor is being reused, close and zero it.
In contrast to exif_process_string this function does always return a string buffer
In earlier versions of PCRE, all the offsets were unset at the start of matching, but this doesn't work because atomic groups and assertions can cause a value to be set that should later be unset.
In earlier versions of the IJG code, this module quantized in YCbCr color space, processing the raw upsampled data without a color conversion step.
In earlier versions, the whole set of potential capturing offsets was set to -1 each time round the loop, but this is handled differently now.
In extended mode, skip white space and comments.
In fact, because we do the check for a number below, the paths that would actually be in error are never taken.
In fact, it can be used as a standalone dom implementation.
In fact, the repeated ones could be re-implemented independently so as not to need this, but for the moment we rely on the code for repeating groups.
In fact, the value ESC_g is returned only for these cases.
In fact, there are only two possible starting bytes for characters in the range 128 - 255.
In fact, this can happen for a non-forward reference because another group with the same number might be created later.
In general it's also possible to do it for any CV variable as well, but it would require complex dataflow and/or type analysis.
In global scope, we know nothing
In lieu of that, let's use a define so we don't use absurd amounts of RAM for OSS users.
In most cases IS_TMP_VAR operand may be used only once.
In most cases we only access a small range so it is faster to use a static buffer there BUT it offers also the possibility to have pointers read without the need to free them explicitley before returning.
In most cases, generating a warning message and inserting a fake EOI marker is the best course of action --- this will allow the decompressor to output however much of the image is there.
In most cases, with the default chunk size of 8K, we will only incur that overhead once.
In multi-threaded environments, we have to init thread safely
In no event will the authors be held liable for any damages arising from the use of this software.
In non-RAC, we always get a brand new connection at the end of the loop and in RAC, we can get a good connection from a different instance before flushing out all bad ones.
In non-UTF-8 mode, the two bit maps are completely compatible.
In order to be consistent, we have to make sure we add the good amount of nulls depending on the current number of elements.
In other words, in the Gregorian calendar, 1700, 1800 and 1900 are not leap years, but 2000 is.
In other words, skip the first -YYN actions for this state because they are default actions.
In pass 1 just add in the length
In phpdbg mode, we consider the environment to be a part of the server variables
In principle, we could implement several newline "types", each referring to a different set of newline characters.
In sljit, the code is under BSD licence.
In some places we need to check if the number NUM is almost zero.
In some places we need to check if the number NUM is zero.
In some places we need to check if the number is negative.
In some rare cases destructors of regular arrays may be changed
In some rare ocasions we may need future patches.
In that case this function is a no-op.
In that case we are not in any hurry.
In that case you'll probably want to tweak the histogram sizes too.
In that case, also set YYMSG_ALLOC to the required number of bytes.
In that case, don't check for expected tokens because there are none.
In that case, just report a simple "syntax error".
In that case, only verify 4-byte alignment.
In that case, we allow yet more memory, just in case.
In the 16-bit and 32-bit libraries, codepoints greater than 255 may be encountered even when UTF is not supported.
In the 8-bit library, this opcode is encountered only when UTF-8 mode mode is supported.
In the IEEE 754 standard, zero is signed.
In the actual compile, there is nothing to do.
In the case of YYABORT or YYACCEPT, an incorrect destructor might then be invoked immediately.
In the case of YYERROR or YYBACKUP, subsequent parser actions might lead to an incorrect destructor call or verbose syntax error message before the lookahead is translated.
In the case of a zero minimum, the first one was set up above.
In the case of reqchar, save the previous value for reinstating.
In the case someone doesn't read all the lines this will save time.
In the case where two connects were being made, without closing the first connect, access violations were occurring.
In the case where we had to get some local store to hold offsets for backreference processing, copy those that we can.
In the case where we have large paths, though, it gets a little tricker, and I like writing lockless data structures :P
In the caseful case, we can just compare the bytes, whether or not we are in UTF-8 mode.
In the compile phase, check for empty string matching.
In the current implementation the cache is traversed by a linear search from most-recent to least-recent.
In the early years, the beginning of the year varied, sometimes based on the ascension of rulers.
In the event that an invalid digit is found, halt the conversion and return the portion which has been converted thus far.
In the first pass over the image, we accumulate a histogram showing the usage count of each possible color.
In the former case, we do not have to allocate any handles
In the future, we'll allow someone to register an error handler
In the non-UCP case, or when UCP makes no difference, we build the bit map for the POSIX class in a chunk of local store because we may be adding and subtracting from it, and we don't want to subtract bits that may be in the main map already.
In the pathelogical case where no blanks are found, then the wrap occurs at the first blank.
In the positive case, it can cause firstchar to be set.
In the pre-compile phase, accumulate the length of any extra data and reset the pointer.
In the pre-compile phase, do a syntax check, remember the longest name, and then remember the group in a vector, expanding it if necessary.
In the pre-compile phase, do a syntax check.
In the pre-compile phase, however, the code pointer can have that value after the start, because it gets reset as code is discarded during the pre-compile.
In the pre-compile phase, update the length by the length of the group, less the brackets at either end.
In the pre-compile phase, we can move the code pointer back to where it was for the start of the first branch.
In the pre-compile phase, we don't actually do the replication.
In the real compile phase, go back through the alternative branches and reverse the chain of offsets, with the field in the BRA item now becoming an offset to the first alternative.
In the real compile phase, just check the workspace used by the forward reference list.
In the real compile phase, there is some post-processing to be done.
In the real compile this will be picked up and the reference wrapped with OP_ONCE to make it atomic, so we must space in case this occurs.
In the real compile we do the work of looking for the actual reference.
In the real compile, search the name table.
In the second case, we can use tail recursion to avoid using another stack frame, unless we have an an atomic group or an unlimited repeat of a group that can match an empty string.
In the second pass we must see if the name is duplicated.
In the second phase this is a sufficient test.
In the special case where we have not yet generated any xclass data, and this is the final item in the overall class, we need do nothing: later on, the opcode OP_NCLASS will be used to indicate that characters greater than 255 are acceptable.
In theory we could just set events to D.
In theory we should allow an extra byte below, since we don't need the NULL.
In theory, you could get away with only having pipes and not using the linked lists at all.
In these cases we can just copy the pointer.
In these cases, therefore, an indirection via a local function is used.
In this branch is execute only when DIFF_ASSOC.
In this case PCRE_INCLUDED is defined.
In this case abandon processing and return the error.
In this case an error is left in pParse.
In this case do not skip forward 2 bytes.
In this case exit early.
In this case ignore stat3 data.
In this case it returns 1.
In this case leave the iterator empty.
In this case see the discussion below for details.
In this case set bSkipnext to true.
In this case the auto-vacuum applies as per normal.
In this case the position-list is not populated at all.
In this case there need not be overflow if certain parts of the pattern were not used, even though there are more capturing parentheses than vector slots.
In this case this function runs a blocking checkpoint.
In this case we are only interested in rows changed, not rows retrieved.
In this case we must scan the list of groups to which the name refers, and use the first one that is set.
In this case we simply fallback to interpreter.
In this case we would like to delete the journal file.
In this case, the RHS is an index b-tree.
In this case, the RHS is the ROWID of table b-tree
In this case, we do what Perl does: advance the matching position by one character, and continue.
In this circumstance, Perl ignores the SKIP entirely.
In this encoding mb-trail bytes doesn't mix with single bytes.
In this environment, fi and i, and fc and c, can be the same variables.
In this instance, that is ok because we want binary zero to be flagged as a meta-character, which in this sense is any character that terminates a run of data characters.
In this module the prescan simply updates the histogram, which has been initialized to zeroes by start_pass.
In this state the integer just read was a docid.
In this way the topmost value on the stack is always belong to the current backtrack code path.
In this way, the first chunk has an index of 1.
In threaded environments, we have to mutex lock to do this init, but we don't want to use a mutex every time to check that it was Inited.
In which case the bIncr flag is set.
In-memory database
In-memory journal file
In-memory list of records
Include ICU headers
Include btree.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include btreeInt.h in the middle of btmutex.c
Include fts3.h in the middle of main.c
Include fts3Int.h in the middle of fts3.c
Include fts3_hash.h in the middle of fts3Int.h
Include fts3_tokenizer.h in the middle of fts3Int.h
Include hash.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include hwtime.h in the middle of os_common.h
Include hwtime.h in the middle of vdbe.c
Include keywordhash.h in the middle of tokenize.c
Include msvc.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include mutex.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include opcodes.h in the middle of vdbe.h
Include os.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include os_common.h in the middle of mutex_w32.c
Include os_common.h in the middle of os_unix.c
Include os_common.h in the middle of os_win.c
Include os_setup.h in the middle of os.h
Include os_win.h in the middle of mutex_w32.c
Include pager.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include parse.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include pcache.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include pragma.h in the middle of pragma.c
Include rtree.h in the middle of main.c
Include sqlite3.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include sqlite3ext.h in the middle of loadext.c
Include sqlite3rbu.h in the middle of sqlite3rbu.c
Include sqliteLimit.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include sqliteicu.h in the middle of main.c
Include vdbe.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include vdbeInt.h in the middle of status.c
Include vxworks.h in the middle of sqliteInt.h
Include wal.h in the middle of pager.c
Include whereInt.h in the middle of wherecode.c
Includes definition for u_char
Includes the ALL keyword
Including the return address saved by the call instruction.
Incompatible type
Incr-merge parameter A
Increase the leaves written counter
Increase the list size if necessary
Increase the size of the aTo set by one
Increase the total number of bytes written to account for the new entry.
Increases the stack pointer.
Increasing the STR_PTR here requires one less jump in the most common case.
Increment constraint counter by this
Increment our pretend rowid value.
Increment pSpace by nOff to align it
Increment position
Increment the "number of sequential leaves without a term" counter.
Increment the free page count on pPage1
Increment the max so the range is inclusive of max
Increment the reference count of an existing page
Increment the row counter
Increment the value just read and write it back to byte 24.
Increment the value stored in the P2 operand of the OP_Rowid.
Incremental merger
Incremental vacuum
Incrementally read one PMA
Incrementally write one PMA
Incremented with each busy call
Incremented with each change
Incrementing the refcount of obj and inf would confuse the garbage collector.
Indeed, using PHP_POLLREADABLE results in select failing only due to the timeout and not immediately as would be expected when a connection is actively refused.
Index Name      NULL
Index Name      Table Name
Index added to make the name unique
Index being probed
Index everything by number
Index for the variable is stored using the numeric value of the pointer to the zend_refcounted struct
Index identifier string
Index in aData of first cell pointer
Index in pWC of the next virtual term
Index in the parent table
Index interior and leaf nodes
Index into aSub array
Index into input list
Index into pNode into which pCell is written
Index into the cache with adjusted pixel value
Index into the cell pointer array
Index iterator
Index key to query for
Index level just updated
Index loop counter
Index number
Index object
Index of "the page" in pParent
Index of PmaReader to advance
Index of VdbeCursor that writes the sqlite_stat1 table
Index of WhereLoop in pPath being processed
Index of a host parameter
Index of candidate output segment
Index of cell to delete
Index of changed index field
Index of child node in parent
Index of column in child table
Index of column in first table
Index of column in pFrom
Index of column in pTab
Index of column in parent tbl
Index of column in second table
Index of column in table
Index of column matching zCol
Index of column this phrase must match
Index of column to create snippet from
Index of column to read value from
Index of column zName applies to
Index of constrained coordinate
Index of constraint to use
Index of containing database.
Index of current page in apPage
Index of database containing pTab
Index of database containing table/index
Index of database holding TABLE
Index of database housing pTab
Index of database to analyze
Index of first cell currently on page
Index of first cell to add
Index of first cell to the left of right sibling
Index of first record in sub-journal
Index of first table to join in pSrc
Index of first token in snippet
Index of free page to move pLastPg to
Index of function argument.
Index of iDelete cell in pLeaf
Index of last frame read
Index of last valid frame in the WAL
Index of left-hand Fts5SegIter
Index of loop to report on
Index of new first cell on page
Index of new output segment
Index of new segment
Index of next byte to read from input
Index of next byte to write to output
Index of next entry to replace
Index of next field to compare
Index of next free chunk
Index of next token to be returned
Index of parent of each node
Index of previous free chunk
Index of rbu_control column
Index of right-hand Fts5SegIter
Index of right-most cell in left sibling
Index of root page
Index of second table in pSrc
Index of statement to evaluate
Index of sub-iterator just advanced
Index of the OR-term to be analyzed
Index of the cell within the node
Index of the column to extract
Index of the database containing the table to lock
Index of the database holding pTab
Index of the database that is being written
Index of the database to use
Index of the equality term within this level
Index of the new VdbeCursor
Index of the parameter to bind
Index of the table column
Index of the term to be analyzed
Index of this term.
Index of top element in stack
Index of zColumn in row-record
Index on key columns in pTo
Index on parent covering the foreign key
Index sort order
Index structure
Index structure corresponding to u1.zIndexedBy
Index that owns this iterator
Index to consider domain of
Index to match column of
Index to read from
Index to write to
Index used to optimize scan, or NULL
Index used, or NULL
Index within level of segment to modify
Index within level, or 0x7FFFFFFF for PT
Index.aSortOrder
Index.aiColumn
Index.aiRowLogEst
Index.azColl
Indexed column is an expression
Indexed column is the rowid
Indicate a non-UTF class which was created by negation
Indicate that there is a global colour map
Indicate to query, that result is released
Indicate to result, that query is released
Indicates a pending lock has been obtained
Indicates a reserved lock has been obtained
Indicates an exclusive lock has been obtained
Indicates caselessness
Indirect offsets are not valid at level 0.
Individual characters in zCharSet
Inequality constraint at range end
Inequality constraint at range start
Inferno libmach/8db.c http://code.google.com/p/inferno-os/source/browse/utils/libmach/8db.c
Infinity or NaN
Infinity or NaN, convert to inf or nan with sign.
Infinity or Nan, convert to inf or nan like printf
Info about index keys needed by index cursors
Info about locks on this inode
Info about the callback functions
Info for single OR-term scan
Info from: http://sc.openoffice.org/compdocfileformat.pdf  N.B.
Info on how to code the DISTINCT keyword
Info on how to code the ORDER BY clause
InfoZip stores valid values in local header even when data descriptor is used.
Information about AUTOINCREMENT counters
Information about aggregates at this level
Information about an AUTOINCREMENT
Information about each column
Information about each format field
Information about each nest loop in WHERE
Information about each nested IN operator
Information about how to do the compare
Information about the ORDER BY clause
Information about the WHERE clause
Information about the function
Information about the record format
Information about this WHERE
Information desired.
Information for internal btree tables
Information for virtual tables
Information is passed back and forth as PgHdr1 pointers.
Information on the ORDER BY clause
Information used by aggregate queries
Information used during initialization
Information used while coding trigger programs.
Information was available, but we were denied access.
Informational stream wrapper constants
Infrastructure for working with persistent COM objects.
Inherit interfaces
Inherit properties
Inherit special functions if needed
Inherit the interfaces, only if they're not already inherited by the class
Inidcates the distacne the autofocus camera is focused to.
Init auto-global strings
Init module
Init nFree to non-freeblock free space
Init the module
Initiailize our structure
Initial DOT must be matched literally.
Initial bulk allocation size
Initial checks.
Initial checksum value input
Initial cost estimate
Initial entry.
Initial number of leaf cells on trunk page
Initial number of pages on free-list
Initial root node
Initial size is zero
Initial sources code is avaibable in the Gems Source Code Packages: http://www.acm.org/pubs/tog/GraphicsGems/GGemsIII.tar.gz
Initial space
Initial space for EQP output string
Initial static space
Initial value of write-counter
Initial working space
Initialise FastCGI request structure
Initialization
Initialization context
Initialization error
Initialize a lookahead iterator for each phrase.
Initialize a number NUM by making it a copy of zero.
Initialize a term iterator for each term in the phrase
Initialize a tokenizer iterator to iterate through column iCol.
Initialize all iterators
Initialize all term iterators in the NEAR object.
Initialize an array that records the number of times a variable is assigned to by the format string.
Initialize and fill this JsonParse object
Initialize and shutdown the page cache subsystem
Initialize any AUTOINCREMENT data structures required.
Initialize best-distance for each cell of the update box
Initialize context as NULL
Initialize destination --- called by jpeg_start_compress before any data is actually written.
Initialize divide loop.
Initialize each of the component segment iterators.
Initialize execute_data
Initialize for "real" parentheses
Initialize for each processing pass.
Initialize for pre-compile phase
Initialize generator state with seed See Knuth TAOCP Vol 2, 3rd Ed, p.106 for multiplier.
Initialize global handles if they weren't initialized before
Initialize here for LIMIT_MATCH/RECURSION
Initialize iLast, the "lastest" rowid any iterator points to.
Initialize in case this module hasn't been loaded yet
Initialize key
Initialize memory locations used by GROUP BY aggregate processing
Initialize module globals
Initialize new parts
Initialize no first byte, no required byte.
Initialize one box containing whole space
Initialize product
Initialize return array
Initialize return object
Initialize return value
Initialize returned array
Initialize source --- called by jpeg_read_header before any data is actually read.
Initialize sqlite3_vtab_cursor base class
Initialize structure containing state of computation.
Initialize structure with current time
Initialize target object
Initialize the 32-char bit map to all zeros.
Initialize the 4-byte leaf-page header to 0x00.
Initialize the BLOB value of a ROWID
Initialize the INTEGER value of a ROWID.
Initialize the JsonString object
Initialize the PCache object.
Initialize the VDBE program
Initialize the buffer
Initialize the contents of sLocal to avoid a compiler warning.
Initialize the contents of the SnippetIter object.
Initialize the count of rows to be inserted
Initialize the count of updated rows
Initialize the local lockdata
Initialize the locking parameters
Initialize the master block.
Initialize the memory allocator
Initialize the name-context
Initialize the next page.
Initialize the node to no-match
Initialize the output variables to -1 in case an error occurs.
Initialize the pParse structure as needed.
Initialize the pointers.
Initialize the propagated errors to zero.
Initialize the result string
Initialize the return array
Initialize the return value as an array.
Initialize the return_value as an array.
Initialize the rowset register to contain NULL.
Initialize the shared memory if we're supposed to
Initialize the structure.
Initialize the subtract.
Initialize the upper limit on the number of worker threads
Initialize the variables.
Initialize things.
Initialize time struct
Initialize variables
Initialize vdbe cursor object
Initializing the tail of the buffer is not necessary.
Initilize notice message hash at MINIT only
Injects SNMP properties into object on first call
Inline immutable values from the target node to avoid excessive method invocations during the layout calculation.
Inlining simple patterns.
Inode number
Inotify Ocaml binding - C glue
Input JSON text to be parsed
Input and output files
Input and output images
Input arguments
Input array
Input buffer
Input character index
Input code filter
Input contains fewer than nChar chars
Input flags to control the opening
Input image
Input iterator
Input stack
Input string
Input string argument
Input text being tokenized
Inputs: code:   A n_bits-bit integer.
Insert a fake EOI marker
Insert an OP_Halt at the end of the sub-program.
Insert an element into the hash table pH.
Insert an implicit AND operator.
Insert data into the table of this cursor
Insert fake frame in case of include or magic calls
Insert into hash collision list
Insert new divider cells into pParent.
Insert on a main table b-tree
Insert on an aux.
Insert or replace a decomposition.
Insert the code in order.
Insert the new divider cell into pParent.
Insert the new freeblock into the freelist
Insert the new index entries and the new record.
Insert the new record into the r-tree
Insert the new sample
Insert the recursion/subroutine item.
Insertion failed because database is full
Inserts are grouped into a transaction.
Inside chunk it's managed by pages of fixed size 4096B.
Inspired by "How to Print Floating-Point Numbers Accurately" by Guy L.
Inspired by http://stackoverflow.com/questions/6161776/convert-windows-filetime-to-second-in-unix-linux
Inspired loosely by William D.
Install our own signal handler.
Instance of shared memory on this file
Instead delete and recreate.
Instead modify the script and run it to regenerate this code.
Instead of a true 3-D array, we use a row of pointers to 2-D arrays.
Instead of resolving full real path name each time we need to identify file, we create a key that consist from requested file name, current working directory, current include_path, etc
Instead of trying to locate the .exe file it'll just return a handle to the process image.
Instead we map the range directly.
Instead, forget about the specific key values and just allocate and initialize per-thread storage until we find a key that writes to the memory location we want.
Instead, just count through the strings.
Instead, just supply small dummy tables.
Instead, mark the stream as OK to auto-clean
Instead, the error code is returned to the caller.
Instead, the term is inserted into the parent of pTree.
Instead, we catch it when the OP_END is reached.
Instead, we compute with fewer bits and propagate the carry if necessary when rounding the final digit up.
Instead, we simply count through to the one we want - this isn't a performance issue because these strings are used only when there is a compilation error.
Instr Prefix
Instr Prefix or media op
Instr Prefix or media op extension
Instrucion forms
Instruction bit sections.
Instruction number of OP_Function
Instruction number of OP_Function opcode
Instruction opcode
Instruction to open the Ephemeral table
Instructions after the current alternative is successfully matched.
Instructions before the first alternative.
Instructions take this many bytes.
Instructions that cannot be bundled are padded out with nops, rather than fnops.
Insufficient room for saving captured contents.
Int to accommodate truecolor single-color transparency
Integer and Real
Integer key for tables.
Integer overflow
Integer overflow check
Integer primary key index
Integer primary key is autoincrement
Integer return code
Integer sum
Integer to fixed point
Integer types.
Integer value
Integer value contained in u.iValue
Integer value of left operand
Integer value of limit
Integer value of right operand
Integer value used when MEM_Int is set in flags
Integrity check context
Integrity checking context
Intel syntax.
Intended for user save handlers.
Intentionally the other opcode.
Interface can only inherit other interfaces
Intermediate negative values can mess this computation otherwise
Internal change requires this for API compatibility.
Internal data structure corruption will result otherwise.
Internal error constants
Internal href try and find node
Internal logic error in SQLite
Internationalized format string.
Interned strings are not duplicated when stored in HashTable, but all the interned strings created during HTTP request are removed at end of request.
Interned strings support
Internet Time
Interpret the argument as a blob.
IntlChar class
IntlDateFormatter functions
Introspection for algorithmic converters
Invalid 0xfe or 0xff bytes
Invalid character
Invalid chunk length, truncate
Invalid key size:  0x80 0x80 0x00
Invalid key size:  0x80 0x80 0x01
Invalid parameters were passed to ldap_explode_dn
Invalid query fails at execution anyway.
Invalid rule to return a more explicit parse error with proper line number
Invalid value
Invalidate all ephemeral cursor row caches
Invalidate any prior representations.
Invalidate the existing cache, otherwise reads can fail, see note in main/streams/filter.c::_php_stream_filter_append
Invariant: If the closure is unscoped or static, it has no bound object.
Invert the P-box permutation, and convert into OR-masks for handling the output of the S-box arrays setup above.
Invert the S-boxes, reordering the input bits.
Invert the key compression permutation.
Invert the key permutation and initialise the inverted key compression permutation.
Invert the result for DESC sort order.
Invert type.
Inverted immediate.
Invoke AFTER DELETE trigger programs.
Invoke BEFORE DELETE trigger programs.
Invoke any destructors registered for collation sequence user data.
Invoke the authorization callback.
Invoke the callback function if required
Invoke the callback once if the
Invoke the main loop body as a subroutine
Invoke the token callback
Invoke the tokenizer destructor to free the tokenizer.
Invoke the update-hook if required.
Invoke the virtual table constructor
Invoke the xBegin method.
Invoke the xFilter method
Invoke this callback routine
Invoke'd args are in reverse order
Invoked at every commit.
Ipv4-Mapped-Ipv6
Is Parent waiting for children to exit
Is a label of an object
Is a virtual table
Is an alias for a result set column
Is an integer key
Is the PRIMARY KEY for the table
Is the function static
Is the map_T valid
Is used while compiling a function, using the context to keep track of an approximate size to avoid to relocate to often.
Isolated 10xx xxxx byte
It ain't gonna proceed to real execution anyway, but the correct descriptor is needed already.
It also assumes that the path is not empty
It also contains code to merge FTS3 b-tree segments.
It also decrements the VTable ref count.
It also helps build the error message
It also sets Mem.flags to MEM_Null.
It also simplifies the handling of Z_ADDREF_P because we don't need to check if only either NUM or ASSOC is set but not both.
It also specified that there would be exactly 12 months per year and 365.25 days per year with every 4th year being a leap year.
It always returns SQLITE_OK.
It appears that Perl allows any characters whatsoever, other than a closing parenthesis, to appear in arguments, so we no longer insist on letters, digits, and underscores.
It appears that the service API is a little bit confused about which flag to use for the source and destination in the case of a restore operation.
It assumes that names are unique.
It can be acquired only when it is zero.
It can be: 1.
It can either be from the style attribute or because the element is flexible.
It cannot normally ever be NULL.
It considerably speeds things up to do a normal load before trying using an atomic operation.
It consists of three parts.
It contains bitset of free pages, few bitset for available runs of predefined small sizes, map of pages that keeps information about usage of each page in this CHUNK, etc.
It contains service information about all pages.
It could be used later.
It creates the environment variables that indicates call graph mode.
It depends on a particular ordering of TK_xx
It depends on session data change.
It does not do expression rebalancing.
It does not have any networking code.
It does not need to be destroyed.
It does, however, expect the extra short to be allocated for each element.
It doesn't seem worth having a separate .h file just for this.
It doesn't store the length in the first short, as with VARCHAR fields.
It finds the first available slot using pthread_key_create and uses it as the offset value for runtime.tlsg.
It first tries "sqlite3_extension_init".
It found Tishri 1 at the end of the year.
It found Tishri 1 at the start of the year.
It gets harder and harder to shut off unwanted compiler warnings.
It has all the context it needs
It has emerged from apache snprintf.
It has to be Kislev.
It has to be used in one particular way.
It has, however, been hacked around a lot, so he is not to blame for the current way it works.
It is Adar II or later - don't need the year length.
It is Kislev - must find the year length.
It is Tevet, Shevat or Adar I - don't need the year length.
It is Tishri or Heshvan - don't need the year length.
It is a hack intended for Windows only.
It is a number computed by the pager.
It is a warning message
It is added into the firstchar or reqchar variables to record the case status of the value.
It is allocated by compile_matchingpath, and contains the arguments for compile_backtrackingpath.
It is also possible to use just the second pass to map to an arbitrary externally-given color map.
It is always sent to PHP at the start of a request.
It is assumed that the caller has allocated sufficient space.
It is complete
It is documented that this happens.
It is done like this so that those without OP_RECURSE that are not fixed length get a diagnosic with a useful offset.
It is done this way to save having to use another function argument, which would take up space on the stack.
It is even worse than that.
It is filled concurrently by the workers.
It is guaranteed that the initial value of ptr is greater than the start of the string that is being processed.
It is guaranteed that the initial value of ptr is less than the end of the string that is being processed.
It is important to check for IMAGE_FILETYPE_TIFF JPEG does not use absolute pointers instead its pointers are relative to the start of the TIFF header in APP1 section.
It is included only for the very lazy.
It is left uninitialized so that multiple parsers can coexist.
It is my intent that you should be able to use this on your system, as part of a software package, or anywhere else to improve security, ensure compatibility, or for any other purpose.
It is never written to disk.
It is not a documented part of the tokenizer interface.
It is not always meaningful.
It is not an error to find no matches.
It is not clear when the current rule based calendar replaced the observation based calendar.
It is not included in production compiles.
It is not necessary to fill the buffer entirely, only to obtain at least one more byte.
It is not reset by zend engine, set it to 200.
It is not used in production code, only for debugging.
It is now impossible to match real values against php constants.
It is one of the last 6 months of the year.
It is only applied with constant shift counts.
It is only here for testing and debugging.
It is only used here so that the buffered data warning is not displayed.
It is painful to recover from incorrectly-computed hashes - merely fixing whatever broke is not enough.
It is possible that a buffered stream was switched to non-buffered, so we drain the remainder of the buffer before using the "raw" read mode for the excess
It is possible that calling this routine itself caused a stack overflow.
It is possible to append to this segment.
It is provided "as is" without express or implied warranty of any kind.
It is reset to ' ' by non-numeric formats
It is retained for historical compatibility.
It is searched by binary chop, so must be in collating sequence of name.
It is simple, and it seems to work, and it is pretty fast.
It is simply a matter of writing a transport.
It is the author's view, that this API is intended for simple data types, and a "fault" is a complex data type consisting of multiple simple data types.
It is the caller's responsibility to free it.
It is the responsibility of the caller to malloc and free memory for insertion into the queue.
It is the reverse of PQescapeBytea.
It is therefore not useful for programs intended to be portable to DOS machines.
It is thread-safe.
It is thus a re-entrant opcode.
It is unfortunate that C does not provide an operator for cyclic rotation.
It is unsigned, so if a negative came from userspace, it'll convert to UINT_MAX, but we wan't to keep the userspace value.
It is used for overflow checking.
It is used only as a sanity check.
It is used when duplicated names are permitted.
It is usually 2.
It is valid for a JP2 file to contain multiple individual codestreams.
It is written out separately for speed and cleanliness.
It is written so that NUM and RESULT can be the same pointers.
It leads to a song and dance at the end of strtod.
It looks ahead to see if it really is a quantifier or not.
It makes sure you don't walk off the string.
It may as well be now.
It may be a timeout.
It may be only temporary disabled
It may fail, the destruction code must handle this case
It may happen that we are not quite the first function to try to allocate thread-local storage keys, so instead of depending on getting 0x100, we try for 0x108, allocating keys until we get the one we want and then freeing the ones we didn't want.
It may not compile or execute correctly on other systems.
It may or may not be of class JournalFile.
It might be a big thing to extend, thus just a local handling for now.
It must be a mov operation, so tmp1 must be free to use.
It must check the list of such references for the group we are dealing with.
It must exist before the call.
It must have only one branch.
It must not return FAILURE for non-existent session data.
It needs fixing for other locales.
It needs to be rolled back.
It needs to happen before argv is used in any way.
It needs to happen right before exiting.
It no longer has relation with the database session.
It remains NULL.
It returns -1 if division by zero is tried.
It returns 0 if the division is ok and the result is in QUOT.
It returns a pointer to the buffer which is NULL on error, and the size of the buffer in retbuflen.
It returns the address of the allocated chunk.
It returns the number of the first one that was set in a pattern match.
It returns the total number of pages in the database.
It searches up the characters, looking for ranges of characters in the "other" case.
It seems that the appearance of a nested POSIX class supersedes an apparent external class.
It serves two purposes at once:  1.
It should be possible to remove this when we no longer care about versions of clang before 3.8.
It should be used in all cases, but for consistency with earlier versions of dtoa, it is optional when MULTIPLE_THREADS is not defined.
It should never occur otherwise, but just in case it does, have something ready to print.
It should raise error, when there is 3rd parameter
It skips over things that do not influence this.
It still happens even though I set it to null, so something weird is going on.
It takes a bit more work in UTF-8 mode.
It turns out that on some non-Unix-like systems there are problems with programs that use a lot of stack.
It turns out this is useful for other purposes, such as parsing config files.
It updates the virtual stack, or creates it if this is the first method entry in the thread.
It uses the output of the operations by C99 as the reference to check the implementation of complex numbers in Go.
It was coded primarily to act as a go-between for expat and xmlrpc.
It was designed with consideration of the flaws in various other generators.
It was determined by inspection of the character codes stored in Microsoft font symbol.
It was found so go ahead and provide it
It was not always the first of January.
It will round at 255 as this is unsigned char.
It works for objects as small as two bytes.
It would be better, IMHO, to skip the C from the S part of the encoding.
It would be done in rshutdown anyway but the handler will have had it's dtor called by then.
It would be nice to find a better solution to this problem in the future.
It's a bit baroque to remove a signal stack here only to add one in minit, but it's a simple change that keeps DragonFly working like other OS's.
It's a bit baroque to remove a signal stack here only to add one in minit, but it's a simple change that keeps NetBSD working like other OS's.
It's a block algorithm
It's a hashtable that contains all the dependencies between Hack objects.
It's also only valid for Great Brittain and it's colonies.
It's an overflow on 32 bit, however it won't fix as long as zend_long is 32 bit.
It's available, so we can call it.
It's better to raise error for this, but disabled error for better compatibility
It's better to use additional FREE opcode and simplify the FETCH handlers their selves
It's defined in a macro so that the definition is next to the definition of the opcodes in pcre_internal.h.
It's done like this so that the start of the bracket has a zero offset until it is closed, making it possible to detect recursion.
It's easier to write this out separately than try to macrify it.
It's length from the segment is the shorter of the lengths from the endpoints, but call the distance -1, so as not to compute the alpha nor draw the pixel.
It's not a block algorithm
It's okay to return an empty array if no filters are registered
It's pointless to match character encodings here.
It's probably "Too many connections, which has SQL state 08004".
It's safe to reread without freeing
It's supposed to return an array of property names to be serialized.
It's supposed to throw an exception on stack overflow, but we don't actually handle that exception, so what happens in practice is we terminate at toplevel with an unhandled exception and a useless ocaml backtrace.
It's too flawed to consider.
It's unclear if XHTML 1.0 allows C1 characters.
It's unsigned.
It's very rare and useless case.
Iterate in descending rowid order
Iterate over the format string filling in the result objects until we reach the end of input, the end of the format string, or there is a mismatch.
Iterate over the hash to construct the argv array.
Iterate through all dirty pages currently stored in the cache.
Iterate through hash
Iterate through input hash and create a sort key for each value.
Iterate through levels, segments
Iterate through tables
Iterate through the b-tree hierarchy.
Iterate through the contents of the WAL, copying data to the db file
Iterate through the phrases in the expression to count them.
Iterates through set of root pages
Iterates through snippet candidates
Iterating in RPO here would converge faster
Iterator for WHERE terms
Iterator for input string
Iterator for looping through Pager.aSavepoint
Iterator for output string
Iterator for skipping through tbl/idx
Iterator for this term
Iterator object to initialize
Iterator pointer
Iterator to advance
Iterator to advance to next page
Iterator to read input data
Iterator to run through pList with.
Iterator to seek
Iterator used for several purposes
Iterator used to gather data from index
Iterator variable
Iterator variable for various purposes
Its advantage is that it is guaranteed to return a color index in one search over the color table.
Its contents will be re-inserted later on.
Its length field points back to the previous branch while the bracket remains open.
Its purpose is to set the object pointer for the object when you can't possibly know its value until you have parsed the arguments from the constructor function.
J instuctions.
JCE: Arrange HAVE_LIBPNG so that it can be set in gd.h
JCE: arrange HAVE_LIBJPEG so that it can be set in gd.h
JIS X 0201 kana
JIS X 0212 hojo-kanji
JIS X 0213 plane 1
JIS X 0213 plane 2
JIS should be tanslated to MB or we leave it to the user - leave it to the user
JIT decreases this value less frequently than the interpreter.
JMP L, L: RETURN to immediate RETURN
JMP to the next block - strip it
JMP_SET result can't be false either
JNODE flags
JP2 is a wrapper format for JPEG 2000.
JPEG 2000 components can be vastly different from one another.
JPEG do we have the data area and what to do with it
JSON formatted without any backslash-escapes
JSON type values
JSON, Array etc
JULIAN CALENDAR
JavaScript/CSS/etc...
Johnson of Cornell.
Join all threads
Join type mask
Journal file must be open.
Journal omitted.
Journaled and ready to modify
July 2008: There is now a script called maint/GenerateUtt.py that can be used to generate this data automatically instead of maintaining it by hand.
Jump destination
Jump destination for skipping partial index entries
Jump flags.
Jump from here if number of rows is zero
Jump here for next cycle
Jump here for next iteration of skip-scan
Jump here if LHS is not contained in the RHS
Jump here if malloc fails
Jump here if the UNIQUE constraint is satisfied
Jump here if the jump is taken
Jump here if the key is OK
Jump here if the results are unknown due to NULLs
Jump here if true.
Jump here if we hit the LIMIT
Jump here on any error
Jump here to break out of UPDATE loop
Jump here to break out of the inner loop
Jump here to break out of the loop
Jump here to continue next step of UPDATE loop
Jump here to continue with next cycle
Jump here to continue with next record
Jump here to continue with next row
Jump here to continue with the next loop cycle
Jump here to exit loop
Jump here to skip excluded rows
Jump here to skip the current record
Jump here to skip this query
Jump here to start the next IN combination
Jump here when skipping the initialization
Jump instructions that get retargetted
Jump optimization for each block
Jump or Call flag - no operand
Jump out of the pTerm loop
Jump over the subroutines
Jump to P2 if they are different.
Jump to addrBrk to break out of a loop.
Jump to here for any other kind of fatal error.
Jump to here if not distinct
Jump to label "D"
Jump to the appropriate pragma handler
Jump to the end of the loop if the LIMIT is reached.
Jump to the this point in order to terminate the query.
Jump to this label on an OE_Ignore resolution
Jump to this label to skip a row
Junk the truecolor pixels
Just a dumb implementation for now.
Just a flag to suppress char handling below
Just be sure not to block.
Just before substitute
Just checking that the page is large enough.
Just do the same as found in PostgreSQL sources...
Just don't forget to remove the Bcc: from the header afterwards.
Just fill in the content with zeros for now.
Just in case inavlid locale e.g. '-x-xyz' or '-sl_Latn'
Just in case it is not.
Just in case the algo has internally allocated resources
Just move the page out of the way.
Just not compatible for extensions that need persistency.
Just recording the address.
Just set the zero flag.
Just some tweaking to optimize the code, and get the end statements work in a general manner.
Just specifying the zend_class_unserialize_deny handler is not enough, because it is only invoked for C unserialization.
Just to check if user passed valid resoruce
Just to make sure the prototypes match the actual definitions
Just write.
KSC5601 lead byte
Keep advancing iterators until they all point to the same document
Keep clrBack as color index if required
Keep compiler happy by referencing function argument
Keep on comparing from the current point.
Keep picky compilers happy
Keep reading until we get enough entropy
Keep running the loop until the Queue is empty
Keep the STR_PTR on the top of the stack.
Keep the column cache up-to-date.
Keep the following function as private.
Keep the original link size.
Keep the result in realpath_cache
Keep to zero when no symbol should be popped.
Keep track of cloned copies to avoid invoking curl destructors for every clone
Keep track of the maximum allocation request.
Keep track of the number of rows to be deleted
Keeping the pids around to make asserts.
Key associated with this element
Key columns for SRT_Queue and SRT_DistQueue
Key for WITHOUT ROWID tables
Key information
KeyInfo for index
Keyinfo for scanned index
Keying information for the group by clause
Keys and elements are compared by user supplied functions.
Keys are compared by user supplied function.
Keys are used to do more restrictive check
Keys are used to do more restrictive check and they are compared by using a user-supplied callback.
Keys are used to do more restrictive check.
Keyword code
Keyword text
Keywords and unquoted identifiers
Kill JMP-over-NOP-s
Kill all the processes in our process group
Kill temporary time and restore original sse
Kill the object
Kill this branch of the original AST, as it was already destroyed.
Kind of gross.
Knott's relatively-prime secondary probe.
Known at compile-time.
Known to ../../../liblink/sym.c:/468 and to ../sys_darwin_386.s:/468  This is truly disgusting and a bit fragile, but taking care of it here protects the rest of the system from damage.
Known to src/cmd/link/internal/ld/sym.go:/0x1d0 and to src/runtime/sys_linux_amd64.s:/0x1d0 or /GOOS_android.
Known to src/cmd/link/internal/ld/sym.go:/0xf8 and to src/runtime/sys_linux_386.s:/0xf8 or /GOOS_android.
L1: JMP L2 to JMP L2 ..
LCS for the current iterator positions
LCS value for this column
LDAP options
LDAP_MSG_ALL
LEFT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK
LEFT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
LFS is only supported on Mac OS X 9 and later.
LHS is entirely deferred.
LHS of LIKE/GLOB operator
LHS of comparison
LIBC_SCCS and not lint
LIBXML_EXPAT_COMPAT
LIBXML_XPATH_ENABLED
LIFO flag makes the iterator traverse the structure as a LastInFirstOut
LIKE opt constraints
LIKE pattern
LIKE range processing address
LIKE range processing counter register
LIMIT expression.
LIMIT value.
LINTED bug in header macro
LIST variable will be deleted later by FREE
LOAD DATA LOCAL INFILE
LOOKUP_DOCSIZE
LSAPI protocol version
Label "C" in templates 3 and 4
Label for the end of the insertion loop
Label for the end of the overall SELECT stmt
Label for the start of the merge algorithm
Label resolution and unwinding adjustments happen in pass two.
Label resolved to end of generated code
Label to jump to if WHEN is false
Labels and jump lists.
Lanczos3 filter, default radius 3
Lanczos8 filter, default radius 8
Lane's fault.
Lane's stdio versions.
Langid of recently inserted document
Language being queried
Language being queried for
Language id
Language id for current row
Language id for tokenizer
Language id of row being written
Language id to merge
Language id to query
Language id to return cksum for
Language id to use
Language id to use in tokenizing
Language id used with tokenizer
Language-id to search
Large - a number of 4096K pages inside a CHUNK.
Large blocks are always aligned on page boundary.
Largest block id written to database
Largest defined DBSTATUS
Largest docid for all iterators
Largest leaf block id written to db
Largest payload of any cell on this page
Largest payload size of all cells
Largest permissible value of i
Largest possible freeblock offset
Largest serialized key seen so far
Largest valid xSavepoint integer
Last alternative.
Last byte of buffer to write
Last chance verification.
Last character before the first wildcard
Last digit is defined by scale.
Last element in link-list.
Last entry on the pEntry list
Last field of the record
Last filter returned data via PSFS_PASS_ON Do something with it
Last frame in list
Last frame in log
Last key written to the current block
Last known position of the requested byte.
Last leaf page number in segment
Last memory cell in new array
Last one doesn't nest
Last page in WAL for this reader
Last position from pp1
Last position from pp2
Last possible cell index
Last possible cell or freeblock offset
Last result returned from the iterator
Last sector might be truncated
Last statement is orphaned TEMP trigger
Last step, update free_size
Last synced page in dirty page list
Last token in coalesced phrase instance
Last token of best snippet
Last walked character
Lastest rowid any iterator points to
Late addition:  construct the table according to file size for noticeable speed improvement on small files.
Later, when we remove the Bcc: out of the header we know it was the last thing.
Latest MIPS architecture.
Latest update build anc tested on Linux 2.2.14  This has been built and tested on Solaris 2.6 and Linux 2.1.122.
Launch a background thread for this operation
Lazy duplication
Leading separators, if any
Leading zeroes
Leaf cursor in SKIPNEXT state
Leaf node containing record iDelete
Leaf on which the required cell resides
Leaf page number to load dlidx for
Leaf pages in a "unit" of work
Leaf to add to tree
Leak detection
Leap years can be from 383 to 385 days and common years can be from 353 to 355 days.
Leap years occur in a fixed pattern of 19 years called the metonic cycle.
Least recently used entry has the smallest value
Leave STATIC_MASTER mutex
Leave WhereLoop.pLTerm intact.
Leave any error code here
Leave any error messages in the pParse structure.
Leave error message here
Leave error messages here
Leave if the match is failed.
Leaving a corrupt image in the database file.
Lee, all rights reserved.
Left alphanum vs right general category
Left alphanum vs right particular category
Left doclist
Left general category, right particular category
Left hand child expression
Left hand serial type
Left hand side of comparison
Left input list
Left operand
Left outer join
Left side of comparison
Left space vs right general category
Left space vs right particular category
Left subnode
Left subtree
Left table being joined
Left word vs right general category
Left word vs right particular category
Left-hand Fts5SegIter
Left-most SELECT statement
Left-most of SELECT of a compound
Legacy and new use.
Legacy save handler may not support update_timestamp API.
Legacy save handler may not support validate_sid API.
Length in bytes of master journal name
Length in bytes of zFrom
Length is non-zero, we can match real repeats.
Length of UTF-8 character
Length of a field
Length of a token prefix
Length of aDoclist in bytes
Length of an instruction word
Length of an instruction word Both for mips-32 and mips-64
Length of an instruction word Both for sparc-32 and sparc-64
Length of an instruction word.
Length of database filename - dbPath
Length of each character in zCharSet
Length of longest segment
Length of needed storage
Length of position list
Length of replacement string
Length of result
Length of string z
Length of string zMaster
Length of the current match
Length of the delta
Length of the destination buffer
Length of the field
Length of the function name in bytes
Length of the keyword
Length of the keyword in characters
Length of the parameter token
Length of the resulting string
Length of the source data
Length of the source file
Length of the string so far
Length of token z
Length of verb name
Length of z in bytes
Length of zAbsoluteName string
Length of zInput in bytes
Length of zSql in bytes.
Length of zTerm in bytes
Length remaining
Length to pad to
Less commonly used but valid nonetheless.
Less than 0 if a frame is not needed.
Less than 0 if not needed.
Less than 19 digits, so we know that it fits in 64 bits
Let I be an integer between 0 and N.
Let be portable instead.
Let caller sort them out.
Let it be known that we are drawing a polygon so that the opacity mask doesn't get cleared after each line.
Let say it fails as no valid op has been given
Let's assume this least common denominator
Let's check for this.
Let's double the table size
Let's go back and see if there are further encoded words or bare content, and hope they might actually have a valid character set.
Let's going ahead and wind anything in the buffer through this filter
Let's have some space, which we can use, if not enough, we will allocate new buffer
Let's not measure the text if we already know both dimensions
Let's play it safe and admit that's the case
Let's try with no cache
Lets let the cookie code clean it all up.
Level at which to change to MATCH_NOMATCH
Level for the new search point
Level of current node or entry
Level of segments
Level of segments to scan
Level offering the most input segments
Level to merge
Level to read input from
Level/index to create new segment at
Levels of indentation
Libcurl commit d021f2e8a00 fix this issue and should be part of 7.28.2
Libcurl is doing connection caching.
Libmach-based disassembler for use in reference tests.
Library used incorrectly
Libxml 2.9.2 prefixes local paths with file:/ instead of file://, thus the php stream wrapper will fail on a valid case.
License is also granted to make and use derivative works provided that such works are identified as "derived from the RSA Data Security, Inc.
License to copy and use this software is granted provided that it is identified as the "RSA Data Security, Inc.
Lift a leg, Yunie.
Like FULL but wait for for readers
Like RESTART but also truncate WAL
Like SRT_Fifo, but unique results only
Like SRT_Queue, but unique results only
Like YYERROR except do call yyerror.
Like all other character and string literals that are compared against the regular expression pattern, we must use STR_ macros instead of literal strings to make sure that UTF-8 support works on EBCDIC platforms.
Like optimization range constraints always occur in pairs
Like perl we only support string increment
Like the other angle in libGD, in which increasing y moves downward, this is a counterclockwise rotation.
Like this:  "database.table".
Limit register for select-A
Limit the error using transfer function set by init_error_limit.
Limits in the regex override only if they are smaller.
Line 1802 of yacc.c
Line 2050 of yacc.c
Line 371 of yacc.c
Line 387 of yacc.c
Line 390 of yacc.c
Line separation as a factor of font height.
Link an element into the hash table
Link list of trigger program steps
Link pNew element into the hash table pH.
Link pParent into the free node list.
Link the foreign key to the table as the last step.
Link the new savepoint into the database handle's list.
Linked List Management
Linked by pParent.
Linked list of VDBEs with the same Vdbe.db
Linked list of all foreign keys in this table
Linked list of all sub-programs used by VM
Linked list of all unfreed memory
Linked list of auxdata allocations
Linked list of coded triggers
Linked list of main db files
Linked list of records
List for thread to write to a PMA
List of Authoritative Name Servers Process when only requesting addtl so that we can skip through the section
List of SQL indexes on this table.
List of Table objects to delete after code gen
List of VTable objects.
List of WHEN terms
List of active savepoints
List of active virtual machines
List of all WhereLoop objects
List of all chunk allocations
List of all unixInodeInfo objects
List of available buffers
List of binary trees of entries
List of columns in pTableName to insert into
List of columns to extract.
List of decomposition.
List of dirty pages in LRU order
List of dirty pages to revert
List of dirty pages to write
List of docids for full-text queries
List of entries using pRight
List of explicit column names, or NULL
List of expressions to scan
List of field names to be indexed
List of frame objects to free on VM reset
List of frames to log
List of free nodes.
List of function arguments
List of in-memory records
List of indexed columns
List of locks held on this shared-btree struct
List of nodes removed during a CondenseTree operation.
List of operands to the LIKE operator
List of other sharable Btrees from the same db
List of properties expected to be found in the Unicode Character Database including some implementation specific properties.
List of statements inside the trigger body
List of table triggers, if required
List of tables
List of tables in FROM clause
List of tables in the join
List of tables to select from
List of triggers on pTab, if required
List of triggers on table pTab
List of triggers stored in pSchema
List of triggers to return
List of unused pcache-local pages
List of user defined columns
List of values being extracted
List terminator
List the colors in the color table.
List to be merged
List to scan and in which to make substitutes
List to which to add the span.
List to which to append.
Lite does not support C API
LiteSpeed PHP module starts here
Literal "new" token
Literal "old" token
Live ranges have to be sorted by "start" field
Load and activate user ini files in path starting from DOCUMENT_ROOT
Load and parse one file.
Load black list
Load composition exclusion data
Load doclist-index for this leaf
Load extension
Load integer.
Load magic initialization constants.
Load new statistics out of the sqlite_stat1 table
Load original PNG, which should contain alpha channel information.
Load the FTS index structure
Load the TypeLib by GUID
Load the built-in tokenizers into the hash table
Load the extension into this database connection
Load the full doclist for the phrase into memory.
Load the integer value into a VFP register.
Load the lowest cost path into pWInfo
Load the next term on the node into zBuffer.
Load the statistics from the sqlite_stat4 table.
Load the whole number.
Local cache of jsl
Local cache of vfs pointer
Local copy of UTF flag for speed
Local copy of initial highlight-mask
Local copy of the flag
Local functions
Local nicknames or unqualified names MUST NOT be used.
Local reference to page 1
Local sidereal time
Local space layout.
Local variables: tab-width: 4 c-basic-offset: 4 End:
Local variables: tab-width: 4 c-basic-offset: 4 indent-tabs-mode: t End:
Locale functions
Locate either the insertion point or range for the code.
Locate symbol for the system pthread_create function.
Locate the PRIMARY KEY index.
Locate the combining class code.
Locate the cursor number of the Current table
Locate the end of the CREATE VIEW statement.
Locate the first character property field.
Locate the index named by the INDEXED BY clause, if any.
Locate the insertion point for the code.
Locate the insertion point.
Locate the next offset that is not 0xffff.
Locate the pragma in the lookup table
Locate the required virtual table module
Locate the second character property field.
Locate the table in question
Locate the table into which we will be inserting new information.
Locate the table which we want to delete.
Locate the table which we want to update.
Location in parent of right-sibling pointer
Location of current replacement in the result
Location of last match
Location of new mapping
Lock a mutex.
Lock all btrees used by the statement
Lock offset to lock for checkpoint
Lock the destination database, if it is not locked already.
Lock the source database handle.
Locking done in library if set
Locking style specific state
Locks are either shared or exclusive.
Locks are within range
Locks obtained by this instance of winFile
Log base 2 of TILEGX_BUNDLE_ALIGNMENT_IN_BYTES.
Log base 2 of TILEGX_BUNDLE_SIZE_IN_BYTES.
Log base 2 of minimum allocation size in bytes
Log if necessary
Log message
Log the error, but continue normal operation using xRead/xWrite
Log2 Size of this block
Log2 of iFullSz/POW2_MIN
Logarithm of table size
Logarithm of the number of rows in the table
Logarithmic, so 0 really means 1
Long options
Long-term TODO list: - Fix the expat library so you can install your own memory manager functions
Longstanding bug.
Look ahead to get the available data amount to read.
Look at lines above and below and start paints
Look at the current letter in the word
Look at the next letter in the word
Look for .mgc
Look for EOL
Look for a magic "hhi" elf section and read it out, if it exists.
Look for a matching node at this level
Look for an existing WhereLoop to replace with pTemplate
Look for ctor, dtor, clone If it's an old-style constructor, store it only if we don't have a constructor already.
Look past the end of the item to see if there is repeat information following.
Look to see if there is an existing winShmNode that can be used.
Look two letters down.
Look up every table named in the FROM clause of the select.
Look up the table being altered.
Lookaside malloc configuration
Lookbehind assertions have an OP_REVERSE item at the start of each branch to move the current point backwards, so the code at this level is identical to the lookahead case.
Lookbehind or named define
Looking at the OS X headers, the conflicting typehints are gated with these definitions, so this was the easiest workaround for me.
Lookup for the lang_tag match
Lookup key for the unixInodeInfo
Lookup the name in the hash
Loop addresses
Loop counter
Loop counter 0..nSnippet-1
Loop counter over the terms of the join
Loop counter:  Field of the foreign key
Loop counter:  Foreign key number for pTab
Loop counter:  Next table in schema
Loop counters
Loop doesn't have freeable variable
Loop for all the alternatives.
Loop for comment characters
Loop for each alternative
Loop for each alternative branch
Loop for each alternative branch.
Loop for each branch
Loop for items in this branch
Loop for multiple comments
Loop for searching the highest bit.
Loop for second and subsequent matches
Loop over all indices
Loop over pattern segments until end of pattern or until segment with meta character found.
Loop over the format string
Loop over the tables in the join, from left to right
Loop termination flag
Loop through all candidate snippets.
Loop through all columns of the table being considered for snippets.
Loop through all the foreign key constraints that refer to this table.
Loop through list and close all statements
Loop through table entries that match term pOrTerm.
Loop through the chunks.
Loop through the returned columns.
Loop through the tables in the main database.
Loop, searching for OP_REVERSE items, and process those that do not have their length set.
Looping over other all cursors
Low accuracy coordinate
Low byte is accessible.
Low byte is not accessible.
Low-level file information
Low-level memory allocation interface
Low-level mutex interface
Low-level page-cache interface
Lower bound on the range.
Lowercase constant name in a separate literal
Lowercased name
Lowercased unqualfied name
Luckily, in 5.0 an error always aborts execution of a statement, wherever it is a multi-statement or a stored procedure, so it should be safe to unconditionally turn off the flag here.
Luckily, the value of CHAR_VT is 0x0b in both ASCII and EBCDIC, so we could just adjust the appropriate bit.
Lucky us, we can free a bit of memory from the pool.
M - Any values pushed by the current alternative.
MAP_ANON is deprecated, but not in macosx
MAP_FIXED leads to discarding of the old mapping, so it can't be used.
MAP_NORESERVE is because we want a lot more virtual memory than what we are actually going to use.
MARK, and PRUNE/SKIP/THEN with an argument must skip over the argument string.
MATCH_ONCE is returned when the end of an atomic group is successfully reached, but subsequent matching fails.
MAXRESOURCERECORDS
MD common stuff
MD5 Message-Digest Algorithm" in all material mentioning or referencing the derived work.
MD5 Message-Digest Algorithm" in all material mentioning or referencing this software or this function.
MD5 password encryption.
MD5C.C - RSA Data Security, Inc., MD5 message-digest algorithm
MD5Update blocks the data and converts bytes into longwords for this routine.
MEM cell holding data for the record to be inserted
MEM cell holding key  for the record
MEM_END or MEM_END_MARK
MIME header decode
MIME header encode
MINSIZE is the minimum size of a dictionary.
MJ checksum value read from journal
MS Access, for instance, doesn't support SQLDescribeParam, so we need to guess
MSDN docs indicate that this might be ignored in current win32 implementations, but at least we are doing the right thing in readiness for the day that it does work
MSIE doesn't delete a cookie when you set it to a null value so in order to force cookies to be deleted, even on MSIE, we pick an expiry date in the past
MSVC doesn't have mode_t
MSVC generates a warning, nevertheless.
MSVC is picky about pulling func ptrs from va lists.
MT RAND FUNCTIONS
MULTI_QUERY support - eat up all unfetched result sets
MUST BE DESTROYED MANUALLY
MUST BE FIRST
MUTEX_STATIC_LRU or NULL
MYSQLI_USE_MYSQLND
MYSQLND specific code
MYSQLND_COMPRESSION_ENABLED
MYSQLND_DEBUG_MEMORY
MYSQLND_STRING_TO_INT_CONVERSION
Machine code is generated for the checker itself and for the actions depending on the result of the checker.
Macro for disabling flag of translation of non-basic entities where this isn't supported.
Macro for setting individual bits in class bitmaps.
Macro that decides whether a character should be output as a literal or in hexadecimal.
Macro that does padding.
Macros are used to achieve this so that the actual code doesn't look very different to what it always used to.
Macros make the argument variables come from the current frame
Magic IV for 64 Blowfish encryptions that we do at the end.
Magic characters count 0
Magic entries with no description get a bonus because they depend on subsequent magic entries to print something.
Magic number 1 is the WAL_CKPT_LOCK lock.
Magic number for detect library misuse
Magic number for sanity checking
Magic number to detect structure corruption.
Magic value read from WAL header
Main IO loop.
Main User Functions
Main database page size
Main database structure
Main function for the watching thread
Main loop to read CSV fields
Main part of the matching
Main pcre_jit_exec entry.
Main structure
Maintenance is more error-prone, but frequent changes to this data are unlikely.
Make a copy of an sqlite3_value object
Make a copy of the actual pattern.
Make a copy of the entire SELECT statement that defines the view.
Make a few "tile_" variables to simplify common code between architectures.
Make a local copy and adjust rve to be in terms of s
Make a new directory within a phar archive
Make a range of all surrogates and assume some default properties.
Make an entry in the sqlite_master table
Make attention so that the root of each subtree of the Generators tree is referenced once per leaf
Make compiler happy.
Make compilers happy.
Make it 0..360 degrees
Make it all zero
Make it so the fetch occurs on the first Implicit Result Set
Make lowercase for easy comparison against 'standard' headers
Make object size a multiple of 16
Make opaque types, etc.
Make our own copy that can persist after we return.
Make pRoot, the root page of the b-tree, writable.
Make space in the table and break the loop for an earlier name.
Make stdin, stdout and stderr accessible from PHP scripts
Make sure "isView" and other macros defined above are undefined.
Make sure YYID is used.
Make sure a corrupt database has not given us an oversize header.
Make sure a mutex is held on the table to be accessed
Make sure all objects are contained in this database
Make sure all the indices are constructed correctly.
Make sure an empty php_ini_scanned_path ends up as NULL
Make sure chunk size is valid.
Make sure color count is acceptable
Make sure colormap indexes can be represented by JSAMPLEs
Make sure every column of the PRIMARY KEY is NOT NULL.
Make sure every page in the file is referenced
Make sure integer cell keys are in order.
Make sure it looks like a float
Make sure jdmaster didn't give me a case I can't handle
Make sure pToRelease is still writeable.
Make sure page is marked dirty
Make sure some idiot didn't include a vector as a child of itself and thus it would have already free'd these.
Make sure sufficient number of registers have been allocated
Make sure that a SIGSEGV in Go causes a run-time panic.
Make sure that destructors are protected from previously thrown exceptions.
Make sure that the preinit sequence has run.
Make sure that there is at least one character in string
Make sure the INTERFACE macro is defined.
Make sure the abstract declaration is compatible with previous declaration
Make sure the arrays are of the same size.
Make sure the column name is unique.
Make sure the database schema is loaded if the pragma requires that
Make sure the exponent has at least 2 digits
Make sure the given internal_date string matches the RFC specifiedformat
Make sure the last argument, if passed, is an array
Make sure the lock has been released before closing.
Make sure the locking sequence is correct
Make sure the locking sequence is correct.
Make sure the mutex subsystem is initialized.
Make sure the new file size is written into the inode right away.
Make sure the ordering..
Make sure the signature can't match by dumb luck -- TBB
Make sure the sort order is compatible in an ORDER BY clause.
Make sure the trait method is compatible with previosly declared abstract method
Make sure there is enough workspace for copying forward references before doing the copy.
Make sure there is no ORDER BY or LIMIT clause on prior SELECTs.
Make sure this array is sized to be on a 4-byte boundary at compile time.
Make sure this is not an attempt to ALTER a view.
Make sure we detect we are a cgi - a bit redundancy here, but the default case is that we have to check only the first one.
Make sure we don't go round the fork loop any more
Make sure we have latest lookahead translation.
Make sure we hold a reference count during the destructor call otherwise, when the destructor ends the storage might be freed when the refcount reaches 0 a second time
Make sure we hold them.
Make sure we're dealing with strings and do the replacement.
Make sure we're dealing with strings.
Make sure zData points to enough of the record to cover the header.
Make the INT_PART and FRAC_PART positive.
Make the IdChar function accessible from ctime.c
Make the JSON in p the result of the SQL function.
Make the context ready to start over
Make the error-limit table if we didn't already.
Make the new connection a child of the unixShmNode
Make the new connection a child of the winShmNode
Make the number.
Make the page containing the entry to be deleted writable.
Make the return value an array only if we need to pass back more than one result.
Make them sufficiently negative to avoid the external error codes.
Make this EXPR node point to the selected column
Make this function work for a regex with integers either byte order.
Make this point to any syntax error
Make this process to use file-cache only
Make year always a positive number.
Makes OP_Jump below testable
Makes the check less complicated below.
Malformated request
Malformed header - probably all zeros
Malformed number or name
Malformed or multiple newlines.
Malloc a buffer to read frames into.
Malloc failed while inserting the new entry.
Malloc must have failed
Malloc utility
Malloc'd buffer to load entire frame
Malloc'd child-journal file descriptor
Malloc'd master-journal file descriptor
Malloc'd output buffers
Malloced memory used by some conversion
Malloced string that needs to be freed
Mangled key
Mangled key - ignore and wait for runtime
Manual call of compile_assert_matchingpath.
Manual call of compile_bracket_matchingpath and compile_bracket_backtrackingpath.
Many of the following variables are used only in small blocks of the code.
Map cursor numbers to bitmasks
Map encode/decode
Map from pIdx cols to child table cols
Map from parent key columns to child table columns
Map only part of SHM to have access opcache shared globals
Map some rows of pixels to the output colormapped representation.
Map the requested memory region into this processes address space.
Map's the T to its new index
Mapped memory region
Mapping failed, wait for mapping object to get freed and retry
Mapping from ORDER BY terms to result set columns
Mapping from columns of pTab to entries in pChanges
Mapping of bundle issue slot to assigned pipe.
Mapping of columns in pFrom to columns in zTo
Mapping retries: When Apache2 restarts, the parent process startup routine can be called before the child process is killed.
Maps private data offset to each opcode.
Mark a single page as clean
Mark all dirty list pages as clean
Mark all of these as Other Neutral to preserve compatibility with older versions.
Mark it as open
Mark it open.
Mark literals of specific types
Mark message copied if any
Mark node i of pParse as being a child of iParent.
Mark non-alphanumeric ASCII characters as delimiters
Mark off any other ORDER BY terms that reference pLoop
Mark password as unchanged by PHP during the duration of the database session
Mark some of them with "register" because they are used a lot in loops.
Mark that we reference the connection, thus it won't be be destructed till there is open statements.
Mark the connection as usable again
Mark the database file just opened as an RBU target database.
Mark the page as clean.
Mark the page that is about to be modified as dirty.
Marker for "currently visiting"
Markers x30 - x3F do not have a segment
Markers xF0 - xF7 ISO/IEC 10918-3
Markers xF7 - xF8 ISO/IEC 14495-1
Marks the end of extra data
Marks the top level
Mask against sqlite3_index_constraint.op
Mask all signals
Mask for page offset
Mask for three values above
Mask of FTS5INDEX_QUERY_X flags
Mask of FTS5INDEX_XXX flags
Mask of ORDER BY terms satisfied so far
Mask of ORDER BY terms that need reversing
Mask of WO_xx values describing operator
Mask of affinity bits
Mask of all ORDER BY terms
Mask of all well-ordered loops
Mask of bits to set or clear.
Mask of columns used by this cursor
Mask of configuration flags
Mask of cursors that are not available
Mask of exclusive locks held
Mask of function arguments that are constant
Mask of inner loops
Mask of locks held by siblings
Mask of locks to take or release
Mask of phrases already covered
Mask of phrases covered by this snippet
Mask of pipes used by this bundle.
Mask of query phrases covered
Mask of shared locks held
Mask of snippet terms to highlight
Mask of the bit in sqlite3.flags to set/clear
Mask of tokens to highlight in snippet
Mask of trigger times
Mask of type bits
Mask to isolate flags related to iterators
Master routine for color selection
Match a back reference, possibly repeatedly.
Match a bit-mapped character class, possibly repeatedly.
Match a negated single one-byte character repeatedly.
Match a negated single one-byte character.
Match a single byte, even in UTF-8 mode.
Match a single character repeatedly.
Match a single character, casefully
Match a single character, caselessly.
Match an extended Unicode sequence.
Match an extended character class.
Match any single character whatsoever.
Match characters up to the end of the reference.
Match control flags
Match extended Unicode grapheme clusters.
Match extended Unicode sequences.
Match found
Match not found
Match succeded
Match these columns only
Matched an empty string
Matchinfo context
Matchinfo context object
Matchinfo format string
Matching column in the left table
Matching failed: handle error cases
Matching left table
Matsumoto and T.
Max args passed to user function by sub-program
Max database page to write
Max dlidx tree height of 32
Max frame that can be backfilled
Max iSize is 4,294,967,296.
Max is BITVEC_NINT.
Max length of an SQL string
Max level number for this index/langid
Max limit of recursions.
Max page number of 2147483648
Max pending data before flush to disk
Max rowid register
Max seg id number 65535
Maximize case
Maximize case.
Maximum PMA size, in bytes.
Maximum Sorter PMA size
Maximum allowed allocation.
Maximum allowed page size
Maximum allowed segments per level
Maximum allowed size of the database
Maximum allowed string or blob size
Maximum amount of payload held locally
Maximum back reference and backref bitmap.
Maximum bit index.
Maximum bytes of data to store
Maximum cost of a set of paths
Maximum difference in token positions
Maximum docid to return
Maximum exponent is LONG_MAX.
Maximum file pathname length
Maximum first byte of cell for a 1-byte payload
Maximum instantaneous currentCount
Maximum instantaneous currentOut
Maximum length of output string in bytes
Maximum length of zSql in bytes.
Maximum length value to check against when making sure that the integer that holds the compiled pattern length does not overflow.
Maximum local payload in a LEAFDATA table
Maximum local payload in non-LEAFDATA tables
Maximum number of PMAs that a single MergeEngine can merge
Maximum number of cells for pNode
Maximum number of ints of offset to save on the stack for recursive calls.
Maximum number of prepared UPDATE statements held by this module
Maximum number of rounds.
Maximum number of samples to accumulate
Maximum number of simultaneous paths tracked
Maximum number of stack segments so far.
Maximum of 4 fragments per snippet
Maximum page size is 64KiB
Maximum page size.
Maximum relative level value in db
Maximum salt string length.
Maximum size of regions mapped by sorter
Maximum size of zOut
Maximum string length
Maximum unsorted cost of a set of path
Maximum value
Maximum value for szMmap
Maximum value of fts5yyidx
Maximum value of yyidx
May be NUL.
May be NULL
May be NULL.
May be changed in the future.
May be null
May change dynamically
May destroy TMP1.
May destroy all locals and registers except TMP2.
May look weird to null it here, but it is to catch the right case in the first_try later on
May or may not be root.
Maybe another cursor on the same btree
Maybe it's better to compile the file instead of just searching,
Maybe we can make it automatic by checking what's the value of max_allowed_packet_size on the server and resending the data.
Maybe we waste some space because of short jumps.
Mean anomaly of the Sun
Mean longitude of perihelion
Melo: hmms..
Mem address which causes query abort if positive
Mem.i contains count of 0s appended to blob
Mem.z points to a static string
Mem.z points to an agg function context
Mem.z points to an ephemeral string
Memory Mapping interface for streams
Memory allocation function
Memory available for allocation
Memory available to be allocated
Memory avaliable for allocation
Memory cell containing record
Memory cell hold array of subprogs
Memory cell holding key of row to be deleted
Memory cell to set to string value
Memory cell to write value into
Memory cell used for change counting
Memory cell used for the row counter
Memory cell used to implement LEFT OUTER JOIN
Memory cell used to store aggregate context
Memory is not available in the SQLITE_CONFIG_PAGECACHE pool.
Memory is retrived from OS by chunks of fixed size 2MB.
Memory location that acts as accumulator
Memory management strategy for zName
Memory mapped page to return
Memory mapped region
Memory register holding the rowid counter
Memory register used by AUTOINC
Memory streams use a dynamic memory buffer to emulate a stream.
Memory to memory move.
Memory usable by this allocator
Memory usage statistics
Merge Blocks
Merge PMAs together
Merge current hashtable with object's default properties
Merge engine containing PmaReaders to compare
Merge engine thread reads data from
Merge engine to return
Merge equal constants
Merge of a non-existing value
Merge the forest into a single sorted list on first call
Merge the two position lists.
Merge-writer object
MergeEngine to initialize
MessageFormatter functions
Messages marked DEAD below are no longer used.
Metachar.h ...
Method macros
Methods above are valid for version 1
Methods above are valid for version 2
Methods above are valid for version 3
Methods for an open file
Methods for the module
Might add new entries.
Might as well create the error-limiting table too.
Might be NULL
Might be a hidden SCOND.
Might be an empty repeat.
Might be defined in sys/types.h.
Might be reallocated
Might contain WHERE_GROUPBY or WHERE_DISTINCTBY
Might happen if EMPTY_RESULT_CALLBACKS are on
Min and max heap requests sizes
Min-heap used for analyzing cell coverage
Min-heap used for checking cell coverage
Minimum PMA size, in bytes
Minimum amount of incr-merge work to do
Minimum amount of payload held locally
Minimum and maximum number of arguments allowed
Minimum cell size is 4
Minimum docid to return
Minimum file format for writable database files
Minimum legal index key size
Minimum local payload in a LEAFDATA table
Minimum local payload in non-LEAFDATA tables
Minimum number of pages reserved
Minimum number of regions required to be mapped.
Minimum number of rounds.
Minimum required file size
Miscellaneous flags.
Miscellaneous initialization
Miscoded characters are removed.
Missing /tmp or similar directory
Missing bytes
Mitchell filter, default radius 2.0
Mixed allows both index and key/val combinations.
Mixed key types: A string key is considered as larger
Mixing the instructions for the two checks.
Mode can be PCRE_STUDY_JIT_COMPILE and others.
Mode to be passed to OCISessionPoolCreate
Modifications to this software may be copyrighted by their authors and need not follow the licensing terms described here, provided that the new terms are clearly indicated on the first page of each file where they apply.
Modifications:  1.
Modifications: 1.
Modified 9 Jan 2002 by Makoto Matsumoto.
Modified Base64
Modified according to LibC definition
Modifier check
Modify the .nOut and maybe .rRun fields
Modify the CREATE TABLE statement.
Modify the page-size after the cache has been created.
Modify the sqlite_master table to use the new table name.
Module Housekeeping
Module destructor function
Module initialization routine for 2-pass color quantization.
Modulo for numbers.
More ARRAY/OBJECT entries at u.iAppend
More complicated way of expressing exposure time, so only use this value if we don't already have it from somewhere else.
More relevant info always comes earlier, so only use this field if we don't have appropriate aperture information yet.
More terms for ARRAY and OBJECT
More-or-less horizontal.
More-or-less vertical.
Most European countries used the Julian calendar prior to the Gregorian.
Most functions are just 'wrappers' for standard file functions.
Most ideas are taken from jemalloc and tcmalloc implementations.
Most of it is going to remain virtual.
Most of the ideas used here can be traced back to Heckbert's seminal paper Heckbert, Paul.
Most of this code adapted from hphp/util/embedded-data.cpp.
Most operations expect sign extended arguments.
Most options must be set at compile time for the JIT code to be usable.
Most recent error message
Most recent seek operation on this cursor
Mostly this is a container for one or more WhereTerms.
Mostly used by vprintf_alloc for non-C99 compliant snprintfs, this is like vsprintf_alloc except it takes a "suggested" size
Move a page here to make room for the root-page
Move level -1 to level iAbsLevel
Move on to the next alternative
Move on to the options
Move pPage to the front of the list
Move page iDbPage from its current location to page number iFreePage
Move remaining bytes into internal buffer.
Move the STR_PTR to the private_data_ptr.
Move the arguments to S registers.
Move the cursor to the first entry in the table.
Move the cursor to the last entry in the table.
Move the decimal point on n1 by n2's scale.
Move the denominator of the fraction.
Move the entry to the top of the linked list
Move the newly created element to the head of the hashtable
Move the page currently at pgnoRoot to pgnoMove.
Move the page to the head of the dirty list.
Move the subject pointer back.
Move the write position of the WAL back to iFrame.
Move to end of path and count trailing X's.
Move to next element closer to the head of the queue.
Move to the next entry that matches the configured constraints.
MoveFileEx has to be used
MoveFileEx returns 0 on failure, other way 'round for this function
Moves the data associated to key1 to key2.
Multi-byte op code - Auxiliary table
Multi-segment-reader handle
Multi-threaded programs that use this may experience problems.
Multiline mode: assert before any newline, or before end of subject unless noteol is set.
Multiline mode: start of subject unless notbol, or after any newline.
Multiple character line break or forced cut
Multiple instructions are required.
Multiple variant values as variant0, variant1 ,variant2
Multiply a fixed by a fixed
Multiply and subtract.
Multiply utility routines
Multithreading does not affect these static variables, since they store built-in CPU features.
Must allocate a new entry in the literal pool.
Must be ZEND_FAST_CALL
Must be a load instruction with immediate offset.
Must be a multiple of 8.
Must be a power of 2
Must be after the matchingpath label.
Must be called after the hack server is done initializing.
Must be called before any other call to 'collator_object_...' functions.
Must be called before any other call to 'spoofchecker_object_...' functions.
Must be called by every worker before any operation is performed
Must be called inside a transaction.
Must be compatible with this index
Must be compatible with this index, if not NULL
Must be divisible by 2.
Must be first
Must be first.
Must be free'd by caller.
Must be less than 65536
Must be of the form  INSERT INTO ...
Must be power of 2
Must be right after "base"
Must be the first member of its descendants.
Must have at least one page for the WAL commit flag.
Must not find value when custom filter returns false
Must prevent duplicates ...
Must set XMLREADER_LOADDTD or XMLREADER_VALIDATE parser option prior to the first call to read or this method will always return FALSE
Mutex controlling the lock
Mutex for accessing the following:
Mutex to access this object
Mutex to protect pMain
Mutex to serialize access
Mutex used to control access to shared lock
Mutual recursion
My attempt to incorporate alpha channel into the result worked poorly and degraded the quality of palette conversion even when the source contained no alpha channel data.
My gut feeling is that it will modify the size field to reflect that so lets be safe and set it to the BIND_OPTS2 size again
My normal style of coding would have declared them within each of those blocks.
MySQL 4.1.0
MySQL 4.1.1
MySQL 5.0.13
MySQL 5.0.23
MySQL Native Password
N CRC error
N Compression method not supported
N Containing zip archive was closed
N Entry has been changed
N Entry has been deleted
N File already exists
N Internal error
N Invalid argument
N Malloc failure
N Multi-disk zip archives not supported
N No such file
N Not a zip archive
N Premature EOF
N Zip archive inconsistent
N indicates which compression process
N1 is added to N2 and the result placed into RESULT.
N2 is subtracted from N1 and the result placed in RESULT.
NB EXACT doesn't have repeat_type
NB this routine will return a single null entry for a blank line
NB: Most other code will NOT use the PHP_STREAM_CAST_INTERNAL flag when casting.
NB: always correctly aligned for uint32_t.
NB: always correctly aligned for uint64_t.
NB: codes C4 and CC are NOT SOF markers
NB: doesn't handle binary strings...
NB: don't want to include the data_source in the error message as it might contain a password
NB: for PHP4 compat only, it should be using 'Z' instead
NB: php_msgbuf is 1 char bigger than a long, so there is no need to allocate the extra byte.
NC_IsCheck or NC_PartIdx or NC_IdxExpr
NEAR distance.
NEAR is treated as AND.
NEAR parameter
NEW_DLL_ENVIRONMENT_VAR
NL, Start of data
NN, End of codestream
NN, Start of codestream
NO NEED, for valgrind
NO NEEDS TO CHECK
NO, End of packet header
NO, Packet length tile part header
NO, Packet packet headers tile part header
NO, Start of packeter default
NOMATCH and PRUNE advance by one character.
NOP in OCI8 2.0.
NOT REACHED
NOT flag for header lines fetch
NOTE that the real ob_gzhandler is an alias to "zlib output compression".
NOTE we don't use _UNICODE
NOTE: Evaluation of the c argument should not have any side-effects
NOTE: Return type is signed so we can return -1 on error.
NOTE: Signed due to -1 on error.
NOTE: The naming of these userland functions was quite unlucky
NOTE: can't guarantee that output or input/output parameters are set until this fella returns SQL_NO_DATA, according to MSDN ODBC docs
NOTE: data must be zero terminated
NOTE: forward declare this rather than including crt_externs.h as not all SDKs provide it
NOTE: modifying 'collator_XX_args' do not forget to modify approptiate 'collator_XX_args' for the procedural API.
NOTE: pad_char may be set to '0' because of the 0 flag.
NOTE: the number of data units matched may differ, because in UTF-8 there are some characters whose upper and lower case versions code have different numbers of bytes.
NOTE: the purposes are added as integer keys - the keys match up to the X509_PURPOSE_SSL_XXX defines in x509v3.h
NOTE: tidy does not support iterative/cumulative parsing, so chunk-sized output handler is not possible
NOTES Be careful to rewind any vector passed in to you if you expect to iterate through the entire list.
NOTES This code incorporates ideas from expat-ensor from http://xml.ensor.org.
NOTES This code was written primarily for xmlrpc, but has found some other uses.
NOTES This is a utility function.
NOTES Welcome to XMLRPC.
NOTES all values are of type xmlrpc_type_empty until set.
NOTES xmlrpc_none is returned if value is not a vector Deprecated for public use.
NOTICE: This needs changing later so it is more general than simply pairs.
NOTPLUS, NOTMINPLUS
NOTPLUSI, NOTMINPLUSI
NOTQUERY, NOTMINQUERY
NOTQUERYI, NOTMINQUERYI
NOTSTAR, NOTMINSTAR
NOTSTARI, NOTMINSTARI
NOTUPTO, NOTMINUPTO
NOTUPTOI, NOTMINUPTOI
NO_LONG_LONG
NO_RECURSE not defined
NO_STRTOD_BIGCOMP
NR, Start of tile
NUL terminate
NUL terminate it and
NUL terminate, as every buffer is handled here.
NUL-terminate dst
NULL CHECK ID
NULL creates a new SrcList
NULL fields are 0 length, 0 is not more than 0 String of zero size, definitely can't be the next max_length.
NULL for outermost
NULL for tables.
NULL if error.
NULL if queue IsEmpty.
NULL if there is no limit
NULL if there is none
NULL indicates an out-of-memory condition.
NULL is automatically added
NULL is returned.
NULL is used for the default character tables.
NULL means no offset
NULL means not used
NULL means not used.
NULL or constants 0 or 1
NULL out the unbound function
NULL pBitvec tests
NULL set by OP_Null, not from data
NULL terminate the buffer once, when finished, for use with the rest of PHP
NULL value means deleted
NULL, name length, filename length, last accepting char position length
NULL-terminate modifications
NULL-terminate the list
NULL-terminate values
NULL-terminated version of pName
NUM is written in base O_BASE using OUT_CHAR as the routine to do the actual output of the characters.
NUMERO SIGN
Naive reallocation
Name assigned to this module
Name context for container
Name context for parent SELECT statement
Name context for processing aggregate information
Name context for resolving pE
Name context for sub-vdbe
Name context of this SELECT
Name context to resolve expressions in
Name means:  "Distinct Fifo".
Name of FTS index
Name of ICU function that failed
Name of OS function that failed
Name of PK index
Name of SQL function
Name of VFS module to use
Name of WAL file
Name of a table or index
Name of attached database
Name of automatically created rbu vfs
Name of child table
Name of collating sequence
Name of column in child table
Name of column in parent table
Name of column in the right table
Name of column in zTo.
Name of content table
Name of database containing pTab
Name of database containing r-tree table
Name of database file
Name of database file for pPager
Name of database file to open
Name of database holding pTab
Name of database holding this table
Name of database iDb
Name of database within pDestDb
Name of database within pSrcDb
Name of file to be deleted
Name of file to check
Name of file to delete
Name of file to delete when closing
Name of fts3 table
Name of fts5 table
Name of function
Name of index or table
Name of indexed column
Name of left-most parent key column
Name of master journal file if any
Name of new SQL function
Name of new function
Name of new table or NULL
Name of new table, or database name
Name of pragma
Name of r-tree table
Name of rank and rowid columns
Name of rank function
Name of savepoint
Name of system call to override
Name of table containing column, or NULL
Name of table into which we are inserting
Name of table or index
Name of table or index being scanned
Name of target db table
Name of that semaphore
Name of the VFS to use
Name of the WAL file
Name of the collating sequence
Name of the collating sequence, UTF-8 encoded
Name of the column
Name of the column of the table
Name of the column we are looking for
Name of the column.
Name of the common-table
Name of the conch file
Name of the constraint currently being parsed
Name of the container - used for error messages
Name of the database
Name of the database containing pTable
Name of the database containing table, or NULL
Name of the database file
Name of the database file to open
Name of the database holding this table
Name of the database to use internally
Name of the database.
Name of the file
Name of the file being opened
Name of the file containing the BTree database
Name of the file to be locked or unlocked
Name of the file used for SHM
Name of the function.
Name of the identifier
Name of the index
Name of the journal file
Name of the mmapped file
Name of the module
Name of the module for the virtual table
Name of the new SQL function
Name of the open file
Name of the operator
Name of the other table
Name of the proxy lock file
Name of the result column
Name of the shared library containing extension
Name of the system call
Name of the table
Name of the table into which we are inserting
Name of the table into which we insert
Name of the table or index to be reindexed
Name of the table or view
Name of the table to add to the FROM clause
Name of the table to be locked
Name of the table to be updated
Name of the table we are looking for
Name of the term in the USING clause
Name of the trigger
Name of the view, trigger, or index
Name of the virtual table
Name of this CTE
Name of this column
Name of this database
Name of this index
Name of this virtual file system
Name of tokenizer
Name of trigger
Name of variables
Name to be added
Name we are searching for
Name:  Ack Input: Output: Description: Get the response from the server.
Name:  MailConnect Input:   None Output:  None Description: Connect to the mail host and receive the welcome message.
Name:  Post Input: Output: Description: Author/Date:  jcar 20/9/96 History:
Named POSIX semaphore
Named capturing brackets.
Names of columns
Names of result columns
Namespace logic is separate and only when uri passed in to insure no BC breakage
Namespace to resolve expressions in.
Naming context
Narrowing integer initialization to doubles
Natural merge
Nav the tree evey time as this is LIVE
Nearly all instructions are unmovable in the following sequence.
Need a clean separation whether it's a remote or local prompt.
Need braces because of following else
Need expansion, recurse.
Need some type of error here
Need this for cpdf.
Need to add element number to name
Need to add origin to get a pie-rule, but will need to set chord-rule before recursion...
Need to drop
Need to free the WhereTerm.u.pAndInfo obj
Need to free the WhereTerm.u.pOrInfo object
Need to keep track of things to free
Need to let pgm process this and the following args
Need to locate the insertion point.
Need to read this page properly.
Need to work with reporter to figure out what goes wrong
Needed because some systems do not allow to write to the original file contents with O_APPEND being set.
Needed for restoring the STR_PTR before the next alternative.
Needed for schema access
Needed for the definition of va_list
Needed for various definitions...
Needed in Windows
Needed to make MS Access happy
Needed to save important temporary registers.
Needle doesn't occur, shortcircuit the actual replacement.
Needs investigation, though.
Needs to be a multiple of 3
Needs to know the start position anytime.
Negated cases
Negative Steps
Negative assert is stronger than positive assert.
Negative assertion: all branches must fail to match for the assertion to succeed.
Negative length given, nothing to write
Negative lookahead
Negative lookbehind
Negative offset counts from the end of the string.
Negative phoneme length is meaningless
Negative steps
Negative values for the firstchar and reqchar flags
Neither are quick, thus the clients of this function are obligated to do what they are asked for.
Neither argument is immediate.
Neither capturing brackets nor recursions are found in the block.
Neither operand is NULL.
Neither side of the comparison is a column.
Neither the RHS or LHS are deferred.
Neither the name of Intel Corporation nor the names of its contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
Neither the name of the Lite Speed Technologies Inc nor the names of its contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
Neither the name of the University nor the names of its contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
Neither the name of the University of Cambridge nor the names of its contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
Neither the name of the author nor the names of other contributors may be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
Nelson Computer Science Department, 9062 Western Washington University Bellingham, WA 98226-9062
Nesting level
Nesting only happens one level deep.
Nesting should only be of limited depth
Net change in number of documents
Net deferred constraints this transaction.
Net deferred immediate constraints
NetBSD: gettemp.c,v 1.13 2003/12/05 00:57:36 uebayasi Exp
Never back out opcodes iFixedOp-1 or earlier
Never called on page 1
Never called with prior errors
Never gets this far otherwise
Never has other case.
Never reached
Never set both isSaveLeft and isExact for the same invocation.
Never spill cache.
Never use any input
Never uses any args
Nevertheless, it is formally deprecated in Bison 2.4.2's NEWS entry, where a plan to phase it out is discussed.
Nevertheless, some regular expressions can cause it to recurse to a great depth.
Nevertheless, there is a built-in protection when sending a command packet, that checks if the line is clear - useful for debug purposes and to be switched off in release builds.
New Pager.aSavepoint array
New Rule: never repair potential malicious user input
New SOAP SSL Method Constants
New binary node to insert into expression tree
New cell becomes the i-th cell of the page
New chunk is required to extend the file.
New colset object to return
New column to add to colset object
New context.
New cursor object
New element added to the pH
New estimate of the number of rows
New hashtable for the stack
New journal mode
New level-0 PMA merger
New list element
New memory is allocated from the first available free block.
New name of FTS5 table
New name of table
New object to return
New option added for Z to remain in-line with the Perl implementation
New path replaces the prior worst to keep count below mxChoice
New root page image
New row data is stored here
New save handlers MUST use PS_MOD_UPDATE_TIMESTAMP macro
New segment within pStruct
New session ID, create data file
New session data
New temp space
New term to write
New thread handlers
New tokenizer object
New value for iStartBlock
New vdbe frame to execute in
New version of subfile tag
New versions of OpenLDAP do it this way
New virtual expression
New virtual table object
Newline control.
Newly allocated SegReader object
Newly allocated VFS
Newly allocated page
Newly allocated winShmNode
Newly cloned object deliberately does not inherit error state from original object
Next FKey with the same in pFrom.
Next MAIN_DB file
Next SHM lock might block
Next WhereLoop object in the WhereClause
Next and previous elements in the table
Next and previous entry on the min-heap
Next available cursor
Next available select ID for EXPLAIN output
Next available unixShm.id value
Next available winShm.id value
Next backup associated with source pager
Next buffer in the list of free buffers
Next byte to write in WAL file
Next character in the format string
Next child of zTo.
Next chunk in the journal
Next chunk on list of them all
Next cursor in Fts5Cursor.pCsr list
Next database page to write
Next element in list
Next element in list of dirty pages
Next element of the cell pointer array
Next entry in Parse.pTriggerPrg list
Next entry in sorted order
Next entry is not on the current page
Next execution will also need to resend the type.
Next fetch the relevant cert chain from the store
Next field of pPKey2 to compare
Next frame address
Next free argvIndex value
Next free slot
Next function with same name
Next hash entry with same hash-key
Next in BtShared.pLock list
Next in LRU list of unpinned pages
Next in a list of them all
Next in hash table chain
Next in list of all blocked connections
Next in list of all winShmNode objects
Next in list of deferred tokens
Next in the link-list
Next info block in a list of them all
Next integer will be a column number.
Next integer will be a docid.
Next is all token values, in a form suitable for use by makeheaders.
Next iteration.
Next node in this hash collision chain
Next object in linked list
Next offset in pgidx
Next offset to read from log file
Next offset to write to
Next on a list of sharable BtShared structs
Next on the Parse.pZombieTab list
Next one may be an array or a list of sort flags.
Next outer name context.
Next parent of pFrom
Next pattern and input string chars
Next phrase instance index
Next position
Next registered VFS
Next registered auxiliary function
Next registered tokenizer module
Next sample to test
Next select to the left in a compound
Next sub-program already visited
Next the case-flipping table
Next time we will return from the same ptr.
Next token type
Next trigger associated with the table
Next unixShm with the same unixShmNode
Next unparsed byte of the header
Next unread data byte
Next unread header byte
Next unused file descriptor on same file
Next unused scratch buffer
Next value in position list
Next value in trailing position list
Next we have the really interesting routines: selection of a colormap given the completed histogram.
Next winShm with the same winShmNode
Next with a different name but the same hash
Next with the same zTo.
Next, the color-selection step begins with a box representing the whole color space, and repeatedly splits the "largest" remaining box until we have as many boxes as desired colors.
Next, we begin to convert actual values.
Nice for thumbnails but there's no support for fussy adjustment of the assumed properties of inks and paper.
Nice interface, but slow.
Nishimura, "Mersenne Twister: A 623-Dimensionally Equidistributed Uniform Pseudo-Random Number Generator", ACM Transactions on Modeling and Computer Simulation, Vol.
No DISTINCT keyword and no aggregate functions
No E box is used, as it's replaced by some ANDs, shifts, and ORs.
No Handlefrees for session pool connections
No IO is required.
No LIMIT means no OFFSET
No LOG_NEWS on HP-UX
No LOG_UUCP on HP-UX
No UTF-8 support, or not in UTF-8 mode: count is byte count
No aggregate functions and no GROUP BY clause
No allocation required.
No arguments
No attempt was made to determine the language in which files of this type were written.
No backtracking
No behaving filter should cause this.
No caching here.
No changes are made to disk by this routine.
No character is accepted.
No collation sequence of this type for this encoding is registered.
No comp_func means we're doing pointer comparisons
No concurrent write/read and write/write.
No copyright info was found in the original bdf.
No copyright is claimed, and the software is hereby placed in the public domain.
No destination, doesn't need to setup flags.
No digits have been scanned.
No directory only file name
No duplicates
No dynamic allocation is required.
No encoding change
No error if the table already exists
No expansion, do next segment.
No file uploaded
No foreign keys against expression indexes
No form with immediate operand.
No function of the specified name was found.
No further bytes to check for 0x80.
No further checks necessary
No further checks necessary, most common case
No harm comes from returning 0.
No hope to find a big-enough block
No idea what to do if an error occures.
No index is created for INTEGER PRIMARY KEYs.
No key specified.
No lock in lib
No locking occurs in temporary files
No longer required OpenEphemeral instr.
No longer used
No malloc required
No match found
No match was found.
No memory allocation is ever used on mem1.
No memory left.
No more remaining characters.
No more results
No more retries.
No more rows obviously
No more rows, or no fetched row
No more tokens here
No need for _r variant, return of __toString should always be a string
No need for a binary search.
No need for a separate index
No need to FREE_ALLOCA as we can reuse the 'lengths' and 'fields' arrays.
No need to Rewind or Next such cursors.
No need to access the main table.
No need to check further.
No need to check notempty conditions.
No need to check the return value, if we failed then whatever.
No need to log a failure to lock
No need to mess with the file on disk.
No need to rollback on disconnect
No need to shift the value.
No need to skip more bytes - we know it's a 1-byte character
No need to waste time with special character handling
No other args are permitted here as there is no interactive mode
No overflow is required.
No overflow pages.
No parameters given, default to "return all"
No prefix as loc_range
No real data will follows after it.
No recursion at top level
No renegotiation rate-limiting
No repeat follows
No room for more colors
No rows or no more rows
No shared-memory support
No slash found, therefore return '.'
No sort order specified
No table available.
No table references
No term was written to this page.
No timezone in struct, fallback to reference if possible
No tokens to defer in this case.
No transformation
No uniqueness if 0
No usable constraint
No user-visible "rowid" column
No value found
No way this can happen
No work is performed in this case.
No work to do.
No written agreement, license, or royalty fee is required for any of the authorized uses.
No zero digits have been scanned.
No, so try to allocate it
No, we aren't bothering to check IPv6 addresses.
No-op if we do not support a codec
No-op stubs to use when memory-mapped I/O is disabled
No-op to set a breakpoint on, immediately after the real chdir.
Node most recently inserted into the tree
Node must have already been started.
Node number of parent node
Node number to load
Node or entry ID
Node pPhrase belongs to
Node to return
NodeWriter for root node
Nodes are loaded in chunks of FTS3_NODE_CHUNKSIZE bytes.
Nodes at EOF are the largest of all.
Non persistent connection
Non static methods
Non-NULL for UPDATE operations
Non-Posix functions which are common
Non-alphanumerics are literals.
Non-blocking connect
Non-capturing bracket
Non-capturing brackets
Non-capturing or atomic group, except for possessive with unlimited repeat and ONCE group with no captures.
Non-capturing possessive bracket with unlimited repeat.
Non-descriptor streams will only "work" if they have previously buffered the data.
Non-logarithmic number of rows in the index
Non-logarithmic stat1 data for this index
Non-negative integer value if EP_IntValue
Non-possessive quantifier
Non-recursive mutex required to access this object
Non-suggogate BMP codepoint
Non-truecolor case, restored to its more or less original form
Non-zero if connection is in exclusive mode
Non-zero if in an error state
Non-zero if the rowid or PRIMARY KEY changed
Non-zero on any differences
None are allocated yet
None of the existing best-so-far paths match the candidate.
None of the remaining opcodes are required to match a character.
None of them matched.
Nonzero means print parse trace.
Nor are they ever temporary files.
Normal case - r-tree scan.
Normal connections use existing pconnections.
Normal form variable, safe to read all data into memory
Normal hash selection/retrieval call
Normal ldr/str instruction.
Normal read/write connection
Normalization form constants
Normalize the address
Normalize time
Normalized weights of neighboring pixels
Normally no options
Normally turned off
Normally turned off.
Normally we don't worry about that warning, but some users do, and we want to make it easy for users to remove YYFAIL uses, which will produce warnings from Bison 2.5.
Normally, if a back reference hasn't been set, the length that is passed is negative, so the match always fails.
Normally, they would, yielding a fat-brush effect.
Normally, zero is written to this value at this time.
Not SUPPORT_UCP
Not SUPPORT_UTF
Not UTF mode
Not UTF-8 mode
Not UTF-8 mode, or character is less than 127.
Not UTF-mode, or no UCP
Not WITHOUT ROWID table.
Not a compound SELECT
Not a correlated subquery
Not a duplicate with same number
Not a duplicated name
Not a recursive common table expression.
Not a tar archive
Not a valid start character
Not all WHERE terms resolved by outer loop
Not allowed on leftward elements
Not alphanumeric
Not always defined in the headers as it ought to be
Not always meaningful.
Not appropriate for html_entity_decode/htmlspecialchars_decode
Not available on windows, the query is possible but there is no DNS_HINFO_DATA structure
Not clear that being smart is worth any trouble anyway --- large skips are infrequent.
Not conditional branch.
Not currently locked
Not enough for block, just pass into buffer
Not enough room in dst, add NUL and traverse rest of src
Not even stubs.
Not every statement has a result set attached
Not every value is representable.
Not found - try it as a special keyword.
Not found, lookup by querying PostgreSQL system tables
Not from malloc.
Not full path given or extension_dir is not set
Not fully initialized object that is being cleaned up
Not going to worry about Path: because we shouldn't be changing urls so path dont matter too much
Not grandfathered
Not ideal, but better than nothing.
Not implemented
Not impossible though.
Not in lookup table
Not last chunk, if the user asks for less, give it to him
Not multiline mode: assert before a terminating newline or before end of subject unless noteol is set.
Not multiline mode: start of subject assertion, unless notbol.
Not needed.
Not nice to convert between enums but we only have place for one error type
Not null-terminated
Not part of an OR optimization
Not previously opened
Not pushed if there are no alternatives.
Not pushed if there is no alternatives.
Not really essential, but these routines were used extensively in GD, so they were moved here.
Not sure I can fix this.
Not sure what should be done here if it's a static method
Not sure why it's a needed but it marks that the whole stream will include many result sets.
Not sure why the memset is necessary here, but without it, we get a bogus stack size out of pthread_attr_getstacksize.
Not the best thing, but in practice it should be good-enough
Not the root node
Not too pretty, but it works.
Not used on win32
Not used yet
Not yet implemented in the engine
Not yet implemented.
Note is a letter is a 'break' in the word
Note negative special
Note slight error in 16-bit case:  up to 256 16-bit shades may get mapped to a single 8-bit shade, and only one of them is supposed to be transparent.
Note that "equivalent" doesn't necessarily mean "identical", e.g., two alpha-converted types are "equivalent" though not literally byte- identical.
Note that Adar II is assigned the month number 7 and Elul is always 13.
Note that ICU uses int32_t as string length and PHP uses size_t.
Note that LONGLONG is a 64-bit value
Note that OP_DIGIT etc.
Note that OleView is unable to generate C headers for this particular tlb...
Note that RowKey and RowData are really exactly the same instruction
Note that at this point we can encounter only the "basic" bracket opcodes such as BRA and CBRA, as this is the place where they get converted into the more special varieties such as BRAPOS and SBRA.
Note that entity tables are defined in terms of unicode code points
Note that files save handler supports splitting session data into multiple directories.
Note that in UTF-8 mode, '.' matches a character of any length, but for the other character types, the valid characters are all one-byte long.
Note that in caseless UTF-8 mode, the number of subject bytes matched may be different to the number of reference bytes.
Note that it is illegal for the driver to take a reference to param, as it resides in transient storage only at this time.
Note that only run-time accessed data need to be cleaned up, pre-defined data can not contain objects and thus are not probelmatic
Note that phpdbg_help_text is not assumed to be collated in key order.
Note that the "rd" argument of RMATCH isn't actually used in this definition.
Note that the "rw" argument of RMATCH isn't actually used in this definition.
Note that the Unicode property types will be present only when SUPPORT_UCP is defined, but we don't wrap the little bits of code here because it just makes it horribly messy.
Note that the current accepted value for the tropical year is 365.242199 days, not 365.25.
Note that the generated buffer will not contain a methodCall.
Note that the loop starting at 1 is intentional, since we've already done the first round of the algorithm.
Note that the second parameter, headers_lc, is actually a lowercased version of headers.
Note that the stream may be filtered, in which case the stat result may be inaccurate, as the filter may inflate or deflate the number of bytes that we can read.
Note that the table for "space" includes everything "isspace" gives, including VT in the default locale.
Note that the tables in chartables are dependent on the locale, and may mark arbitrary characters as digits - but the PCRE compiling code expects to handle only 0-9, a-z, and A-Z as digits when compiling.
Note that there are substantial restrictions on the use of suspension --- see the documentation.
Note that there is no code from the gd package in this file
Note that there may be an auto-callout at the start of a condition.
Note that these values are always the ASCII ones, even in EBCDIC environments.
Note that this also affects what script_path_translated points to.
Note that this code only handles characters in the BMP.
Note that this function is called only for ANY or ANYCRLF.
Note that this is a temporary hack that should be fixed soon.
Note that this may be an under estimate because there are 6939.6896 days in a metonic cycle not 6940, but it will never be an over estimate.
Note that this read relies on the __sync call above preventing the compiler from caching the value read out of memory.
Note that this will ignore any methodCall.
Note that we always assume the path is not empty and nul terminated
Note that we cannot use the value of "length" to check for sufficient bytes left, because the other case of the character may have more or fewer bytes.
Note that we don't try to then combine the second and third instr into a single bundle.
Note that we must not include the OP_KETRxxx opcodes here, because they all imply an unlimited repeat.
Note that we really just look for LF terminated lines.
Note that we rely on the semaphores being zeroed when they are created.
Note that zip- based phar archives cannot support signatures.
Note that, for Perl compatibility, SKIP with an argument does NOT set nomatch_mark.
Note we need not unload belowerrN because it is for the dummy column before or after the actual array.
Note: A break point must always set the correct id and type A set breakpoint function must always map new points
Note: FILE_SEARCH and FILE_REGEX do not actually copy anything, but setup pointers into the source
Note: In SSE3, we could also use MOVDDUP and MOVSLDUP.
Note: SPACE and PXSPACE used to be different because Perl excluded VT from "space", but from Perl 5.18 it's included, so both categories are treated the same here.
Note: This list isn't exhaustive, but should cover common cases.
Note: We pass in the pointer to the server_context in case this is handled by a different thread.
Note: _not_ MATCH_ACCEPT
Note: a zero length key is no key at all
Note: can_cache is called only for binary operators.
Note: for global settings sake we check from root to path
Note: if sub is called, accum must be larger that what is being subtracted.
Note: src1 is NOT immediate.
Note: strchr includes the terminating zero in the characters it considers.
Note: the test here for php_stream_udp_socket_ops is important, because we want the default to be TCP sockets so that the openssl extension can re-use this code.
Note: there must not be a mixture of XPG3 specs and non-XPG3 specs in the same format string.
Note: this code is harmless on little-endian machines.
Note: when reporting iJVM_EVENT_TYPE_ENTER_NIDS, there is no need to fill in the stack_id field in the iJIT_Method_NIDS structure, as VTune fills it.
Nothing allowed
Nothing in SQLite requires multiple threads.
Nothing matched the range, stop processing
Nothing points to this buffer now, free it
Nothing stored during the first run.
Nothing to check...
Nothing to do
Nothing to do at end-of-loop for a single-pass
Nothing to do if we got an empty string
Nothing to do.
Nothing to store for UPSERT/LOAD DATA
Nothing will break if it doesn't work.
Notice that when returning from a function the stack pointer is the address of the function return.
Notify of page size changes
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the authors grant the U.S.
Now 'shift' the result of the reduction.
Now `shift' the result of the reduction.
Now a bit of recursion - read from the read buffer, if the data which we have just read from the wire is not enough, then the recursive call will try to satisfy it until it is satisfied.
Now add carry the longer integer part.
Now add the remaining fraction part and equal size integer parts.
Now adjust all forward reference offsets for the group.
Now allocate memory of array, array of pointers
Now an optional 4th parameter specifying the cursor type defaulting to the cursors default
Now build the character set.
Now compare the magnitude.
Now copy, and magnify as we do so
Now count remaining bytes.
Now do allocs
Now do the equal length scale and integer parts.
Now do the pre-compile.
Now emit the colormap index for this cell
Now encode the result...
Now ensure that the reqchars match
Now fill in the complete length of the item
Now fill the next block with 56 bytes
Now fire up the session
Now for the full divide algorithm.
Now get last part - the description
Now get the read-lock
Now get the read-lock SHARED_LOCK
Now handle repetition for the different types of item.
Now handle the original range.
Now hook it up to the source
Now if we weren't inside restart, restart would not begin until we remove usage lock
Now into new section that parses buf for delimiter/enclosure fields
Now let's read from the wire, decompress it and fill the read buffer
Now load the image.
Now loop over all cells in box, updating distance per Thomas method
Now loop through the file and do the magic quotes thing if needed
Now make the extraction
Now make the output string
Now manipulate the actual database free-list structure.
Now pass our field back to php
Now persistent_script structure is ready in process memory
Now pull in the remote sections into our address space.
Now reconnect using the same handle
Now save the offset data
Now scan remaining volume of box and compute population
Now search for a zipvfs instance lower down in the VFS stack.
Now search pTab for the exact column.
Now see if the situation is what we want
Now see if we need to remove any special characters.
Now sign it
Now sort the index
Now start processing the opcodes.
Now that pcre_maketables is a function visible to the outside world, we make use of its code from here in order to be consistent.
Now that we placed the element, we need to update the variables We only need to do that for relative elements.
Now that we've identified that we've a Bcc list, remove it from the current header.
Now the fraction.
Now the hard part -- adjusting rv to the correct value.
Now try to discover other details about the file.
Now tuneable thanks to Wez Furlong
Now update the actual sibling pages.
Now we can construct the result string.
Now we can destroy the result set
Now we can get on with it
Now we can scan the table and, for each entry, print the number, the name, and the substring itself.
Now we have nd0 digits, starting at s0, followed by a decimal point, followed by nd-nd0 digits.
Now we know that no cell in the update box is more than minmaxdist away from some colormap entry.
Now when 1 and 2 are destroyed, 3 can still access 2 in its destructor, with very problematic results
Now, do the IO operation.
Now, if comps exist, write them out.
Now, if number mappings exist, write them out.
Now, if we have to wait some time, and we're supposed to be blocking, wait for the socket to become available.
Now, php_pollfd_for uses select to wait up to our time_left value only...
Now, search for the parameter
Nowadays we allow for larger numbers in UTF-8 mode and 16-bit mode, but no more than 3 octal digits.
Nul-terminated URI to parse
Nul-terminated entry key
Nul-terminated string containing "A,B"
Nul-terminated string containing boolean
Null encode
Null encode/decode
Null-terminate the string, so strdup can work even if the packets have a string at the end, which is not ASCIIZ
Null-terminated column definition
Number from first found
Number instances seen so far
Number of 8-bit characters
Number of Blowfish rounds, this is also hardcoded into a few places
Number of COLNAME_xxx symbols
Number of CTEs in the WITH clause
Number of DNS Types Supported by PHP currently
Number of Journal Records
Number of OP_Once instructions
Number of OP_Once instructions so far
Number of ORDER BY clause terms
Number of ORDER BY terms satisfied by indices
Number of PMAs currently in file
Number of PMAs to read
Number of PRIMARY KEY memory cells
Number of PtrMap pages to be freed
Number of Records in the journal
Number of SELECT statements seen
Number of SHARED locks held
Number of SQL function arguments
Number of TryBeginRead attempts
Number of UChar elements in pInput
Number of UTF-8 characters in zTabName
Number of VDBEs currently running
Number of VM memory registers
Number of WAL frames backfilled into DB
Number of active OP_VDestroy operations
Number of active VDBEs that read and write
Number of active VDBEs that read or write
Number of additional bytes
Number of aliased result set columns
Number of args
Number of arguments
Number of arguments in subprograms
Number of arguments to VUpdate
Number of arguments to the function
Number of arguments to the module
Number of arguments used so far
Number of arguments.
Number of assigned cursor values
Number of attached databases
Number of backends currently in use
Number of backtraces on this alloc
Number of backup operations reading this btree
Number of bits in the bitmap array.
Number of block extensions.
Number of buckets in the hash table
Number of buffers currently checked out
Number of bytes actually read from file
Number of bytes available on the local btree page
Number of bytes in a page
Number of bytes in a varint
Number of bytes in aPoslist
Number of bytes in buffer z
Number of bytes in buffer zRoot
Number of bytes in buffer zTerm
Number of bytes in current position list
Number of bytes in current term
Number of bytes in header
Number of bytes in input
Number of bytes in key
Number of bytes in nKey
Number of bytes in pList
Number of bytes in term prefix
Number of bytes in term suffix
Number of bytes in text at z
Number of bytes in the BLOB
Number of bytes in the content of a field
Number of bytes in the key
Number of bytes in the record
Number of bytes in token
Number of bytes in zFunc
Number of bytes in zPathname
Number of bytes in zTerm
Number of bytes of available data
Number of bytes of cell payload
Number of bytes of data space
Number of bytes of data to be bound
Number of bytes of extra space to alloc
Number of bytes of header space
Number of bytes of leaf data written
Number of bytes of memory available to this allocator
Number of bytes of prefix compression
Number of bytes of space to allocate
Number of bytes of the blob to include in output
Number of bytes of the string text to include in output
Number of bytes required on leaf page
Number of bytes still to come
Number of bytes to allocate
Number of bytes to copy
Number of bytes to lock
Number of bytes to lock or unlock
Number of bytes to read
Number of bytes to return.
Number of bytes to write
Number of bytes written
Number of bytes written by seekAndWrite
Number of bytes yet to be written
Number of captured subpatterns
Number of cells
Number of cells in page pPage
Number of cells on page
Number of cells on the page
Number of cells on this page, local and ovfl
Number of cells to add to pPg
Number of characters in function name
Number of characters in the name
Number of characters in this token
Number of characters in zCharSet
Number of characters in zName
Number of characters so far in this 'packet'
Number of child nodes
Number of child processes that will get created to service requests
Number of children of returned node
Number of children that must disable us
Number of columns
Number of columns beyond the key columns
Number of columns forming the key
Number of columns in current object
Number of columns in index
Number of columns in index being sampled
Number of columns in one row of the result set
Number of columns in pIdx.
Number of columns in parent key
Number of columns in result set
Number of columns in stat4 records
Number of columns in table
Number of columns in the FTS table
Number of columns in the PRIMARY KEY
Number of columns in the constructed index
Number of columns in the data
Number of columns in the recursive table
Number of columns in the result
Number of columns in the result set
Number of columns in the sorting index
Number of columns in this key
Number of columns in this table
Number of columns must be the same in tab1 and tab2
Number of columns of data
Number of columns stored in the index
Number of columns that show through to the output.
Number of columns to test for changes
Number of components of the PRIMARY KEY
Number of compound terms processed so far
Number of conch taking failures
Number of constraint terms
Number of contiguous term-less nodes
Number of coordinates
Number of cursors for child frame
Number of cursors required
Number of databases with an active write-transaction
Number of days since 1st day of year
Number of db changes made since last reset
Number of def.
Number of deferred fk violations
Number of deferred imm fk.
Number of dimensions
Number of distinct values in index
Number of docs in database
Number of elements
Number of elements along histogram axes.
Number of elements in a bitmap array.
Number of elements in aIndent
Number of elements in aList
Number of elements in apVal
Number of elements in argv array
Number of elements in list aMerge
Number of elements in pTabList
Number of elements in regKey for WITHOUT ROWID
Number of elements in the data array
Number of elements in the input array
Number of elements left to test
Number of elements summed
Number of enterances
Number of entrances
Number of entries currently in hash
Number of entries in aConstraint
Number of entries in aMem
Number of entries in aOnceFlag
Number of entries in apCsr
Number of entries in apSub
Number of entries in array
Number of entries in the hash table
Number of entries in the input hashtable
Number of entries in this segment
Number of entries in this table
Number of entries on one ptrmap page
Number of entries with this hash
Number of entries without a matching leave
Number of equality constraints
Number of errors encountered
Number of errors encountered while resolving names
Number of errors reported
Number of errors seen
Number of expressions on the list
Number of extra 0 bytes to append to data
Number of extra columns needed
Number of extra copies of last page
Number of extra registers before regResult
Number of extra registers needed
Number of extra registers to allocate
Number of fields in PRIMARY KEY.
Number of fields in pRec
Number of fields in test sample
Number of fields in the header
Number of fields in the record
Number of fields in the table or index
Number of fragmented bytes on the page
Number of fragments in this snippet
Number of frames in pFrame list
Number of free bytes on the page
Number of full pages read from DB
Number of full pages written to DB
Number of function arguments
Number of function parameters
Number of hash collisions
Number of hash collisions remaining
Number of header fields parsed so far
Number of hidden columns if TABLE is virtual
Number of identifiers on the list
Number of imm.
Number of index columns including rowid
Number of index columns w/o the pk/rowid
Number of indices
Number of indices that need updating
Number of input segments
Number of input segments on best level
Number of instance matches this row
Number of instructions in the program
Number of integers output by cArg
Number of internal buffer hits.
Number of iterators in aIter not at EOF
Number of iterators/phrases
Number of key columns
Number of key columns in pIndex
Number of key columns in the index
Number of key fields in each record
Number of labels used
Number of leaf blocks added this trans
Number of leaf pages flushed
Number of leaf pages in unit of work
Number of leaf pages left to write
Number of leaf pages per optimize step
Number of leaf pages written
Number of leaf pages yet to  be written
Number of leaves on the trunk of the freelist
Number of left-most columns to skip
Number of level-0 PMAs to merge
Number of levels in this index
Number of loaded extensions
Number of locks in aTableLock
Number of locks to acquire or release
Number of locks to hold
Number of matchable phrases in query
Number of matching column names
Number of matching table names
Number of memory cells for child frame
Number of memory cells in the row key
Number of memory cells required
Number of memory cells used so far
Number of memory locations currently allocated
Number of memory registers for sub-program
Number of messages written to zErrMsg so far
Number of mmap pages currently outstanding
Number of names resolved by this context
Number of neighbors on either side of pPage
Number of nested brackets
Number of nested calls to the parser/code generator
Number of nested loop
Number of nested statement-transactions
Number of non-benign errors
Number of non-transaction savepoints
Number of non-wildcard prefix characters
Number of objects currently in use
Number of objects on pFresh
Number of opcodes for progress callback
Number of open cursors
Number of output leaves just written
Number of outputs for the new entry
Number of outputs for this subquery
Number of outstanding file locks
Number of outstanding xFetch references
Number of outstanding xFetch refs
Number of overflow pages to load doclist
Number of pages in database after autovacuuming
Number of pages in database file
Number of pages in pList
Number of pages in the LRU list
Number of pages in the database
Number of pages in the database according to hdr
Number of pages in the database file
Number of pages left to copy
Number of pages on the freelist
Number of pages on the freelist initially
Number of pages on the overflow chain
Number of pages per doc loaded
Number of pages starting at pg1 to journal
Number of pages still on the free-list
Number of pages to use in the cache
Number of pages written to journal
Number of parameters
Number of parameters to the SQL function
Number of pending entries in the queue
Number of phrase instances
Number of phrases in expression
Number of phrases in query
Number of phrases seen so far
Number of pointers to this Table
Number of pointers to this structure
Number of pragmas: 60 on by default, 73 total.
Number of prefix indexes
Number of previously allocated VDBE cursors
Number of purgeable pages allocated
Number of queued entries by iLevel
Number of reader locks obtained
Number of records written to sub-journal
Number of references to columns in other FROM clauses
Number of references to columns in pSrcList
Number of references to this KeyInfo object
Number of references to this node
Number of references to this one
Number of references to this structure
Number of registers allocated
Number of registers left to copy
Number of registers to allocate
Number of remaining savepoints after this op.
Number of result columns
Number of result columns returned by SELECT
Number of result columns written here
Number of result rows written here
Number of retries
Number of retrys
Number of right-hand side symbols in the rule
Number of rows for a single term
Number of rows in index
Number of rows in table
Number of rows in the entire table
Number of rows in the result
Number of rows in the table
Number of samples
Number of scratch buffers
Number of segment-iters in use
Number of segments in incr-merge
Number of segments not deleted
Number of segments that share a docid
Number of segments to merge
Number of sets used so far
Number of sign chars.
Number of significant digits returned
Number of sorting key columns, including OP_Sequence
Number of sub-vdbes seen so far
Number of subqueries
Number of subqueries that the label is moving
Number of syntax errors so far.
Number of szAtom sized blocks in zPool
Number of table columns
Number of tables or subqueries in the FROM clause
Number of tables to check.
Number of terms
Number of terms contributing to sumEq
Number of terms in subquery FROM clause
Number of terms in the ORDER BY clause
Number of terms in the join
Number of terms in the result set
Number of terms written to node so far
Number of the page to fetch
Number of the page to get
Number of the rule by which to reduce
Number of times each op has been executed
Number of times stack has grown.
Number of times table has been busy
Number of times this instruction was executed
Number of tokens desired for snippet
Number of tokens in each fragment
Number of tokens in extracted snippet
Number of tokens in phrase
Number of tokens in query
Number of tokens in table
Number of tokens in the phrase
Number of tokens seen so far
Number of tokens to shift before error messages enabled.
Number of tokens to shift snippet by
Number of u32 elements in match-info
Number of u32 values in hash table.
Number of unixShm objects pointing to this
Number of unused bytes at end of each page
Number of unused bytes on page
Number of unused bytes on the page
Number of unused pcache slots
Number of usable bytes on a page
Number of usable bytes on each page
Number of user columns in table
Number of users of pInitMutex
Number of users of this page
Number of valid bytes in zDb
Number of valid fields currently in pRec
Number of virtual machine steps
Number of virtual tables to lock
Number of winShm objects pointing to this
Number of words in this segment.
Number of work-quanta to perform
Number of zero bytes at the end of the record
Number of zero-bytes to append
Number terms in the ORDER BY clause
Number used to identify the index
Numbered group recursion test
Numbered group used test
Numbers are always smaller than strings int this function as it anyway doesn't make much sense to compare two different data types.
Numbers for RMATCH calls.
Numeric key
Numeric pack types will return numbers, a and A will return strings, f and d will return doubles.
Numeric session.name won't work at all
Numeric type of left operand
Numeric type of right operand
Numeric value
OBJECTS_FIXME
OBJECTS_FIXME: This whole extension needs going through.
OBJECTS_OPTIMIZE
OCI likes to stick non-terminated strings in things
OCIClientVersion only available 10.2 onwards
OCIPing available 10.2 onwards
OCISessionBegin returns OCI_SUCCESS_WITH_INFO when user's password has expired, but is still usable.
OCI_LOBMAXSIZE
OCI_MAJOR_VERSION
OCaml: Fsnotify.fsenv
OE_Abort for IMMEDIATE, OE_Rollback for DEFERRED
OE_Abort, OE_Ignore, OE_Replace, or OE_None
OE_Rollback etc.
OFFSET expression.
OFFSET value.
OID increase check
OK to convert here since if str_len were big, convert above would fail
OK to factor out constants
OK to return IN_INDEX_NOOP
OK to spill pager cache
OK to update SQLITE_MASTER
OK, get an integer and set the index.
OK, now we are ready to create a new one.
OK, now we can do the recursion.
OK, now we can get on with the real code of the function.
OK, we can now run the match.
ON CONFLICT algorithm.
ON CONFLICT policy
ON CONFLICT policy to code trigger program with
ON CONFLICT strategy
ON DELETE action
ON DELETE and ON UPDATE actions, respectively
ON UPDATE action
ON, Packed packet headers main header
ON, Packet length main header
ON, Tile part length main header
ONEPASS defaults to OFF
ONEPASS is ok with multiple rows
ONEPASS is valid for multiple rows
ONEPASS valid for a single row update
ONEPASS_OFF or _SINGLE or _MULTI
ONEPASS_OFF, _SINGLE, or _MULTI.
ONEPASS_OFF, or _SINGLE, or _MULTI
OO, Coding style component
OO, Progression order default
OO, Quantization component
OO, Region of interest
OOM detected prior to this routine
OPEN_ALWAYS mode sets the last error to ERROR_ALREADY_EXISTS but the CreateFile operation succeeds
OPTIMIZATION
OP_CCLASS can match mb-code.
OP_Column never called on virtual table
OP_Column/OP_Rowid references to this table
OP_Column: Ephemeral output is ok
OP_Compare: use the permutation
OP_Copy must be used instead.
OP_Destroy stores an in integer r1.
OP_Explain for loop
OP_Found will use a composite key
OP_Found will use an unpacked key
OP_KETRPOS is a possessive repeating ket.
OP_MaxPgcnt enforces this
OP_Next or OP_Prev
OP_ONCE removes everything in case of a backtrack, so we don't need to explicitly release the STR_PTR.
OP_OpenEphem opcodes related to this select
OP_OpenRead or OP_OpenWrite
OP_OpenWrite cursors for the ONEPASS opt
OP_RECURSE items contain an offset from the start of the regex to the group that is referenced.
OP_REPEAT ID
OP_Seek always uses a single rowid
OP_XCLASS cannot occur in 8-bit, non-UTF mode.
OR dst, src, 0
OR in the Bits per Pixel
OR in the resolution
OR using multiple indices
ORA-00022: invalid session id
ORA-00955: name is already used by an existing object
ORA-03133: end of file on communication channel
ORA-12154: TNS:could not resolve service name
ORDER BY 1 ASC
ORDER BY 1 DESC
ORDER BY clause
ORDER BY of joins via index
ORDER BY or GROUP BY or DISTINCT clause to check
ORDER BY terms to skip
OS Allocation
OS Interface
OS functions to use for IO
OS-dependent half
OUT params result set.
OUT: "Score" for this snippet
OUT: A pointer to the prepared statement
OUT: Acquired node
OUT: Acquired page object
OUT: Allocated Fts3SegReader
OUT: Allocated Wal handle
OUT: Allocated seg-reader cursor
OUT: Array of indexes for this table
OUT: Best snippet found
OUT: Bitmask of phrases covered
OUT: Bitmask of terms to highlight
OUT: Blob data in malloc'd buffer
OUT: Block id of last entry written
OUT: Block number in next layer down
OUT: Byte offset of end of token in input buffer
OUT: Byte offset of token in input buffer
OUT: Bytes actually loaded
OUT: Bytes of string content
OUT: Bytes stored locally
OUT: Caller should free this pointer
OUT: Columns for imposter table
OUT: Compiled statement
OUT: Created tokenizer
OUT: Created tokenizer cursor
OUT: Current rowid
OUT: Data for root node
OUT: Database page number for frame
OUT: Deserialized object
OUT: Dlidx flag
OUT: Docid and doclist for new entry
OUT: Docid for row just inserted
OUT: Docid value
OUT: End of parsed string
OUT: End-of-file flag
OUT: Ending offset of token
OUT: Error code
OUT: Error code.
OUT: Error message
OUT: Error message, if any
OUT: Error number if error occurs
OUT: Extracted value
OUT: Filename component of URI
OUT: Final checksum value output
OUT: First token of proposed snippet
OUT: Global maximum cache size
OUT: Head of merged list
OUT: Height
OUT: Imposter PK clause
OUT: Jump to this label to skip partial index
OUT: List length pointer
OUT: Malloc'd array of column names
OUT: Malloc'd doclist
OUT: Malloced result buffer
OUT: Map of index columns in pFKey
OUT: Mapped memory
OUT: Mask of WhereLoops to run in reverse order
OUT: New cursor object
OUT: New iterator
OUT: New iterator object
OUT: New merge-engine
OUT: New sqlite3_vtab object
OUT: New tokenizer handle
OUT: New virtual table
OUT: Next overflow page number
OUT: Normalized text for token
OUT: Number of backfilled frames in WAL
OUT: Number of bytes consumed
OUT: Number of bytes in token
OUT: Number of frames in WAL
OUT: Number of leaf pages in b-tree
OUT: Number of phrases in query
OUT: Number of tokens in query
OUT: Number of tokens returned before this one
OUT: Page number
OUT: Parsed query structure
OUT: Permissions to open file with
OUT: Pointer to buffer containing data
OUT: Pointer to current position-list
OUT: Pointer to doclist for pTerm
OUT: Pointer to hash index
OUT: Pointer to mapping
OUT: Pointer to page number array
OUT: Pointer to position list
OUT: Pointer to position-list data
OUT: Pointer to unused portion of zSql
OUT: Position integer of token
OUT: Prepared statement handle
OUT: Rank function arguments
OUT: Rank function name
OUT: Result
OUT: Result of comparison
OUT: Results of parse
OUT: Return code
OUT: Return data in this Mem structure.
OUT: Return the Pager structure here
OUT: Returned database handle
OUT: Rowid value
OUT: SQLite db handle
OUT: Score of snippet pFragment
OUT: SegReader for pending-terms
OUT: Segment id
OUT: Selected child node
OUT: Selected leaf page
OUT: Set for new term
OUT: Set to 1 if EOF
OUT: Set to malloced error message
OUT: Set to point to affinity string
OUT: Set to true if EOF
OUT: Set to true if call is a no-op
OUT: Set to true if constraint may cause a replace
OUT: Set to true if dequoting required
OUT: Set to true if really a match
OUT: Set to true if row really does exist
OUT: Size of WAL log in frames
OUT: Size of blob data
OUT: Size of current key in bytes
OUT: Size of doclist in bytes
OUT: Size of position list in bytes
OUT: Size of position-list in bytes
OUT: Size of root node in bytes
OUT: Space to write result to
OUT: Starting offset of token
OUT: Statement handle
OUT: Store cursor handle here
OUT: Sum of PCache1.nMin for purgeable caches
OUT: The page number of the next page
OUT: Token text
OUT: Tokenization cursor
OUT: Total number of OR nodes in expr.
OUT: Total number of frames checkpointed
OUT: Total number of pages available for recycling
OUT: Total number of pages cached
OUT: Total number of tokens in phrase.
OUT: Trbul number of columns
OUT: True if iterator is at EOF
OUT: True if value was extracted
OUT: UPDATE statement handle
OUT: Unique index on parent table
OUT: VFS to use
OUT: Value of original database size field
OUT: Value read from the nRec field
OUT: Visiblity
OUT: WHERE clause
OUT: WITH clause return value belongs to
OUT: Wal frame index of next page
OUT: Write encoded frame here
OUT: Write new node image here
OUT: Write the answer here
OUT: Write the cell contents here
OUT: Write the score here
OUT: Write the thread object here
OUT: bm25-data object for this query
OUT: error message
OUT: expression
OUT: gid to set on the file
OUT: malloc'd buffer containing str/bw
OUT: pointer to doclist
OUT: score for the cell
OUT: size of doclist in bytes
OUT: sqlite3_malloc'd error message
OUT: stats written here
OUT: uid to set on the file
OUT: visibility of the cell
OUTPUT: Collation sequence name
OUTPUT: Declared data type
OUTPUT: True if NOT NULL constraint exists
OUTPUT: True if column is auto-increment
OUTPUT: True if column part of PK
OUT_CHAR is the actual routine for writing the characters.
O_NOFOLLOW to prevent us from following evil symlinks
Object being parsed at the point of error
Object completely outside of query region
Object declarations
Object describing the transient index
Object for pair-wise doclist merging
Object fully contained within query region
Object iterator
Object iterator for column names
Object partially overlaps query region
Object reference count
Object store not available during request shutdown
Object to allocate and return
Object to populate
Object to return
Object used to lock page 1
Object used to write leaf nodes
Object used to write to the file
Obsoleted by DTrace probes
Obtain a RESERVED lock on the database file.
Obtain a reference to the root node to initialize Rtree.iDepth
Obtain authorization to do a recursive query
Obtain db Handle
Obtain db Handler
Obtain or release the WRITER lock.
Obtain relevant filename and lineno
Obtain the current thread id
Obtain the page at pgnoRoot
Obtain the page from this cache
Obviously the CRT version will be useful more often.
Obviously, in a real application you might want to do things other than print them.
Offset could be treated as a long
Offset from start of page to first cell pointer
Offset from the beginning of the file
Offset from the start of data to return bytes from.
Offset in CREATE TABLE stmt to add a new column
Offset in pFile
Offset in pointer map page
Offset in zDoc of end of token
Offset in zDoc of start of token
Offset into the data
Offset into the file to begin writing at
Offset is set zero to mark that this bracket is still open
Offset must be treated as a string
Offset of entry in pointer map
Offset of first byte to lock
Offset of first rowid on leaf
Offset of first term on leaf
Offset of first type in header
Offset of free space in list.aMemory
Offset of header in journal file
Offset of header on pPg
Offset of journal header being read
Offset of pFd to begin writing at
Offset of page in file
Offset of record to playback
Offset of space for 4-byte poslist size
Offset of start of buffer in file
Offset of this term from read positions
Offset on new first leaf page
Offset to beginning of page header
Offset to cell content of cell being deleted
Offset to first byte to be locked/unlocked
Offset to get elements from
Offset to linkage control of previous segment of stack.
Offset to next unparsed byte of the header
Offset to overflow page number.
Offset to read at
Offset to stack base.
Offset to start writing file at
Offset to the cell content area
Offset to the cell pointer array
Offset to the page header
Offset to the second branch
Offset to the start of the cell content area
Offset to the start of the cell pointer array
Offset to write
Offset within aMemory of next record
Offset within buffer to read from
Offset within poslist
Offsets in subject.
Offsets into aPoslist for current row
Offsets of each character in utf-8 input
Offsets starts at 0.
Often NULL.
Often a no-op.
Oh, and it is also binary safe, ie it can handle strings with embedded NULLs, so long as the real length is passed in.
Oid is unsigned int, we don't need this code, where LONG is wider
Ok for uniqueness
Ok to return a row more than once
Ok, we're doing some weirdness here...
Old fashioned tar archive
Old session creation semantics when session pool cannot be used Eg: privileged connect/password change
Old value for iStartBlock
Old version of subfile tag
Olympus has this padded with trailing spaces.
Olympus specific tags
Omit all terms smaller than this
Omit children but continue walking siblings
Omit error if index already exists
Omit this entire file if SQLITE_ENABLE_UNLOCK_NOTIFY is not defined.
Omit unused tables in joins
Omitted if leaf flag is set.
Omitted if the zerodata flag is set.
Omitted on leaves.
On DragonFly, a new thread inherits the signal stack of the creating thread.
On Lion, the base moved a little, so while the math above still applies, the base is different.
On NetBSD, a new thread inherits the signal stack of the creating thread.
On Unix, the stack can be large, and this works fine.
On Win32 locked files that are closed without being explicitly unlocked will be unlocked only when "system resources become available".
On Windows we don't have ability to extend huge blocks in-place.
On Windows, we expect regular chgrp to fail silently by default
On Windows, we expect regular chown to fail silently by default
On a 2's complement machine, negating the most negative integer results in a number that cannot be represented as a signed integer.
On a 60 MHz Pentium this takes 34 msec, so you would need 30 seconds to build a 1000 entry dictionary...
On average.
On destruct return 1 else 0.
On entry, ptr is pointing past the bracket character, but on return it points to the closing bracket, or vertical bar, or end of string.
On entry, ptrptr is pointing at the P or p.
On error, error is filled in and -1 is returned.
On error, errorcode will be set non-zero, so we don't need to look at the result of the function here.
On exit from the switch, s points to the string that must be printed, s_len has the length of the string The precision requirements, if any, are reflected in s_len.
On exit, it is on the final character of the escape sequence.
On exit, it is pointing at the final character of the escape sequence.
On failure only
On iOS, Go tests and apps under development are run by lldb.
On linux, when the path begins with a NUL byte we are referring to an abstract namespace.
On machines with plenty of memory, filling the whole histogram in one shot with Thomas' refined method might be faster than the present code --- but then again, it might not be any faster, and it's certainly more complicated.
On most systems, this would mean that any file consisting only of characters in the range 0x00 ...
On the off chance we were given nothing but crap...
On the upwards pass, or...
On to the metaphoning
On way to solve this is to just re-allocate the buffer size.
Once GCC version 2 has supplanted version 1, this can go.
Once again, we may have to adjust any OP_RECURSE calls inside the group.
Once this flag is set, it remains set.
One alternative is translating here after every semantic action, but that translation would be missed if the semantic action invokes YYABORT, YYACCEPT, or YYERROR immediately after altering yychar or if it invokes YYBACKUP.
One bit for each page in the database file
One byte past end of position list
One byte past the end of usable data
One byte per block.
One character past the end of input text
One column in the result set
One could argue that this is wrong.
One day we might  have binary strings...
One element of this array for each open cursor
One entry for each identifier on the list
One entry for each of nCol columns
One entry for each token in the phrase
One for each column cache entry
One for each phrase
One for every 32KB page in the wal-index
One for the zero integer part.
One instruction is enough.
One iterator for each phrase
One less left to do
One might also try: PROCESS_MODE_BACKGROUND_BEGIN
One of OE_None, OE_Cascade etc.
One of PASSIVE, FULL and RESTART
One of PASSIVE, FULL or RESTART
One of SHARED_LOCK, RESERVED_LOCK etc.
One of TK_ALL, TK_UNION, TK_EXCEPT, TK_INTERSECT
One of TK_BEFORE, TK_AFTER, TK_INSTEAD
One of TK_DELETE, TK_UPDATE, TK_INSERT
One of TK_DELETE, TK_UPDATE, TK_INSERT, TK_SELECT
One of TK_INSERT, TK_UPDATE, TK_DELETE
One of TK_UNION, TK_EXCEPT etc.
One of TK_UPDATE, TK_INSERT, TK_DELETE
One of TRIGGER_BEFORE, TRIGGER_AFTER
One of our parent classes are the same as the scope, and it contains a private function with the same name that has the same scope.
One of several kinds of errors
One of the FTSQUERY_XXX values defined below
One of the INCRINIT_XXX constants
One of the JSON_ type values
One of the P4_xxx constants for p4
One of the PAGER_JOURNALMODE_XXX symbols
One of the SQLITE_AFF_...
One of the SQL_XXX constants above
One of the SRT_ operations to apply to self
One of the WhereLoop objects
One of the children.
One of the following two instructions is replaced by an OP_Noop.
One of the journals pointed to by the master journal exists.
One of: TK_UNION TK_ALL TK_INTERSECT TK_EXCEPT
One or both operands are NULL
One or more aggregate functions seen
One or more character type fudges the pointer and restarts, knowing it will hit a single character type and stop there.
One or more of FLAG_ constants below
One or more of the following warnings have already been issued.
One or more subtasks
One or more tables used to resolve names
One or the other is used, depending on whether the check is for a general or a particular category.
One particular FROM clause in a nested query
One past the last escaped input char
One permutation of all possible is created
One register allocated to each index
One register assigned to each index to be updated
One release per successful fetch.
One side is a column, the other is not.
One usually wants to use hw.acctivecpu for MT decisions, but not here
One-time brackets
One-time test address
Only AUTO_CALLOUT can insert this opcode.
Only F-S dithering or no dithering is supported.
Only OCI_RESULT_TYPE_SELECT is supported by Oracle DB 12cR1
Only SLJIT_INT_OP or SLJIT_SINGLE_OP is allowed.
Only SOF0-SOF2 are now in common use
Only WORD actually needs all four entries, but using repeats for the others means they can all use the same code below.
Only a BTREE_SINGLE database can be BTREE_UNORDERED
Only a username for example may still be a valid address at the destination system.
Only allow sensible combinations of bits in the flags argument.
Only allow tracing if SQLITE_DEBUG is defined.
Only back references and those types that consume a character may be repeated.
Only blend with different colors that aren't the dont_blend color.
Only built-in functions have access to this feature.
Only built-in memory allocators can be used.
Only call this right before exiting.
Only called if really needed
Only change the method to the constructor if the constructor isn't called __construct we check for __ so we can be binary safe for lowering, we should use ZEND_CONSTRUCTOR_FUNC_NAME
Only check if utf8 string is valid, and compute utf16 length
Only check simple variables on the RHS, as only CVs cause issues with this.
Only check the salt if it's not EXT_DES
Only check when open_basedir is available
Only code the 1st table in pTabList
Only concurrent reads allowed.
Only creates a single-dimensional array of variants.
Only cursor read
Only do the open_basedir check at runtime
Only do the safemode/open_basedir check at runtime
Only do this if SSL is active.
Only dom uses _private
Only for cumulative operations.
Only free statement if db-connection is still open
Only happens when no variables are specified
Only has meaning after compile
Only if it is the 3rd month is both the start and end of the year required.
Only if the day number is actually found to be in the ambiguous period of 29 to 31 days is the other molad calculated.
Only initted - error
Only keep closing bracket on same line for empty arrays/objects
Only lookup the real file path and add it to the included_files list if already opened otherwise it will get opened and added to the included_files list in zend_execute_scripts
Only needed if the user requested a buffer size.
Only offset
Only one flag value allowed
Only one has a type declaration and the other one doesn't
Only one recursive reference is permitted.
Only one writer allowed at a time.
Only parse errors are currently reported in err, not structural errors.
Only perform conversion if variant not already of type passed
Only persistent  connections get hashed up.
Only report line terminators if we find one other than LF, or if we find none at all.
Only save cursor with this iRoot.
Only screw with the buffer if we can seek, otherwise we lose data buffered from fifos and sockets
Only shared Btrees are on the list.
Only supports a architecture-dependent binary dump format at the moment.
Only the first 63 columns are considered.
Only the first error is ok
Only the hashes of the objects are stored, so this uses relatively little memory.
Only the journal header is written.
Only the master can perform this operation.
Only the non-zero members must be set.
Only the value 1 matters for class_one_char, so don't increase it if it is already 2 or more ...
Only these flags are set.
Only to silence a warning.
Only truncate if it is an in-memory sub-journal.
Only use a point that is in the image.
Only used in legacy parse mode
Only used to silence a warning.
Only valid for Gregorian calendar, commented out as we don't handle Julian calendar.
Only valid for real tables, no pseudotables
Only valid in paren mode
Only way this happens is if file is opened with NO_DEFAULT_CONTEXT param, but then something is called which requires a context.
Only works with FreeTDS.
Oops, someone binding the same variable - clone
Op when arg present, or -1 if not allowed
Op when no arg, or -1 if arg mandatory
Opaque type used by code in vdbesort.c
Opaque type used by the explainer
Opcode Helper Macros
Opcode for update hook: SQLITE_UPDATE or SQLITE_INSERT
Opcode not accepted
Opcode of pRight
Opcode pointer.
Opcode that opens the sorter
Opcode to add sorter record to sorter
Opcodes that must match a character
Open ICU Transliterator.
Open ICU collator.
Open Options
Open a cursor on zDoc/nDoc.
Open a directory handle within a phar archive
Open a phar file for streams API
Open a read-only cursor on the index being analyzed.
Open a read-only cursor, execute the OP_Count, close the cursor.
Open a temporary file.
Open a token cursor on the document.
Open a transaction on the database file.
Open an already loaded phar
Open an ephemeral index to use for the distinct set.
Open and close a Pager connection.
Open and close a connection to a write-ahead log.
Open conch file
Open connection to the WAL file
Open destination file
Open existing file, or create if it doesn't exist
Open file descriptor
Open file descriptor of file being opened
Open file descriptor on path
Open file handle on the write-ahead log file.
Open for Appending
Open for reading
Open for writing
Open it now if this is the case.
Open it now so this can happen.
Open mode flags
Open origin file
Open page 1 of the file for writing.
Open page to move
Open proxy lock file
Open save handler.
Open session handler first
Open the backend database driver
Open the case.dat file.
Open the cmbcl.dat file.
Open the comp.dat file.
Open the connection to the log file.
Open the ctype.dat file.
Open the database file.
Open the decomp.dat file.
Open the file.
Open the index sub-system
Open the journal file if it is not already open.
Open the kdecomp.dat file.
Open the master journal.
Open the num.dat file.
Open the output file.
Open the pager file.
Open the sorter cursor if we are to use one.
Open the sqlite_stat1 table on this cursor
Open the storage sub-system
Open the sub-journal, if it has not already been opened
Open the table.
Open the target database
Open transactions both databases.
OpenBSD and older Darwin lack TLS support
OpenSSL 1.0.2 deprecates RSA_generate_key
OpenSSL 1.0.2 removes SSLv2 support entirely
OpenSSL includes
Opening a db handle.
Opening flags
Opening highlight
Opens a file, only if it exists.
Operand Format codes
Operand decoding codes
Operand size override
Operand-sized immediate, possibly 64 bits
Operand-sized immediate, possibly big
Operands of the opcode used to ends the loop
Operates at least on doubleword.
Operation       NULL
Operation       Savepoint Name
Operation performed by this node
Operational flags
Operations on page references.
Operator for the combined expression
Operators and special symbols
Operators defined in FIPS 180-2:4.1.2.
Optimal text encoding
Optimization for if no strip flags are set
Optimize RocksDB.
Optimize adding the first item.
Optimize one-character ranges.
Optimize register allocation: use a real register.
Optimize the case of adding the range to the end.
Optimize the cases of extending the last range and adding new ranges to the end.
Optimize using call-graph
Optimized for English alphabet.
Optimized version
Optimized versions
Optimizing character pairs, if their difference is power of 2.
Option to allow processing of unassigned codepoints in the input
Option to check for whether the input conforms to the BiDi rules.
Option to check for whether the input conforms to the CONTEXTJ rules.
Option to check if input conforms to STD-3 ASCII rules
Option to prohibit processing of unassigned codepoints in the input and do not check if the input conforms to STD-3 ASCII rules.
Optional WHERE clause to be added
Optional block size to use
Optional column name list for the table
Optional database for lookaside.
Optional list of result-set columns
Optional list of view column names
Optional parameters
Optional second parameter is a regular expression for filtering directory contents.
Optional work factor to use
Optionally, the connect can be made asynchronously, which will implicitly enable non-blocking mode on the socket.
Options and Configuration
Or NULL If the cursor id does not exist.
Or NULL if those keywords are omitted.
Or break out of the loop if it is not.
Or clear otherwise.
Or else it will cause ORA-1406 error in OCIStmtExecute
Or if a malloc failure occurred.
Or if it is a non-periodic sample.
Or if zWord is not a keyword, return 0.
Or one of 719 other combinations might be used.
Or the PK cursor for WITHOUT ROWID
Or the key itself if intkey flag is set.
Or to a non-unique first byte after study
Or to just after a linebreak for a multiline match
Or, if an error occurs, an SQLite error code is returned.
Or, if it is zero, in ascending order.
Oracle LOBS are 1-based, but PHP is 0-based
Oracle doc says don't free Implicit Result Set handles
Oracle error number
Order of Phis is importent, Pis must be placed before Phis
Order of subpattern matches
Original I/O methods for close
Original JSON string
Original KeyInfo on the sorter table
Original SQL parameter values
Original SQL values of parameters
Original code is from TCL8.3.0 and bears the following copyright: This software is copyrighted by the Regents of the University of California, Sun Microsystems, Inc., Scriptics Corporation, and other parties.
Original list of tables
Original lockingcontext to restore on close
Original name
Original name of the table
Original number of pages in file
Original schema cookie in destination
Original text of the default value
Original text of the expression
Original value of iSize
Original, innermost WhereClause
Originally, PCRE did not allow repetition of assertions, but now it does, for Perl compatibility.
Originally, the table contained pointers to the name strings in the first field of each entry.
Originally, this function checked according to RFC 2279, allowing for values in the range 0 to 0x7fffffff, up to 6 bytes long, but ensuring that they were in the canonical format.
Originally, this function only recognized a sequence of letters between the terminators, but it seems that Perl recognizes any sequence of characters, though of course unknown POSIX names are subsequently rejected.
Originally, this space was supposed to be taken from the current stack frame of the caller, but that method cannot be made to work for some implementations of C, for example under Gould's UTX/32.
Originates in ON/USING clause of outer join
Other brackets simply allocate the next entry.
Other cases already resolved by constant folding
Other characters: check option setting
Other classes are built from combinations.
Other compilers don't.
Other drivers will bork
Other initializations.
Other inp_flags.
Other instructions
Other kinds of condition fail.
Other matching errors are not recoverable.
Other processes may hold and obtain new SHARED locks.
Other recursion is handled here.
Other than true/false setting
Other things people escape, but shouldn't need to, so we disallow them
Otherwise 0.
Otherwise 1.
Otherwise NULL.
Otherwise PHP-compare.
Otherwise SQLITE_OK is returned.
Otherwise SQLITE_OK.
Otherwise an SQLite error code.
Otherwise an overriding method in a child class may be called.
Otherwise fall back to the default logging location, if we have one
Otherwise fall through to the next case
Otherwise fall through to the next instruction.
Otherwise fall through.
Otherwise false.
Otherwise further processing may be required.
Otherwise getput_arg_fast would capture it.
Otherwise it is a lowercase u letter.
Otherwise it is a lowercase x letter.
Otherwise it is false.
Otherwise it leads to false matches in memdup check.
Otherwise it needs to clear out its own stack frame and continue the execution on the backtrack code paths.
Otherwise it returns with a value outside the range.
Otherwise it returns with zero.
Otherwise it's a cross-join edge.
Otherwise look for the name.
Otherwise no conversion occurs.
Otherwise original str param.
Otherwise return NULL.
Otherwise return false.
Otherwise returns NOT_AVAILABLE or NOT_INITIALIZED
Otherwise see if some other process holds it.
Otherwise the file would typically be slightly larger.
Otherwise the string is length encoded.
Otherwise the user wanted to delete the group.
Otherwise there is just one following character
Otherwise this case would be handled by the normal code path.
Otherwise update the main code pointer to the end of the group.
Otherwise use extra data.
Otherwise use no affinity.
Otherwise useTempTable is true
Otherwise we can fall through and treat it the same as any other subpattern.
Otherwise we could have been able to skip that step.
Otherwise we have data available to PASS_ON Swap the brigades and continue
Otherwise we must pick up the subject character.
Otherwise we will have to do send two TCP packets, or do new alloc and memcpy.
Otherwise we would need a facility to handle such exceptions in that handler.
Otherwise we're in runtime
Otherwise you get the following error.
Otherwise, 0 is returned.
Otherwise, SQLITE_OK is returned.
Otherwise, SQLITE_OK.
Otherwise, THEN is passed back to an outer alternative.
Otherwise, a copy of the buffer is made.
Otherwise, allocate and return a new page buffer.
Otherwise, an IO error code is returned.
Otherwise, an SQLite error code is returned.
Otherwise, an SQLite error code.
Otherwise, arrange to run another match at the same point to see if a non-empty match can be found.
Otherwise, artifacting occurs.
Otherwise, break everywhere.
Otherwise, carry on scanning after the subpattern.
Otherwise, check for recursion here.
Otherwise, do nothing.
Otherwise, ensure the vector for holding the return data is large enough.
Otherwise, ensure we
Otherwise, fall through to the next instruction.
Otherwise, fall thru into the TK_COLUMN case
Otherwise, flush the current node of layer iLayer to disk.
Otherwise, if "previous" is NULL, reset the current code pointer to the start.
Otherwise, if an error occurs, an SQLite error code is returned.
Otherwise, if minimizing, keep trying the rest of the expression and advancing one matching character if failing, up to the maximum.
Otherwise, if no such function exists, return NULL.
Otherwise, if there's a dval or no need to check for a full match, stop when there are too many digits for a long
Otherwise, if we know what the first byte has to be, save it, because that speeds up unanchored matches no end.
Otherwise, invoke it for the database named zDb only.
Otherwise, it is always set to zero.
Otherwise, it means we have failed to find a non-empty-string match at a point where there was a previous empty-string match.
Otherwise, it must be initialized.
Otherwise, it returns SQLITE_OK.
Otherwise, just insert the unique subpattern number.
Otherwise, just report that they are block special files and go on to the next file.
Otherwise, keep going.
Otherwise, leave it unchanged.
Otherwise, leave the firstchar value alone, and don't change it on a zero repeat.
Otherwise, load it into memory.
Otherwise, non-zero.
Otherwise, only column iCol is considered.
Otherwise, pass back the return code unaltered.
Otherwise, return 0.
Otherwise, return 1.
Otherwise, return an SQLite error code.
Otherwise, return an error code to the caller.
Otherwise, return an error code.
Otherwise, return zero.
Otherwise, scan the individual branches of the group.
Otherwise, set it NULL.
Otherwise, set the length to the length of what was matched by the referenced subpattern.
Otherwise, the argument is a column name.
Otherwise, the following function call is a no-op.
Otherwise, the following line sets YYVAL to garbage.
Otherwise, the original item is left in place and, if the maximum is greater than 1, we use OP_UPTO with one less than the maximum.
Otherwise, there can be no first char if this item is first, whatever repeat count may follow.
Otherwise, treat the ORDER BY term as an ordinary expression
Otherwise, true.
Otherwise, typedef it to int, because that's what libjpeg does if HAVE_BOOLEAN is not defined.
Otherwise, up to three octal digits are read to form an escaped byte.
Otherwise, use "rbu_rowid".
Otherwise, use RTREE_DEFAULT_ROWEST.
Otherwise, use a recursive call to add the additional range.
Otherwise, use form.
Otherwise, use the normal shared-memory.
Otherwise, we can check only ASCII characters.
Otherwise, we can use the vector supplied, rounding down its size to a multiple of 3.
Otherwise, we have a match.
Otherwise, we look if we have a TimeZone identifier
Otherwise, we need to find the next part of the namespace
Otherwise, when we are doing the actual compile phase, check to see whether this group is one that could match an empty string.
Otherwise, zero.
Othewise SQLITE_OK.
Our custom signal handler that calls the appropriate php_function
Our little 7-bit alpha channel trick costs us a bit here.
Our method of efficiently finding nearest colors is based on the "locally sorted search" idea described by Heckbert and on the incremental distance calculation described by Spencer W.
Our safety measure is meant to protect from such many-buggy to one-correct collisions, by deviating from the correct algorithm in such cases.
Out-of-Order hidden columns
Out-of-range pages are also skipped.
Outer conjunction
Output array
Output buffer
Output character index
Output code filter
Output dimensions, etc.
Output each row of result
Output flags returned to SQLite core
Output hashtable
Output iterator
Output leaf pages left to write
Output of a bcd number.
Output operand
Output pointer
Output poslist
Output register from the sorter
Output segment
Output should be DISTINCT
Output string - not real JSON
Output string with quoted characters
Output success/failure
Output the digits.
Output the final row of result
Output the number.
Output the single row in Current
Output value
Output values
Output values.
Output variables
Output variables.
Output vars
Output vector starting point.
Outputs: Outputs code to the file.
Outside a character class, the digits are read as a decimal number.
Overflow page pointer-map entry page
Overflow payload available for local storage
Overflows are sequential
Overflows in sorted order
Overload the start of match pointer to do this.
Overly paranoid
Override "include_path" modifier callback
Override SAPI callbacks
Override compiler
Override onError to this if not OE_Default
Override the gcc computation in this case.
Override them with ours
Overwhelmingly the most common.
Overwrite existing values that do exist.
Overwrite the passed-in value for subpatterns with an empty array.
P-box and S-box tables initialized with digits of Pi.
P3 Value for OP_VFilter
P3 is an integer rowid.
P3 is usually 0.
P4 is a 32-bit signed integer
P4 is a 64-bit floating point value
P4 is a 64-bit signed integer
P4 is a pointer to a CollSeq structure
P4 is a pointer to a FuncDef structure
P4 is a pointer to a KeyInfo structure
P4 is a pointer to a SubProgram structure
P4 is a pointer to a transient string
P4 is a pointer to an sqlite3_context object
P4 is a pointer to an sqlite3_vtab structure
P4 is a vector of 32-bit integers
P4 operand type
P4_STATIC or P4_TRANSIENT
P5 value for OP_Column
P5_ErrMsg type
PAGER_GET_NOCONTENT or PAGER_GET_READONLY
PAGER_GET_XXX flags
PAM Authentication
PARALLEL TO
PARAMETERS: PS_CLOSE_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS.
PARAMETERS: PS_DESTROY_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS or FAILURE.
PARAMETERS: PS_GC_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS or FAILURE.
PARAMETERS: PS_OPEN_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS or FAILURE.
PARAMETERS: PS_READ_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS or FAILURE.
PARAMETERS: PS_UPDATE_TIMESTAMP_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS or FAILURE.
PARAMETERS: PS_VALIDATE_SID_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS or FAILURE.
PARAMETERS: PS_WRITE_ARGS in php_session.h RETURN VALUE: SUCCESS or FAILURE.
PARTLY_WITHIN or FULLY_WITHIN
PASSIVE, FULL, RESTART, or TRUNCATE
PATH section entries are used per-request from down to top, each overriding previous if one exists.
PATH sections
PATH_INFO and PATH_TRANSLATED should always be munged
PCRE added it at release 8.34.
PCRE does not allow closing square brackets in POSIX class names.
PCRE is a library of functions to support regular expressions whose syntax and semantics are as close as possible to those of the Perl 5 language.
PCRE is thread-clean and doesn't use any global variables in the normal sense.
PCRE might get stuck if the input buffer is too big.
PCRE specific options
PCRE supports POSIX class stuff inside a class.
PCRE was changed at release 8.34.
PCRE_DEBUG is not defined when building a production library.
PCRE_ERROR_NULL means that the selected normal or partial matching mode is not compiled.
PCRE_EXTRA enables extensions to Perl in the matter of escapes.
PCRE_INCLUDED
PCRE_UTF16 has the same value as PCRE_UTF8.
PCache object
PDO_USE_MYSQLND
PGHDR flags defined below
PG_VERSION - libpq version
PGroup this cache belongs to
PHP 5.2 is the minimum supported version for OCI8 2.0
PHP 7 is the minimum supported version for OCI8 2.1
PHP Authentication support
PHP Includes
PHP Language
PHP Sendmail for Windows.
PHP-5.4 and above return "double", but we use 1 sec precision
PHP3 Internationalization support program.
PHP_BUNDLED_ONIG
PHP_CAN_SUPPORT_PROC_OPEN
PHP_GDIMG_TYPE_GIF PHP_GDIMG_TYPE_PNG PHP_GDIMG_TYPE_JPG PHP_GDIMG_TYPE_WBM PHP_GDIMG_TYPE_WEBP
PHP_HASH_MD5_NOT_IN_CORE
PHP_HASH_SHA1_NOT_IN_CORE
PHP_JSON_T_DOUBLE
PHP_JSON_T_EOI
PHP_JSON_T_ERROR
PHP_JSON_T_ESTRING
PHP_JSON_T_FALSE
PHP_JSON_T_INT
PHP_JSON_T_NUL
PHP_JSON_T_STRING
PHP_JSON_T_TRUE
PHP_OCI_MAX_DATA_SIZE,
PHP_OCI_RETURN_LOBS means that we want the content of the LOB back instead of the locator
PINFO ERROR CODES
PKCS12 funcs
PLUS, MINPLUS
PLUSI, MINPLUSI
PM_STYLE_STATIC
PORTABILITY Coded on RedHat Linux 6.2.
POSIX collating elements are not supported
POSIX named classes are supported only within a class
POSIX space
POSIX version
POSIX.1,  4.2
POSIX.1, 3.3
POSIX.1, 4.1
POSIX.1, 4.3
POSIX.1, 4.4
POSIX.1, 4.5
POSIX.1, 4.7
POSIX.1, 5.2
POSIX.1, 5.4
POSIX.1, 5.6
POSIX.1, 6.x most I/O functions already supported by PHP.
POSIX.1, 7.x tty functions, TODO POSIX.1, 8.x interactions with other C language functions POSIX.1, 9.x system database access
POSIX.1, 9.2
POS_COLUMN is 1.
POS_END is 0.
PPC doesn't like you re-using a va_list...
PQunescapeBytea - converts the null terminated string representation of a bytea, strtext, into binary, filling a buffer.
PQunescapeBytea returned an error
PRAGMA secure_delete is enabled
PRIMARY KEY changed in a WITHOUT ROWID table
PRIMARY KEY index for WITHOUT ROWID tables
PRIMARY KEY index, or NULL for rowid tables
PRIMARY KEY is the key
PROT_AUTH_PACKET
PROT_AUTH_RESP_PACKET
PROT_CHANGE_AUTH_RESP_PACKET
PROT_CHG_USER_RESP_PACKET
PROT_CMD_PACKET
PROT_EOF_PACKET
PROT_GREET_PACKET
PROT_OK_PACKET
PROT_PREPARE_RESP_PACKET
PROT_ROW_PACKET
PROT_RSET_FLD_PACKET
PROT_RSET_HEADER_PACKET
PROT_SHA256_PK_REQUEST_PACKET
PROT_SHA256_PK_REQUEST_RESPONSE_PACKET
PROT_STATS_PACKET
PS has already allocated it
PS_USE_CHANGE_ARGV
PS_USE_CHANGE_ARGV or PS_USE_CLOBBER_ARGV
PS_USE_CLOBBER_ARGV
PS_USE_NONE
PS_USE_PSTAT
PS_USE_PS_STRINGS
PS_USE_WIN32
PUA for CP950
Pacify GCC's 'empty if-body' warning.
Pacify GCC's `empty if-body' warning.
Pacify compilers like GCC when the user code never invokes YYERROR and the label yyerrorlab therefore never appears in user code.
Packed key if the btree is an index
Packed packet headers, main header
Packed packet headers, tile part header
Packet length, main header
Packet length, tile-part header
Pad block to 56 bytes
Pad out to 112 mod 128.
Pad out to 118 mod 128.
Pad out to 56 mod 64
Pad out to 56 mod 64.
Pad state to finalize
Pad transactions out to the next sector
Padding value obviously
Page 1 of the database file
Page 1 only.
Page Allocation/SQLITE_CONFIG_PCACHE Related Functions
Page being freed.
Page cache allocations
Page cache memory
Page containing pPayload
Page containing the cell
Page content
Page header size.
Page in use, not on the LRU list
Page into which we are copying
Page is on the PCache.pDirty list
Page is pinned until released.
Page iter.iLeaf must now be the rightmost leaf-page in the segment
Page not on the PCache.pDirty list
Page number
Page number array
Page number array for hash table
Page number corresponding to btterm
Page number for first page in the list
Page number for this page
Page number obtained
Page number of current leaf page
Page number of free-list trunk page
Page number of pNew
Page number of the frame
Page number of the new child page
Page number of the next source page to copy
Page number of the page to check
Page number to clear
Page number to fetch
Page number to obtain
Page number to read
Page numbers of new pages before shuffling
Page p itself has already been visited.
Page size according to the log
Page size can no longer be changed
Page size for host database
Page size must be a power of 2
Page size of main database
Page to add cells to
Page to delete cell from
Page to edit
Page-size field of journal header
Page-type flage for the root page of new table
PageWriter object
Pager associated with pBt
Pager object
Pager object associated with page pPg
Pager object to allocate and return
Pager page handle
Pager structure
Pager.pageSize bytes of space for tmp use
Pages from root to current page
Pages in wal
Pages in wal - keys for the sort
Pages journalled since last j-header written
Pages of work to do
Pairwise merge
Palette based to palette based
Palette image, or something coerced to be one
Parameter iDocid is the docid of the new row.
Parameter parsing.
Parameter to the watching thread
Parameters : format     The format string.
Parameters passed to SQL geom function
Parameters to CREATE TABLE statement
Parameters to bind
Parameters: dst - Image to draw the transformed image src - Source image dstX - X position in the destination image dstY - Y position in the destination image src_area - Rectangular region to rotate in the src image  Returns: GD_TRUE if the affine is rectilinear or GD_FALSE
Parameters: dst - Pointer to a gdImagePtr to store the created image, NULL when the creation or the transformation failed src - Source image src_area - rectangle defining the source region to transform dstY - Y position in the destination image affine - The desired affine transformation  Returns: GD_TRUE if the affine is rectilinear or GD_FALSE
Parameters: dst - Where to store the resulting affine transform  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: dst - Where to store the resulting affine transform angle - Rotation angle in degrees  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: dst - Where to store the resulting affine transform angle - Shear angle in degrees  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: dst - Where to store the resulting affine transform m1 - First affine matrix m2 - Second affine matrix  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: dst - Where to store the resulting affine transform offset_x - Horizontal translation amount offset_y - Vertical translation amount  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: dst - Where to store the resulting affine transform src_affine - Original affine matrix flip_h - Whether or not to flip horizontally flip_v - Whether or not to flip vertically  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: m - The affine transformation  Returns: GD_TRUE if the affine is rectilinear or GD_FALSE
Parameters: m1 - The first affine transformation m2 - The first affine transformation  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: scale_x - X scale factor scale_y - Y scale factor  Returns: GD_SUCCESS on success or GD_FAILURE
Parameters: str - string to be converted from,to - one-symbol label of source and destination charset The following symbols are used as labels: k - koi8-r w - windows-1251 i - iso8859-5 a - x-cp866 d - x-cp866 m - x-mac-cyrillic
Paranoid check for integer overflow
Parent class.
Parent frame
Parent key index for this FK
Parent node
Parent of this frame, or NULL if parent is main
Parent page of siblings being balanced
Parent row data starts here
Parent table of FK constraint pFKey
Parent table of FK pFKey
Parent table of foreign key pFKey
Parent table that child points to
Parent tokenizer instance
Parent tokenizer module
Parse Composite Document Files, the format used in Microsoft Office document files before they switched to zipped XML.
Parse XML packet
Parse a MATCH expression.
Parse a new one and add it to the cache, returning either SUCCESS or FAILURE, and setting pphar to the pointer to the manifest entry  This is used by phar_open_from_filename to process the manifest, but can be called directly.
Parse a new one and add it to the cache, returning either SUCCESS or FAILURE, and setting pphar to the pointer to the manifest entry  This is used by phar_open_from_fp to process a zip-based phar, but can be called directly.
Parse any width specifier.
Parse arguments
Parse array
Parse context
Parse context for sub-vdbe
Parse context to store any error in
Parse context.
Parse number
Parse object
Parse of the input JSON
Parse options
Parse parameters.
Parse string
Parse the filename/URI argument.
Parse the instructions in the bundle.
Parse the offset.
Parse the type.
Parse through the leading whitespace, and display a warning if we get to the end without encountering a delimiter.
Parse through the options, setting appropriate flags.
Parsed MATCH query string
Parsed information on cells being balanced
Parser context
Parser context.
Parser parses the tokens and passes the name/value pairs to the callback function which stores them in the configuration hash table.
Parser state when parsing URI
Parsing and code generating context
Parsing context
Parsing context for error messages
Parsing context to record errors
Parsing context used to create this Vdbe
Parsing context.
Parsing contexts
Parsing succeeded as a multi-byte sequence
Part of a compound query
Part of a multi-token phrase.
Part of a parenthesized FROM clause
Part of the record being decoded
Partial Index Expression
Partial index inappropriate for this query
Partial match
Partial matching mode.
Partial short
Partially uploaded
Parts of this file is based on code from the OpenVSwitch project, that  is released under the Apache 2.0 license and is copyright 2014 Nicira, Inc.
Pass back current position
Pass back the character offset and error code for an invalid string if a results vector is available.
Pass back the position in the pattern so that it can be displayed to the user for diagnosing the error.
Pass invalid mode to OCIConnectionPoolCreate
Pass the expected checksum down to the FTS index module.
Passed as opaque in malloc callbacks
Passing NULL remove the existing comment
Passing NULL to HeapFree is undefined.
Passing a value less than or equal to zero turns off all busy handlers.
Passing modules with full path is not supported for dynamically loaded extensions
Password used to authenticate
Patch up the ORDER BY clause
Path by which to filter zJson
Path of the file to examine
Path to page from root
Path to rbu db
Path to target db
Path to this element
Path to this page
Pathname of file to be opened
Pattern offset
Pause time in microseconds
Pcache object page handle
Pending terms hash table to add entry to
Pending terms table for this index
Per request and per thread, if applicable
Percent symbol.
Perform addition: N1 is added to N2 and the value is returned.
Perform median-cut to produce final box list
Perform splice
Perform subtraction: N2 is subtracted from N1 and the value is returned.
Perform the match
Perform the requested scanning operation.
Perform whatever processing is required and return.
Performed when YYTABLE does not specify something else to do.
Performed when YYTABLE doesn't specify something else to do.
Performs an Invoke on the given com object.
Perhaps even use queue itself to have a list of cursors.
Perhaps it is best to leave it un-implemented.
Perhaps the caller will want to call strcmp to break the tie.
Perhaps we should just compute leading 28 bits of S once and for all and pass them and a shift to quorem, so it can do shifts and ors to compute the numerator for q.
Perhaps we should keep this brigade hanging around and try to write it later.
Perl and POSIX space are the same
Perl compatible options
Perl gives an error if they are encountered at the top level, so we'll do that too.
Perl has changed over the years.
Perl recursion/subroutine syntax
Perl space used to exclude VT, but from Perl 5.18 it is included, which means that Perl space and POSIX space are now identical.
Perl style string increment
Perl treats a hyphen as a literal in such circumstances.
Permission granted to use, copy, modify, distribute and sell so long as the above copyright and this permission statement are retained in all copies.
Permission is granted to anyone to use this software for any purpose, including commercial applications, and to alter it and redistribute it freely, subject to the following restrictions:  1.
Permission is granted to anyone to use this software for any purpose, including commercial applications, and to alter it and redistribute it freely, subject to the following restrictions: 1.
Permission to use, copy, modify, and distribute this software for any purpose without fee is hereby granted, provided that this entire notice is included in all copies of any software which is or includes a copy or modification of this software and in all copies of the supporting documentation for such software.
Permissions to create file with
Permutation of columns for OP_Compare
Persistent WAL mode
Persistent connection stubs are also counted as they have private session pools
Persistent connections have private session pools
Persistent connections: For old close semantics we artificially bump up the refcount to prevent the non-persistent destructor from getting called until request shutdown.
Persistent connections: two list-types le_pconn, le_conn and a plist where hashed connection info is stored together with index pointer to the actual link of type le_pconn in the list.
Persistent font cache until explicitly cleared
Phase 1: hash password
Phase 2: hash sha1
Phrase and token index, respectively
Phrase expression
Phrase expression node
Phrase number
Phrase object
Phrase object to advance to next docid
Phrase object to initialize
Phrase to advance token of
Phrase to append to
Phrase to merge pList/nList into
Phrase to return doclist for
Pick up where we left off
Pick which browser pattern replaces the least amount of characters when compared to the original user agent string...
Pierre: crop everything sounds bad
Ping loop: Ping and loop till we get a good connection.
Place e-SSA pis.
Place phis after pis
Plain old inconsistency/typo/bug
Plane 15 private use
Plane 16 private use
Planning to make it even more clever in the future.
Plausibility checks
Playback and delete the journal.
Please feel free to add more valitions.
Please follow this convention for the convenience of others editing your code.
Please keep the same order as in fpm_conf.h and in php-fpm.conf.in
Please preserve the runtime self-test.
Please send bug reports to David M.
Pluggable cache module
Plus 1 if this entry carries the "delete" flag.
PmaReader from which to take the blob
PmaReader to populate
Point the object iterator at the first object
Pointer into the body of aDoclist
Pointer map 'page-no' entry for pDbPage
Pointer map 'type' entry for pDbPage
Pointer map page data
Pointer map page index
Pointer p currently points at the first byte of an offset list.
Pointer to 1 byte past end of doclist
Pointer to BtShared that this page is part of
Pointer to DNS_RECORD structure
Pointer to Fts5Global object
Pointer to Fts5InsertCtx object
Pointer to HighlightContext object
Pointer to MatchInfo structure
Pointer to TK_STRING expression with pattern prefix
Pointer to a new child page
Pointer to a single WhereLoop object
Pointer to a static string
Pointer to allocated object to return
Pointer to allocated vtab
Pointer to allocation
Pointer to an array of results
Pointer to application-specific data
Pointer to array of page numbers
Pointer to buffer
Pointer to buffer containing block data
Pointer to buffer containing doclist
Pointer to buffer containing name
Pointer to buffer containing record
Pointer to buffer containing root node
Pointer to buffer containing string
Pointer to buffer containing term
Pointer to buffer containing token
Pointer to buffer to copy data from
Pointer to busy-handler function
Pointer to bytes counter
Pointer to cell to delete
Pointer to cell-pointer area
Pointer to child node
Pointer to corresponding expr token
Pointer to current cell in pPage
Pointer to current file mapping
Pointer to current key
Pointer to current poslist
Pointer to current term
Pointer to cursor object to return
Pointer to data for pPg
Pointer to data part of aFrame buffer
Pointer to data to append to buffer
Pointer to disk image of the page data
Pointer to doclist
Pointer to doclist buffer
Pointer to doclist for this term
Pointer to doclist of current entry
Pointer to entire doclist
Pointer to filter object
Pointer to first byte after the header
Pointer to first entry with this hash
Pointer to first in list of synonyms
Pointer to function information
Pointer to hash bucket
Pointer to hash table
Pointer to hash table to clear
Pointer to int
Pointer to interior tree structure
Pointer to left-most node of this depth
Pointer to list of ongoing backup processes
Pointer to mapping of entire file
Pointer to module implementation
Pointer to multitasking thread giveup.
Pointer to new Btree object written here
Pointer to new system call value
Pointer to next docid
Pointer to next record in list
Pointer to nul-term of zCopy
Pointer to one byte after EOF
Pointer to one journal within MJ file
Pointer to one of the indices
Pointer to padding string
Pointer to page cache object
Pointer to page data
Pointer to phrase counter
Pointer to phrase expression
Pointer to position list following iDocid
Pointer to position list for phrase
Pointer to previous term buffer
Pointer to return
Pointer to right-sibling
Pointer to sampled record
Pointer to save as auxdata
Pointer to sqlite3_int64 variable
Pointer to start of phrase position list
Pointer to string from which to read char
Pointer to sub-list content
Pointer to task common address block.
Pointer to term buffer
Pointer to the "extra" space
Pointer to the appropriate info structure
Pointer to the cell text.
Pointer to the conversion buffer
Pointer to the data to be bound
Pointer to the end of the file
Pointer to the index object
Pointer to the minor token to shift in
Pointer to the rbu_vfs object
Pointer to the rightmost select in sub-query
Pointer to the root node of a tree
Pointer to the start of payload
Pointer to the subexpression that is this term
Pointer to token
Pointer to tokenizer hash table
Pointer to value 1
Pointer to value 2
Pointer to vfs object
Pointer to virtual tables needing locking
Pointer to vtab instance
Pointer to wal-index content in memory
Pointer to write buffer
Pointer value
Pointers first.
Pointers to instances of struct Trigger are stored in two ways.
Pointers to names of parameters
Pointers to phrase objects
Pointers to the body of overflow cells
Pointers to the extension init functions
Points after the current instruction.
Points for polygon
Points to definition if a view.
Points to our private memory word on the stack.
Points to the last matched capture block index.
Points to the marked string.
Points to the starting opcode.
Points to the starting position of the current match.
Points to the structure shared across all PHP processes
Pop FAST_CALL from unwind stack
Pop all X509 from Stack and free them, free the stack afterwards
Pop all events from the shared list
Pop the current state because it cannot handle the error token.
Pop the loop variable stack separator
Populate key if passed
Populate new node buffer
Populate our return value data structure here.
Populate the PagerSavepoint structures just allocated.
Populate the argument registers.
Populate the coverage-checking heap for leaf pages
Populate the overflow cache.
Populate the register containing the index name.
Populate this object
Populate this structure before returning.
Portions of this code are based on Berkeley's uuencode/uudecode implementation.
Position at the first row
Position in FROM clause of table for this loop
Position just read from pList
Position list
Position list data following iHead
Position list data following iTail
Position list for deferred tokens
Position list to iterate through
Position lists for current row
Position of last value written
Position of next token
Position of term for entry to add
Position of token in phrase
Position of token in zText
Position of token within column
Position read from poslist
Position term appears in
Position-list
Position-list terminator
Positive Steps
Positive forward assertions
Positive forward assertions and conditions
Positive lookahead
Positive lookbehind
Positive steps
Poslist buffer to iterate through
Poslist of this iterator
Possessifying an EXACT quantifier has no effect, so we can ignore it.
Possessive quantifiers can use a special case.
Possible Content-Type:
Possible E_STRICT error message
Possible covering index for WHERE_MULTI_OR
Possible values for Rtree.eCoordType:
Possible values for RtreeConstraint.op
Possibly new term to test
Possibly relative input path
Possibly, skip spaces/tabs at the end of line
Post handlers are stored in the thread-local context.
PostgreSQL 7.4 or later
PostgreSQL is released under the PostgreSQL License, a liberal Open Source license, similar to the BSD or MIT licenses.
PostgreSQL wants params in the connect string to be separated by spaces, if the PDO standard semicolons are used, we convert them to spaces
Potential error situation - eg: no space on device.
Powers of two are not biased
PragTyp_XXX value
Pragma Name     1st arg or NULL
Pre-allocated UnixUnusedFd
Pre-allocated buffer
Pre-compile phase
Pre-existing files can be appended, truncated, or read.
Pre-fill cross axis dimensions when the child is using stretch before we call the recursive layout pass
Pre-fork or spawn, if required
Pre-initialize the runtime synchronization objects
Preallocated space for the PCache
Preallocated, blank file handle
Precision of the current field
Precompiled statements used by the implementation.
Precomputed device characteristics
Predefined entities will expand unless no cdata handler is present
Prefer to null the destructor
Preference to built-in funcs
Preferred text encoding
Prefix character.
Prefix for optional rounds specification.
Prefix query
Prefix the character ch to the string str Increase length Set the has_prefix flag
Preliminary specification: http://wp.netscape.com/newsref/std/cookie_spec.html "This is based on RFC 822, RFC 850,  RFC 1036, and  RFC 1123, with the variations that the only legal time zone is GMT and the separators between the elements of the date must be dashes."
Premature EOF.
Prepare argv
Prepare for input from a gdIOCtx stream.
Prepare for output to a stdio stream.
Prepare for the next round.
Prepare for the real work.
Prepare num.
Prepare search path
Prepare socket address
Prepare sum.
Prepare the arguments.
Prepare the option character and the argument string.
Prepare to listen
Prepare value
Prepare variable name
Prepared statement
Prepared statement being queried
Prepared statement for which info desired
Prepared statement in use by the cursor
Prepared statement under construction
Prepared statements under construction
Preprocess format into formatcodes and formatargs
Prerequesites of pExpr
Prerequisites
Prerequisites of the new entry
Prescan some rows of pixels.
Preserve the application id
Preserve the default page cache size
Preserve the text encoding
Preserve the user version
Preset error values: no error propagated to first pixel from left
Pretend to compile the pattern while actually just accumulating the length of memory required.
Pretend we already have a lock
Pretend we are in EXCLUSIVE mode
Pretend we have a string_key here
Prevent any values from flowing into irreducible loops by replacing all incoming values with explicit phis.
Prevent compiler "uninitialized" warning
Prevent derived classes from restricting access that was available in parent classes
Prevent endless loops on corrupt database files
Prevent from freeing
Prevent overflow error/crash
Prevent overflow error/crash ...
Prevent recursion
Prevent reentrant calls to the same user ticks function
Prevent reentrant handler calls
Prevent the single-thread code below
Prevent update of the snmpapp.conf file
Prevents a race condition.
Previous block size: 0 - This is the first block of the memory chunk.
Previous content.
Previous docid stored in doclist
Previous element in list of dirty pages
Previous id read from aDoclist
Previous in LRU list of unpinned pages
Previous index in the loop
Previous letter.
Previous result register.
Previous revisions of the code would do explicit cleanups, but simply running the self-test after hash computation is more reliable.
Previous row content
Previous row data is stored here
Previous rowid value written to page
Previous rowid written to current leaf
Previous term
Previous term written to new node
Previous thread used to flush PMA
Previous value read from pgidx
Previous value written into pgidx
Previous with the same zTo
Previously generated index key
Previously obtained value for P4
Previously saw an Implicit Result Set in an earlier invocation of php_oci_fetch_row
Previously set handler must have been saved before.
Previously we used strtol here, not is_numeric_string, and strtol gives you LONG_MAX/_MIN on overflow.
Primary key declaration for imposter
Print a bit map
Print a sequence of chars in printable format, stopping at the end of the subject if the requested.
Print a string containing C character escapes.
Print a summary line giving, the command, its alias and tip
Print an error with magic line number.
Print client stats
Print its message, with a blank before it if the previous item printed and this item isn't empty.
Print message header according to RFC 822
Print out aliases for all commands except help as this one comes last
Print out aliases for help as this one comes last, with the added text on how aliases are used
Print out the compiled data if debugging is enabled.
Print the digits on the stack.
Print the instructions in the bundle.
Print the string s.
Printf format string to append
Prior index
Prior journalmode
Prior select in a compound select statement
Prior to 8.13, all atomic groups were handled this way.
Priority queue for search points
Private control structure number for microtasking.
Private flags added to firstchar and reqchar.
Private functions
Private subobject
Probability of truth for this expression
Probes stack depth:
Problem reported by Andreas Pfaller.
Proceed to ICU
Process HTTP status codes
Process ID for pid based multi-tasking.
Process LEN bytes of BUFFER, accumulating context into CTX.
Process NATURAL keywords, and ON and USING clauses of joins.
Process all bytes in the buffer with 128 bytes in each round of the loop.
Process all bytes in the buffer with 64 bytes in each round of the loop.
Process all the continuations of that match before returning.
Process as many whole blocks as remain
Process available complete blocks.
Process component 0
Process component 1
Process component 2
Process data in 64-byte chunks
Process each potentially referenced group.
Process group
Process last bytes.
Process nested bracketed regex.
Process old session data
Process soap headers
Process string values only.
Process symbolic control-flow constraints
Process the LIMIT and OFFSET clauses, if they exist
Process the ORDER BY clause for singleton SELECT statements.
Process the header info
Process the next pattern item.
Process the remaining bytes in the internal buffer and the usual prolog according to the standard and write the result to RESBUF.
Processing continues and no error is reported.
Processing for ref-cursor out binds
Produce the multibyte output
Profiling function
Program counter
Program implementing pTrigger/orconf
Program instructions for parent frame
Progression order change
Promote any segments that should be promoted as a result.
Promote anything this size or smaller
Propagate these bits up tree
Property already exist - make array
Property management
Protect against corrupt headers
Protect the quoted characters.
Protects class' refcount, copies default properties, functions and class name
Protocol must be "tcp" or "udp"
Provides leaky bucket handhsake renegotiation rate-limiting
Provides mmap function.
Proxy HTTP Authentication
Pseudo pass through to catch level validating code
Pseudo-random number used for sampling
PseudoTable input register
Pseudotable used to decode sorting results
Ptr to head of pagers backup list
Public functions
Pull a 32-bit integer from the generator state Every other access function simply transforms the numbers extracted here
Pull data from this table
Pull parsers.
Pull the requested columns.
Pulling in the header ensures that the array gets flagged as "someone outside this compilation unit might reference this" and so it will always be supplied to the linker.
Pure parsers.
Pure red always maps to 6 in this implementation.
Push FAST_CALL on unwind stack
Push a new event in the shared list and wakeup the OCaml thread
Push a separator to the loop variable stack
Push an empty string, so that we at least have an xslt result...
Push its first rowid up to the new root.
Push parsers.
Pushing the constant pool into the instruction stream.
Pushing the starting string pointer.
Put all the names into a single string, in order to reduce the number of relocations when a shared library is dynamically linked.
Put any active cursors into REQUIRE_SEEK state.
Put buffered data together with inbound for a single block
Put checksum in context given as argument.
Put error message here if not 0
Put in the magic number, and save the sizes, initial options, internal flags, and character table pointer.
Put key-value
Put out the final code.
Put result from CTX in first 32 bytes following RESBUF.
Put result from CTX in first 64 bytes following RESBUF.
Put saved Parse.zAuthContext here
Put sent value in the target VAR slot, if it is used
Put the expression object together.
Put the new key into this register if not 0
Put the pointer back and fall through
Put the results here
Put the tokens into the symbol table, so that GDB and other debuggers know about them.
Putting the top-level on the stack rather than malloc-ing them all gives a performance boost in many cases where there is not much "recursion".
Putting this code right at the start ensures that comments have no bad side effects.
Python-style named subpattern handling
QUERY, MINQUERY
QUERYI, MINQUERYI
Q_Next only moves in the direction from the head of the queue to the tail.
Quadratic filter, default radius 1.5
QuadraticBSpline filter, default radius 1.5
Qualify the filename so that DosQueryAppType does not do extraneous searches.
Quantifier options
Quantities of days, hours, minutes, and seconds can be specified without explicit unit markings.
Quantization component
Quantization default
Quasi-random value added to every checksum
Query column to extract text from
Query flattening
Query for existance of table only
Query for next idx at level iLevel
Query prefix
Query prefix, if any
Query the WAL sub-system for the database size.
Query the schema of the main database.
Query the value of journalmode
Query used to initialize the table
Queue cannot distinguish between pointers to literals and malloced memory.
Queue cursor left on position found item else at end.
Quick and dirty octal conversion.
Quick check.
Quote character
R-tree structure
READ_LOCK or WRITE_LOCK
RECURSE, CALLOUT
REFERENCES  Conversions Between Calendar Date and Julian Day Number by Robert J.
REFERENCES  I have found no detailed, authoritative reference on this calendar.
REG_ECOLLATE
REG_EESCAPE
REG_EONIG_BADARG
REG_EONIG_BADWC
REG_EONIG_INTERNAL
REG_EONIG_THREAD
REG_ESUBREG
REG_NOMATCH
REG_STARTEND is a BSD extension, to allow for non-NUL-terminated strings.
REINDEXEDESCAPEACHECKEYBEFOREIGNOREGEXPLAINSTEADDATABASELECT
REMEMBER TO ADD MIME-TYPE TO FUNCTION php_image_type_to_mime_type
REMOVED by TBB 2/12/01.
RENAME TO or ALTER TABLE ...
REPLACE_CONFIG
REPLACE_CONTENT
REPLACE_DOCSIZE
REQ_UNSET means "no char matching encountered yet".
RESULT XMLRPC_VALUE - newly created value, or NULL if fatal error.
RESULT XMLRPC_VALUE a newly created struct vector representing the error, or null on error.
RESULT fault code, else 0.
RESULT fault string, else 0.
RESULT void NOTES Data is set/stored/retrieved as passed in, but is base64 encoded for XML transfer, and decoded on the other side.
RESULT void NOTES Normally this function will be called for the topmost vector, thus free-ing all children.
RETURN_ADDR is not a saved register.
RFC 1951 Deflate
RFC 1951 Inflate
RFC 2822 2.2.
RFC 7230 ch.
RFC850, Section 2.1.4: http://www.ietf.org/rfc/rfc850.txt Format must be acceptable both to the ARPANET and to the getdate routine.
RHS always has 2 or more terms...
RHS is a blob
RHS is a string
RHS is an integer
RHS is entirely deferred.
RHS is null
RHS is real
RHS must not overlap with this mask
RHS of LIKE/GLOB ends with wildcard
RHS of LIKE/GLOB operator
RHS of comparison
RIGHT DOUBLE QUOTATION MARK
RIGHT SINGLE QUOTATION MARK
RIGHT_SHIFT provides a proper signed right shift of an INT32 quantity.
RIGHT_SHIFT rounds towards minus infinity, so adding 8 is correct for either sign of the error value.
RIP-relative in amd64 mode
RN, Image and tile size
RO, Codeing style defaulte
RO, Quantization default
ROTATE_LEFT rotates x left n bits.
ROUND_BIASED_without_Round_Up
ROW-MAJOR IN GD 1.3
ROWID value for this entry
RSA Data Security, Inc.
RSA_PKCS1_OAEP_PADDING is recommended for new applications.
RTD key is placed after lcname literal in op1
RTREE_COORD_REAL32 or RTREE_COORD_INT32
RTREE_GT or RTREE_GE,  or fallthrough of RTREE_EQ
RTREE_LE and RTREE_LT end here
RTree to search
Raise BASE to the EXPO power, reduced modulo MOD.
Raise NUM1 to the NUM2 power.
Raise warning and return NULL by checking client_encoding.
Ran out of input before finding an opening bracket.
Ran out of input before finding the table name.
Ran out of polynomials
Randomly chosen byte used as a shared lock
Range between -1 and -32768 is covered above.
Range of content
Range of registers allocated for aCol and aFunc
Range of registers hold conent for pIdx
Range of registers holding conflicting PK
Rare case of a really large header
Rare ocasion.
Rate-limit client-initiated handshake renegotiation to prevent DoS
Rather than swallow a low surrogate, just stop if we hit a bad one.
Rather than swallow a surrogate, just stop if we hit one.
Rather than swallow random bytes, just stop if we hit a bad one.
Rather, it is intended to be plugged into apps or libraries with existing networking facilities, eg PHP, apache, perl, mozilla, home-brew application servers, etc.
Raw cell content
Raw cell content as appears on disk
Raw hash value of the key
Raw index records are transferred in the same way.
Raw text of the SQL statement
Re-enable queue
Re-enable the lookaside buffer, if it was disabled earlier.
Re-initialization should be tried here.
Re-insert the contents of any underfull nodes removed from the tree.
Re-open the databases.
Re-position to original element
Re-set to the beginning
Reached end of array
Reached end of range
Read a lookahead token if we need one and don't already have one.
Read a numeric value from a pointer, into the value union of a magic  pointer, according to the magic type.
Read a page from the write-ahead log, if it is present.
Read a resource from a thread's resource storage
Read a specific resource from the thread's resources.
Read a string from the file descriptor and print it.
Read all fields metadata
Read all frames from the log file.
Read an unsigned value.
Read and decode the next log frame.
Read and uncompress an entire chunk.
Read and write return code from here
Read and write the xxx_node table
Read and write the xxx_parent table
Read and write the xxx_rowid table
Read blob data into this buffer
Read body until EOF
Read field, leaving bptr pointing at start of next field
Read in the WAL header.
Read in the complete content of the index entry
Read in the first 8 bytes of the journal header.
Read input from all segments in the input level
Read is required to make new session data at this point.
Read it now.
Read metadata only if there is actual result set.
Read position list size
Read session data from opened resource.
Read the DACL from the original file, so we can copy it to the temp file.
Read the PK into an array of temp registers.
Read the compressed header
Read the data...
Read the database schema.
Read the extra info in the gd2 header.
Read the first integer value
Read the header
Read the header.
Read the length of the section.
Read the master journal name from the journal, if it is present.
Read the nKeep field of the next term.
Read the next journal header from the journal file.
Read the page-size and sector-size journal header fields.
Read the schema cookie from the database.
Read the schema information out of the schema tables
Read the sector allocation table.
Read the serial types for the next element in each key.
Read the socket ACL
Read the specified cookie value
Read the values returned by the SELECT into local variables.
Read the wal-index header.
Read the whole section.
Read this many bytes
Read what's available and proceed disregarding whether len could be exhausted or not.
Read-only page is acceptable
Read-only system table
Reader marks
Reader object
Reader to advance to next docid
Reader whose cursor is to be moved
Reading the hostname and its optional non-default port number
Readr data from the file.
Reads all the pending commands and executes them
Reads the character into TMP1, keeps STR_PTR.
Reads the character type into TMP1, updates STR_PTR.
Reads the precise character type of a character into TMP1, if the character is less than 128.
Real value of left operand
Real value of right operand
Real value used when MEM_Real is set in flags
Reallocate string and return it
Really a cast to BLOB
Really complex instruction form for branches.
Reapply raw input
Reapply symbol table
Rearrange the actual queue into correct order
Reattach the ORDER BY clause to the query.
Rebalance the expression.
Rebuild buffer zval
Rebuild cookies, env vars etc.
Rebuild it from scratch instead.
Recast strcpy to handle unsigned chars used below.
Recently parsed phrase
Reclaim all malloced memory.
Reclaim all memory used by the VDBE
Reclaim all memory used.
Reclaim all memory.
Reclaim garbage, defined as all alloca'd storage that was allocated from deeper in the stack than currently.
Reclaim memory used by a Stat4Sample
Recompute the master chunk as the largest free chunk.
Reconstruct SSA
Record a pointer to the logger function and its first argument.
Record best loops here, if not NULL
Record changes in the file format
Record pRec is equal to sample i
Record that it changed in the external options
Record that this module has started
Record the actual number of property lists.
Record the final value.
Record the instruction used to terminate the loop.
Record the trait from which this alias was resolved.
Record this fact.
Record to decode
Record to read varints from
Record where we ended
Recovery action to do in case of an error
Recurse captures then.
Recurse once.
Recurse, adding values as we go.
Recursion either matches the current regex, or some subexpression.
Recursion group number
Recursion or subroutine
Recursive brace globbing helper.
Recursive calls are specified by the macro RMATCH and RRETURN is used to return.
Recursive control verb management chain.
Recursive divide and conquer multiply algorithm.
Recursive function, which scans prefix literals.
Recursive representation
Recursive vs non-recursive multiply crossover ranges.
Recursively call checkTreePage on all children.
Recursively resolve names in all subqueries
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted only as authorized by the OpenLDAP Public License.
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions are met:  1.
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions are met: 1.
Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions are met: Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright notices, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright notice immediately at the beginning of the file, without modification, this list of conditions, and the following disclaimer.
Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright notices, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
Reduce angle to within 0..360 degrees
Reduce fieldlen by 1 if we have char data.
Reduce the key first
Reduction in fragmentation
Ref: ftp://ftp.ora.com/pub/examples/nutshell/ujip/doc/japan.inf-032092.sjs
Refcount for pOuterNC and outer contexts
Refer to the stacks through separate pointers, to allow yyoverflow to reallocate them elsewhere.
Reference counted destructor function
Reference or recursion
Reference page
Reference to an unidentified subpattern.
Reference to page 1
References to objects are treated as if the reference didn't exist
Referrals are not handled automatically.
Refine the salt first
Reflect pattern for debugging output
Refs more than one table
Refuse to draw if no style is set.
Refuse to fill to a non-solid border
Refuse to load if this wasn't a threasafe library loaded
Reg with value of this column.
Region of interest
Region to retrieve
Register 'BreakIterator' class
Register 'Collator' PHP class
Register 'DateFormat' PHP class
Register 'IntlCalendar' PHP class
Register 'IntlException' PHP class
Register 'IntlIterator' PHP class
Register 'IntlPartsIterator' class
Register 'IntlTimeZone' PHP class
Register 'Locale' PHP class
Register 'Normalizer' PHP class
Register 'NumberFormatter' PHP class
Register 'ResourceBundle' PHP class
Register 'Spoofchecker' PHP class
Register 'Transliterator' PHP class
Register Allocations
Register B67 contains the address of the end of the current stack segment.
Register P3 must not be one of the function inputs.
Register PHP core ini entries
Register SNMP Class
Register SNMP Class properties
Register SNMPException class
Register SQL function on this connection
Register SQLite 3 Class
Register SQLite 3 Prepared Statement Class
Register SQLite 3 Result Class
Register SoapClient class
Register SoapFault class
Register SoapParam class
Register SoapServer class
Register SoapVar class
Register Transliterator constants
Register Zend ini entries
Register __COMPILER_HALT_OFFSET__ constant
Register allocations
Register base class
Register constant for options and errors
Register constants
Register containing index name
Register containing table name
Register destination.
Register for RowSet object
Register for ephem table rowid
Register for rowset of rows to delete
Register holding Current table
Register holding ROWID value
Register holding an index key
Register holding an index record
Register holding assembled index record
Register holding assembled record for the table
Register holding block-output return address
Register holding co-routine entry-point
Register holding largest rowid for AUTOINCREMENT
Register holding max rowid
Register holding maximum rowid
Register holding operands
Register holding previous generated key
Register holding pseudotable content.
Register holding results
Register holding return address of addrFillSub
Register holding root page number for new objects
Register holding rowid
Register holding rowid of CREATE TABLE entry
Register holding the AUTOINCREMENT counter
Register holding the offset counter
Register in which Expr value is cached
Register in which to assemble record
Register init.
Register input.
Register interfaces
Register keeping track of errors remaining
Register mangled variable
Register namespaces in the node
Register storing resulting
Register that is true if RHS contains NULL values
Register that records whether NULLs exist in RHS
Register the derived class
Register to allocate runtime space
Register to copy from
Register to copy to
Register to hold Stat4Accum object
Register to hold key for checking the FK
Register to hold name of table
Register to hold packed record
Register to hold temp table ROWID
Register used by each index.
Register used with OP_Gosub
Registers for holding the start boundary
Registers holding data and rowid
Registers holding results of a co-routine
Registers to hold a row from pTab
Registers used by LIMIT and OFFSET
Registration / unregistration
Regs for sorter record
Regular CHUNKs reserve a single page at start for special purpose.
Regular expression
Regular function
Reinstall the LIKE and GLOB functions.
Relabel R/G/B as components 0/1/2, respecting the RGB ordering defined in jmorecfg.h.
Relative path open
Release memory back to the heap
Release memory from the SQLITE_CONFIG_SCRATCH allocation
Release memory used for the compiled pattern
Release resources associated with connection
Release the array of temp registers
Release the checkpointer and writer locks
Release the connection to underlying pool.
Release the locks
Release the locks.
Release the memory used for the compiled pattern
Release the page reference.
Release the provider handle.
Release the reader lock held while backfilling
Release the reference to the new page.
Release the reference to the root node.
Release the semaphore if it has been acquired but not released.
Release what we had, if we had
Release/Acquire the system-level lock
Releases a lock for SHM access
Releases the cgo traceback context.
Releasing a pending lock
Releasing a reader lock or an exclusive lock
Releasing a reserved lock
Reload the schema of the modified table.
Reload the table, index and permanent trigger schemas.
Relocate STACK from its old location to the new one.
Remaining string
Remap the PNG palette to put the entries with interesting alpha channel values first.
Remap to the palette available in the destination image.
Remember file position of image data.
Remember how much was scanned to save rescanning
Remember if locale was changed
Remember reference counters before calling destructors
Remember rowid changes made by xFunc
Remember the current position, and return the MATCH_KETRPOS.
Remember the earliest consulted character for partial matching.
Remember the rowid of every item to be updated.
Remember to change this if the number of directives change
Remember to efree it when done with it.
Remember where this code item starts so we can pick up the length next time round.
Remember where we started
Remember whether this is a variable length repeat
Remember, it's a colour circle
Remember, preserve vowels at the beginning
Remember, zeros on the end of num2 are wasted effort for dividing.
Remove PCRE cache entries with inconsistent keys
Remove a FD from the fd set
Remove a FD from the kevent queue
Remove a directory within a phar archive
Remove all entries from a hash table.
Remove already sent session ID cookie.
Remove caseless flag for non-caseable chars
Remove cells from the start and end of the page
Remove connection p from the blocked connections list.
Remove duplicates.
Remove either the OP_OpenWrite or OpenRead.
Remove everything after the first null
Remove for recursive calls
Remove if there's nothing to do at request end
Remove if there's nothing to do at request start
Remove leading/training white spaces on search_string
Remove newlines and spaces from start and end.
Remove notices
Remove pPage from dirty list
Remove pParent from the original tree.
Remove page from cache
Remove result from a UNION index
Remove terms smaller than this
Remove the FK from the fkeyHash hash table.
Remove the caseless flag for non-caseable bytes.
Remove the cell from the node.
Remove the cursor from the Fts5Global.pCsr list
Remove the entire input segment.
Remove the entry in the parent cell.
Remove the following function when you have successfully modified config.m4 so that your module can be compiled into PHP, it exists only for testing purposes.
Remove the hash entry if present
Remove the page from the files free-list.
Remove the redundant segments from the input level
Remove the search point with the lowest current score.
Remove the shared lock before trying the range.
Remove the slot from the free-list.
Remove the trailing ","
Remove the unserialised properties, since we now have the elements within the spl_fixedarray_object structure.
Remove the xxx_node entry.
Remove the xxx_parent entry.
Remove these first.
Remove thumb mode flag.
Remove trailing white space and nulls chars from unpacked data
Remove trailing zeros and the "." if no digits follow the "."
Remove unconsumed buckets from the brigade
Remove values captured in destructors
Removed because this can not be safely done, e.g. in this situation: Object 1 creates object 2 Object 3 holds reference to object 2.
Removes a key from the hash table.
Removes an entry, either by actually removing it or by marking it.
Removing a return type is not valid.
Rename FROM
Rename an fts3 table.
Rename an fts5 table.
Rename directory.
Rename the new to the old.
Rendering buffer
Reparse everything to update our internal data structures
Repeated character flags.
Repeatedly run the collected hash value through SHA256 to burn CPU cycles.
Repeatedly run the collected hash value through SHA512 to burn CPU cycles.
Repeatedly select and split the largest box until we have enough boxes
Repeating a DEFINE group is pointless, but Perl allows the syntax, so we just ignore the repeat.
Replace any previously installed collation sequence factory.
Replace exception handling so the catchable fatal error that is thrown when a class without __toString is converted to string is converted into an exception.
Replace pTo with the candidate.
Replace the last recently used
Replace with JsonNode.iVal
Replace with NULL if there's nothing to do at request end
Replace with NULL if there's nothing to do at request start
Replacement array
Replacement string
Replacement value when JNODE_REPLACE
Replacement values
Replaces single character iterations with their possessive alternatives if appropriate.
Report about uncaught exception in case of fatal errors
Report errors here
Report errors here, if not NULL
Report failure to filter_alloc
Report malloc errors here
Report malloc errors to this connection
Report the old value.
Report two lines per PC returned by traceback, to test more handling.
Reqchar followed non-literal item
Request Time
Request a pointer to the required page from the VFS
Request alpha blending.
Request content, such as for POST requests
Request is out of range.
Request permission to read the parent key columns.
Request the current charset, or it will be reset to the system one.
Require a write-lock on the table to perform this operation
Required collating sequence, if not NULL
Required file size
Required mapping size
Required space after adding zTerm
Required table locks for shared-cache mode
Required to catch very short invalid data.
Requires rather complex checks.
Requires two instruction.
Reserved for Cray Research.
Reserved for future use
Reserved for user.
Reset / free active_ini_sectin global
Reset Long Data
Reset a JsonEachCursor back to its original state.
Reset active ini section
Reset all of our flags
Reset and close the cache object
Reset capture count for each branch
Reset child margins before re-layout as they are added back in layoutNode and would be doubled
Reset flag as XML_SAX2_MAGIC is needed for xmlCreatePushParserCtxt so must be set in the handlers
Reset for start of next match attempt
Reset head and drop saved frame.
Reset high-water mark if true
Reset in-process realpath cache
Reset it to the correct value for this process.
Reset label length counter
Reset lineno for final opcodes and errors
Reset literal state
Reset max_execution_time
Reset schema after an error if positive
Reset stack.
Reset stream's internal read buffer since the filter is "holding" it.
Reset string length, but don't free the reserved buffer
Reset the bracket count and the names_found field.
Reset the checkpoint-header.
Reset the code to MATCH_NOMATCH for subsequent checking.
Reset the inverse color map
Reset the policy
Reset the scanner for scanning the new file
Reset the start of match point
Reset the working variable associated with each extraction.
Reset to top of main for loop to allow for code to do necessary wrapping/encoding.
Reseting/initializing
Resize an allocation
Resize the array if necessary.
Resize the hash table so that it cantains "new_size" buckets.
Resize the range list if necessary.
Resolve all names in the ORDER BY term expression
Resolve classes for all precedence operations.
Resolve function names
Resolve indirection.
Resolve names in all CHECK constraint expressions.
Resolve names in table-valued-function arguments
Resolve names in the result set.
Resolve open_basedir to resolved_basedir
Resolve path relatively to state and put the real path into state
Resolve the GROUP BY clause.
Resolve the column names in the WHERE clause.
Resolve the expressions in the LIMIT and OFFSET clauses.
Resolve the references in the WHERE clause.
Resolve the servers IP
Resource tags is a big part of what we created, but NetWare doesn't ask us to free those.
ResourceBundle functions
Response for one-way opearation
Response only.
Rest are not deeper.
Rest of input range
Restore Content-Type Header
Restore clip if required
Restore executor globals
Restore fudged end_subject
Restore handler in case of error on Windows Not sure if this applicable on Win but just in case.
Restore if not zero length.
Restore old TZ info
Restore options
Restore original chunk size now that we're done with headers
Restore originals
Restore previous private_data_ptr
Restore saved collator.
Restore table -- usually faster then memset'ing the table on every invocation
Restore the R registers that need to be reserved.
Restore the S registers.
Restore the return address.
Restoring previous options
Restrict matches to these columns
Restrict matches to this column
Restriction 18.
Restriction 20
Restrictions on range of iteration
Result accumulator
Result code
Result code from subfunctions
Result code from subroutine call
Result code from this function
Result code of a subroutine
Result code stored here
Result codes from subroutines
Result is a column
Result of a Windows lock call
Result of a successful parse
Result of comparison operation
Result of custom function
Result of last OP_Compare operation
Result of prior seek or 0 if no USESEEKRESULT flag
Result of query pNextIdx
Result of replacement
Result of special query
Result of the comparison of pIn1 against pIn3
Result of xTask
Result pgno must be greater than iMin
Result returned by the thread
Result set can follow UPSERT statement, check server_status
Result set of the query
Result set.
Result string
Result written here
Resulting string
Results are equal
Results are not equal
Results of parsing argc/argv
Results of the query
Results stored in register inReg
Results: FAILURE or SUCCESS.
Results: None.
Results: Returns non-zero if the character matches the given set.
Results: Returns the next format position.
Resume execution
Retain the highest bracket number, in case resetting was used.
Retreive the text stored in column iCol.
Retries and formats text from the phpdbg help text table
Retrieve a copy of the file information on a single file within a phar, or null.
Retrieve the current mutex implementation
Retrieve unencoded data that is found before encoded data
Retry with substituting invalid chars on fail.
Return -1 if an error occurs.
Return -1 if not found.
Return 0 for success, non-zero for failure.
Return 0 if new item added, error code if memory couldn't be allocated.
Return 0 if not found.
Return 0 if not.
Return 1 if any of these are found.
Return 1 if it does and 0 if not.
Return 1 if the time and date cannot be found.
Return 1 on success.
Return 1 or 0.
Return 2 if the required number of bytes is too large to store.
Return Code
Return FAILURE, if querystring is empty
Return MARK data if requested
Return NULL if not found.
Return NULL if there are no matches.
Return NULL.
Return SQLITE_ABORT in this case.
Return SQLITE_NOMEM if a malloc fails, or SQLITE_OK otherwise.
Return SQLITE_NOTFOUND.
Return SQLITE_OK if they do, or SQLITE_CORRUPT if not.
Return SQLITE_OK on success.
Return SQLITE_ROW
Return TRUE if it is and FALSE if not.
Return TRUE if that list is constant.
Return TRUE to retry.
Return TRUE.
Return WRC_Prune on success.
Return a Found Redirect if one is not already specified
Return a meaningful error when no parameters were passed
Return a negative number if malloc fails.
Return a pointer to a TriggerStep structure.
Return a pointer to at least SIZE bytes of storage, which will be automatically reclaimed upon exit from the procedure that called alloca.
Return a pointer to it.
Return a pointer to its binary value.
Return a pointer to the allocated memory.
Return a pointer to the allocated object to the caller.
Return a pointer to the enlarged SrcList
Return a pointer to the new object.
Return a pointer to the node on success.
Return a random integer.
Return a success code.
Return a transient error.
Return a variable number of PC values.
Return address register for output subroutine
Return address register for reset subroutine
Return address register.
Return an already opened filename.
Return an empty array if this class implements no interfaces
Return an empty array in case no static variables exist
Return an error code if anything goes wrong.
Return an error code to the caller if an IO error occurs.
Return an error code.
Return an error if we get here
Return an error in either case.
Return an error message.
Return any I/O error from the restore operation.
Return at least 1
Return back from CONN_QUERY_SENT
Return cde from function - usually 0
Return char value in TMP1, length in TMP2.
Return closest available color
Return code
Return code for this function
Return code from execution
Return code from service routines
Return code from subfunctions
Return code from subprocedures
Return code from subroutines
Return code of various sub-routines
Return collator's last error code.
Return control to the parent frame.
Return correct grandfathered language tag
Return early if an error occurs here.
Return early if an error occurs.
Return early if not found.
Return exact match color
Return failure if at end of input.
Return false if it is ok.
Return false if we can't find argv.
Return flag - no operand
Return formatter's last error code.
Return global server.
Return if don't need to do anything.
Return if the frame is not valid.
Return last error message.
Return last line from the shell command
Return leaving the pointer at the terminating char.
Return merged result.
Return newly allocated color
Return no rowids earlier than this
Return no rowids later than this
Return non-zero on an OOM error
Return number of characters processed so far.
Return number of matching commands from a command table.
Return original arg.
Return result of the comparison.
Return results here
Return segments in order from oldest to newest.
Return successfully.
Return the 0...11 month number.
Return the MARK data if it has been requested.
Return the Rtree of a RtreeCursor
Return the address of the new instruction.
Return the amount of time slept.
Return the bits for this operand to be ORed into an existing bundle.
Return the current rowid value
Return the cursor integer id number.
Return the day within the month
Return the equivalent native integer
Return the header size
Return the index of this cell.
Return the length of YYSTR.
Return the module configuration
Return the new character
Return the new journal mode
Return the new name length.
Return the next entry on the list
Return the next pixel from the image
Return the number of bytes actually read.
Return the number of bytes read.
Return the number of cells in a node
Return the number of days between jan 01 1601 and jan 01 of year.
Return the number of errors.
Return the number of rows that were deleted.
Return the page in this parameter
Return the rest of the data as unencoded, as it was either unencoded or was missing separators which rendered the remainder of the string impossible for us to decode.
Return the result code.
Return the result of the comparison.
Return the result.
Return the results
Return the size in bytes of a PCache object.
Return the size of an allocation
Return the tail.
Return the total number of outstanding page references
Return the total number of pages stored in the cache
Return the unicode value.
Return the unixInodeInfo object here
Return the value of a column
Return the value.
Return token
Return true if and only if an opcode was removed.
Return true if index X is a PRIMARY KEY index
Return true if index X is a UNIQUE index
Return true if it can be and false if not.
Return true if the cursor was opened using the OP_OpenSorter opcode.
Return true if they do.
Return true or false.
Return updated scan pointer as function result.
Return value
Return value - unused
Return value for this function
Return value from subprocedures
Return value in TMP1.
Return value is an array mapping phar index to actual files added.
Return value must be freed
Return with an error if the posted data is garbled
Return without doing anything
Return without further ado.
Return zero if no errors are seen.
Return zero.
Return-path, Received, Date, From, Subject, Sender, To, cc
Returning KERN_FAILURE lets the exception fall through to the next handler, which is the standard signal emulation code registered on the task port.
Returning KERN_SUCCESS intercepts the exception.
Returning an error code won't help matters.
Returns -1 if error or not in the open_basedir, else 0.
Returns -1 if not plausible, else the difference between the lowest and the highest fileposition reached
Returns -1 on failure, or non-negative file descriptor on success.
Returns 0 if successful, 1 if successful and wrote ZIP64 extra field.
Returns 0 if things went well, nonzero if errors occurred.
Returns 1 if the address is valid, 0 if not.
Returns 1 when source len is 0.
Returns NULL if hash is full Returns pointer the actual hash entry on success key needs to be already allocated as it is not copied
Returns NULL if no splittable boxes remain
Returns NULL if not found, or a pointer to the start of the first match.
Returns NULL if there hasn't been an error yet.
Returns PS_TITLE_SUCCESS if the OS supports this functionality and the init function was called.
Returns TRUE on success and FALSE on failure
Returns a new session.
Returns a struct zip_cdir which contains the central directory  entries, or NULL if unsuccessful.
Returns chartype in TMP1 and UCD offset in TMP2.
Returns copy of src
Returns false when the are no more messages
Returns from recursive calls
Returns from this function
Returns integer result when possible
Returns number of bytes added to buffer.
Returns number of freed bytes
Returns number of freed zvals
Returns old property if removed otherwise NULL
Returns size of dirent read if successful.
Returns the base opcode for repeated single character type opcodes.
Returns the bound socket, or -1 on failure.
Returns the current domain
Returns the current ps_buffer value into string.
Returns the data associated with key on success Returns NULL if data doesn't exist
Returns the function address that should be called, or NULL if no such function exists.
Returns the hash entry associated with key on success Returns NULL if it doesn't exist
Returns the hash table data if found and NULL if not.
Returns the image, or NULL upon error.
Returns the next CRLF terminated line from the client
Returns the number of bytes consumed from buf by the first filter in the chain.
Returns the number of bytes moved.
Returns the output if TRUE is specified for return, printing it otherwise.
Returns the previously defined error handler, or false on error
Returns the previously defined exception handler, or false on error
Returns the value associated to a given key.
Returns true if it does, and false if the code indicates success or a warning.
Returns true if it succeeded, false otherwise
Returns true if the key is present.
Returns true to the fake Closure's __invoke
Returns with 0 if not possible.
Returns with error when an invalid argument is passed.
Returns with the othercase.
Returns zero if successful.
Reuse old pages where possible.
Reuse one of those pages.
Reuse the function descriptor if possible.
Reverse order to pop values off ctxt stack
Reverse the order of IN operators
Reverse unordered SELECTs
Revert SCC order
Reverting stack is needed.
Revision 1.5  2001/09/29 21:58:05  danda adding cvs log to history section  10/15/2000 -- danda -- adding robodoc documentation TODO Nicer external API.
Richard Stevens p 298.
Right alphanum vs left general category
Right alphanum vs left particular category
Right and left size of LIKE operator
Right general category, left particular category
Right hand child expression
Right hand serial type
Right hand side of comparison
Right input list
Right now, there isn't any reason not to allow it.
Right operand
Right outer join
Right side of comparison
Right space vs left general category
Right space vs left particular category
Right subnode
Right table being joined
Right thing to do, but it breaks some legacy code.
Right word vs left general category
Right word vs left particular category
Right-hand Fts5SegIter
Rm and Rd must not be the same register.
Rol imm by rol.
Rollback any active transaction and free the handle structure.
Root BTree page for this table
Root frame of VDBE
Root node of rtree structure
Root node of the tree.
Root node of tree for this task
Root of NEAR expression
Root of NEAR/AND cluster
Root of current AND/NEAR cluster
Root of the input tree
Root of the new tree
Root of tree
Root page number of the table to be locked
Root page of PK index
Root page of b-tree
Root page of current object
Root page of index
Root page of scanned b-tree
Root page of table
Root page of table to open
Root page of the open btree cursor
Root pages return 0.
Rootpage of table being initialized
Rotate subkeys and do compression permutation.
Rotation is separate from addition to prevent recomputation.
Round away from zero
Round down if false
Round nByte up to the next valid power of two
Round off last digit
Round to NUMCOLORS levels of antialiasing for index color images since only 256 colors are available.
Round towards zero
Round up if true.
Round up request size to allocation size
Rounds a number to a certain number of decimal places in a certain rounding mode.
Routine for en/decoding data
Routine to run in a separate thread
Row is being deleted from this table
Row-major ever since gd 1.3
Rowid changed in a normal table
Rowid compenents
Rowid components
Rowid for current doc being written
Rowid for current entry
Rowid for record being decoded
Rowid for the inserted record
Rowid for this entry
Rowid for this leaf
Rowid in main table of the key
Rowid in sqlite_sequence
Rowid is stored in this register, if not zero
Rowid of final leaf block to traverse
Rowid of first leaf block to traverse
Rowid of last value written
Rowid of the next row to insert
Rowid to append
Rowid to delete
Rowid used for the averages record
Rows are coming out in undetermined order.
Rows come from source in GROUP BY order
Rows less than the lower bound
Rows less than the upper bound
Rows processed for all objects
Rows processed for current object
Rowset of rows to be updated
Rtree handle
Rtree node cache
Rtree table
RulesTransPHP
Run a separate WHERE clause for each term of the OR clause.
Run the BEFORE and INSTEAD OF triggers, if there are any
Run the actual search
Run the constructor if there is one
Run the next matching operation
Run the program
Run the progress counter just before returning.
Run through the tokenchars.
Run time client version
Run-cost of the new entry
Runtime cache relies on bound scope to be immutable, hence we need a separate rt cache in case scope changed
S Can't open file
S Can't remove file
S Closing zip archive failed
S Failure to create temporary file
S Read error
S Renaming temporary file failed
S Seek error
S Write error
SAPI Deactivate is called from two places: module init and request shutdown 2.
SAPI Modules
SCALE_MIN is the minimum scale for the result.
SCALE_MIN is the minimum scale of the result.
SCALE_MIN is to set the minimum scale of the result.
SCC with a single element
SCRIPT_NAME set to a URL path that could identify the CGI script rather than the interpreter.
SEE ALSO  SOURCE
SELECT can't initiate uncommitted DML.
SELECT may not be DISTINCT
SELECT may not be a compound query
SELECT may not have a GROUP BY clause
SELECT may not have a LIMIT clause
SELECT may not have a WHERE clause
SELECT may not have an ORDER BY clause
SELECT name ...
SELECT rowid ...
SELECT rowid FROM x ...
SELECT statement in which to make substitutions
SELECT statement or RHS of INSERT INTO SELECT ...
SELECT statement to encode
SELECT to the right of IN operator
SELECT used to determine types and collations
SELECTRACE_ENABLED
SEND_UNPACK may acquire references into the array
SERVER_NAME should also be defined at this stage..but better check it anyway
SET clause for UPDATE.
SET reads 4 input bytes in little-endian byte order and stores them in a properly aligned word in host byte order.
SETUP-INVARIANT above
SET_INEXACT
SHA256 Password
SHA256-based Unix crypt implementation.
SHA384 uses the exact same algorithm
SHA512-based Unix crypt implementation.
SHIFT_TEMPS must be included in the variables of any routine using RIGHT_SHIFT.
SHM region size
SHM was reinitialized.
SHOUDLNT HAPPEN
SHUTTERSPEED comes after EXPOSURE TIME
SIB byte required to avoid RIP based addressing.
SID constant is defined when non-cookie ID is used
SIGNED_COMPARE_SLOW
SIZEOF_LONG
SKIP passes back the next starting point explicitly, but if it is no greater than the match we have just done, treat it as NOMATCH.
SKIPZERO skips the bracket.
SLJIT_ARGUMENT_CHECKS
SLJIT_CONFIG_PPC_64
SLJIT_CONFIG_UNSUPPORTED
SLJIT_CONFIG_X86_32
SLJIT_CONFIG_X86_64
SLJIT_DETECT_SSE2
SLJIT_EXECUTABLE_ALLOCATOR
SLJIT_MIPS_R1
SLJIT_REWRITABLE_JUMP is 0x1000.
SLJIT_SINGLE_THREADED
SLJIT_UTIL_GLOBAL_LOCK
SLJIT_UTIL_STACK
SLJIT_VERBOSE
SNMP_CMD_GET SNMP_CMD_GETNEXT SNMP_CMD_WALK
SNMP_CMD_GETNEXT
SOAP 1.2 enc:id enc:ref
SOAP client calls this function to parse response from SOAP server
SO_BROADCAST is only applicable for UDP
SP based immediate.
SPACE and PXSPACE, 2nd value redundant
SPARE_RECV_FD
SPARE_RECV_FDS
SPARE_SEND_FD
SPARE_SEND_FDS
SPL_ITERATORS_H
SQL error or missing database
SQL function call context
SQL function return value
SQL name of the function.
SQL statement to delete rows
SQL statement, UTF-16 encoded
SQL statement, UTF-8 encoded
SQL statements
SQL to be evaluated
SQL used to determine first block
SQL used to determine iAbsLevel
SQL used to determine nLeafEst
SQL used to find output index
SQL-style comments from "--" to end of line
SQLITE_ABORT
SQLITE_AFF_BLOB
SQLITE_AFF_INTEGER
SQLITE_AFF_NUMERIC
SQLITE_AFF_REAL
SQLITE_AFF_TEXT
SQLITE_ALTER_TABLE
SQLITE_AMALGAMATION
SQLITE_AUTH
SQLITE_BUSY
SQLITE_CANTOPEN
SQLITE_CHECK_PAGES
SQLITE_CONSTRAINT
SQLITE_CORRUPT
SQLITE_DEBUG
SQLITE_EMPTY
SQLITE_ENABLE_COLUMN_METADATA
SQLITE_ENABLE_COLUMN_USED_MASK
SQLITE_ENABLE_DBSTAT_VTAB
SQLITE_ENABLE_EXPENSIVE_ASSERT
SQLITE_ENABLE_LOCKING_STYLE
SQLITE_ENABLE_MEMORY_MANAGEMENT
SQLITE_ENABLE_MEMSYS3
SQLITE_ENABLE_MEMSYS5
SQLITE_ENABLE_STAT3_OR_STAT4
SQLITE_ENABLE_STMT_SCANSTATUS
SQLITE_ERROR
SQLITE_FORMAT
SQLITE_FULL
SQLITE_HAS_CODEC
SQLITE_IGNORE_AFP_LOCK_ERRORS
SQLITE_IGNORE_FLOCK_LOCK_ERRORS
SQLITE_INTERNAL
SQLITE_INTERRUPT
SQLITE_IOCAP_POWERSAFE_OVERWRITE
SQLITE_IOERR
SQLITE_LOCKED
SQLITE_LOCK_TRACE
SQLITE_MEMDEBUG
SQLITE_MISMATCH
SQLITE_MISUSE
SQLITE_MUTEX_PTHREADS
SQLITE_MUTEX_W32
SQLITE_NOLFS
SQLITE_NOMEM
SQLITE_NOTADB
SQLITE_NOTFOUND
SQLITE_OK is returned in this case.
SQLITE_OK or ERROR
SQLITE_OMIT_ANALYZE
SQLITE_OMIT_ATTACH
SQLITE_OMIT_AUTHORIZATION
SQLITE_OMIT_AUTOINCREMENT
SQLITE_OMIT_AUTOMATIC_INDEX
SQLITE_OMIT_BETWEEN_OPTIMIZATION
SQLITE_OMIT_BTREECOUNT
SQLITE_OMIT_BUILTIN_TEST
SQLITE_OMIT_CAST
SQLITE_OMIT_COMPILEOPTION_DIAGS
SQLITE_OMIT_COMPLETE
SQLITE_OMIT_COMPOUND_SELECT
SQLITE_OMIT_CTE
SQLITE_OMIT_DECLTYPE
SQLITE_OMIT_DISKIO
SQLITE_OMIT_EXPLAIN
SQLITE_OMIT_FLAG_PRAGMAS
SQLITE_OMIT_FLOATING_POINT
SQLITE_OMIT_GET_TABLE
SQLITE_OMIT_HEX_INTEGER
SQLITE_OMIT_INCRBLOB
SQLITE_OMIT_INTEGRITY_CHECK
SQLITE_OMIT_LIKE_OPTIMIZATION
SQLITE_OMIT_LOAD_EXTENSION
SQLITE_OMIT_LOCALTIME
SQLITE_OMIT_LOOKASIDE
SQLITE_OMIT_OR_OPTIMIZATION
SQLITE_OMIT_PAGER_PRAGMAS
SQLITE_OMIT_PRAGMA
SQLITE_OMIT_QUICKBALANCE
SQLITE_OMIT_SCHEMA_PRAGMAS
SQLITE_OMIT_SCHEMA_VERSION_PRAGMAS
SQLITE_OMIT_SHARED_CACHE
SQLITE_OMIT_SUBQUERY
SQLITE_OMIT_TRACE
SQLITE_OMIT_TRIGGER
SQLITE_OMIT_TRUNCATE_OPTIMIZATION
SQLITE_OMIT_UTF16
SQLITE_OMIT_VACUUM
SQLITE_OMIT_VIEW
SQLITE_OMIT_VIRTUALTABLE
SQLITE_OMIT_WAL
SQLITE_OMIT_WSD
SQLITE_OMIT_XFER_OPT
SQLITE_OS_UNIX
SQLITE_OS_WIN
SQLITE_OS_WINCE
SQLITE_OS_WINRT
SQLITE_OS_WIN_THREADS
SQLITE_PAGER_PRAGMAS
SQLITE_PERM
SQLITE_PROTOCOL
SQLITE_RANGE
SQLITE_READONLY
SQLITE_SCHEMA
SQLITE_SOUNDEX
SQLITE_SO_ASC or SQLITE_SO_DESC
SQLITE_STATUS_MALLOC_COUNT
SQLITE_STATUS_MALLOC_SIZE
SQLITE_STATUS_MEMORY_USED
SQLITE_STATUS_PAGECACHE_OVERFLOW
SQLITE_STATUS_PAGECACHE_SIZE
SQLITE_STATUS_PAGECACHE_USED
SQLITE_STATUS_PARSER_STACK
SQLITE_STATUS_SCRATCH_OVERFLOW
SQLITE_STATUS_SCRATCH_SIZE
SQLITE_STATUS_SCRATCH_USED
SQLITE_SYSTEM_MALLOC
SQLITE_TEST
SQLITE_TOOBIG
SQLITE_USER_AUTHENTICATION
SQLITE_USE_FCNTL_TRACE
SQLITE_UTF16 is not used internally.
SQLITE_UTF16NATIVE
SQLITE_UTF8, SQLITE_UTF16BE or UTF16LE
SQLITE_UTF8, SQLITE_UTF16BE, SQLITE_UTF16LE
SQLITE_VDBE_COVERAGE
SQLITE_WIN32_FILEMAPPING_API
SQLITE_WIN32_HAS_ANSI
SQLITE_WIN32_MALLOC
SQLITE_ZERO_MALLOC
SQLSetConnectOption
SQLSetStmtOption
SQLSpecialColumns values
SQLStatistics values
SQLT_CHR is the default value when type was not specified
SQLite connection to register module with
SQLite error code
SQLite function call context
SQLite never tries to read past the end of a rollback journal file
SQLite scalar function context
SQLite will never do either.
SQLite will not operate with these drivers.
SSA construction, Step 1: Propagate "def" sets in merge points
SSA construction, Step 2: Phi placement based on Dominance Frontiers
SSA construction, Step 3: Renaming
SSE2 and immediate is not possible.
SSL config for this request
SSLv3/TLSv1
SSTH Exception: IS_LONG may be accepted instead as IS_DOUBLE
STACK_DIRECTION undefined
STACK_TOP is set by THEN.
STAR, MINSTAR
STARI, MINSTARI
START_GENERATED
STAT3 and STAT4 have a parameter on this routine.
STRACCUM_NOMEM or STRACCUM_TOOBIG
SUCCESS or FAILURE is returned and pphar is set to a pointer to the phar's manifest
SUPPORT_JIT
SUPPORT_UCP
SUPPORT_UTF
SYNC_NORMAL or SYNC_FULL for checkpoint
SYNC_NORMAL or SYNC_FULL for wal writes
SYNC_NORMAL or SYNC_FULL otherwise
SYSTEM RAND FUNCTIONS
Safe to add conntype_option, since 2 args was illegal
Safe to call as if the resource were freed then doc pointer is NULL
Same as aData for leaves.
Same as compile_stmt, but with early binding
Same for protocol, we don't support old protocol
Same for these
Same input and output
Same logic, code as darwin_386.c:/inittls, except that words are 8 bytes long now, and the thread-local storage starts at 0x60 on Leopard / Snow Leopard.
Same logic, code as gcc_android_amd64.c:/inittls.
Same logic, code as gcc_darwin_386.c:/inittls.
Same position as prev.
Same with OnigEncodingEUC_KR except the name
Samples of the left-most key
Sanity check
Sanity check: Assert that the IntValue is non-negative if it exists
Sanity checking on calling parameters
Sanity checking on other operands
Sanity checking on the page.
Sanity checks should be handled by pcre_exec.
Save a little file size by not saving the alpha channel.
Save all if zero
Save execution context in generator object.
Save for checking forward references
Save for later completion
Save for matching
Save for possessive optimizing
Save g for this thread in C TLS
Save number of bits
Save old TZ info
Save open slot
Save phar contents to disk  user_stub contains either a string, or a resource pointer, if len is a negative length.
Save previously registered signal handlers into orig_handlers
Save profiling information from this VDBE run.
Save start of previous item, in case we have to move it up in order to insert something before it.
Save the R registers that need to be reserved.
Save the S registers.
Save the char
Save the current term so that it can be used to prefix-compress the next.
Save the earliest consulted character, then skip to next op code
Save the file position of chunk index, and allocate enough space for each chunk_info block .
Save the flag and make sure then next arg is not the current flag.
Save the left position
Save the original values for the op_array, function table and class table
Save the positions of all other cursors open on this table.
Save the positions of any open cursors.
Save the positions of any other cursors open on this table.
Save the return address.
Save the start
Save the transparent color.
Save time in the pre-compile phase
Save time/memory when chain isn't specified
Save value before bracket
Saved LIMIT and OFFSET
Saved State
Saved key that was cursor last known position
Saved stack frames: Atomic blocks and asserts require reloading the values of private data when the backtrack mechanism performed.
Saved syscall error number
Saved value of the last insert ROWID
Saved xAuth pointer
Saving previous accept variables.
Saving the previous value.
Saving the previous values.
Saving the real start pointer is necessary.
Scale each row
Scale to 128 levels of alpha for gd use.
Scan a branch and compute the fixed length of subject that will match it, if the length is fixed.
Scan a floating point number
Scan a parenthesized group and compute the minimum length of subject that is needed to match it.
Scan a string up to width characters or whitespace.
Scan along the opcodes for this branch.
Scan an unsigned or signed integer.
Scan and parse any .ini files found in scan path if path not empty.
Scan backward.
Scan for a consonent
Scan for a vowel
Scan forward.
Scan from middle.
Scan past any delimiter characters before the start of the next token.
Scan past delimiter characters
Scan the JPEG headers.
Scan the list to check for duplicates.
Scan the number in.
Scan the pattern, compiling it into the a vector.
Scan the table of verb names
Scan the value from the temporary buffer.
Scan til non-octal
Scan to write OP_Explain opcode for
Scan visits at most 1 row
Scanner scans file for tokens and passes them to parser.
Scanning the necessary info.
Schema containing the table
Schema containing the trigger
Schema containing this index
Schema format version for this file
Schema of database iDb
Schema of the expression
Schema that contains this table
Schema to which this item is fixed
Schema used for this query
Schema validation options
Scope unset or equal to the function we compare to, and the alias applies to fn
Score for the new search point
Score of best match
Score of best snippet
Score of parent node
Score of this snippet
Scratch allocations
Scratch memory
Script is setting Content-length.
Search TEMP before MAIN
Search an ephemeral b-tree
Search constraints.
Search directory for matching names.
Search for a page near this one
Search for a recognized property name using binary chop
Search for a string in a fixed-length byte string.
Search for an existing entry that matching the canonical name.
Search for an existing statement.
Search for equality and range constraints on the "term" column.
Search for existing entry and if it does not exist create one
Search for last called user function
Search for source array matching the host from configuration_hash
Search for source array matching the path from configuration_hash
Search for such an entry.
Search for the end of the first line.
Search for the end of the position list within the current page.
Search for the end of the range, which is either the end of the input range, or a character that has zero or more than one other cases.
Search for the index that has the lowest scan cost.
Search for the parent.
Search for the required lock.
Search for this index expression
Search for wildcard matches instead
Search point for the the leaf
Search the UCD record for the character comes in TMP1.
Search the pathlist for any of a list of font names.
Search the rowid of the table
Search through to find the first varint with value 1.
Search/sort options
Searching for the first zero.
Second PmaReader to compare
Second and subsequent calls get processed here
Second argument to pass to callback
Second callback for SELECTs
Second code generation pass.
Second disjunct
Second doclist
Second entry.
Second instruction
Second list to merge
Second loop through list, now close all connections
Second part of index name.
Second part of the name of the table or view
Second sorted list to be merged
Second varint to store in hint
Second, try to get a magic file from Common Files
Section Filters
Section Filters Declarations
Section start
Sector size
Sector size doesn't matter for temporary files.
Sector-size field of journal header
See COLFLAG_ defines below
See GEMS I for the algorithm details
See README_PHP3-i18n-ja for more detail.
See RFC 1010 for values
See Sreedhar et al, "Identifying Loops Using DJ Graphs".
See XMLRPC_REQUEST_FromXML INPUTS in_buf -- character buffer containing XML len    -- length of buffer RESULT XMLRPC_VALUE -- newly allocated data, or NULL if error.
See _php_curl_close_ex
See `fsnotify_win/fsnotify.ml` for a general description.
See also "PRAGMA journal_size_limit".
See also MATCH_CONDASSERT below.
See also OP_SCopy.
See also section 8.1.3.
See bug 67397: overlong locale names cause trouble in uloc_getDisplayName
See bug35916.phpt for reference.
See can_cache above.
See comment below
See comment in the code for capturing groups above about handling THEN.
See comments at user semantic actions for why this is necessary.
See comments in hh_add about its similar construction here.
See comments with init_error_limit for rationale.
See further description below.
See gd_arc_f_buggy.c for a better version that doesn't seem to be bug-free yet.
See getput_arg below.
See golang.org/issue/12210.
See http://connect.microsoft.com/VisualStudio/feedback/details/759720/vs2012-strftime-crash-with-z-formatting-code
See http://support.microsoft.com/kb/190351
See http://swift.org/LICENSE.txt for license information See http://swift.org/CONTRIBUTORS.txt for the list of Swift project authors
See if CRLF is a valid newline sequence.
See if any siblings hold this same lock
See if it's a branch to an ancestor on the dominator spanning tree.
See if the checksum matches the master journal name
See if the next thing is a quantifier.
See if the server requested a close
See if there are any named substrings, and if so, show them by name.
See if we are dealing with a keyword.
See if we are dealing with a quoted phrase.
See if we can find a fixed set of initial characters for the pattern.
See if we have an exact match, if so, we're done...
See if we have to clean the wire
See more here: http://www.openssl.org/docs/crypto/RSA_public_encrypt.html
See more in the doc.
See my_getsystime.c for high res
See note about index shifting on OP_ReadCookie
See note above
See notes in update_box about scaling distances.
See original header:
See php's glob for the pattern syntax.
See php's pcre for the pattern syntax.
See sljit_emit_enter and sljit_emit_op0 if you want to change them.
See spl_filesystem_object_new_ex
See the AUTHORS file for names of contributors.
See the GNU General Public License for more details.
See the GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.
See the IJG JPEG library documentation for more details.
See the Lt opcode for additional information.
See the comment above for a rare situation in which the transparent pixel may not work properly with 16-bit channels.
See the comment below.
See the corresponding marks just before function definition, where the functions purpose is also documented.
See the file "license.terms" for information on usage and redistribution of this file, and for a DISCLAIMER OF ALL WARRANTIES.
See the macro definitions above.
See the manpage for details.
See the mkopcodec.awk script for details.
See the mkopcodeh.awk script for details
See zip_add.c for more details.
See: CODING_STANDARDS for details.
Seed only once
Seed the generator with a simple uint32
Seed the search with a single WherePath containing zero WhereLoops.
Seek back to the beginning and write the byte count.
Seek cursor iCur to the row to delete.
Seek opcode
Seek the cursor now.
Seek the index cursor to the start of the range.
Seek the table cursor, if required
Seems we have 3 bytes reserved for future use
Seg-reader cursor for this term
Seg-reader is at EOF.
Segid to write to
Segment "age".
Segment Prefix
Segment id to load from
Segment just written
Segment reader object
Segment term filter condition
Segment term filter configuration
Segment to check internal consistency
Segment to delete
Segment to iterate through
Segment-reader for this token
SegmentNode handle
SegmentWriter to flush to the db
Select a master journal file name
Select box to split.
Select from a "CREATE ...
Select statement to read idx values
Select the column is extracted from
Select the yet unassigned pipe.
SelectDest targetting the Queue table
Selected leaf node
Selects no more than one row
Semaphore functions using System V semaphores.
Send Host: header so name-based virtual hosts work
Send RETR/STOR command
Send a Connection: close header to avoid hanging when the server interprets the RFC literally and establishes a keep-alive connection, unless the user specifically requests something else by specifying a Connection header in the context options.
Send cookies along with request
Send data to a co-routine
Send flushed data to the stream
Send mail to all Bcc rcpt's This is basically a rip of the Cc code above.
Send mail to all Cc rcpt's
Send mail to all rcpt's
Send ourselves a SIGIO.
Send that header even for HTTP/1.0 to avoid issues when the server respond with a HTTP/1.1 keep-alive response, which is the preferred response type.
Send the gd2 id, to verify file format.
Send to GD File then Ptr
Send to GD2 File then Ptr
Send to PNG File then Ptr
Sends a command to the run loop thread by adding the command to the linked list of commands and then signaling the run loop thread through a pipe
Sends the first SIGSEGV and lets lldb catch the second one, avoiding a loop that locks up iOS devices requiring a hard reboot.
Separate commandline string into words
Separate file holding temporary table
Separate the UTF-8 code completely as that is tidier.
Separate the bound variables, which point to the result set, then destroy the set.
Separate the caseless case for speed.
Separate the left and the right query from one another
Separates integer and floating point registers
Sequence counter
Sequence number of leaf within tree
Serial type
Serial type of the rowid
Serial type to deserialize
Serializable
Serialization is not supported for anonymous classes
Server Functions
Server died - connection not usable.
Server variables
Servers need to load and assign CA names from the cafile
Session based file upload progress uses non-cookie ID.
Session creation returns OCI_SUCCESS_WITH_INFO when user's password has expired, but is still usable.
Session data will not be written
Session is now taken from the session pool and attached and open
SessionHandler class
SessionHandlerInterface
SessionIdInterface
SessionUpdateTimestampHandler class
SessionUpdateTimestampInterface
Sessions for non-persistent connections should be dropped.
Set 'compare function' according to sort flags.
Set Method Name to call
Set TMP_REG1 to the bit.
Set TRUE at EOF.
Set a SQLITE_TOOBIG error if no NULL
Set a flag to cause another lookbehind check at the end.
Set a new process title.
Set a prohibitively high cost.
Set after incrementing the change-counter
Set al to conditional flag.
Set and get the suggested cache-size for the specified pager-cache.
Set bit count to 0 and buffer to mysterious initialization constants.
Set bit for this starter
Set callback function
Set carry flag.
Set default precision
Set default values
Set defaults for non-supported filesystems
Set empty string
Set error messages.
Set executor globals
Set false for more content
Set final carry.
Set from environment variables
Set given strength.
Set global error code.
Set hard timeout
Set iBestLvl to the level to read input segments from.
Set idxFlags flags for all WHERE clause terms that will be used.
Set idxFlags flags for the ORDER BY clause
Set if global data is loaded
Set if thread is finished but not joined
Set initial value of temp.
Set initial values.
Set interlace.
Set isHighlight to true if this term should be highlighted.
Set isset fetch indicator here, opcache disallows runtime altering of the AST
Set it to INVALID_HANDLE_VALUE It will be initialized correctly in tsrm_win32_access or set to NULL if no impersonation has been done.
Set its value only once.
Set len to the maximum number of bytes required in the output buffer.
Set low byte to conditional flag.
Set low register to conditional flag.
Set nByte to the number of bytes required to store the expanded blob.
Set new value for the given attribute.
Set of best costs
Set of characters to trim
Set of contexts for which prohibited
Set of pages in this savepoint
Set of pages moved to free-list this transaction
Set of table index masks
Set options for the current file/buffer.
Set pTC to point to the cheapest remaining token.
Set peer_name or name verification will try to use the proxy server name
Set pipe mode according to type -- for now allow only "r" or "w"
Set pointer back to the last byte
Set procedural save handler functions
Set proper value for true/false settings
Set rCostIdx to the cost of visiting selected rows in index.
Set remaining X's to pid digits with 0's to the left.
Set replacement value to the one we got from array
Set replacement value to the passed one
Set return_value to current module name
Set semaphore 1 back to zero.
Set session status to prevent error while restoring save handler INI value.
Set signal handler of SIGCHLD to default to prevent other signal handlers from being called and reaping the return code when our child exits.
Set some CLI defaults
Set some Embedded PHP defaults
Set specific keys in thread local storage.
Set specific keys.
Set stack entry to point to the newly created object
Set stack variable q to the close-quote character
Set string.
Set the EP_Reduced, EP_TokenOnly, and EP_Static flags appropriately.
Set the JsonString object to an empty string
Set the VdbeCursor.isTable variable.
Set the abort flag and return
Set the callback using SQLITE_TESTCTRL_VDBE_COVERAGE.
Set the character tables in the block that is passed around
Set the cursor upper and lower rowid limits.
Set the data pointer in the list entry to NULL
Set the delete flag.
Set the doNotSpill NOSYNC bit to 1.
Set the error
Set the error code in the database handle to the same value.
Set the error code of the destination database handle.
Set the executed flag to 0 to reallocate columns on next execute
Set the fields of immediate loads.
Set the first and required bytes appropriately.
Set the first char of padding to 0x80.
Set the flag to indicate that at least one PMA has been written.
Set the foreign key value to NULL
Set the foreign key value to its default
Set the limiter.
Set the limiting size of a WAL file.
Set the lower and upper bounds on docids to return
Set the magic to VDBE_MAGIC_RUN sooner rather than later.
Set the match location in subject
Set the maximum error count
Set the new 'max-root-page' value in the database header.
Set the new ping value into the connection
Set the number of output columns
Set the number of ranges used.
Set the output variable to NULL in case an error occurs.
Set the output variables and return.
Set the output variables before returning.
Set the output variables.
Set the pointer to NULL to indicate that forward references have been filled in.
Set the pointer to the final character before returning.
Set the pointer-map entry for the new sibling page.
Set the resolved resolution in the node's layout
Set the result to the offset in this segment and add the sizes of all predecessor segments.
Set the return code to the number of captured strings, or 0 if there were too many to fit into the vector.
Set the right-child pointer of pParent to point to the new page.
Set the start bits always, to avoid unset memory errors if the study data is written to a file, but set the flag only if any of the bits are set, to save time looking when none are.
Set the szLeaf field
Set the szLeaf header field.
Set the value of a single config attribute
Set the value of the SQL statements only variable to integer iRow.
Set this early so that early errors get offset 0.
Set this flag to 1
Set this to 1 to enable non-thread safe re-use of NEOERR data structures.
Set thread local storage to this new thread resources structure
Set thumb mode flag.
Set to " AND " later on
Set to 1 after new rowid is determined
Set to 1 when TABLE matches
Set to NULL at EOF.
Set to cheapest remaining token.
Set to non-zero if we are the parent process
Set to true at EOF
Set to true if a 'special' error
Set to true if at least one expr.
Set to true if constraints may cause a replace
Set to true if out of memory
Set to true if segment is appendable
Set to true when merge is finished
Set to true when thread finishes
Set transparent color.
Set types of tests
Set unused flag for all literals in the constant pool.
Set up a starting, non-extracting bracket, then compile the expression.
Set up an alternate signal stack for this thread.
Set up an sqlite3_backup object.
Set up appropriate ctrlFlags
Set up dummy OP_REVERSE if lookbehind assertion
Set up for cell analysis
Set up for repetition, or handle the non-repeated case
Set up handler to kill children upon exit
Set up known arguments
Set up line thickness
Set up method pointers
Set up other data
Set up our overridden path.
Set up pointers and others
Set up pointers to the individual character tables
Set up the 'byte output' routine
Set up the OR-mask arrays for the initial and final permutations, and for the key initial and compression permutations.
Set up the SIGIO signal handler in a high priority constructor, so that it is installed before the Go code starts.
Set up the array of NodeWriter objects
Set up the changed option bits, but don't change anything yet.
Set up the current x and y position
Set up the default and non-default settings for greediness
Set up the default garbage collection implementation.
Set up the divide.
Set up the first character to match, if available.
Set up the globals:  g_init_bits - initial number of bits g_outfile   - pointer to output file
Set up the iteration.
Set up the key
Set up the necessary values
Set up the new page-index array
Set up the required files for pIncr.
Set up the signal handlers in a high priority constructor, so that they are installed before the Go code starts.
Set up things specially for that OS
Set up utility functions and values
Set user's error text message
Set values to pass back
Set values to reset to if this is followed by a zero repeat.
Set variable i to the maximum number of bytes of input to tokenize.
Set variable iNext to the next available segdir index at level iLevel.
Set via pragma
Sets CPU and IO priorities.
Sets the context function to call to record the traceback context when calling a Go function from C code.
Setting contextEngineIS if specified
Setting contextName if specified
Setting it to the offset to the ALT or KET, then incrementing ecode achieves this effect.
Setting the authentication passphrase.
Setting the authentication protocol.
Setting the default length first and initializing 'offset' avoids compiler warnings in the REF_REPEAT code.
Setting the security level.
Setting the security name.
Setting the security protocol passphrase.
Setting the security protocol.
Setting this up requires a two pass approach.
Setup Keys that will be used for all hmac rounds
Setup Main Loop to build a long enough result
Setup calling arguments
Setup default context
Setup filehandle
Setup information needed to write frames into the WAL
Setup internal flags
Setup resources that are needed by the handler.
Setup string
Setup the CGI variables if this is the main request
Setup the execution environment and spawn new process
ShallowCopy only needs to copy the information above
Sharable content of this btree
Shared b-tree handle
Shared code to read color tables from gd file.
Shared library endings to try if zFile cannot be loaded as written
Shared locks never span more than one byte
Shared memory associated with this inode
Shared memory instance
Shared memory segment information
Shared memory segment used for locking
Shared part of btree structure
Shift JIS, Big5 and HKSCS use multi-byte encodings where an ASCII range byte can be part of a multi-byte sequence.
Shift all entries before the current one up by one to make room.
Shift following values up by two.
Shift the array up by one.
Shift the decomps up by one if the codes don't match.
Shift the error token.
Shift the lookahead token.
Shift things around to insert the code if necessary.
Shifts left before out of the error
Short circuit portscan, we're dealing with an IPv6 embedded address
Short object name
Short summary about the backtracking mechanism empolyed by the jit code generator: The code generator follows the recursive nature of the PERL compatible regular expressions.
Short-circuit having to go through method calls and data marshalling when we're using default behavior
Short-circuit: if no callback and only one array, just return it.
Shortcut for the case when the freelist is empty
Shortcut: When we have a open_basedir and someone tries to unset, we know it'll fail
Shortened table list or OR-clause generation
Should always be set to 0 or 1.
Should be always 0x0 or ERROR_MARKER for error
Should be always EODATA_MARKER
Should be calloc, as mnd_calloc will reference LOCK_access
Should be enough for the metadata of a single row
Should be free'd by caller.
Should be numbered beginning with 0.
Should be prime
Should be server specific, but that requires changing all the XMLRPC_VALUE api's.
Should be the multiply of page size.
Should build on just about anything with minor mods.
Should never be executable
Should never happen
Should never happen.
Should not be set in a per-request handler.
Should not go over MYSQLND_MAX_PACKET_SIZE, since we expect non-arena memory in mysqlnd_wireprotocol.c .
Should not happen
Should not happen as sizeof is used.
Should not have any newlines at the beginning.
Should only be used during core initialization
Should only be used for the insertion of the odd element ,not the piecemeal building of an entire queue.
Should revisit this if / when we switch to compiling with an optimization level higher than -O0.
Should we send the entire path in the request line, default to no.
Shouldn't be too hard to do...just need to map of paths to FSEvent streams.
Show abbreviation if wanted
Show full column names on SELECT
Show short columns names
Show substrings stored in the output vector by number.
Show to the user what changed and delete watchpoint upon removal
Shows sorted patterns list in the order which is used for the matching
Shrink it to actually-used volume and set its statistics
Shrink the min/max bounds of a box to enclose only nonzero elements,
Shut up the compiler warning
Shut-up the streams, they don't know what they are doing
Shutdown scanner/executor/compiler and restore ini entries
Side effects: Initializes the charset.
Side effects: May set php_error based on abnormal conditions.
Side effects: None.
Sign extension for integer operations.
Sign extension in the first char has no effect - nothing to overwrite yet, and those extra 24 bits will be fully shifted out of the 32-bit word.
Sign-extend on a right shift of a negative number
Sign-extend the operand.
Signal Constants
Signal handler for SIGSEGV on a C thread.
Signal handler that uses up more stack space than a goroutine will have.
Signed shift.
Significant digits after the decimal point
Silence some compiler warnings
Silently convert buffered to unbuffered, for now
Similar code as PUSH_BACKTRACK macro.
Similarly, the last 6 months do not change from year to year.
Simple case - long that doesn't need to be rounded.
Simple cases we want to handle fast.
Simple division can't be used since that will cause wrong results.
Simple operation except for updates.
Simple recursion
Simple recursions are easily detected.
Simple register allocation.
Simple soundex algorithm as described by Knuth in TAOCP, vol 3
SimpleXML must be initialized before
Simplest way of expressing aperture, so I trust it the most.
Simplified mnemonics: clrldi.
Simplify ssl context option retrieval
Simplify the code that we create a copy of stripped_header no matter if we actually strip something or not.
Simply extend the current range.
Since Content-Type maybe part of user's headers we need to do this check first.
Since Grandfathered , no value , do nothing , retutn NULL
Since Grandfathered, no value, do nothing, retutn NULL
Since I'm too lazy to
Since Unicode code points in that range are not disallowed in any document type, we could do nothing.
Since both numerators are complex NaNs, it seems that the results should agree in kind.
Since files cannot be loaded via this kind of stub, no parameters are accepted when the Phar object is zip- or tar-based.
Since here we are handling internal functions only we can add the keyword flag.
Since major is a function on SVR4, we cannot use `ifndef major'.
Since return is in  sec.
Since structures used in those callback are freed, we need to use an other callback to which avoid segfaults.
Since sunset varies, the day is assumed to begin at 6:00 P.M.
Since that seems to violate the DRY principle, we check against it and abort.
Since the VCWD functionality isn't used here, a sophisticated functionality would have to be reimplemented to know ahead there are no files with invalid names there.
Since the class is not an interface it needs to be declared as a abstract class.
Since the flags should be set, we just fallback to the register mode.
Since the length of a metonic cycle is a constant, this is a simple calculation, except that it requires an intermediate value which is bigger that 32 bits.
Since the minimum repeat, is zero the invalid case is basically the same as an empty case.
Since the values are variably sized and can get quite large, they are stored separately from the hashes in a garbage-collected heap.
Since this is repeated in exif_process_IFD_TAG make it a notice here
Since we have no way of knowing the true length either, we'll bump up our buffer size to a reasonable size, just in case
Since we successfully read a char above, partial matching must occure.
Single VALUES term with multiple rows
Single back reference
Single character search can shortcut memcmps
Single character search can shortcut memcmps Can also avoid tolower emallocs
Single character types set the bits and stop.
Single precision constants.
Single step in trigger program
Single term in FROM clause
Single-Threaded
Single-char upto sets the bit and tries the next
Single-script enforcement is on by default.
Size contains the flags as well.
Size decreases
Size each output buffer in bytes
Size flags for emit_x86_instruction:
Size flags not allowed for typed instructions.
Size in bytes
Size in bytes of each node in the node table
Size increases
Size limit for persistent journal files
Size of PMA in bytes
Size of WAL
Size of a cell
Size of aDoclist in bytes
Size of aNode in bytes
Size of aOp array
Size of allocated array at aElem
Size of allocated buffer
Size of allocation at aData
Size of allocation rounded up to power of 2
Size of apPhrase array
Size of apSegment array
Size of argument array
Size of argv array
Size of array apRegion
Size of array apSegment
Size of array apWiData
Size of array at aElem
Size of buffer at aDoclist
Size of buffer at zNode
Size of buffer containing root node
Size of buffer nBuf
Size of buffer p in bytes
Size of buffer pBuf in bytes
Size of buffer pData in bytes
Size of buffer pOut in bytes
Size of buffer pRec in bytes
Size of buffer pToken in bytes
Size of buffer pointed to by zHeader
Size of buffer z in bytes
Size of buffer zDoc in bytes
Size of buffer zNext in bytes
Size of buffer zPrev in bytes
Size of buffer zRoot
Size of buffer zTerm
Size of column value in tokens
Size of database content section
Size of database in pages
Size of db file in bytes
Size of doclist
Size of doclist in bytes
Size of doclist in current entry
Size of each buffer in bytes
Size of each free slot
Size of each object in the array
Size of each scratch buffer
Size of every page
Size of every page in this cache
Size of extra space for each page
Size of first block written to WAL file
Size of function name in bytes
Size of hash table Rtree.aHash.
Size of header before each frame in wal
Size of increments to stack.
Size of index key in bytes
Size of initial segment.
Size of input list
Size of input text in bytes
Size of journal file on disk
Size of leaf without page-index
Size of list.aMemory allocation in bytes
Size of log file
Size of malloc'd buffer at zMalloc
Size of master journal file
Size of new segment at iAbsLevel
Size of one page
Size of open blob, in bytes
Size of output buffer in bytes
Size of pKey for indices
Size of pKey, or last integer key
Size of pList as PMA in bytes
Size of pList in bytes
Size of pOrig region in bytes
Size of pSorter in bytes
Size of phrase in terms
Size of prefix shared with previous term
Size of previous chunk in Mem3Block elements
Size of read buffer in bytes
Size of record header in bytes
Size of record in bytes
Size of regions
Size of scratch memory requested
Size of segment just written
Size of shared-memory regions
Size of sibling on the left
Size of sibling on the right
Size of source db in pages
Size of string aInput in bytes
Size of subclassed sqlite3_file
Size of temporary buffer
Size of term in bytes
Size of term on leaf in bytes
Size of term prefix
Size of term prefix in bytes
Size of term suffix
Size of term suffix in bytes
Size of term zTerm in bytes
Size of the Bitvec structure in bytes.
Size of the SHM filename in bytes
Size of the binary record
Size of the cell being deleted
Size of the cell content on the main b-tree page
Size of the current data field
Size of the database file
Size of the free slot
Size of the geometry function blob
Size of the header
Size of the header in the record
Size of the image
Size of the input array
Size of the journal file in bytes
Size of the offsets array
Size of the open journal file in bytes
Size of the original file in pages
Size of the output buffer
Size of the pCell cell in bytes
Size of the page
Size of the record in bytes
Size of the rendering buffer
Size of the rowid
Size of the temporary register block
Size of the zAuthPW in bytes
Size of the zMalloc allocation
Size of this allocation
Size of token in bytes
Size of where we allocate shared objects.
Size of write ahead log header, including checksum.
Size of write buffer in bytes
Size of zBlob in bytes
Size of zDoc in bytes
Size of zName in bytes
Size of zPattern
Size of zRep
Size of zStr
Size of zTerm in bytes
Size of zToken in bytes
Size to pad to
Size value to return
Size, in bits, of the bitmap element.
Sizes in bytes of nPrefix prefix indexes
Sizes of deleted document written here
Sizes of deleted documents
Sizes of each column, in tokens
Sizes of inserted documents
Sizes required for the strings "variant15" , "extlang11", "private12" etc.
Sizes required for the strings "variant15" , "extlang3", "private12" etc.
Skeleton name.
Skip 0 so that handles are true
Skip QD entries, they're only used by dn_expand later on
Skip ZEND_ prefix
Skip accumulator loading if true
Skip all leading non-hex digits.
Skip any leading 0s
Skip any leading divider characters.
Skip any leading whitespace at the beginning of a field unless the format suppresses this behavior.
Skip any separator characters.
Skip backwards past any 0x00 varints.
Skip compatibility formatting tag.
Skip consecutive whitespace
Skip continuation of "extended" BB
Skip docid varint
Skip for now to retain compatibility
Skip incrementing the color count so that the dither / matching phase won't use it on pixels that shouldn't have been transparent.
Skip indices that do not change
Skip leading delimiters
Skip leading zeros.
Skip low surrogate if necessary.
Skip one item before completing
Skip over any TK_COLLATE nodes
Skip over assertive subpatterns
Skip over bracket number
Skip over callout
Skip over callouts
Skip over lookbehind and negative lookahead assertions
Skip over position list
Skip over things that don't match chars
Skip pages already processed
Skip partial indices for which the WHERE clause is not true
Skip past any leading X.
Skip past any whitespace
Skip property freeing for the following types
Skip protected and private members.
Skip salt prefix.
Skip spaces
Skip sub-tests
Skip the "sqlite_altertab_" prefix on the name
Skip the 'E'
Skip the first 3 bytes to emulate the file type examination
Skip the other alternatives.
Skip the variable-length character.
Skip these types
Skip these, but we need to add in the name length.
Skip this term for now.
Skip to next top-level test
Skip to the number field.
Skip to the start of the possible case mappings.
Skip unknown arguments.
Skip useless ZEND_RECV and ZEND_RECV_INIT opcodes
Slap a null character on the end of the phoned word
Small - less than 3/4 of page size.
Small blocks are allocated from RUNs.
Smaller rScore values come first.
Smaller, self-destribing enums
Smallest goes first.
Smallest possible allocation in bytes
Smallest sample larger than or equal to pRec
Smallest sample not yet tested
Snippet iterator
Snippet to extract
So I put a right shift to loose the lsb.
So PHP would crash by allowing the call.
So are Unicode property matches, if supported.
So call it now.
So do not bother - just return true.
So do nothing in this case.
So each chunk consists from 512 pages.
So far no cases are known where it would be an issue.
So far, so good.
So far, two transports have been defined.
So get a WRITE lock and try again.
So in this environment, uncomment the following line.
So it's very easy to determine the CHUNK owning the certain pointer.
So just return true.
So no other connection may be writing the db.
So pushing a state here evens the stacks.
So quickly guess a minimum result size based on that
So run recovery to do exactly that.
So skip this term.
So the phonome SCI invades both S and C.
So the result will be either the default value or a NULL.
So there are no more results and we should just return FALSE, error_no has been set
So there's no harm in leaving this code.
So this forward declaration is required.
So this next line is harmless in that case.
So this routine is never called.
So under Vista, we try to map into a hard coded predefined addresses in high memory.
So unique matches will be used to generate a help message but non-unique one will be used to list alternatives.
So we are forced to probe it
So we assume it matches every row.
So we can gdFree it with impunity.
So we can leave it out when NDEBUG is defined.
So we deal with that case by considering the UTF-8 encoding.
So we disable usage of interned strings as hash keys especually for this table.
So we forward declare the I/O methods.
So we goto out_err.
So we have to do our own lookup to get env vars.
So we have to link generator call frame with caller call frame.
So we must test for alnum specially.
So we reinvent the wheel.
So we run it once during initialization.
So we want a .re scanner to find it.
So we want first of all to clean up all data and then move to tables destruction.
So we're safe enough.
So writing '.' to the pipe is sufficient.
So, error_log is used by - SysV init launch php-fpm as a daemon - Systemd launch php-fpm in foreground
So, we do this code for all non 11g versions.
So, we have this declaration here to fix it
So, we need to take care of that.
So, we only lock if our first test of Inited was false
So, we use cfg_get_string here to check it this once.
So, we will not do anything.
SoapClient functions
SoapFault Functions
SoapHeader Functions
SoapParam Functions
SoapVar Functions
Soft limit for node size
Software written by Ian F.
Solar distance
Solar distance, astronomical units
Solaris 10 defines atomic API within
Solaris processes report a tiny stack when run with "ulimit -s unlimited".
Solaris sucks
Solaris: uint
Solid 3.5 does not have this issue.
Solid doesn't have ExtendedFetch, if DriverManager is used, get Info, whether Driver supports ExtendedFetch
Some Features: - output option for xml escaping data.
Some OS prepend _ to symbol names while their dynamic linker does not do that automatically.
Some allocators round up to a larger multiple or to a power of 2.
Some basic sanity checking on the Btree.
Some broken save handler implementation returns FAILURE for non-existent session ID
Some combination of MEM_Null, MEM_Str, MEM_Dyn, etc.
Some compilers complain about constants of the form 0x7fffffffffffffff.
Some compilers don't like
Some compilers like AIX, defines uchar in sys/types.h
Some compilers never learn.
Some countries did not accept it until much later.
Some databases require a sequence or table name to be passed in.
Some glob implementation simply return no data if no matches were found, others return the GLOB_NOMATCH error code.
Some information for the reader...
Some internal functions.
Some kind of disk I/O error occurred
Some known optimizations are not included to reduce source code size and avoid compile-time configuration.
Some levels up
Some of the fields default to undefined and not 0
Some old systems does not have MAP_ANON.
Some options are unpacked into BOOL variables in the hope that testing them will be faster than individual option bits.
Some property combinations also acceptable.
Some protocols are sending content like the FTP one, and libcurl try to use the WRITEFUNCTION or the HEADERFUNCTION.
Some special cases.
Some terms not completely tested
Some utility routines for the divide:  First a one digit multiply.
Some versions of windows set the temp file to be read-only, which means that opening it will fail...
Some views have defined column names
Something bad happened
Sometimes we can just extend the original range.
Sometimes, utf8mb4 is just utf8 but the old charsets are utf8mb3.
Somewhat arbitrary length limit here, but should be way more than anyone needs and avoids file-level warnings later on if we exceed MAX_PATH
Somthing wrong in chunked encoding
Soon we'll add alpha channel to palettes
Sorry about that.
Sorry, I can't make use of it.
Sort by block number to traverse children in pre-order
Sort data from this cursor
Sort entries into the forest on the first test of a new batch
Sort functions
Sort in ascending order
Sort order for each column.
Sort specified array.
Sort the list
Sorted index for this segment
Sorted order.
Sorter cursor
Sorter cursor to read from
Sorter file to read from
Sorter for "ORDER BY rank" queries
Sorter key to compare pVal with
Sorter key to copy into pOut
Sorter object
Sorter object for OP_SorterOpen cursors
Sorter task to read from
Sorter that owns this sub-task
Sorting and partial sorting costs
Sorting index number.
Source and destination indices
Source and destination is register.
Source b-tree file
Source data
Source data to compress
Source database connection
Source database handle
Source database name
Source database page data
Source database page to backup
Source line number where error occurred
Source of content
Source of new entry objects
Source page number
Source page object
Source page size
Source pager
Source registers if SQLITE_ECEL_REF
Source table
Source-code line that generated this opcode
Space allocated for leaf blocks
Space for aKey if aBuffer and pMap wont work
Space for azColumn strings
Space for copies of dividers cells
Space for holding column names
Space for new cursor
Space for other PMAs
Space for the eventually created colormap is stashed here
Space on the edges is half of the space between elements
Space to buffer journal writes
Space to hold MJ filename from a journal file
Space to hold the labels
Space to hold the virtual machine's program
Space to unpack a record
Space to write cursor structure
Special case - lookup by rowid.
Special case for a single-character break as it needs no additional storage space
Special case if exponent is a zero.
Special case of a FROM clause subquery implemented as a co-routine
Special case where no modulus is required
Special case: A DELETE without a WHERE clause deletes everything.
Special case: No FROM clause
Special case: a WHERE clause that is constant.
Special case: ext/date wasn't initialized yet
Special cases, optimized implementations
Special cases.
Special command to parse
Special encodings
Special exception for sljit_emit_op_flags.
Special handling for a compound-select that originates as a VALUES clause.
Special handling of class SoapVar
Special handling of subjectAltName, see CVE-2013-4073 Christian Heimes
Special long value case for SIG_DFL and SIG_IGN
Special processing for WITHOUT ROWID Tables
Special query text
Special registers.
Special spacing and line-terminating items.
Specific chunk into which cursor points
Specific token to advance
Specifically, all but the last digit is 0 and the last digit is 1.
Specify an alternative mutex implementation
Specs dictate that they are both type XML_DOCUMENT_TYPE_NODE
Spill is ok, but do not sync
Split name into class/namespace and method/function names
Split operator.
Split the master block.
Split those two.
Split u and v.
Square output for digest
SrcList to be returned
Stack address function for a CRAY-1, CRAY X-MP, or CRAY Y-MP.
Stack grew downward.
Stack grew upward.
Stack high-water mark.
Stack management.
Stack may only be destroyed when no cached patterns possibly associated with it do exist.
Stack must be aligned to 8 bytes:
Stack pad size.
Stack separator
Stack structures for CRAY-1, CRAY X-MP, and CRAY Y-MP
Standard errors
Standard message handlers
Standard says more types possible but skip them...
Start MD5 accumulation.
Start Of Frame N
Start YYX at -YYN if negative to avoid negative indexes in YYCHECK.
Start a new range before the current location.
Start a search on a new JSON string
Start a thread to handle exceptions.
Start a write transaction on these databases
Start another range on the end.
Start at end of previous match
Start at the beginning and go until we hit offset
Start at the beginning of the input hash and copy entries to output hash until offset is reached
Start at the beginning of the string
Start at the end and work backwards.
Start at the inner-most context and move outward until a match is found
Start computation of P byte sequence.
Start computation of S byte sequence.
Start label for the block-output subroutine
Start of BEFORE trigger programs
Start of Codestream
Start of Data
Start of Tile part
Start of loop body
Start of match assertion
Start of memory holding result set
Start of nested parenthesized sub-expression, or comment or lookahead or lookbehind or option setting or condition or all the other extended parenthesis forms.
Start of option with offset
Start of packet
Start of range is constrained
Start of subject assertion
Start of subroutine that outputs a result row
Start offset in pFile
Start offset of token
Start option value
Start scanning the virtual table
Start some goroutines.
Start subpattern
Start table tag
Start talking to ftp server
Start the validating loop
Start the view context
Start the view context.
Start this only for the time of the run or eval command, for so long that the main thread is busy serving some debug session.
Start with an empty image information structure.
Start with the fraction part.
Start with the length of the BRA and KET and any extra bytes that are required at the beginning.
Start with the time of the first molad after creation.
Start writing at this offset
Started out as two integer operands
Starting offset in main journal
Starting offset of private data for capturing brackets.
Starting optimizations
Starting point is exactly on ellipse
Starting pointer for partial soft matches.
Starts up a thread running a run loop, creates the env, and then returns it
Startup / shutdown
Startup extensions mechanism
Stash the color map into the image
Stat an opened phar file handle
Stat4Accum.anDLt
Stat4Accum.anEq
Stat4Accum.anLt
State must be valid.
State variables
State vector for the DB fixer
Statement Timeout
Statement for DELETE ops
Statement for INSERT operations
Statement for reading and writing
Statement holding cursor open
Statement holding lock on pIndex
Statement to iterate through segments
Statement to query database with
Statement to return all language-ids
Statement under construction
Statement used to fetch segdir
Statement used to insert the encoding
Statements to read/write/delete a record from xxx_node
Statements to read/write/delete a record from xxx_parent
Statements to read/write/delete a record from xxx_rowid
Static methods
Static mutexes should never fail...
Static properties
Static space for the 2 default backends
Status code
Status options
Status return flags
Status verb
Stay within bounds of both yycheck and yytname.
Steele, Jr.
Step 1: Search the hash table for an existing entry.
Step 2: If the page was found in the hash table, then return it.
Step 3: Abort if createFlag is 1 but the cache is nearly full
Step one, copy the live values in a new heap.
Step two, memcopy the values back into the shared heap.
Steps 2 through 4.
Steps 3, 4, and 5 implemented by this subroutine
Still didn't find anything, let's find the zone solely based on offset/isdst then
Still the result from the query is PASS
Stmt under construction
Stolen directly out of the book...
Stop accumulating errors when this reaches zero
Stop at an unescaped space or tab.
Stop if out of errors
Stop if this was the last box
Stop if tried at original pos
Stop reporting errors after this many
Stop the operation but leave all prior changes
Stop when row count reaches this
Stops warning for unused parameter
Storage handle
Storage module to write to
Store 1 if the result is not empty
Store SELECT results in intermediate table
Store SQLITE_NOMEM here if required
Store a pointer to the memory block in global structure mem3.
Store a private linked list of absolutely positioned children so that we can efficiently traverse them later.
Store a private linked list of flexible children so that we can efficiently traverse them later.
Store allocated handle here
Store file date/time.
Store first two pre-read bytes.
Store in active hash
Store integers here
Store it if requested
Store its associated 'score' in iBestScore.
Store match begin and end.
Store numeric indexes in proper order
Store objects API
Store only the name
Store pointer to the allocated page here
Store result as data with an automatic rowid
Store result as keys in an index
Store result in a memory cell
Store result in an queue
Store results as keys in an index
Store results here
Store rise and set times - as Unix Timestamp
Store state in digest
Store string indexes referencing the same zval
Store the RAW variable internally
Store the compiled pattern and extra info in the cache.
Store the index column value in this register
Store the integer value from a VFP register.
Store the name and decltype
Store the output in zOut.
Store the page number here
Store the result as data using a unique key.
Store the result in variable iRes.
Store the results in the Queue.
Store the results of the setup-query in Queue.
Store the token that zCsr points to in tname.
Store the value in this register
Store this value in nNew.
Store type information
Strategy index
Stream cipher
Stream will report errors opening file
Streams based network functions
Stretch vectors
String accumulator
String containing int array to decode
String data
String defining the affinity of each column
String encode
String encode/decode
String inserted after highlighted term
String inserted before highlighted term
String inserted between snippets
String is converted successfully
String matching - Sunday algorithm http://www.iti.fh-flensburg.de/lang/algorithmen/pattern/sundayen.htm
String on RHS of LIKE operator
String options
String or BLOB exceeds size limit
String or BLOB value
String or blob
String pointer
String rep is nul terminated
String to be tokenized
String to draw.
String to match against
String to return
String to tokenize
String wasn't interned but we will use it as interned anyway
String, possibly obtained from sqlite3_malloc
Strip all chars not part of section 5 of http://www.faqs.org/rfcs/rfc1738.html
Strip any trailing slashes
Strip ctrl-m prefix
Strip filename
Strip slashes which came before the file name
Strip trailing slashes
Strip trailing space from buf, saving end of line in case required for enclosure field
Struct encode/decode
Struct for holding a composition pair, and array of composition pairs
Struct for parameters
Struct for properties
Struct for reflection objects
Struct for type hints
Structure for remembering the local variables in a private frame
Structure object to return
Structure of specific index
Structure to save state of computation between the single steps.
Structures for handling numbers.
Stub for calling free from Go
Stub for calling malloc from Go
Stub for calling setenv
Stub for calling unsetenv
Stub for creating a new thread
Stub function when INCRBLOB is omitted
Stub: create a watching thread for a given directory
Stub: initialize the environment
Stub: read all events from the shared list
Sub-program to execute
Sub-vdbe for trigger program
Subfunction return code
Subject to the following 3 conditions, Epinions, Inc.
Subquery id 1
Subquery id 2
Subroutine for resetting the accumulator
Subroutine return code
Subsequent pconnects in the same script are not guaranteed to get the same database session.
Subset of btreeMask that requires a lock
Substitute expressions
Substitute function - never called
Substitute the variable and function names.
Substitute values
Subsubstructure is also included.
Subtract the numbers.
Subtraction, carry is really borrow.
Subtype for this value
Success code
Success code from a subroutine
Success query
Success-oriented.
Successful match
Successful result
Successfully created session
Successfully handled a verb
Such groups are non-capturing and are not assertions of any kind.
Such interned strings are shared across all PHP processes
Such that the comparison is always going to be false
Such values can only be added to xmlrpc_vector_struct.
Sudden_Underflow
Sufficient space is allocated to the return value to hold the suppressed trailing zeros.
Suffix length
Sum of nMax for purgeable caches
Sum of nMin for purgeable caches
Sum of ref counts over all pages
Sum of the nEq values
Summary: - Horizontal filter contributions are calculated on the fly, as each column is mapped from src to dst image.
Sun always above altit
Sun always below altit
Sun's Right Ascension
Sun's apparent radius
Sun's declination
Super-Boxes can contain super-boxes which provides us with a hierarchical storage system.
Support Functions
Supports only input parameters.
Suppress "unused parameter" compiler warning
Suppress an incorrect diagnostic about yylval being uninitialized.
Suppress assignment.
Suppress duplicates for UNION, EXCEPT, and INTERSECT
Suppress error messages if VIEW already exists
Suppress errors if the trigger already exists
Suppress the first OFFSET entries if there is an OFFSET clause
Suppress unused-variable warnings by "using" E.
Surrogate pair
Suspicious pointer arithmetic
Swap arguments.
Swap the roles of aFrom and aTo for the next generation
Swatch Beat a.k.a.
Switch back to HTML.
Switch on next character until the end of the branch
Switch to a new external colormap between output passes.
Switch to non-blocking mode and try to consume something from the line, if possible, then continue.
Switch to the end.
Switch to xxxPOS opcodes
Switching from bind_one_parameter to bind_parameters may result in zv being NULL
Sybase AS12
Symbol on the left-hand side of the rule
Symbolic ID of this loop for debugging use
Symbolic name of this SELECT use for debugging
Sync all the db files involved in the transaction.
Sync at the end of each transaction
Sync the WAL to disk
Sync the database file to disk.
Sync the db file
Sync the journal file and write all dirty pages to the database.
Sync the journal file if required.
Sync the master journal file.
Syntax error
Synthesized from VALUES clause
System call return code
System page size
T index in use
TBB: Write img to test/arctest.png
TBB: Write img to test/fttest.png
TBB: move this up so include files are not brought in
TBD need to come up with better match here.
TBFixed: may lose one hit
TCP_NODELAY is only applicable for TCP
TERM_xxx bit flags.
TESTING  This algorithm has been tested from the year 4713 B.C.
TESTING  This algorithm has been tested from the year 4714 B.C.
TESTING  This algorithm has been tested in two ways.
THE AUTHORS AND DISTRIBUTORS SPECIFICALLY DISCLAIM ANY WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND NON-INFRINGEMENT.
THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS" AND THE AUTHOR DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES WITH REGARD TO THIS SOFTWARE INCLUDING ALL IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS.
THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT.
THE SOFTWARE PROVIDED HEREUNDER IS ON AN "AS IS" BASIS, AND THE UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA HAS NO OBLIGATIONS TO PROVIDE MAINTENANCE, SUPPORT, UPDATES, ENHANCEMENTS, OR MODIFICATIONS.
THE UNIVERSITY OF CALIFORNIA SPECIFICALLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.
THEN at this level acts exactly like PRUNE.
THERE IS NO WARRANTY - USE AT YOUR OWN RISK.
THIS SOFTWARE IS BEING PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTY.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY SOFTWEYR LLC, THE REGENTS AND CONTRIBUTORS ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE AUTHOR AND CONTRIBUTORS ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE AUTHOR ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE AUTHORS ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE NETBSD FOUNDATION, INC.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE REGENTS AND CONTRIBUTORS ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED ON AN "AS IS" BASIS, AND THE AUTHORS AND DISTRIBUTORS HAVE NO OBLIGATION TO PROVIDE MAINTENANCE, SUPPORT, UPDATES, ENHANCEMENTS, OR MODIFICATIONS.
THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED ``AS IS'' AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE DISCLAIMED.
THOUGHT:  It would be nice if, rather than having things like...
TIFF thumbnail: our data structure cannot store a thumbnail of a thumbnail
TK: old code follows
TK_AND or TK_OR
TK_COLUMN: column index.
TK_UPDATE, TK_INSERT or TK_DELETE
TMP1 is preferred if possible.
TMP1 is used in OP_KETRMIN below.
TMP1 returns with begin - 1.
TMP1 was set a few lines above.
TMP2 Destroyed.
TMP2 contains the high surrogate.
TMP2 destroyed.
TMP2 may be destroyed by peek_char.
TMP2 may be destroyed.
TMP2 must contain the starting STR_PTR.
TMP2 was set above.
TMP2 which is set here used by OP_KETRMAX below.
TMP2 will be used below.
TMP_REG2 is not used by getput_arg
TMP_REG3 can be used for caching.
TMP_REG3 is used for caching.
TO DO: H if source is XMM
TO DO: L if source is XMM
TO DO: check
TODO :avoid reallocation
TODO PORTABILITY Coded on RedHat Linux 6.2.
TODO add persistent_timeout check at PDO level
TODO check for overflow
TODO check if handling other error codes would make sense
TODO emulate if not available
TODO move attached check to PDO level
TODO revisit this and check if a workaround available and needed.
TODO this file, or part of it, could be machine generated, to allow extensions and SAPIs adding their own init stuff.
TODO this function should be part of either Zend or PHP API
TODO wouldblock
TODO1: Fix this
TODO1: Updating pgidx here.
TODO2: Doclist terminator written here.
TODO: - add IPTC translation table
TODO: - allow index or array of indeces - replace path - patterns
TODO: Add gdImageGetRowPtr and works with ptr at the row level for the true color and palette images new formats will simply work with ptr
TODO: Array index overflow
TODO: Async connects need to check the enable_on_connect option when we notice that the connect has actually been established
TODO: Check if all of these are really required.
TODO: Check there is no doclist index
TODO: Check version relationship
TODO: Could use temporary registers here.
TODO: Find the ICU call which does this properly
TODO: Merge with refcounting watches, store if watched ref value is to be dropped etc.
TODO: Only one "types" is allowed
TODO: Only the OS can help to determine the correct fpu type.
TODO: Re-enable this once OCI provides capability.
TODO: Re-enable this when OCI provides support.
TODO: See warning in main/stream/streams.c::php_stream_fill_read_buffer
TODO: Should handle sparse/partial arrays here.
TODO: Support for TCP sockets
TODO: These could be moved to MINIT and removed.
TODO: Think about moving these checks to the compiler or some sort of lint-mode.
TODO: This definition is just included so other modules compile.
TODO: This implementation is kind of a hack, find a better way to do it.
TODO: Translate known names.
TODO: Unconditionally do this once OCI provides extended OCISessionGet capability
TODO: Use the real values once the openssl constants are used See the enum at the top of this file
TODO: Which function
TODO: XML apparently disallows "X"
TODO: add a test to check if we really have zvals here...
TODO: add ini entry for always use soap errors
TODO: add parse error information
TODO: add support for other APIs
TODO: add support for overloaded objects
TODO: better error message
TODO: check .ini setting here and apply user-defined input filter
TODO: check for overflow
TODO: check for safearray
TODO: check for string too long
TODO: copy fptr
TODO: could expand this to make a callback into PHP user-space
TODO: could use zend_is_callable here
TODO: curl based streams probably support file:// properly
TODO: deduce HEADERLEN from size for uncompressed
TODO: do_alloca, free_alloca
TODO: enable it when enabling vista/2k8 mode in tsrm
TODO: encoding
TODO: ensure that persistent procs will work
TODO: figure it out
TODO: fix  _zip_replace
TODO: fix this.
TODO: get rid of "bogus"..
TODO: handle 64 bit properly
TODO: if PHP raises an exception here, we should catch it and expose it as a COM exception
TODO: if we want to play nicely, we should check to see if the driver really supports ODBC v3 or not
TODO: implement callbacks or other mechanism for applications to "understand" these headers.
TODO: improve fixed addresses on x64.
TODO: inline
TODO: inline with support for closed resources
TODO: inline with support for incomplete class
TODO: lang attribute
TODO: libedit doesn't seems to support coloured prompt
TODO: microsecconds
TODO: namespace isn't stored
TODO: needs updating for new filter API
TODO: not all elements converted.
TODO: not ts on linux
TODO: output to stderr is not useful for apps.
TODO: perform topological sort of cyclic call graph
TODO: produce warning invalid ns
TODO: put in negative code for non-persistent stubs
TODO: refactor it
TODO: replace this with a hash of available column names to column numbers
TODO: revisit this start size, may be its not optimal
TODO: revisit this when flags are supported, since they may require a recompression
TODO: should be checked for NULL tm/return vaue
TODO: simplify Update and Final, those look ridiculously complex Mike, 2005-11-23
TODO: soap seems to favor this method.
TODO: some smart thing that avoids duplicating the value in the general loop below.
TODO: these need correct docrefs
TODO: this error message is unhelpful if the format string is not one character long
TODO: unlink current from the global linked list, and replace it it with the new context, protected by mutex where/if appropriate
TODO: unset
TODO: use the known fast rgba multiplication implementation once the new formats are in place
TODO: visit persistent handles: for each persistent statement handle, remove bound parameter associations
TODO: we should assign a name for the mapping
TODO: write some code here
TODOs: Implement DeltaE instead, way better perceptual differences
TRANSACTION
TRANS_NONE, TRANS_READ or TRANS_WRITE
TRUE after OP_ColumnName has been issued to pVdbe
TRUE for a TEMPORARY view
TRUE if back assert
TRUE if currently initializing
TRUE if next pass must zero histogram
TRUE is also returned if the table is empty.
TRUE only in greedy case.
TRUE, when minlength is greater than 0.
TUNING: Cost of a rowid lookup is 10
TUNING: Cost of a unique index lookup is 15
TUNING: Each index lookup yields 20 rows in the table.
TUNING: For simple queries, only the best path is tracked.
TUNING: Minimum for skip-scan
TYPEPLUS, TYPEMINPLUS
TYPEQUERY, TYPEMINQUERY
TYPESTAR, TYPEMINSTAR
TYPEUPTO, TYPEMINUPTO
Table Name      Column Name
Table Name      Module Name
Table Name      NULL
Table associated with this expression
Table being altered
Table being modified
Table being queried
Table being renamed
Table being updated
Table being updated or deleted from
Table column number
Table column this handle is open on
Table containing the row to be deleted
Table cursor
Table cursor common to all terms
Table cursor number
Table cursors are already open
Table for TK_COLUMN expressions.
Table for handling escaped characters in the range '0'-'z'.
Table has a primary key
Table has keys only - no data
Table has only 64-bit signed integer keys
Table hold the row
Table holding the result of the SELECT
Table into which text will be inserted
Table into which to insert
Table jump if alt_max is greater than 4.
Table leaf node
Table list this loop refers to
Table name - used by the opdate hook
Table of WHERE clause constraints
Table of an index whose exprs are being coded
Table of class bit maps for each POSIX class.
Table of sizes for the fixed-length opcodes.
Table of texts corresponding to POSIX error codes
Table of the number of extra bytes, indexed by the first byte masked with 0x3f.
Table on the left with matching column name
Table structure column is extracted from
Table that the trigger fires off of
Table this info block refers to
Table this step applies to
Table to append
Table to be indexed
Table to be opened
Table to be replaced
Table to be substituted
Table to identify digits and hex digits.
Table to index.
Table to open
Table to translate PCRE compile time error codes into POSIX error codes.
Table to translate from particular type value to the general value.
Table triggers are being coded for
Table type - an RBU_PK_XXX value
Table we are trying to access
Table whose indices are to be analyzed
Table with INTEGER PRIMARY KEY and nothing else
Table with characters for base64 transformation.
Tables block
Tables have different CHECK constraints.
Tables in outer loops of the join
Tables of horizontal and vertical whitespace characters, suitable for adding to classes.
Tables of names of POSIX character classes and their lengths.
Tables that are indexable, satisfying case 2
Tables that might satisfy case 1
Tables that must be scanned after this one
Tables that must be scanned before this one
Tabs used below.
Tail item on backtrack.
Tail of table name e.g. "data", "config"
Tail of unprocessed SQL
Tail recursion
Take a copy of the sample.
Take a shared-cache advisory read-lock on the parent table.
Take advantage of short-circuit false optimization for AND
Take care of the last array sort flags.
Take care of the longer scaled number.
Take care with CRLF partial
Take care, as the sprintf implementation may return less places than we requested due to internal buffer limitations
Take data to be written from here
Take it easy.
Take steps to avoid spinning forever if there is a protocol error.
Take the binary representation of the length of the key and for every 1 add the alternate sum, for every 0 the key.
Take the jump if the BETWEEN is NULL
Take the jump if the BETWEEN is true
Take the square root NUM and return it in NUM with SCALE digits after the decimal place.
Take yet unprocessed bytes into account.
Takes a pointer to posix group and a pointer to an already initialized ZVAL array container and fills the array with the posix group member data.
Takes a string or an instance as an argument
Takes an instance as an argument
Tantzen, Communications of the Association for Computing Machinery August 1963.
Target address must be aligned to 64-byte boundary
Target for MARK name
Target table for DELETE, UPDATE, INSERT
Task context
Task that owns this merger
Tediously free stuff.
Tell PHP if we read / wrote bytes.
Tell the Go code to catch SIGIO.
Tell the Go code to stop catching SIGIO.
Tell the Go library to start looking for SIGIO.
Tells whether the capturing bracket is optimized.
Tells whether the character codes below 128 are enough to determine a match.
Tells whether the starting offset is a target of then.
Temp area for cell content
Temp db schema
Temp file for level-0 PMAs
Temp register to free before returning
Temp space for pIdxKey - to avoid a malloc
Temp space sufficient to hold a single cell
Temp space used by merge-sort
Temp storage must have already been allocated
Temp storage space for pCell, if needed
Temp streams are streams that uses memory streams as long their size is less than a given memory amount.
Temp var to store a page number in
Template WhereLoop
Template WhereLoop object
Template WhereLoop under construction
Template for VFS
Temporarily encoding the needs_control_head in framesize.
Temporarily end the regex in case it doesn't exist before this point.
Temporarily holds the number of cursors assigned
Temporarily mark the end of the branch with OP_END.
Temporarily terminate the pattern while doing this.
Temporary Function aliases until the next major upgrade to PHP.
Temporary VM
Temporary buffer
Temporary buffer space
Temporary buffer to use
Temporary expression node
Temporary file object wrapper
Temporary memory used by this routine
Temporary release of STR_PTR.
Temporary space to use
Temporary space used to build header
Temporary storage for the page
Temporary use register
Tends to be less accurate as distance increases.
Term at iPos
Term iterator to advance
Term suffix
Term to compare to
Term to iterate through a doclist for
Term to query for
Term to scan doclist of
Term to search for
Term to seek to
Term to select leaves for
Term to write to internal node
Term.pExpr is an IS operator
Term/rowid iterator object
TermOffset associated with next token
TermSelect object to merge into
Terminate destination --- called by jpeg_finish_compress after all data has been written.
Terminate source --- called by jpeg_finish_decompress after all data has been read.
Terminate the string.
Terminate token and skip trailing separators
Terms that make up this phrase
Terms that may be omitted
Terwilliker Jehosophat Aloysius Monstrosity Animal Beast.
Test Extraction
Test a C thread that calls sigaltstack and then calls Go code.
Test all CHECK constraints
Test all NOT NULL constraints.
Test calling a Go function to raise SIGIO on a C thread with an alternate signal stack when there is a Go signal handler for SIGIO.
Test calling panic from C.
Test for Python-style defn
Test for divide by 1.
Test for divide by zero.
Test for forward reference or uncompleted reference.
Test for negative result.
Test for verifying that the Go runtime properly forwards signals when non-Go signals are raised.
Test if the zval was separated or replaced and if necessary move the watchpoint
Test installing a signal handler before the Go code starts.
Test is we have place for 1 more char.
Test os/signal.Notify and os/signal.Reset.
Test performance of native C UUID generation To Compile: cc -luuid benchmark-native.c -o benchmark-native
Test qguess.
Test raising SIGIO on a C thread with an alternate signal stack when there is a Go signal handler for SIGIO.
Test that a SIGSEGV on this thread is delivered to us.
Test that a signal handler that uses up stack space does not crash if the signal is delivered to a thread running a goroutine.
Test that a signal handler works in non-Go code when using os/signal.Notify.
Test the query function
Test the storage function
Test the various possible conditions
Test this expression
Test to see if the iRowid value appears anywhere in the forest.
Test variable that can be set to enable WHERE tracing
Test vector from FIPS 180-2: appendix B.3.
Test vector from FIPS 180-2: appendix C.3.
Test vectors from FIPS 180-2: appendix B.1.
Test vectors from FIPS 180-2: appendix B.2.
Test vectors from FIPS 180-2: appendix C.1.
Test vectors from FIPS 180-2: appendix C.2.
Test vectors from the NESSIE project.
Testing char type.
Tests "main.main" is exported on android/arm, which golang.org/x/mobile/app depends on.
Tests libgo.so to export the following functions.
Tests libgo2.so, which does not export any functions.
Tests whether the immediate can be stored in the 12 bit imm field.
Text encoding
Text encoding used by this database
Text inserted into table-name column
Text of MATCH query
Text of document to be inserted
Text of the CREATE TABLE or CREATE VIEW statement
Text of the SQL statement
Text of the SQL statement that generated this
Text of the error report
Text of the new string
Text of the token
Text of the token.
Text to add to EQP output
Text to tokenize
Text will be wrapped according to the STDOUT terminal width, so paragraphs are flowed using the C stringizing and the CR definition.
Textual time units and their abbreviations:
Thanks to "Super Pikeman."
Thanks to Aaron Giles for this idea.
Thanks to Frank Warmerdam for pointing out the issue.
Thanks to Frank Warmerdam.
Thanks to Geert Jansen
Thanks to Ian Taylor for noticing this possibility and sending the original patch.
Thanks to John Buckman.
Thanks to Robin Houston for the original version of this logic.
Thanks to Steven Brown.
That approach would require an extra instruction and memory reference in every stack growth prolog and would also require rewriting the code that 8c generates for extern registers.
That aside, the greatest value wins, but we can't know that it will until we've scanned both numbers to know that they have the same magnitude, so we remember it in BIAS.
That clips too, so don't clip twice.
That concludes the basic part of this demonstration program.
That confuses minit, so we remove that signal stack here before calling the regular mstart.
That could help to adjust intersections  to produce a nice interior_extrema.
That file uses //export so it can't put function definitions in the "C" import comment.
That is no longer true.
That is not permitted.
That is the IFD for the first thumbnail
That is the largest legal value, divided by the base.
That is why the "so" value is used to bump the start location rather than being passed as a PCRE "starting offset".
That is why we have a private table here.
That is, the match must be before or at the first newline.
That is, we allow equality in stopping tests when the round-nearest rule will give the same floating-point value as would satisfaction of the stopping test with strict inequality.
That means the byte after represents a character or is the leading byte of an sequence of 8-bit code units.
That method assumes that no backtracking is possible.
That one of the jobs of this function.
That seems acceptable to me, to avoid making this code hard to follow
That should be COM_FIELD_LIST.
That should be handled by the client when fetching.
That table is guaranteed to be a virtual table.
That was the date, now we do the tiiiime
That way, if the name is longer than any in the table, the comparison will fail without reading beyond the table entry.
That will likely cover most cases.
That's ok, break
That's the one we're interested in.
That's why for generators the execution context is allocated using a separate VM stack, thus allowing to save and restore it simply by replacing a pointer.
The  x  subexpression
The "-z" option of "file" is the reason for this ugly code.
The ".FFF" may be omitted.
The "B" part of a "A AS B" phrase.
The "OUTER" keyword is present
The "Select-ID" for this loop
The "break" point is here, just past the end of the outer loop.
The "new" rowid.
The "old" rowid, or NULL.
The "op" member indicates whether this is a "DELETE", "INSERT", "UPDATE" or "SELECT" statement.
The "real" underlying VFS
The "real" underlying file descriptor
The "step_list" member points to the first element of a linked list containing the SQL statements specified as the trigger program.
The "subtype" set for JSON values
The "to" table is the table that is named in the REFERENCES clause.
The "xxx" in the name "xxx.yyy" or "xxx"
The "yyy" in the name "xxx.yyy"
The ',' token after the last column defn.
The .gd format is not intended to be a general-purpose format.
The 0 at H indicate the end-of-document.
The 0 digit has special meaning at the beginning of a number.
The 0x48 base mentioned above is the offset of the tsd array within the per-thread structure on Leopard and Snow Leopard.
The 1-byte case.
The 1st shear may use the original clrBack as color index Convert it once here
The 2-byte case
The 2-dimensional table is indexed by the properties of two adjacent code points.
The 2/3/1 scale factors used here correspond loosely to the relative weights of the colors in the NTSC grayscale equation.
The 3-byte case
The 3rd, 6th, 8th, 11th, 14th, 17th and 19th years of this cycle are leap years.
The 5 month cycle is used to account for the varying lengths of months.
The API routine is partially broken on filenames ending ".com".
The Accelerator is disabled, act as if without the Accelerator
The BETWEEN expression
The BLOB containing the varints
The BLOB encoding of the document size
The BTree cursor
The BTree that contains the table
The BtShared object that owns pPage
The BtShared this cursor points to
The Btree to which this cursor belongs
The C definitions for tracebackctxt.go.
The CGI RFC allows servers to pass on unvalidated Authorization data
The CJK compatibility area.
The CPU does not set flags if the shift count is 0.
The CREATE token that begins the statement
The CREATE token that begins this statement
The Current table
The DBG object
The DIR typedef is not compatible with Unix.
The DISTINCT marking is pointless.
The Expr.x union is never used at the same time as Expr.pRight
The FILTER_NULL_ON_FAILURE flag inverts the usual return values of the function: normally when validation fails false is returned, and when the input value doesn't exist NULL is returned.
The FROM clause
The FROM clause btree term to add
The FROM clause of the outer query
The FROM clause of the recursive query
The FROM clause of the subquery
The FROM clause term to get the next index
The FROM clause term to process
The FROM clause term to search
The FTS table to delete from
The FTS3 table
The GLOB operator does not have an ESCAPE clause.
The GROUP BY clause
The GROUP BY clause.
The HAVING clause
The HAVING clause.
The Han ideographs.
The Hangul syllables.
The IN expression
The IN, SELECT, or EXISTS operator
The INSERT primitive adds a new element to the RowSet.
The INT64_OR_DOUBLE type is a 64-bit integer type when available, otherwise double.
The JSON to search
The Jewish calendar has been in use for several thousand years, but in the early days there was no formula to determine the start of a month.
The Julian calendar specifies that every year that is a multiple of 4 will be a leap year.
The KeyInfo elements are used sequentially.
The LHS of the IN operator
The LHS of the rule reduced
The LIMIT clause will jump out of the loop for us
The LIMIT clause will terminate the loop for us
The LIMIT clause.
The LIMIT expression.
The Loop object
The MATCH or rowid constraint, if any
The MD5 transformation for all four rounds.
The MergeEngine that the IncrMerger will control
The Next opcode is only used after SeekGT, SeekGE, and Rewind.
The OCaml GC must know about them.
The OFFSET clause.
The OFFSET expression.
The ON clause of a join
The ONEPASS_DESIRED flags never occurs together with ORDER BY
The OP_Column opcode can decode the record later.
The OP_OpenEphemeral for the sorting index
The OP_REF and OP_REFI opcodes are used for a reference to a numbered group or to a non-duplicated named group.
The OR-clause broken out into subterms
The ORDER BY clause
The ORDER BY clause is ignored for all of the above
The ORDER BY clause or NULL
The ORDER BY clause.
The ORDER BY or GROUP BY clause to be processed
The ORDER BY term is an integer constant.
The OS might guarantee only one guard page at the bottom of the stack, and a page size can be as small as 4096 bytes.
The OVECTOR offset goes to TMP2.
The P1 operand
The P1 register is initialized to 0 by this instruction.
The P2 operand
The P3 operand
The P4 operand
The P4 operand as an integer
The P4 parameter is not used
The PDO Database Handle Class
The PDO Statement Handle Class
The POSIX class substitutes must be in the order of the POSIX class names, defined above, and there are both positive and negative cases.
The PRIMARY KEY index
The PRIMARY KEY index for WITHOUT ROWID tables
The PRIMARY KEY index on the table
The PT_CLIST property is a pseudo-property that contains a pointer to a list of case-equivalent characters.
The Parse structure
The PgHdr1 header is a subclass of sqlite3_pcache_page.
The Private Use area.
The Queue table
The REQ_CASELESS leaves the lower 28 bit empty.
The RHS of the IN operator
The SELECT has been coded.
The SELECT statement
The SELECT statement being coded.
The SELECT statement containing the ORDER BY
The SELECT statement containing the clause
The SELECT statement holding pOrderBy
The SELECT statement to be fixed to one database
The SELECT statement with the ORDER BY clause
The SET clause: list of column and new values
The SET expressions are not actually used inside the WHERE loop.
The SHM file is readonly
The SQL table being indexed
The SQL to be executed
The SQLITE_ColumnCache flag disables the column cache.
The SQLite database connection
The SRT_ operation to apply to prior selects
The STR_PTR must be released.
The SnippetIter object has just been initialized.
The Source list to check and modify
The SrcList to be enlarged
The Sun's ecliptic latitude is not
The Table object to which the virtual table belongs
The USING clause of a join
The UTF-8 string to compare against
The VDBE already created by calling function
The VDBE containing code to translate
The VDBE cursor
The VDBE cursor for the index
The VDBE cursor for the table
The VDBE cursor number used to access this table
The VDBE cursor that implements the sort
The VDBE cursor used by this IN operator
The VDBE cursor used to access pIdx
The VDBE cursor used to access the table
The VDBE has been deallocated
The VDBE should have been allocated before this routine is called.
The VDBE under construction
The VDBE we are building
The VFS containing this xAccess method
The VFS for which this is the xOpen method
The VFS pointer.
The VFS that created this unixFile
The VFS to use for actual file I/O
The VFS used to create pDbFd
The VFS used to open this file
The VM that owns this context
The VM under construction
The WAL file is readonly
The WAL file to which we write
The WAL transaction is then closed.
The WHERE clause
The WHERE clause for DELETE or UPDATE steps
The WHERE clause of the outer query
The WHERE clause to be scanned
The WHERE clause to be searched
The WHERE clause.
The WHERE processing context
The WhereClause to be initialized
The WhereLoop builder
The WhereLoop factory
The WhereLoop object
The WhereLoop object being coded
The WhereOrSet to be updated
The WherePath to check
The WhereScan object being initialized
The Windows errno from the last I/O error
The X expression
The Y is also optional.
The Z in X.Y.Z cannot be NULL
The _DEP / _DEP_DEP variants additionally free the temporary values passed in the last / last two arguments.
The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
The above might be initialized to non-zero.
The actual computation according to FIPS 180-2:6.2.2 step 3.
The actual computation according to FIPS 180-2:6.3.2 step 3.
The actual computation.
The actual string
The actual transformation has been performed several dozens line above.
The affinity of the column or 0 if not a column
The affinity string for the record
The affinity to be applied
The aggregate function implementation
The algorithm is found in Knuth Vol 2.
The algorithms are based on a preponderance of less authoritative sources.
The alpha channel is where it's really at these days.
The application should resume compression after it has made more room in the output buffer.
The application should resume decompression after it has loaded more data into the input buffer.
The argument is a Parse object for the code generator.
The argument list
The argument to this macro should be a variable.
The argument values
The arguments after _NAMELENGTH and _CONTENTSLENGTH must be explicitly cast to long in curl_formadd use since curl needs a long not an int.
The arguments should have their types declared as well, but you're free to pass arguments of other types instead.
The array might be stored in a local variable that will be overwritten.
The associated database
The associated database connection
The associated pager.
The associativity is preserved.
The assumed sector size for this process
The attached database containing the blob
The attempt to extend the existing mapping failed.
The author of this software is David M.
The authorization context
The authors hereby grant permission to use, copy, modify, distribute, and license this software and its documentation for any purpose, provided that existing copyright notices are retained in all copies and that this notice is included verbatim in any distributions.
The auto-commit flag.
The automatic index is partial
The backtrack path must check whether there is a next alternative.
The backup process p has already copied page iPage.
The base for radix conversion
The base frame is on the machine stack, and so must not be freed.
The basic MD5 functions.
The basic blocks of regular expressions are condition checkers whose execute different commands depending on the result of the condition check.
The beginning and end of the LRU list
The below are erroneous inputs, so NULL return is expected/required
The below if loop is added for NetWare to fix an abend while unloading PHP when an Apache unload command is issued on the system console.
The binary operation
The binary record
The bit is set if the corresponding page is allocated.
The bit that is set for overflow
The bits used for last_capture
The bits used for the overflow flag
The blame is not necessarily with GCC, though.
The block header contains the size of the previous and the next block.
The blocking transaction has been concluded.
The boolean index is empty
The bottom of the loop
The bracket content will be checked by the OP_BRA/OP_CBRA case above.
The branch is temporarily terminated with OP_END when this function is called.
The branch terminates at string end
The breaking rules are as follows: 1.
The btree layer manages reference counting issues.
The btree to be checked
The btree to set the safety level on
The busy callback
The byte case is the same as non-UTF8
The byte is OK
The bytes to be written
The cache to truncate
The calendar was created in 46 B.C., but the details did not stabilize until at least 8 A.D., and perhaps as late at the 4th century.
The call assures that only valid opcodes are sent
The call to this function will effect all following calls of SOAP methods.
The callback for when the main thread has issued a command to the run loop thread.
The callback function is called when the event is first registered and when the event is cancelled.
The callback function may have defined the class
The caller has already promised not to write to it.
The caller is responsible for zeroing output parameters.
The caller must always assume that it is.
The caller must ensure that the source buffer is long enough that this routine does not run off the end and dereference non-existent memory looking for trail bytes.
The caller must have already opened the stream, and is responsible for closing it after finishing compression.
The caller must have already opened the stream, and is responsible for closing it after finishing decompression.
The caller must hold the appropriate mutex.
The caller will do so.
The caller will fix it.
The callout item calls an external function, if one is provided, passing details of the match so far.
The case of a zero minimum is special because of the need to stick OP_BRAZERO in front of it, and because the group appears once in the data, whereas in other cases it appears the minimum number of times.
The cell index area
The cell index from which to extract the ID
The cell index.
The cell may contain a pointer to an overflow page.
The cell pointers occur in sorted order.
The cell should normally be sized correctly.
The cell to be inserted
The cell to write
The chain does not match the policy
The char contains its length.
The character is lower case.
The character is title case.
The character is upper case.
The character or character type itself comes last in all cases.
The character set ID of the buffer data.
The character set form of the buffer data.
The character we are checking can be multibyte.
The check can be turned off for maximum performance, but the consequences of supplying an invalid string are then undefined.
The check expression
The check for little-endian architectures that tolerate unaligned memory accesses is just an optimization.
The checkpoint status information
The checksum is wrong
The child table to be scanned
The chunks are cache aligned.
The classes that have their own maps are: space, xdigit, digit, upper, lower, word, graph, print, punct, and cntrl.
The clause this term is part of
The client will de-serialize it into memory, and can iterate through the results via API.
The client will then send the XML to the server via external mechanism.
The client will use stmt_send_long_data
The code below is actually not very nice, but I didn't see a better method
The code can also be used to build a tree via API then write out the tree to a buffer, thus "serializing" the xml.
The code can be up to 6 hex digits in length to allow surrogates to be specified.
The code does, however, check for an overrun.
The code is a duplicate of a code in the last range, so just return.
The code is already generated.
The code is duplicated for the caseless and caseful cases, for speed, since matching characters is likely to be quite common.
The code is shared with single-character repeats by setting op_type to add a suitable offset into repeat_type.
The code is similar to that for character classes, but repeated for efficiency.
The code is similar to the above, without the capturing complication.
The code later relies on this.
The code requires a 32-bit integer type, though.
The code should be inserted somewhere before the last range in the list.
The code starts after the real_pcre block and the capture name table.
The code variable is pointing at the byte into which the BRA operator has been stored.
The collation sequence used by the comparison.
The collector should only be called by the master.
The column containing the blob
The column of the index to be loaded
The column on the LHS of the term.
The column that is wanted
The column the token must match
The column value supplied by SQLite must be in range.
The columns of the result set
The columns to change in the UPDATE statement
The combined READER/HANDLER
The commit flag.
The commit has already been done.
The common case
The comparison of the keys is performed by a user supplied function.
The comparison opcode
The comparison was done above.
The compiler is not-reentrant.
The complete IN operator
The complete WAL information
The complete WHERE clause
The complete hash table
The complete new option state
The complete select statement being coded
The complete wSendmail package with source code can be located from http://www.jgaa.com
The complex case - There is a multi-file write-transaction active.
The compressed file stream
The compression flags can
The computed column name
The computed hash
The conch file contains the header, host id and lock file path
The condition is an assertion.
The condition must always be set, even if the ORR/EOR is not executed above.
The condition must always be set, even if the ORR/EORI is not executed above.
The condition must always be set, even if the ORRI/EORI is not executed above.
The conflict algorithm.
The connection is removed from the blocked list.
The connection to be closed
The connection to be opened
The constant may resolve to NULL
The constraint to test
The content of the page
The content of the whole page
The context function, used when tracing back C calls into Go.
The controlling WhereLoop object
The conversion is done in-place.
The cookie mask contains one bit for each database file open.
The core of the MD5 algorithm, this alters an existing MD5 hash to reflect the addition of 16 longwords of new data.
The count is already in characters, but we need to skip over a multibyte character in UTF8 mode.
The count part of the header will be the total number of codes that have numbers.
The cross dimension is the max of the elements dimension since there can only be one element in that cross dimension.
The ctypes array contains only 256 values.
The current SQL statement
The current code allows for fixed one- or two-byte sequences, plus "any" and "anycrlf".
The current column index in pp1
The current column index in pp2
The current continuation level reverts to the level of the one we're seeing.
The current doclist-index page is full.
The current leaf node is full.
The current match
The current piece of subject
The current thread will continue to use this snapshot.
The current token did not end with e.g. a "."
The current token is no valid hexadecimal digit
The cursor for a virtual table
The cursor number of the table
The cursor on the LHS of the term
The cursor pointing to the table
The cursor structure of the backend
The cursor to be moved
The cursor to compare against
The cursor used for this query
The cursor's state is set to CURSOR_REQUIRESEEK.
The data for the record immediately follows this header
The data is a list of varints.
The data is currently in the process of being written, wait until it actually is ready to be used before returning.
The data of the new record
The data variable is saved across frames, so the byte map needs to be stored there.
The database
The database being initialized
The database being vacuumed
The database connection
The database connection holding this btree
The database connection must not have been closed.
The database connection that owns this statement
The database connection whose status is desired
The database containing table being inserted into
The database containing the table to be locked
The database disk image is malformed
The database encoding
The database file
The database file is determined by P3.
The database file is locked
The database file on disk has not been modified.
The database file to check
The database has been modified
The database index number
The database may not be read or written.
The database name
The database number
The database of pDest
The database of pSrc
The database on which the SQL executes
The database schema changed
The database size is known in this state.
The database structure
The database the table is being created in
The database to store the trigger in
The database we are looking in
The debugger uses a task-level exception handler to intercept signals.
The decimal point
The default configuration is limited to 512 stdio files
The default page size and offset
The default relocation type for this operand.
The default socket location is sometimes defined by configure.
The default value is PDO_PARAM_STR
The default value is the full path to the archive.
The definition of the module
The definition of this CTE
The dependency table is made of 2 hashtables, one that can is used to quickly answer if a dependency exists.
The description of the operands.
The descriptor will be initialized in a thread, so we have to give a chance to get opened.
The deserialized value is returned.
The desired encoding for the collating sequence
The destination object is made permanent so that multiple JPEG images can be written to the same file without re-executing jpeg_stdio_dest.
The destructor
The details are unknown, but the lengths of the months were adjusted until they finally stablized in 8 A.D.
The difference between VSPACE and ANYNL is that the latter can match the two-character CRLF sequence, but that is not relevant for finding the first character, so their code here is identical.
The difference between the Julian and today's Gregorian calendar is that the Gregorian does not make centennial years leap years unless they are a multiple of 400, which leads to a year of 365.2425 days.
The dimensions can never be smaller than the padding and border
The dirent struct is compatible with Unix, except that d_ino is always 1 and d_off is made up as we go along.
The dist tool enables this by build flag when testing.
The diurnal arc, hours
The doc states it'll be always true, however it theoretically could be FALSE when the thread was signaled.
The docid to be deleted
The eMode parameter is always valid
The early check means that subsequent code can assume it is dealing with a valid string.
The element that matches key
The element to be inserted
The element to be removed from the pH
The element we are about to add would make us go to the next line
The empty list
The end of these brackets will always be OP_KETRPOS, which returns MATCH_KETRPOS without going further in the pattern.
The entire doclist will fit on the current leaf.
The entire doclist will not fit on this leaf.
The entire output segment fits on a single node.
The entire poslist will fit on the current leaf.
The entire poslist will not fit on this leaf.
The entire segment is stored in the root node.
The entire tree fits on the root node.
The entry into which pNew is inserted
The entry point is zProc.
The enum value for this mnemonic.
The environment variable doesn't exist.
The error at a given pixel is propagated to its not-yet-processed neighbors using the standard F-S fractions, ...
The error code in the range 0x10400-0x104ff are reserved for IDNA related error codes
The error code is set to "err_code".
The error code range 0x10000 0x10100 are reserved for Transliterator
The error code range 0x10100 0x10200 are reserved for formatting API parsing error
The error code range 0x10200 0x102ff are reserved for Break Iterator related error
The error codes in the range 0x10300-0x103ff are reserved for regular expression related errrs
The error context into which to write the error
The error has left the cache in an inconsistent state.
The error may not be safe to handle in user-space
The error stack is NOT cleared after this call.
The error texts are now all in one long string, to save on relocations.
The error_code is cleared, otherwise the caller will read the last error message from the driver.
The escape character
The escape character string must consist of a single UTF-8 character.
The escape coded a single character
The exceptional ones forgo this.
The existence of the to-table is not checked.
The expression is a column.
The expression is a sub-select.
The expression list to be analyzed.
The expression list to be coded
The expression mask set
The expression of the term
The expression parse tree
The expression that defines the start bound
The expression that is the result column name
The expression to be analyzed
The expression to be analyzed.
The expression to be fixed to one database
The expression to check authorization on
The expression to code when the VDBE initializes
The expression to evaluate
The expression to extract a value from
The extra column whose name is the same as the table.
The extra flags to use in calls to the Win32 heap APIs.
The fg and bg colors must already be in the color table for palette images.
The field width is "width".
The fields of the result
The file contains at most 1 b-tree
The file descriptor
The file descriptor for pFile
The file descriptor for the journal file
The file descriptor to be filled in
The file is compiled on its own as part of the PCRE library.
The file mbfilter.c is included in this package .
The file to open
The file:// wrapper may have been disabled/overridden
The final result will be added to the first context.
The first 59 days of the year are the same regardless of the length of the year.
The first 8 memory cells are used for the result set.
The first and the last character of a label must be alphanumeric
The first block has format u.hdr.
The first char may be unset for an unanchored pattern, of course.
The first column is in this register
The first cursor that needs saving
The first element of the array
The first element of the linked list is the first step of the trigger-program.
The first fields of the two keys are equal.
The first four bytes contain the length of the key
The first key should be at 257.
The first key should be at 258.
The first list index given out is always 1.
The first metonic cycle starts with Jewish year 1, or 3761/60 B.C.
The first nOBSat columns of the previous row
The first node of the scan
The first one has to be handled carefully because it's the original copy, which has to be moved up.
The first op2_len bytes of result will still be the same.
The first page of each chunk is reseved for chunk header.
The first page of the wal-index must be mapped at this point.
The first parameter is the CLI startup filename, which defaults to "index.php".
The first pass, m always is 0, so no_read becomes 1 in the first pass.
The first step is to get the stack status structure.
The first three must be alpha, lower, upper, as this is assumed for handling case independence.
The first to increment to 1 does actual initialization
The first two entries in each row are Unicode general categories, and apply always, because all the characters they include are part of the PCRE character set.
The first_char value is never set for an anchored regular expression, but the anchoring may be forced at run time, so we have to test for anchoring.
The fixer to be initialized
The float won't be larger than 1e15 anyway.
The following EBCDIC-to-ASCII table may relate more closely to reality, or at least to modern reality.
The following are only used if the FTS5_SEGITER_REVERSE flag is set.
The following are used by the fts3_eval.c module.
The following are used by the fts3_snippet.c module.
The following array determines which.
The following block runs if pExpr is the root of a NEAR query.
The following block sets the new values of Mem.z and Mem.xDel.
The following block updates the change-counter.
The following blocks should probably assert in debug mode, but they are to cleanup in case any locks remained open
The following code should catch this problem at compile-time.
The following comment and code was inserted in January 1999.
The following default should work okay.
The following defines are used in implementing this.
The following definition of Storeinc is appropriate for MIPS processors.
The following example shows how the code generated for a capturing bracket with two alternatives.
The following fields are only available in 3.8.11 and later
The following from FF's DBUG library, which is in the public domain
The following goto is an optimization.
The following info was obtained using OleView to export the IDL from mscorlib.tlb.
The following is just enough definition to be able to reach the _AppDomain::CreateInstance method that we need to use to be able to fire up .Net objects.
The following macro is used to suppress compiler warnings.
The following routines provide output for bcd numbers package using the rules of POSIX bc for output.
The following structure contains the information associated with a character set.
The following structure defines the vector of words returned by the STKSTAT library routine.
The following structure describes the data structure which trails any stack segment.
The following structure is the key data type for the recursive code generator.
The following table supplies these names
The following terms apply to all files associated with the software unless explicitly disclaimed in individual files.
The following testcase is true for indices with redundant columns.
The following three return codes are possible: ZEND_HASH_APPLY_KEEP   - continue ZEND_HASH_APPLY_STOP   - stop iteration ZEND_HASH_APPLY_REMOVE - delete the element, combineable with the former
The following two checks can be removed once we drop XP support
The following two optimizations are disabled for partial matching or if disabling is explicitly requested.
The following value requires a mutex to change.
The foreign key linking pSrc to pTab
The format field code letter
The four core functions - F1 is optimized somewhat
The full division routine.
The full list of Unicode newline characters is taken from http://unicode.org/unicode/reports/tr18/.
The full_read argument tells whether characters above max are accepted or not.
The function calling context
The function definition object
The function definition to insert
The function for reporting virtual-machine related events to VTune.
The function name
The function name.
The function overwrites the appropriate opcode values, so the type of the pointer must be cast.
The function returns always true.
The function returns old value of location options.
The function returns only the integer part of the number.
The function we are evaluating for match quality
The function will return a unique method ID, the user should maintain the ID for each method
The general concept of this implementation is to keep track of all alloca-allocated blocks, and reclaim any that are found to be deeper in the stack than the current invocation.
The general version.
The generator is already closed, thus can't resume
The generator is already closed, thus can't send anything
The getput_arg_fast should handle this otherwise.
The glob pattern
The group by clause
The group the new page cache will belong to
The handle to our heap.
The handling of escape sequences consisting of a string of digits starting with one that is not zero is not straightforward.
The hash for this key.
The hash function
The hash table into which to insert
The hash table is cleared before returning.
The hash table to insert into
The hashtable containing the shared values.
The head also contains pointers to three user defined functions: - a function to test if a cached userdata matches some keydata - a function to provide a new userdata struct to the cache if there has been a cache miss.
The head structure has a pointer to the most-recently-used element, and elements are moved to this position in the list each time they are used.
The header was successfully read.
The hello method is not inherited by SSL structs when assigning a new context inside the SNI callback, so the just use SSLv23
The higher bits represent the key, the lower ones the value.
The highest number for a valid UTF-8 first byte is in fact 0x3d.
The i-th cell pointer
The i-th index expression
The iCol-th column of the result set
The iLimit register is initialized to LIMIT.
The iParent cursor will never be used.
The idx of the new segment is always 0.
The immediate operand must be 32 bit.
The impersonation token is not actually assigned to the thread, but is used in the call to AccessCheck.
The implementation is stolen from array_data_shuffle
The index associated with pLoop
The index being used for this loop
The index can not be larger than ZIP_INT64_MAX since the size of the central directory cannot be larger than ZIP_UINT64_MAX, and each entry is larger than 2 bytes.
The index entry must begin with a header size
The index for which to generate a key
The index of the cell within the node
The index of the database the expression refers to
The index that triggers the constraint
The index to be created
The index we will be using
The index whose column is to be loaded
The index: a pointer to pointers
The indices for graph, print, and punct are needed, so identify them.
The individual item types that can be repeated set these backoff variables appropriately.
The inet type holds an IPv4 or IPv6 host address, and optionally its subnet, all in one field.
The information where a class is declared is only available for user classes
The information where a function is declared is only available for user classes
The initial code size
The initial database size
The initial handshake is never rate-limited
The initial options have been put into the cd block so that they can be changed if an option setting is found within the regex right at the beginning.
The initial size of the Win32-specific heap.
The inner query or "subquery"
The inode of fd
The input string A
The instruction includes the AL condition.
The integer ROWID or key for the record to be inserted
The integer just read is a column number.
The integer range is limited by the machine's int representation.
The integer values
The intent was to create a new calendar system that was based on scientific principals, not religious traditions.
The interface might change in incompatible ways.
The internal __COMPILER_HALT_OFFSET__ is prefixed by NULL byte
The intersection finding technique of this code could be improved by remembering the previous intertersection, and by using the slope.
The iterator key should be the path that the file will have within the phar archive.
The iterator must return a series of strings that are full paths to files that should be added to the phar.
The iterator to advance by one position
The journal file from which to read
The journal file into which to write
The journal file may or may not be open at this point.
The journal file needs to be opened.
The julian day number times 86400000
The kernel offers thread handlers a chance to resolve exceptions before the task handler, so we can generate the panic and avoid lldb's SIGSEGV handler.
The key MUST be present.
The key for INTKEY tables, or nPayload otherwise
The key is generated using MD5, but we only use the first 8 bytes because it allows us to use atomic operations.
The key is stored in register P3.
The key numbers start at 0x100, and we expect to be one of the early calls to pthread_key_create, so we should be able to get a pretty low number.
The key of the new record
The key we are searching for
The key will be incremented on first use, so it'll start at 0
The key with be for index pIdx which is an index on pTab.
The keys of the PHP hash MUST be numeric.
The label could point the address after the constant pool.
The largest amount I've seen used is 218, so this number is very generous.
The largest iLevel value in the tree
The last argument should be the image.
The last buffer content is sent to next buffer
The last capture is a local variable even for recursions.
The last column is NULL to indicate the end of the row.
The last column is the record as a blob.
The last field of the index should be an integer - the ROWID.
The last four columns apply to items that cannot be repeated, so there is no need to have rows for them.
The last multiplication could overflow.
The last multiplication could underflow.
The last packet will have 'eof' set If PS, then no result set follows.
The last part is the salt string.
The last prior entry
The last rowid in the doclist may not be on the current page.
The last statement or normal query result will close it then.
The last token parsed
The latter hasn't been moved
The latter is important for XHTML.
The latter is needed because for certain multiple inputs to the buggy algorithm there exist easily found inputs to the correct algorithm that produce the same hash.
The least significant bit is bit 1.
The left operand
The left part of the FROM clause already seen
The length in the table is a minimum, so we have to arrange to skip the extra bytes.
The length in the terminating ket is always the length of the whole bracketed item.
The length is cached so we don't need to ask Oracle every time
The length of the serialized data for the column
The level of the FROM clause we are working on
The list is connected by Trigger.pNext pointers.
The list must be in order.
The list of expressions
The list of freeblocks must be in ascending order.
The list of lengths is terminated by a zero length entry.
The local variables YYSIZE and YYSTACKSIZE give the old and new number of elements in the stack, and YYPTR gives the new location of the stack.
The local_size is already adjusted by the saved registers.
The location of the column value is returned.
The location to move pDbPage to
The lock is held if and only if the lockfile exists
The locking context for the proxy lock
The logic is that a recursion can only make sense if there is another alternation that stops the recursing.
The longest anonymous name
The longest property name we use in an uploaded file array
The longest run of digits wins.
The longest string dtoa can return is about 751 bytes long.
The look-ahead token
The lookahead symbol.
The lookup key
The loop below will correct for any error in this estimate.
The loop that calls php_random_bytes should be terminated by the exception instead of proceeding to demand more entropy.
The loop that contains the LIKE operator
The loop to adjust downward
The low 8 bit must be zero.
The lowest nibble contains the phar wide flags.
The macros CAMLparam0 and CAMLlocal1 register the roots.
The main btree structure
The main database structure
The main db file
The main dimension is the sum of all the elements dimension plus the spacing.
The main parser program.
The main query has a select-id of zero.
The main static mutex
The main thread tells the run loop thread that a new command is ready by writing to a pipe.
The main thread will append commands to this list
The main thread will only ever remove all the events...it will never append an event
The main thread writes to this fd when there are events ready to be run
The major token code number
The major token to shift in
The major token value.
The major type of the error token
The man page from OS X says "REG_STARTEND affects only the location of the string, not how it is matched".
The mapping must be valid for at least nAmt bytes.
The master stores, the workers read.
The master-journal page number must never be used as a pointer map page
The match succeeded, but the output vector wasn't big enough.
The matching pSrcList item
The max value usec can have is 0xF423F, so we use only five hex digits for usecs.
The maximum length of an e-mail address is 320 octets, per RFC 2821.
The maximum number of cells on a single page of the database.
The maximum size of the Win32-specific heap.
The maximum supported page-size is 65536 bytes.
The memory locations
The memory manager table
The memory sanitizer distributed with versions of clang before 3.8 has a bug: if you call mmap before malloc, mmap may return an address that is later overwritten by the msan library.
The memsys static mutex
The merge engine to advance to the next row
The methods above are in version 1 of the sqlite_module object.
The methods of the json_each virtual table
The methods of the json_tree virtual table.
The minimum answer is 1.
The minimum count for any phrase so far.
The minor type of the error token
The mode to open the stream with
The module for this tokenizer
The module for this virtual table
The module will be unloaded automatically when the process exits.
The month table.
The most-recently-returned value is always left at the beginning of the list after retrieval.
The multiply routine.
The mutex type
The nTo best paths at the current level
The name context
The name context of the SELECT statement
The name context used to resolve the name
The name of the author may not be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
The name of the new table
The name of the table/view the trigger applies to
The name of the trigger
The name-context to resolve expressions in
The names "Apache Server" and "Apache Group" must not be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without prior written permission.
The names are now all in a single string, to reduce the number of relocations when a shared library is dynamically loaded.
The names of its contributors may not be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
The names of the authors may not be used to endorse or promote products derived from this software without specific prior written permission.
The negative sign if needed.
The new AtoF never returns NaN
The new Julian calendar set fixed lengths for the months, abandoning the lunar cycle.
The new column
The new entry
The new function is given a new name.
The new hash table
The new key
The new leaf holds no terms or rowids
The new mode call back routine
The new offset
The new opcode
The new record
The new rowid
The new sorter
The new state to shift in
The new table
The new table name.
The new trigger
The new value, or NULL on failure.
The new virtual table
The newly created page cache
The next 31 bits encode the key the lower 31 bits the value.
The next 5 must be kept together and in sequence so that a test that checks for any one of them can use a range.
The next action
The next entry is on the current page.
The next few lines are basically copied from gd2CreateFromFile we change the file size, so don't want to use the code directly.
The next index associated with the same table
The next iteration of the do-loop balances the parent page.
The next key to be read is cached in nKey/aKey.
The next line would break the image on writeback:
The next page to be freed
The next state
The next table maps tokens into fallback tokens.
The next three routines implement inverse colormap filling.
The next two lines ignore swap of low- and high-order 2 bytes.
The node containing the cell to be read
The node from which to extract a coordinate
The node from which to extract the ID
The node into which the cell is to be written
The node may be a leaf or an internal node.
The node number
The node to render
The nodeno of the root node is always 1.
The non flexible children can overflow the container, in this case we should just assume that there is no space available.
The non-greedy case could be replaced by an OP_EXACT, but it is probably not worth it.
The noopFunc macro provides this.
The normal repeating kets try the rest of the pattern or restart from the preceding bracket, in the appropriate order.
The number is between 0 and 1.
The number is greater than 1.
The number is in base 10, do it the fast way.
The number is some other base.
The number of ZEND_CASE instructions usually terminated by ZEND_FREE that finally kills the value.
The number of bits of precision can be adjusted by changing these symbols.
The number of digits after the decimal point is SCALE.
The number of elements in the hashtable
The number of indices is returned.
The number of integers to decode
The number of integers to encode
The number of nonzero histogram cells within this box
The number of notReady tables
The number of pcache slots
The number of symbols on the RHS of the reduced rule.
The object to be destroyed
The offset data is the offset to the starting bracket from the start of the whole pattern.
The offset for ReadFile.
The offset for WriteFile.
The offset will always be the same for converting to title case.
The offset_vector values are handled similarly to the normal case above.
The offsets array is on a 4-byte boundary to keep things efficient for architectures that need such a thing.
The old does not.
The old journal mode
The old rowid
The only difference being the specification of leap years.
The only difference between OP_CLASS and OP_NCLASS occurs when a data character outside the range is encountered.
The only difference will be a combined handling of them in the end.
The only number that _can_ be determined is the number of rows that have already been pre-fetched by the client library.
The only possible error from InitPage
The only potential use of repetition is in cases when the assertion is optional.
The only thing the main thread can write to events is NULL, so we can just try one more time
The only thing the thread can write to commands is NULL, so we can just try one more time
The only way we can do that is to re-do the match at the same point, with a flag to force SKIP with an argument to be ignored.
The opcode being coded
The opcode mnemonic, e.g. "add"
The opcode to be commented
The open cursor on the table
The open database file
The operand
The operand token for setting the span
The operands are usually destroyed by the opcode handler.
The operator
The optional paramtype acts as a hint for drivers that have alternate quoting styles.
The order of destruction is important here.
The ordering is a comma delimited list of provider names.
The original LIKE operator
The original argv is then 'clobbered' to store the process title.
The original code caused an unsigned overflow in 64 bit systems, so now we use a conditional statement.
The original expression
The original idea for these functions came from Scott Wimer.
The original page number
The other one to retrieve the list of dependencies associated with an object.
The other thread can clear the list, so we know events can only be NULL until we change it.
The other thread has signaled us on this pipe and we've received the signal, now we need to read all the data so we can select on this fd again.
The other two will be 0.
The othercase might be the same value.
The others have a common form.
The output stack uses the rest of htab, and contains characters.
The output struct is copied, and may be freed by the caller.
The output vector is stored on the stack, and contains pointers to characters.
The output vector wasn't big enough
The overall R-Tree
The overrun tests check for a slightly smaller size so that they detect the overrun before it actually does run off the end of the data block.
The pDbPage reference remains valid.
The pH containing "elem"
The pH to be searched
The padding is done by adding '0's to the left of the string that is going to be printed.
The padding is done by printing the character ch.
The padding type value
The page and offset from which the current term was read.
The page being analyzed
The page being overwritten.
The page cache
The page data
The page is left marked dirty in this case.
The page must be corrupt
The page number of a page in journal
The page of the frame to be written
The page size
The page size can be any power of 2 between 512 and 65536.
The page that contains a pointer to pDbPage
The page that contains the Cell
The page that contains the cell
The page to move to.
The pager being played back
The pager cache has created a new page.
The pager object
The pager open on the database file
The pager that owns pPg
The pager this page is part of
The pager to set safety level for
The parent already computed us a width or height.
The parent key is a composite key that includes the IPK column
The parent or outer SELECT statement
The parent process has then to wait for the master process to initialize to return a consistent exit value.
The parent table
The parse context of the CREATE TRIGGER statement
The parsed WHERE clause
The parser action.
The parser builds the list this way.
The parser context
The parser to be deleted
The parser to be shifted
The parser's stack
The parsing context
The parsing context.
The particular policies used here have proved out well in experimental comparisons, but better ones may yet be found.
The pass2 scanning routines call fill_inverse_cmap when they need to use an unfilled entry in the cache.
The passed in "connection" can be a cached stub from plist or freshly created.
The passed string obviously doesn't descend from the regular serializer.
The password first, since that is what is most unknown
The path only contained slashes
The path to search
The pattern string B
The period of this function is equal to the product of both primes.
The phrase extracted from pExpr
The phrase object to trim the doclist of
The phrase the token belongs to
The pipes are only used signal the other thread that something is ready.
The point is past an end of the line segment.
The point lies inside the portion of the plane spanned by the line segment.
The pointer is always the first 4 bytes of the page in this case.
The pointer map data
The pointer map is used to locate the parent page quickly.
The pointer map page
The pointer map page number
The pointer p is currently at the last byte of the character.
The pointer to the top of the heap.
The position could have changed, recalculate
The position is set by the parent, but we need to complete it with a delta composed of the margin and left/top/right/bottom
The posix advisory locking structure
The posspropstab table has four entries per row.
The prefix should normally always be present.
The prepared statement
The prepared statement being evaluated
The prepared statement under construction
The prepared stmt under constructions
The present code works in the post-conversion color space, typically RGB.
The previous line is meant for vim and emacs, so it can correctly fold and unfold functions in source code.
The primary goals are portability and ease of use.
The print_lengths flag controls whether offsets and lengths of items are printed.
The probability is close to 0 in practice.
The problem here is that cp1252 looks like SJIS for certain chars.
The problem here is that cp1254 looks like SJIS for certain chars.
The problem in trying to be exactly like Perl is in the handling of escapes.
The program counter
The program should be interrupted before this sleep finishes.
The progress callback
The properties in each row are those that apply to the character set in question.
The public SQLite interface.
The purpose of this routine is to linearize, in some sense, stack addresses for alloca.
The quality parameter for gd2 stands for chunk size
The query under construction
The random check-hash initializer
The readdirfunc declaration can't be prototyped, because it is assigned, below, to two functions which are prototyped in glob.h and dirent.h as taking pointers to differently typed opaque structures.
The real implementation of xFetch and xUnfetch
The reasons are: 1.
The record flows over onto one or more overflow pages.
The record to verify
The recursive SELECT to be coded
The recursive part of a recursive CTE
The refcount is decremented in the persistent helper
The reference count is a 16-bit field, initialized to zero.
The reference string for digits.
The refinement below will clean this approximation up.
The regex below is based on a regex by Michael Rushton.
The regex is partly compiled into this space, but the compiled parts are discarded as soon as they can be, so that hopefully there will never be an overrun.
The regex might still be not perfect, but catches the most of IP variants.
The regions in the following copy operation cannot overlap.
The register allocator depends on this property.
The register or immediate operand.
The registers begin with iDest and increase consecutively.
The relative text table.
The remainder can be handled by code that is common with the non-zero minimum case below.
The remainder of the node contains the node entries.
The remainder will be in r1, the upper 16 bits of the quotient will be in d2 and the lower 16 bits will be in d1.
The remaining 5 to 6 days in the year are grouped at the end and are holidays.
The remaining available space that needs to be allocated
The remaining opcodes are just skipped over.
The remapping case could be accomplished with less memory for non- interlaced images, but interlacing causes some serious complications.
The repeating kets try the rest of the pattern or restart from the preceding bracket, in the appropriate order.
The replacement string C
The request could not be fulfilled using a freelist slot.
The request line looks like: "GET http://foo.bar.com HTTP/1.1" That is, there is no path.
The request line looks like: "GET http://foo.bar.com:1234 HTTP/1.1" That is, there is no path.
The request was for a RESERVED or EXCLUSIVE lock.
The requested data is available in the in-memory buffer.
The requested data is not all available in the in-memory buffer.
The requested memory region does not exist.
The requested region is not mapped into this processes address space.
The resource and the list entry with its pointer to the resource are still intact
The resource sizes table
The response will be serialized into XML and sent back to the client.
The rest also applies to other integer formats, so fall into that case.
The rest apply in both UCP and non-UCP cases.
The result code
The result is aligned on 2M boundary.
The result is aligned to 8 bytes.
The result is placed in RESULT.
The result is returned as a new image.
The result of the function is stored in register P3.
The result set must have exactly one column
The result set of the SELECT
The result set of the outer query
The result set that needs to be DISTINCT
The result that is returned from the executed PHP code is ignored.
The results in an exception.
The return address register
The return code
The return code indicates the error.
The return is the negated value of the frame size.
The return value is NULL.
The return value is stored here
The return value of this function will be used as the return value for this aggregate UDF.
The returned slot is either free or points to the key.
The returned value does not include leaf nodes.
The right operand
The right-hand side of the AS subexpression
The right-most of SELECTs to be coded
The roles of pLower and pUpper are swapped for a DESC index
The root cause was fixed in Oracle 10.2.0.4 but there is no compile time method to check for that precise patch level, nor can it be guaranteed that runtime will use the same patch level the code was compiled with.
The root page of the PRIMARY KEY is the table root page
The root page of the b-tree is overfull.
The root page of the b-tree now contains no cells.
The root page of the table to be locked
The root page of this tree
The routine below is shamelessly, gloriously floating point.
The routine to run as a thread
The row containing the glob
The row is selected by the general category and the column by the particular category.
The row that the VUpdate opcode will delete: none
The row-trigger may have deleted the row being updated.
The rowid searching for
The rowid that might be changing
The rowid we are to seek to
The rtree may have between 1 and RTREE_MAX_DIMENSIONS dimensions.
The run loop thread is responsible for running the loop and then executing the callbacks when they are triggered
The runtime signal handler will jump to this code.
The same code works when not in UTF-8 mode and in UTF-8 mode when there is no UCP support.
The same space is used in the second phase for remembering where to fill in forward references to subpatterns.
The same workspace is used during the second, actual compile phase for remembering forward references to groups so that they can be filled in at the end.
The schema has been loaded
The schema of the expression
The score for a perfect match
The score for this node.
The script cannot reasonably know the size of the message body after compression, so it's best do disable compression altogether.
The script was updated in March 2009 to generate a new EBCDIC-compliant version.
The search path is part of the HDF by convention
The second argument is the result.
The second check will generate a hit.
The second is a table name.
The second one is used when we already know we are past the end of the subject.
The second part of a range can be a single-character escape sequence, but not any of the other escapes.
The selected WhereLoop object
The semantic value of the lookahead symbol.
The semantic value stack.
The sentinel at the end of the array is the max index value.
The server doesn't send sqlstate in the greet packet.
The server is 5.5.x and supports authentication plugins
The server needs this for simple flow control checking.
The server sends 0 but libmysql doesn't read it and has established a protocol of giving back -1.
The server signalled error.
The server will de-serialize the XML back into an binary representation, call the appropriate registered method -- thereby generating a response.
The setting is persistent.
The setup query
The shared memory being locked
The shared memory will be simulated with heap memory.
The shebang line was read, get the current position to obtain the buffer start
The sign in front of the number
The signal trampoline expects the TLS slots to be zeroed.
The signature algorithm must be one of Phar::MD5, Phar::SHA1, Phar::SHA256, Phar::SHA512, or Phar::OPENSSL.
The signs of N1 and N2 are ignored.
The simplest is just to forbid invalid filenames, which is done here.
The single value is an array.
The single-byte matcher isn't allowed.
The single-byte matcher means we can't proceed in UTF-8 mode.
The size is set to zero when the storage is empty.
The size of a Mem5Link object must be a power of two.
The size of a single frame
The size of an array large to enough to hold all stacks, each with N elements.
The size of the heap after initialization of the server
The size of the maximum gap between one aligned stack and the next.
The sljit ceneric compiler.
The slot is free, let's try to take it.
The slot remains on the free-list.
The soft heap limit
The source and destination do not overlap.
The source code of the verification program is included in this package.
The source object and input buffer are made permanent so that a series of JPEG images can be read from the same file by calling jpeg_gdIOCtx_src only before the first one.
The source or pattern file
The space between the beginning and the first element and the space between each two elements.
The span to be added
The special case
The specific ORDER BY term
The specific database being pragmaed
The specific table containing the indexed database
The speed of this approach is heavily influenced by the subbox size: too small means too much overhead, too big loses because Heckbert's criterion can't eliminate as many colormap entries.
The sqlite_sequence table used by AUTOINCREMENT
The sqlite_stat2 table is deprecated.
The sqlite_statN table does not exist.
The stack is unchanged.
The stack pointer is decreased.
The stack segment linkage control information occurs at the high-address end of a stack segment.
The stacks and their tools: 'yyss': related to states.
The stacks and their tools: `yyss': related to states.
The start field is used to free temporary variables in case of exceptions.
The start/end pattern and initial options are already set from the pre-compile phase, as is the name_entry_size field.
The starting points of the name/number translation table and of the code are passed around in the compile data block.
The state stack.
The state variable is passed in to allow a function like fgetss to maintain state across calls to the function.
The state-number, or reduce action in SHIFTREDUCE
The statement to bind against
The string being accumulated
The string collected so far
The string is "OrpheanBeholderScryDoubt" on big-endian.
The string is built from string macros so that it works in UTF-8 mode on EBCDIC platforms.
The string is not necessarily zero-terminated.
The string may be treated as static by the caller.
The string to compare against the glob
The string will be the same as the name of the error code constant.
The strings are already in the correct encoding.
The strings compare the same.
The structure record
The study data is put in the latter, which is pointed to by the former, which may also get additional data set later by the calling program.
The subexpression broken out
The subquery
The subquery whose WHERE clause is to be augmented
The supported encoding types are hardcoded here because we are limited to the encodings supported by expat/xmltok.
The symbol can be either a terminal or nonterminal.
The symbolic label is really just a negative number.
The symbols being reduced.
The szMalloc field holds the correct memory allocation size
The tab_prefix table is the same size and type as the codetab.
The table already exists.
The table being constructed
The table being indexed
The table being inserted or updated
The table being read
The table being referenced
The table containing the blob
The table containing the value
The table contains key/value bindings encoded in a word.
The table cursor.
The table does not exist.
The table from which records will be deleted
The table from which rows are deleted
The table from which we should delete things
The table in the FROM clause of SELECT
The table in which we should change things
The table is opened using cursor 0.
The table is truncated at OP_CALLOUT because all relevant opcodes are less than that.
The table key
The table of operator names.
The table or view to which the trigger applies
The table pTrigger is attached to
The table pointer is always in native byte order.
The table that is indexed
The table the contains the triggers
The table to be opened
The table to be updated
The table to code triggers from
The table to insert into.
The table to rename.
The table trigger pTrigger is attached to
The table we are inserting into
The table we are writing to
The table whose column is desired
The table with the non-unique rowid
The tables are built according to the current locale.
The tables are used only for characters whose code values are less than 256.
The tables herein are needed only when UCP support is built into PCRE.
The target is relative to the link itself, not to the CWD.
The target name
The temporary database we vacuum into
The term being tested
The term of the WHERE clause to be coded
The term to be analyzed
The terminating NOTACHAR is copied form the clist itself.
The test for this is misc/cgo/testsanitizers.
The text encoding used by this database
The text expression being built
The texts of compile-time error messages.
The third and fourth entries are a general and a particular category, respectively, that include one or more relevant characters.
The third literal is the lowercased unqualified name
The third parameter
The thread handle
The thread identifier
The thread routine
The thread that will be using the new IncrMerger
The thread will append events to this linked list
The thread will only ever remove all the commands...it will never append a command
The thread writes to this fd when there are events ready to be returned
The three bits give eight cases.
The three bits give seven cases.
The three function arguments
The three output values will always be modified.
The threshold argument defines the tolerance to be used while comparing the image color and the color to crop.
The threshold is in a macro that can be changed at configure time.
The threshold method works relatively well but it can be improved.
The time interval specified 1,000,000 or more microseconds.
The time slicing may cause this function call to take up to 100 ms longer than you specified.
The timezone table.
The title text
The tmp1next must be TRUE in either way.
The token itself
The token level exceeds our allowed limit
The token that holds the name of the view
The tokenizer
The tokenizer always gives us a token
The tolerances below are conservative.
The top of the heap
The top of the parser's stack
The topmost item should be 0.
The total number of bytes in all fragments is recorded.
The total size of the shared memory.
The trait for this alias has not been resolved, this means, this alias was not applied.
The transaction counter has changed
The tree being checked out
The tree is modified in place.
The trigger containing the target token
The trigger step be fixed to one database
The trigger that this step is a part of
The triggered program
The trigonometric functions in degrees
The trunk has no leaves and the list is not being searched.
The two angles are acute.
The two journal files
The two limit values override the defaults, whatever their value.
The two values have different signs
The two values have the same sign.
The type of lock held on this fd
The underlying database file
The underlying file iNode
The underlying mmapped file
The underlying mutex is non-recursive.
The underlying shared-memory file
The underlying unixShmNode object
The underlying winShmNode object
The unix errno from last I/O error
The unoptimized version would be ...
The unqualified db name
The unused blocks are stored in a chain list pointed by free_blocks.
The update box is specified by the center coordinates of its first cell.
The update hook will be invoked, if it exists.
The upper 32 bits of the result will be in r2 and the lower 16 bits will be in r1.
The upper 5 bits are known at this point.
The upper bound on this value is 65536.
The upper or lower bound just coded
The use of a stale cache can lead to database corruption.
The use of objects looks pretty broken here
The use of the "v2" interface is recommended.
The user could have skipped binding - don't crash
The user error handler failed, use built-in error handler
The user has killed its own connection
The user might have not bound any variables for result.
The user-supplied minor token value.
The value below is therefore a minimum, and we put a maximum on it for safety.
The value for the token
The value is 1 if the particular category is not part of the general category.
The value is the number of slots in the list.
The value must be freed the same number of times it is copied or there will be a memory leak.
The value of fc at this point is always one character, though we may or may not be in UTF mode.
The value of lengthptr distinguishes the two phases.
The value of reqchar doesn't change either.
The value of the "rank" column.
The value of the INTEGER PRIMARY KEY column is always a NULL.
The value return
The value returned from the PHP function being called will automatically be converted if necessary.
The value returned from the function is used to determine if the event handler should remain set.
The value returned might be zero.
The value to apply affinity to
The values are now limited to be between 0 and 0x0010ffff, no more than 4 bytes long, and the subrange 0xd000 to 0xdfff is excluded.
The values can only be ocaml strings.
The values may be one of several types, as defined by XMLRPC_VALUE_TYPE.
The variable codelink will be added to ecode when the condition is false, to get to the second branch.
The variable req_caseopt contains either the REQ_CASELESS value or zero, according to the current setting of the caseless flag.
The variable-length output codes are re-sized at this point, and a special CLEAR code is generated for the decompressor.
The variables used to return semantic value and location from the action routines.
The varint is the number of bytes in the blob of data.
The various UTF/non-UTF and caseful/caseless cases are handled separately, for speed.
The vector data is divided into two groups: the first group contains the start / end character pointers, and the second is the start pointers when the end of the capturing group has not yet reached.
The verification will be done in runtime by ZEND_VERIFY_ABSTRACT_CLASS
The very beginning of the WHERE loop
The virtual database engine
The virtual file system to use
The virtual machine
The virtual machine being built up
The virtual machine under construction
The virtual table
The virtual table being constructed
The virtual table to be modified
The vm under construction
The wal-index is broken up into 32KB pages.
The wal-index is divided into pages of WALINDEX_PGSZ bytes each.
The where level to be coded
The whole SELECT statement
The whole chunk is free.
The whole database
The win32 namespace will cut off trailing dots and spaces.
The word before the chunk address contains the size of the chunk in bytes.
The word is too big or too small for the porter stemmer.
The work array elements have to be INT32s, so the work array would need 256Kb at our recommended precision.
The work array need be only as big as the subbox, so the memory usage problem is solved.
The work was all in the test
The write cursors opened by WHERE_ONEPASS
The write-ahead log
The year is divided into 12 months of 30 days each.
The zDbName parameter is ignored.
The zType is a word like "NULL" or "closed" or "invalid".
The zval can be: .
Then acquire our lock.
Then check for 1111 1000, xx00 0xxx
Then check for 1111 1100, xx00 00xx.
Then check for an overlong sequence, and for the excluded range 0xd800 to 0xdfff.
Then clear the array itself.
Then compare them.
Then copy the 32-byte map into the code vector, negating it if necessary.
Then install pChild as the right-child.
Then keep that key.
Then match against the list of Unicode properties or large chars or ranges that end with a large char.
Then obey similar code to character type repeats - written out again for speed.
Then our magic string
Then reduce the compiled code to just a set of non-capturing brackets so that it doesn't use much memory if it is duplicated by a quantifier.
Then remember the forward reference.
Then remember this forward reference in the workspace so it can be filled in at the end.
Then return SQLITE_ERROR.
Then something really weird...
Then sort the list in order of current term again.
Then the character class tables.
Then the co-routine yields.
Then the data...
Then the mean color in each remaining box becomes one of the possible output colors.
Then the raw salt
Then turn imposter mode back off again.
Then use the molads to find Tishri 1 of the current and following years.
Then verify it against a policy
Then we copy the input string.
Then we don't care.
Then we see if run-together words should be treated as valid components
Then zero the original node.
Then, if the minimum number of matches is 1 or 0, cancel the possessive flag so that the default action below, of wrapping everything inside atomic brackets, does not happen.
Then, we convert the argument to a string.
Theoretically, the stream is borked, so all further reads should fail.
Theoretically, the stream is borked, so all further writes should fail.
There are 3 kinds of storage implemented in this file.
There are a LOT of them, so they're separated out into include files, leaving this source file for actual implementation.
There are a few different OCaml modules that act as interfaces to this global storage.
There are also other values that have to be saved.
There are also some static supporting functions.
There are debugging versions and production versions.
There are many possibilities here to consider: - Assume YYFAIL is not used.
There are many possibilities here to consider: - If this state is a consistent state with a default action, then the only way this function was invoked is if the default action is an error action.
There are no alignment requirements.
There are pages on the freelist.
There are several special subcases when the minimum is zero.
There are several ways to build this library, depending on which way the database is accessed.
There are some optimizations that avoid running the match if a known starting point is not found, or if a known later character is not present.
There are suggestions that it was to skip a leap year ever 100 years like the Gregorian calendar.
There are three kind of children, non flexible, flexible and absolute.
There are three other classes that generate special property calls that are recognized only in an XCLASS.
There can be an error in the middle of a multi-statement, which will cancel the multi-statement.
There can never be a first char if '.' is first, whatever happens about repeats.
There can't be two sort flags of the same type after an array, and the very first argument has to be an array.
There cannot be more newlines here.
There could be an error message
There exists an unusable MATCH constraint.
There is a message
There is a quirk here.
There is a similar code in compile_bracket_matchingpath.
There is a slight redundancy here but we can live with it.
There is a table for possessifying opcodes, all of which are less than OP_CALLOUT.
There is already result bound.
There is also a reference count.
There is an extra node on the end of the offsets to allow this routine to work right.
There is more than one character in the class, or an XCLASS item has been generated.
There is no INDEXED BY clause.
There is no caching here.
There is no constraint to check
There is no need for a bitvec in this case.
There is no need for further mutexing.
There is no particularly good way around this in the case that all 256 8-bit shades are used, but one could write some custom 16-bit code to handle the case where there are gdFree palette entries.
There is no point storing per-file entries as it would not be possible to detect added / deleted entries between separate files.
There is no prefix-length field for first term in a node
There is no sense in actually repeating assertions.
There is no such thing as an EOF return.
There is no way of generating a sequence of numbers at compile time in C.
There is no way to tell which happened.
There is one unfortunate ambiguity, caused by history.
There is support for caseless matching if UCP support is present.
There may be up to 65535 such values, which is too large to put on the stack, but using malloc for small numbers seems expensive.
There might be concurrent writers, when that happens, the first writer wins.
There might have been a previous inconsistent state, consistent state with a non-default action, or user semantic action that manipulated yychar.
There must be at least one stack segment.
There must be some entry before the one we want to delete
There should be at least one opcode.
There should be two additional arguments.
There was a sign extension bug in older revisions of this function.
There was once an "if" here.
There were no digits at all so scanning has failed and we are done.
There will simply be a standard struct with 2 child elements.
There would be a check here for the IS_VOID type hint, which would trigger an error because a value had been returned.
There's ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY, express or implied.
There's absolutely no warranty.
There's been some horrible disaster.
There's something to read.
Therefor we cannot use MYSQLI_LLU_SPEC and must use MYSQLI_LL_SPEC.
Therefor we need to make sure that if data is available we fill the buffer completely.
Therefor we need to re-use the exiting PHP instance to handle the request rather then creating a new one.
Therefore UNDEFINED can be defined as 0 in situations where only unsigned numbers are desired.
Therefore infinite recursions are not possible.
Therefore it is a fatal error if "trailer" is null.
Therefore they can be overwritten by different threads if they detect the CPU features in the same time.
Therefore we do non-blocking read to clean the line, if there is a need.
Therefore, don't ever reduce the length at this point.
Therefore, if the minimum is greater than zero, just ignore the repeat.
Therefore, if we have just failed to match, starting at a newline, do not continue.
Therefore, it cannot be used in a NOTPROP case.
Therefore, only colors that are within minmaxdist of some part of the box need be considered.
Therefore, op1 won't become the result so we have to free it.
Therefore, the client has no way to find out whether there are more result sets of a multiple-result-set statement pending.
Therefore, these apply in the case when only characters less than 256 are recognized to match the types.
These 4 rules can delay the start of the year by as much as 2 days.
These aliases are provided in order to maintain forward compatibility.
These are assigned at the end to avoid unitialized memory in case of an error
These are dummy functions to avoid linking errors when JIT support is not being compiled.
These are from Wincrypt.h, they conflict with OpenSSL
These are handled separately.
These are mutually exclusive
These are not types, and cannot be preceded by "u" to make them unsigned.
These are specials
These are the amounts to shift an input value to get a histogram index.
These are the bits that determine if a bundle is in the X encoding.
These are the breakpoints for different numbers of bytes in a UTF-8 character.
These are the funtions that are contained within.
These are the indicator bits and the mask for the data bits to set in the first byte of a character, indexed by the number of additional bytes.
These are used by 'col' tables only
These are used by GetDiskFreeSpace otherwise.
These are used by GetDiskFreeSpaceEx, if available.
These brackets are converted to repeats, so no global based single character repeat is allowed.
These cases are never obeyed.
These cases better be left to handled by normal way.
These checks are currently valid for oci_bind_by_name, not oci_bind_array_by_name.
These codes are defined in a range that can be tested for.
These days it is often faster than table lookups or integer arithmetic.
These form diphthongs when preceding H
These function declarations are missing from the IMAP header files...
These letters are passed through unchanged
These lists are short, as they are used for characters with more than one "other case", so there is no point in recognizing them for OP_NOTPROP.
These look like magic numbers.
These macros are the standard way of turning unquoted text into C strings.
These macros define the alternative names that are used.
These macros pack up tests that are used for partial matching, and which appear several times in the code.
These make C and G soft
These methods use special implementations
These notices must be retained in any copies of any part of this documentation and/or software.
These pointer sized fields temporarly stores internal variables.
These prevent GH from becoming F
These recognize specific lists of characters.
These repeats aren't empty
These require special handling
These routines are concerned with the time-critical task of mapping input colors to the nearest color in the selected colormap.
These routines provide selection of a custom color map for an image, followed by mapping of the image to that color map, with optional Floyd-Steinberg dithering.
These should allow users to continue to use their current scripts, but should in reality warn the user that this functionality is deprecated.
These should never be used unless previously set, but they get saved and restored, and so we initialize them to avoid reading uninitialized locations.
These sizes can also contain special values.
These statements are here to stop the compiler complaining about unitialized variables.
These structures are ordered by their address.
These tables are also required by pcretest in 16- or 32-bit mode.
These two are defined as macros in both cases
These two locals can be used by the current opcode.
These two settings are used in the code for checking a UTF-8 string that follows immediately afterwards.
These two statements stop the compiler for warning about possibly unset variables caused by the jump to HANDLE_NUMERICAL_RECURSION.
These types are mentioned as array types in the manual, but I wouldn't know how to create an array field with any of these types.
These values are for testing purposes only.
These values can be changed by the caller, but are shared between all threads.
These variables are not thread-safe.
These variables do not need to be preserved over recursion in this function, so they can be ordinary variables in all cases.
These versions of the macros manage a private stack on the heap.
These versions of the macros use the stack, as normal.
These will be set in gcc_android_386.c for android-specific customization.
These will be set in gcc_android_amd64.c for android-specific customization.
These will do the right thing for either R,G,B or B,G,R color order, but you may not like the results for other color orders.
They all use the same area of memory, so only one can be active at any one time.
They allow macros like PCRE_MAJOR to be defined without quotes, which is convenient for user programs that want to test its value.
They also make IOCtx calls look better...
They are build using the ctype functions, and consequently their contents will depend upon the current locale setting.
They are equal up to the last part of the equal part of the fraction.
They are implemented as macros in sqliteInt.h.
They are not both allowed to be zero.
They are on different cache lines because we modify them atomically.
They are replaced by Unicode property escapes.
They are used by code in notify.c.
They are vital.
They can be turned off from pcretest so that automatic tests on bytecode can be written that do not depend on the value of LINK_SIZE.
They can have the binary version of it
They cannot be DROP-ed.
They mainly fill in the desired values for the reference altitude
They make writing magic entries more complicated, for very little benefit
They will be converted to the best matching PHP type before being passed to the PHP function.
They're not to confuse with the NTFS streams.
Things get more disgusting on OS X 10.7 Lion.
Things to be changed
Think hard before fiddling with it.
Third parameter
Third, try to get magic file relative to dll location
This "while" is the end of the "do" far above.
This API is not used by any PHP modules including session currently.
This AST kind is only used for temporary nodes during compilation
This C program generates the file cmplxdivide1.go.
This Mem is a shallow copy of pScopyFrom
This OP_Insert is an sql UPDATE
This UDF library adds the ability to call PHP functions from SQL statements.
This adjustment is not optional.
This allowed the color conversion math to be done only once per colormap entry, not once per pixel.
This allows Trigger structures to be retrieved by name.
This allows a fairly fast implementation of the "brute force" approach of computing the distance from every colormap entry to every histogram cell.
This allows compiled addons to work when node.exe or iojs.exe is renamed.
This allows disabling scanning for ini files in the PHP_CONFIG_FILE_SCAN_DIR but still load an optional ini file.
This allows legacy scripts to be pharred unmodified
This allows max_acquire to be set and track the PHP code without having a global init routine or external semaphore init code.
This allows setting the request type.
This allows the extension to treat phar.zip and phar.tar types as honorary phars.
This allows to be more defensive in such definitions.
This allows us to stop PHP and attach a debugger before much gets started
This allows use of ftps:// and https:// urls
This already contains bravalue
This also covers the 0 case, since if we start on the weekend, we want to move forward as if we stopped there while going backwards.
This also determines whether it is a leap year.
This also happens for a repeating ket if no characters were matched in the group.
This also transfers the open file pointer, if any, to the entry.
This approach could be improved upon.
This array contains the bytes used to pad the buffer to the next 64-byte boundary.
This array holds the actually closest colormap index for each cell.
This array holds the distance to the nearest-so-far color for each cell
This array lists the candidate colormap indexes.
This avoids having to supply alternative calls for the different cases.
This avoids security issues on shared hosts where a luser messes with the lower-level pipe settings and screws up the FastCGI service.
This avoids the need for a mutex lock and our hashtable lookup.
This bad handling is also in mysqlnd_result.c
This behavior is at least reproducible with VS2012 and earlier, and seems not to be fixed till now.
This behavior is undocumented and Bison users should not rely upon it.
This block calculates the checksum according to the FTS index.
This block codes the top of loop only.
This block deals with an obscure problem.
This block is if we had no timeout...
This block stores the checksum in ctx.cksum.
This branch happens for multiple negative signs.
This branch happens only when content is on overflow pages
This branch of code also allows blocking streams with buffered data to operate correctly in stream_select.
This calculation is done here to simplify allocation elsewhere.
This call cannot fail.
This call frees pShmNode if required
This call is a request for the "docid" column.
This call is to merge all segments at level iLevel.
This callback is called whenver an FSEvents watch is triggered
This can and should be used while extending the module as it shows if you are at the right position.
This can be a big performance boost.
This can be an extra read in some situations, but hopefully it is needed in most cases.
This can be detected by checking the NUM for zero after having a zero returned.
This can be handled like an assertion.
This can be helpful if the pattern that follows the assertion doesn't set a different char.
This can be helpful when matching -- for instance in caseless checking of required bytes.
This can be used for debugging and analysis.
This can happen if the database is corrupt.
This can help the subquery to run more efficiently.
This can only happen for stores
This can only happen with the table rooted at page 1.
This can prevent the hash index range increasing in the common case that each descriptor is allocated/used/freed before another descriptor is needed.
This case cannot be optimized in the same was as normal capturing brackets.
This case is handled better by fast_forward_first_char.
This case is highly unlikely since we just recently freed a lot of memory.
This case is really difficult, since ecx itself may used for addressing, and we must ensure to work even in that case.
This case occurs after failing to recompile an sql statement.
This case runs if the aggregate has no GROUP BY clause.
This case should work for GCC
This cast is safe, since both values are defined here in code and cannot overflow
This causes future drawing operations to perform alpha channel blending with the background, resulting in an opaque image.
This cell was just inserted
This character is not found in valid UTF-8 sequences and is rarely used in popular 8-bit character encodings.
This check even works for scientific notation, because the mantissa always contains a decimal point.
This check is done here in the debugging case so that the code that was compiled can be seen.
This class is based on the original code by Jarle Aase, see bellow: wSendmail.cpp  It has been striped of some functionality to match the requirements of phpfi.
This code aims to be a full-featured C implementation of XMLRPC.
This code does the right thing for R,G,B or B,G,R color orders only.
This code is common to both the zero and non-zero minimum cases.
This code is derived from software contributed to Berkeley by Chris Torek.
This code is derived from software contributed to Berkeley by Guido van Rossum.
This code is derived from software contributed to Berkeley by Peter McIlroy.
This code is heavily based on the PHP md5 implementation
This code is logically tricky.
This code is owned by Tilera Corporation, and distributed as part of multiple projects.
This code is perf sensitive, please check the perf before modifying.
This code is taken from http://www.acm.org/jgt/papers/SmithLyons96/hwb_rgb.html, an article on colour conversion to/from RBG and HWB colour systems.
This code is very perf sensitive, please check the performance before modifying.
This code looks a bit odd, but there used to be some cases other than the default, and there may be again in future, so I haven't "optimized" it.
This code runs once to initialize everything.
This code runs only in 8 bit mode.
This code was modified from code based on code written by Jarle Aase.
This column was already computed by the previous index
This comes from various sources that like to contradict.
This commits the transaction.
This compares two variants for equality
This computes N1 / N2.
This consistent approach does not always have exactly the same effect as in Perl.
This continuation matched.
This contributes to making scripts portable between setups that have and don't have zlib compression enabled globally.
This could be done easily in Go, we are just using C for demonstration purposes.
This could happen with a network mount
This could lead to database corruption.
This could probably be faster somehow.
This covers the DEFINE "condition" automatically.
This default length suffices to get rid of MALLOC calls except for unusual cases, such as decimal-to-binary conversion of a very long string of digits.
This define is here because some versions of libintl redefine setlocale to point to libintl_setlocale.
This destination implies "LIMIT 1".
This differs from Colin Plumb's older public domain implementation in that no 32-bit integer data type is required, there's no compile-time endianness configuration, and the function prototypes match OpenSSL's.
This does just ONE match.
This done is to improve locality.
This ensures that filters do not corrupt areas of constant color.
This ensures that other threads/requests that might have disabled the loader do not affect the current request.
This entry point is equivalent to the `crypt' function in Unix libcs.
This error condition is now caught prior to reaching this function
This error will be extremely rare in general, though.
This escape is incompatible with PQescapeLiteral.
This facility is an optional feature of the library.
This fails for languages like Japanese that legally use multiple scripts within a single word, so we turn it off.
This fd will be ready to be read when there are events ready to be processed
This fd will be ready to be read when there is a command ready to be run
This feature is available in gcc versions 2.5 and later.
This field of the structure is documented as private, and sure enough it's gone in the latest libjpeg, replaced by something else.
This file contains a private PCRE function that converts an ordinal character value into a UTF8 string.
This file contains character tables that are used when no external tables are passed to PCRE by the application that calls it.
This file contains only code for the core SQLite library.
This file has not been truncated.
This file is only useful for some really internal stuff, eq.
This file is part of libXMLRPC - a C library for xml-encoded function calls.
This file is part of the Independent JPEG Group's software.
This file is part of, or distributed with, libXMLRPC - a C library for xml-encoded function calls.
This file is rewriten specificly for PHPFI.
This file is used for Windows only
This file is used on unix only
This file modified from sources for imap4 for use in PHP 3
This file was autogenerated by the MultiStage2.py script.
This first part MUST match the declaration of interface IDispatchEx
This flag can be set and cleared as often as desired.
This function adds pLeaf to the tree.
This function allows for duplicate names in the table of named substrings.
This function allows the user to query in which mode, if at all, VTune is running
This function always returns SQLITE_OK.
This function applies a compiled re to a subject string and picks out portions of the string if it matches.
This function builds a set of character tables for use by PCRE and returns a pointer to them.
This function computes GMST0, the Greenwich Mean Sidereal Time
This function computes the Sun's position at any instant
This function consumes at least one input character.
This function copies a single captured substring into a given buffer, identifying it by name.
This function copies a single captured substring into a given buffer.
This function copies a single captured substring, identified by name, into new store.
This function detects multiple/malformed multiple newlines.
This function doesn't return if it uses E_ERROR
This function gets one chunk of store and builds a list of pointers and all of the captured substrings in it.
This function has an extensible interface so that additional items can be added compatibly.
This function has been extended to cope with forward references for recursions and subroutine calls.
This function is a substitute for real alpha channel operations, so it doesn't pay attention to the alpha channel.
This function is always called by the main user thread.
This function is called between compiling passes to add an entry to the name/number table, maintaining alphabetical order.
This function is called during the second compiling phase, if the number of forward references fills the existing workspace, which is originally a block on the stack.
This function is called only during the real compile, not during the pre-compile.
This function is called only when doing the real compile, not during the pre-compile that measures the size of the compiled pattern.
This function is called recursively in many circumstances.
This function is called to check for left recursive calls.
This function is called when a backward assertion is encountered, so that if it fails, the error message can point to the correct place in the pattern.
This function is called when the PCRE_AUTO_CALLOUT option is set, to insert callout points before each pattern item.
This function is handed a compiled expression that it must study to produce information that will speed up the matching.
This function is mutually recursive with the function above.
This function is mutually recursive with the function immediately below.
This function is only called for rollback pagers in WRITER_DBMOD state.
This function is only called from two places.
This function is passed the start and end of a class range, in UTF-8 mode with UCP support.
This function is provided for convenience only, the same result could be achieved directly by the application.
This function is used during the pre-compile phase when we are trying to find out the amount of memory needed, as well as during the real compile phase.
This function is used for adding a list of case-equivalent characters to a class, and also for adding a list of horizontal or vertical whitespace.
This function is used for adding the complement of a list of horizontal or vertical whitespace to a class.
This function makes use of the internal SNMP object fetcher.
This function never returns error.
This function now supports some "standardized" fault codes, as specified at.
This function packages up the logic of adding a character or range of characters to a class.
This function reduces any angle to within the first revolution
This function releases all the allocated frames.
This function requires 'properties' to contain all props declared in the class and all props being public.
This function scans a compiled unanchored expression recursively and attempts to build a bitmap of the set of possible starting bytes.
This function scans through a branch of a compiled pattern to see whether it can match the empty string or not.
This function sets starting bits for a character type.
This function should be called after the constructor has been called because it may call __set from the uninitialized object otherwise.
This function should be called by the user for any method once.
This function should be called by the user when the process ends, to free the local storage index
This function should be called by the user whenever a thread ends, to free the thread "virtual stack" storage
This function should be made binary safe
This function should only be used as a copy constructor, i.e. it should only be called AFTER a zval has been copied to another location using ZVAL_COPY_VALUE.
This function takes a string and returns a pointer to a block of store holding a compiled version of the expression.
This function takes an integer value in the range 0 - 0x10ffff and encodes it as a UTF-8 character in 1 to 4 pcre_uchars.
This function tells the run loop to call a callback whenever that fd is ready to be read
This function touches all 4k pages belongs to the requested stack space, which size is passed in local_size.
This function will be extremely optimized by remembering the end of the list
This function would be ineffective to do in JIT level.
This functionality is not yet implemented
This gives a return value similar to that from fcvt, except that trailing zeros are suppressed, and ndigits can be negative.
This gives a return value similar to that of ecvt, except that trailing zeros are suppressed.
This grammar assumes section 5.3.1.3 is correct and that Annex B.2 is in error.
This hack uses a standard trick for avoiding calling the STRING macro with an empty argument when doing the test.
This has been built and tested on Linux 2.2.14  This has been built and tested on Solaris 2.6.
This has to be bug-compatible with the original implementation, so only encode 23 of the 24 bytes.
This heuristic does not reclaim storage as soon as it becomes invalid, but it will do so eventually.
This holds good for NetWare too, both for Winsock and Berkeley sockets
This holds the 'locally' allocated environ from the save_ps_args method.
This how we recognize which colors are actually used.
This however means constant hashing of the column name, which is not needed as it can be precomputed.
This implementation is meant to be fast, but not as fast as possible.
This implementation is very closely tied to the that of the native sockets implemented in the core.
This implements the RTRIM collation.
This implies greediness, whatever the setting of the PCRE_UNGREEDY option.
This imply that only LIBXML_STATIC_FOR_DLL is supported ATM.
This includes COMMIT, SKIP, PRUNE and an uncaptured THEN, which means they take their normal effect.
This includes negated single high-valued characters.
This index implies that the DISTINCT qualifier is redundant.
This index is a superset of the primary key
This indicates success
This info is not preserved for runtime.
This information is for finding all the numbers associated with a given name, for condition testing.
This involves freeing descriptors and rolling back transactions, setting timeout-related parameters etc.
This is  a quirk for ODBC 2.0 compatibility for broken driver implementations.
This is 'SHOW'/'EXPLAIN'-like query.
This is VxWorks.
This is a Perl 5.10 feature.
This is a WONT FIX bug, at least for the moment.
This is a braminzero backtrack path.
This is a brand new connection, we need not ping, but have to initialize ping
This is a class that must be abstract itself.
This is a code duplication.
This is a compound name.
This is a consistent approach, but does not always have the same effect as in Perl.
This is a constant time equality check that will always check every byte of both values.
This is a default version of the tables that assumes ASCII encoding.
This is a delete.
This is a demonstration program to illustrate the most straightforward ways of calling the PCRE regular expression library from a C program.
This is a feature that makes it possible to save compiled regex and re-use them in other programs later.
This is a freestanding support program to generate a file containing character tables for PCRE.
This is a fudge that causes a compile- time error if the vectors OP_names or OP_lengths, which are indexed by opcode, are not the correct length.
This is a fudge that causes a compile-time error if the vector eint, which is indexed by compile-time error number, is not the correct length.
This is a gd 2.0 .gd file
This is a generated file, do not modify
This is a global handler.
This is a hack necessary to accommodate situations where bucket is appended to the stream multiple times.
This is a hack to support it
This is a lesser evil than not diagnosing bad classes when Perl does, I think.
This is a little safety check for instances when we are dealing with a regenerated session that was not yet written to disk.
This is a lot like misc/cgo/testcarchive/main2.c.
This is a lot like misc/cgo/testcarchive/main3.c.
This is a lot like misc/cgo/testcshared/main4.c.
This is a lot like misc/cgo/testcshared/main5.c.
This is a new term.
This is a newer "info" function which has an extensible interface so that additional items can be added compatibly.
This is a no-op.
This is a one-time occurrence.
This is a safe way to pass pointers back to ocaml.
This is a short table, so it is searched linearly.
This is a structure that holds all the context the main thread needs.
This is a structure that the thread holds on to.
This is almost a repeat of the code for a repeated single character, but I haven't found a nice way of commoning these up that doesn't require a test of the positive/negative option for each character match.
This is also problem for encoding like UTF-7/UTF-8/ISO-2022 which a single char can be more than 4 bytes.
This is also used to detect groups that contain recursive back references to themselves.
This is an EOF condition
This is an OpenSSL-compatible implementation of the RSA Data Security, Inc.
This is an UPDATE.
This is an class alias, use alias name
This is an in-memory DB
This is an inconvience that means that help can't be logically grouped Not worth the savings
This is an mmap page object
This is an optimization only.
This is an original closure object and __invoke is to be called.
This is an unsigned integer type.
This is assumed to be 29 days 12 hours and 793 halakim for calendar purposes.
This is bad, but since we are going to be hardcoding in the POSIX stuff anyway...
This is basically what a lot of other Web servers do in this case anyway.
This is because some of the "globals" in this module should actually be per-connection variables.
This is behavior that should reflect the 'MAP_NORESERVE' flag of 'mmap' on Unix.
This is believed to be the year of creation.
This is best for palette images, and libpng defaults to it for palette images anyway, so we don't need to do it explicitly.
This is called by several functions that scan a compiled expression looking for a fixed first character, or an anchoring op code etc.
This is called in parallel.
This is called outside of a mutex, so have to be aware about external changes to the structure as we read it.
This is called when db is being closed.
This is caught by a recursion depth count.
This is character-set independent
This is compatible with PQescapeLiteral, but it cannot handle multbyte chars such as SJIS, BIG5.
This is compiling for real
This is compiling for real.
This is correct behavior for reading a series of images from one source.
This is correct for Linux which has union semun.
This is correct for Solaris 2.6 which does not have union semun.
This is correct for typical "arithmetic shift" instructions that shift in copies of the sign bit.
This is currently an undocumented limit.
This is default so NOP
This is done also in mysqlnd_ps.c
This is done by the usual test runner.
This is done to protect the sqlite3.pDisconnect list.
This is faster.
This is for big-endian machines only, PPC and Sparc specifically.
This is for cases like http://localhost/blah.phar/path/to/file.php/extra/stuff which calls "blah.phar" file "path/to/file.php" with PATH_INFO "/extra/stuff"
This is here to suppress warnings from the GCC cpp's -Wunused-macros.
This is hit if -k is set or there is no match
This is how you do event::event_list in c
This is implemented by setting them to zerofirstbyte and zeroreqchar when such a repeat is encountered.
This is in violation of the appnote.
This is just a small subset of the functionality provided by the LDAP library.
This is just an arbitrary value for the fallback case.
This is likely to be an append
This is mainly for debugging, though the function is able to force a failure.
This is more restrictive than necessary.
This is most useful for declaring functions that can then be called with CALL_PHPx.
This is mostly just syntactic sugar.
This is necessary if you are running in an EBCDIC environment, or if you want to default to a different encoding, for example ISO-8859-1.
This is necessary on Windows where the stack can only grow in 4k steps.
This is needed even though pcre_internal.h itself includes pcre.h, because it does so after it has set PCRE_EXP_DECL to "export" if it is not already set.
This is needed for dealing with backward assertions.
This is needed for the annoying case of receiving a response to a HEAD request.
This is needed to make RSAREF happy on some MS-DOS compilers.
This is never the case when building a production library.
This is not VxWorks.
This is not a malloc/realloc check.
This is not a performance issue because it happens only when there has been a compilation error.
This is not a problem, because ZEND_ACC_HAS_TYPE_HINTS is never set, and we won't check arguments on internal function.
This is not actually used, but is here for completeness, in case someone wants to use the HWB stuff for anything else...
This is not correct any more, depends on what compare_func is set to.
This is not feasible in DOS machines.
This is not space efficient for large text.
This is not the right way to get output size...
This is not universal.
This is not used yet
This is often faster.
This is only done when necessary ofcourse.
This is only required for the memory sanitizer, so it's unfortunate that we always run it.
This is overcome by a scan at the end if there's no firstchar, looking for an asserted first char.
This is part of Perl's movement towards a unified syntax for back references.
This is potentially great stuff, but fails against the test program at the end.
This is probably not what you want.
This is really OP_Noop and OP_Explain
This is really just for tidiness with callouts, in case they inspect these fields.
This is safe since there is always at least one byte free
This is security sensitive code.
This is slow and works badly.
This is somewhat different than other callbacks because if the user returns 1, we will interpret that as saying that this message has no body.
This is stupid way to do.
This is subsequently free'd at exit.
This is sufficient to allow us to identify EBCDIC text and to distinguish between old-style and internationalized examples of text.
This is the "Composite Document File" format, and not the "Compound Document Format", nor the "Channel Definition Format".
This is the "abnormal" case, for EBCDIC systems not running in UTF-8 mode.
This is the "abnormal" table for EBCDIC systems without UTF-8 support.
This is the "normal" case, for ASCII systems, and EBCDIC systems running in UTF-8 mode.
This is the "normal" table for ASCII systems or for EBCDIC systems running in UTF-8 mode.
This is the "user callable" routine to compare numbers N1 and N2.
This is the 2nd template.
This is the PGroup.lru element
This is the approximate beginning of a month.
This is the best bit...
This is the central step in the MD5 algorithm.
This is the classic nomatch case
This is the database that must be used
This is the descendent of an OR node.
This is the difference - make a file based on size of chunks.
This is the easiest way to get RocksDB to perform well
This is the first call to this function.
This is the forcible breaking of infinite loops as implemented in Perl 5.005.
This is the general purpose conversion function.
This is the length of the matched pattern
This is the main recursive call.
This is the non-NL case
This is the normal case.
This is the number of concurrent requests, equals FCGI_MAX_CONNS
This is the only way out of this procedure.
This is the point at which we convert to a hash table at this level, if we're over the count
This is the spprintf implementation.
This is the sub-WHERE clause body.
This is the top of the main insertion loop
This is transparent to the caller.
This is ugly, but otherwise we would have to maintain a fully compatible struct stat.
This is ugly, but we have to replace ungetc
This is unwanted.
This is used by VACUUM operations.
This is used for both automatic and manual callouts.
This is used only for ASCII characters.
This is used only when UCP support is available and UTF mode is selected.
This is used to recurse elements and selectively delete certain entries from a hashtable.
This is used to share an environment in read-only mode with all the workers.
This is used when closing connection db.
This is used when compiling patterns.
This is useful for disassembly.
This is useful for the image dimensions
This is useful for writable temp files like databases
This is very similar to the code for single characters, but we repeat it in the interests of efficiency.
This is what SWIG does.
This is what the Go code expects on failure.
This is where control jumps back to to effect "recursion"
This is where the data ends up after the copy
This is, of course a documentated possibility, when NO_UTF_CHECK is set, so it isn't a bug, but we can detect this case and just give up on this optimization.
This isn't an assert, we need to ensure 019 isn't valid octal Because the lexing itself doesn't do that for us
This isn't needed per-se because the OS will clean-up anyway, but having and calling this will ensure Valgrind doesn't output 'false positives'.
This isn't really needed until pass 2, but again it is FAR storage.
This isn't supported by all drivers.
This issue is fixed "properly" in PCRE2.
This item can't be repeated
This iterator is already at EOF for this column.
This just creates a place-holder record in the sqlite_master table.
This just seems unessacary
This keeps it consistent and simple.
This label is used for tail recursion, which is used in a few cases even when NO_RECURSE is not defined, in order to reduce the amount of stack that is used.
This lead to an 11 day shift in the calendar with respect to the seasons by the 16th century when the Gregorian calendar was created to replace the Julian calendar.
This leads to a year that is 365.25 days long, but the current accepted value for the tropical year is 365.242199 days.
This leads to link errors.
This lets us omit having to allocate a temporary full horizontal stretch of the src image.
This linear search probably limits the usefulness of this implementation to cache sizes of a few tens of elements.
This list holds all data associated with one session.
This list is useful if we need to find a suitable memory area when the allocator is called.
This little application will list the DLL dependencies for a PE module to it's stdout for use by distro/installer building tools
This little function scans through a compiled pattern until it finds a capturing bracket with the given number, or, if the number is negative, an instance of OP_REVERSE for a lookbehind.
This little function scans through a compiled pattern until it finds an instance of OP_RECURSE.
This loads from a file, a stack of x509/crl/pkey sets
This looks ridiculous and it is - but we validate the name ourselves using the peer_name ctx option, so just use the CN from the cert here
This loop runs once for each entry in the blocked-connections list.
This loop runs once for each leaf in the tree of eType nodes.
This macro does zero padding so that the precision requirement is satisfied.
This macro is provided for backward compatibility.
This makes for compatibility with Perl.
This makes it dangerous to use this manager and a different destination manager serially with the same JPEG object, because their private object sizes may be different.
This makes it possible to do the repeats one at a time from the outer level, thus saving stack.
This makes some inner loops simpler and sometimes saves work during multiplications, but it often seems to make things slightly slower.
This mapping is logically trivial, but making it go fast enough requires considerable care.
This maps an external file or directory to a location within the phar archive, allowing reference to an external location as if it were within the phar archive.
This matches the pager layer defaults.
This may be a compound name that includes namespace name
This may be different than the number of offsets actually written because of aligning on a 4-byte boundary.
This may be greater than 256.
This may be the first character of a range, so don't add it yet.
This may not be consistent with other numbering schemes.
This may not be quite the closest entry to the actual input color, but it's almost as good.
This may trigger a real write to the stream.
This means invalidating the read buffer and then performing a low-level seek
This means restart was scheduled or is in progress now
This means that any OP_RECURSE items within it that refer to the group itself or any contained groups have to have their offsets adjusted.
This means that if the given day number falls in the 3rd month or on the 30th day of the 2nd month the length of the year must be found, but in no other case.
This means that the library is called at process shutdown, and cannot be unloaded beforehand.
This means that the memory space will be reserved in the virtual memory table but the pages will not be bound to any physical memory yet.
This means we have a match.
This memory file is tagged "reserved" but not "committed".
This might be helpful in applications where the block is shared by different users.
This minimizes the size of the tRNS chunk and thus the size of the PNG file as a whole.
This module contains a PCRE private debugging function for printing out the internal form of a compiled regular expression, along with some supporting local functions.
This module contains an internal function for validating UTF-8 character strings.
This module contains an internal function that is used to match an extended class.
This module contains global variables that are exported by the PCRE library.
This module contains internal functions for testing newlines when more than one kind of newline is to be recognized.
This module contains some convenience functions for extracting substrings from the subject string after a regex match has succeeded.
This module contains some fixed tables that are used by more than one of the PCRE code modules.
This module exports a PHP object as a COM object by wrapping it using IDispatchEx
This module implements a SafeArray proxy which is used internally by the engine when resolving multi-dimensional array accesses on SafeArray types.
This module implements the well-known Heckbert paradigm for color quantization.
This module is a wrapper that provides a POSIX API to the underlying PCRE functions.
This module is generated by the maint/MultiStage2.py script.
This module is only called on query plans that use an index.
This module should not be referenced otherwise, so it should not matter whether it is compiled or not.
This more than covers the period when the calendar was in use.
This must be a brand-new connection.
This must precede the empty string test - in this case that test is done at the outer level.
This needs an extra 16-bit data item.
This needs changing if the code behind ZEND_VERIFY_RESOURCE changed.
This negated adjustment is what is written into the "adjustment" parameter.
This next statement and the later reference to dummy are here in order to trick the optimizer of the IBM C compiler for OS/2 into generating correct code.
This notice may not be removed or altered from any source distribution.
This number is actually corrupted by STKSTAT to include the fifteen word trailer area.
This object is not used by SQLite.
This occurs only at the start of each branch of a lookbehind assertion.
This one checks the error value, destroys object and returns false
This one doesn't exists on QNX
This one has to be used carefully.
This only allows setting execution bit, read/write
This only happens when coding check constraints
This only seems to happen on 32bit systems with large file support.
This op code is used when all the characters in the class have values in the range 0-255, and either the matching is caseful, or the characters are in the range 0-127 when UTF-8 processing is enabled.
This opcode really does match any byte, even newline, independent of the setting of PCRE_DOTALL.
This opcodesnever appears in a real VM program.
This optimization can save a huge amount of backtracking in patterns with nested unlimited repeats that aren't going to match.
This ought to use HWB, but we don't have an alpha-aware version of that yet.
This page from bulk local storage
This page is never used.
This part ensures also, that no drive letter traversing happens.
This part will load the functions, and check if we are in Call Graph mode.
This particular expression does not need to be expanded.
This pass only populates the Fts3PhraseToken array.
This piece of code has been inspirated from nginx and pureftpd code, which are under BSD licence.
This prevent using ordinary floating-point arithmetic when the result could be computed with one rounding error.
This prevents us from starting PHP until the second load.
This processes one or more 64-byte data blocks, but does NOT update the bit counters.
This program was generated by testconv.rb.
This provides for register storage for the routine which overflows the stack.
This reduces the recommended histogram size from 256Kb to 128Kb, which is a useful savings on PC-class machines.
This regex does not handle comments and folding whitespace.
This relies on the fact that the class table starts with alpha, lower, upper as the first 3 entries.
This remains here temporarily to ease the transition to the new meaning of YYERROR, for GCC.
This replaces inet_addr, the return value from which cannot distinguish between failure and a local broadcast address.
This requires that the combining class codes are the same.
This results in a segfault for this module.
This routine adds a new term to the end of the expression.
This routine assumes that the line is a valid Unicode Character Database entry.
This routine does the necessary conversion.
This routine effects pPage only.
This routine is a no-op for virtual tables.
This routine is a no-op if the shared-cache is not enabled
This routine is called only once
This routine is intended for testing and analysis only.
This routine is never called during trigger-generation.
This routine is never used in single-threaded mode
This routine is only be called from within a read transaction.
This routine is used for debugging only.
This routine merely does the comparison.
This routine only runs while holding the checkpoint lock.
This routine sets that result back to SQLITE_OK.
This routine shifts that operator over to B.
This routine should not be called if a prior error has occurred.
This routine uses Heckbert's "locally sorted search" criterion to select the colors that need further consideration.
This routine uses Thomas' incremental distance calculation method to find the distance from a colormap entry to successive cells in the box.
This saves IO.
This saves a call to the read implementation and will not block where blocking is not necessary at all.
This saves us from looking for the actual place where out-of-order packets have been sent.
This section is for debugging outside of VTune.
This section is performed when method enter event occurs.
This section is performed when method leave event occurs It updates the virtual stack.
This seems a little convoluted to me, but I'll bet you save a cycle somewhere.
This seems crazy, so PCRE now gives an error.
This seems to be what Perl does.
This selects one of the six possible month length configurations listed above.
This sets group 1 as part of the atomic group, but this is not on the final matching path, so must be unset when 2 is set.
This setting has no effect when compiling for WinRT.
This shortened the year by 3 days per 400 years, giving a year of 365.2425 days.
This should be a multiple of 3, because the offset vector is always a multiple of 3 long.
This should be done even for local variables, as they might otherwise be expanded by user macros.
This should be fixed by reallocating the olestring, but as emalloc is used, that doesn't matter much.
This should be handled in a better way.
This should catch convoluted mutual recursions.
This should count as an absolute local path as well, however IS_ABSOLUTE_PATH doesn't care about this path form till now.
This should have been a word all along
This should never happen
This should never happen as closures will always be callable
This should never happen here, but for security
This should never happen, since all clists are shorter than 5 character now.
This should never happen.
This should never occur
This should never occur, but compilers may mutter if there is no default.
This should not occur
This should not occur: we list all opcodes explicitly so that when new ones get added they are properly considered.
This should only be the case for the first element
This should only be used before forking
This should only be used by the master
This should use a hash to determine if a given target id has already been appended.
This shouldn't happen in this program.
This shouldn't, however, impact performance when true recursion is being used.
This software is based in part on the work of the Independent JPEG Group.
This software is released under the GNU Lesser General Public License.
This source code is licensed under the BSD-style license found in the LICENSE file in the "hack" directory of this source tree.
This source code is licensed under the BSD-style license found in the LICENSE file in the root directory of this source tree.
This source file is part of the Swift.org open source project
This space is used for "compiling" into during the first phase, when we are computing the amount of memory that is needed.
This special exception was added by the Free Software Foundation in version 2.2 of Bison.
This step is only for non-persistent connections as persistent connections have private session pools.
This step usually works if step 1 fails.
This structure is used for saving digits in the conversion process.
This structure is used to store a section of a Jpeg file.
This subquery can be absorbed into its parent.
This subroutine first looks at the iUseFlag.
This symbol is defined in ext/standard/config.m4.
This table contains bit maps for various character classes.
This table encodes the rules for finding the end of an extended grapheme cluster.
This table identifies various classes of character by individual bits: 0x01   white space character 0x02   letter 0x04   decimal digit 0x08   hexadecimal digit 0x10   alphanumeric or '_' 0x80   regular expression metacharacter or binary zero
This table is a case flipping table.
This table is a lower casing table.
This table is not a VIEW
This table is used to check whether auto-possessification is possible between adjacent character-type opcodes.
This table reflects a particular philosophy about what constitutes "text," and there is room for disagreement about it.
This table's current rowid value
This temporary number is stored in the temp argument, which is of type gmp_temp_t.
This temporary value needs to be freed lateron using the FREE_GMP_TEMP macro.
This term does not restrict search space
This term is already coded
This term is not useful for search.
This test function is not currently used by the automated test-suite.
This testing proceeds by initially truncating the input string, then if necessary comparing the whole string with a decimal expansion to decide close cases.
This time we set the flag for the keyword 'abstract'.
This time, a result of NOMATCH isn't an error.
This turns out to be rather cunning.
This type of "rounding" allows us to avoid calculating the length of the year in most cases.
This type will be opaque to them and only be useful when passed back to c.
This used to be a conditional around just the two extra args, but that might be undefined if yyoverflow is a macro.
This used to be a table of strings, but in order to reduce the number of relocations needed when a shared library is loaded dynamically, it is now one long string.
This uses the stack for saving everything that has to be saved for a recursive call.
This value determines the size of the initial vector that is used for remembering named groups during the pre-compile.
This value is beyond our precision, so rounding it is pointless
This value may be zero for the default behavior.
This value may be zero.
This value specifies the size of stack workspace that is used during the first pre-compile phase that determines how much memory is required.
This variable is intentionally re-defined as the code is transpiled to a block scope language
This vector is used for remembering name groups during the pre-compile.
This version does not attempt to produce an output file with transparency in some of the palette indexes, which, in practice, doesn't look so hot anyway.
This version performs Floyd-Steinberg dithering
This version performs no dithering
This version requires less memory writing.
This vtab delivers always results in "ORDER BY term ASC" order.
This was a premature performance optimization that isn't thread safe, if we want it thread safe we need to add mutex code...
This was easier recursively, but dangerous on long lists, so we walk it ourselves
This was the 'else' case, we can't really 'detect' it
This was the last allocation.
This was the root node.
This way we don't need to touch the build system files.
This way, php_pollfd_for will return a mask with POLLOUT if the connection is successful and with POLLPRI otherwise.
This whole area is rewritten in PCRE2 because there are some obscure cases.
This will add additional "def" points, so it must happen before def propagation.
This will be caught by the Go signal handler which should forward to the C signal handler.
This will be used in order to either set the dimensions of the node if none already exist, or to compute the remaining space left for the flexible children.
This will cause dtoa modes 4 and 5 to be treated the same as modes 2 and 3 for some inputs.
This will copy also the strings and the root, which we will have to adjust in the loop
This will copy the error code and the messages, as they are buffers in the struct
This will free the libxml alloc'd memory
This will take control down to where bracketed groups, including assertions, are processed.
This will usually not destroy anything but decref.
This works around a bug in internet explorer for the macintosh which sends mime boundaries that are only LF terminated when you use an image submit button in a multipart/form-data form.
This works as long as this function is not used for streaming.
This works better with a C99 compliant vsnprintf, but should work ok with versions that return a -1 if it overflows the buffer
This works for i.e. AIX
This works regardless we have SLJIT_MEM1 or SLJIT_MEM0.
This would actually be Monday, because the Jewish day is considered to begin at sunset.
This would be slower than storing it.
This would likely require user D script variables, which would use kernel memory.
This would probably be much more efficient than the implementation currently in gd.c if the errors in the output were corrected.
Thomas points out that the distances from a given colormap entry to each cell of the histogram can be computed quickly using an incremental method: the differences between distances to adjacent cells themselves differ by a constant.
Thomas' article also describes a refined method which is asymptotically faster than the brute-force method, but it is also far more complex and cannot efficiently be applied to small subboxes.
Those cannot be recreated afterwards.
Those operator always uses word arguments without write back.
Those operators always uses word arguments without write back.
Those that follow are added in version 2 or later
Thread context used to create new PMA
Thread holding this mutex
Thread local storage
Thread procedure Win32 compatibility shim
Thread that is within this mutex
Thread that will run pMerger
Thread will use this task object
Three byte sequence.
Three-byte-character lead byte followed by two trail bytes.
Throw the exception in the context of the generator
Throw the exception in the context of the generator.
Throws an Exception in case the given Zend extension does not exist
Throws an Exception in case the given class constant does not exist
Throws an Exception in case the given extension does not exist
Throws an Exception in case the given function does not exist
Throws an Exception in case the given method does not exist
Throws an Exception in case the given property does not exist
Thumb immediate form.
Thumb16 encodings.
Thumb16 helpers.
Thumb32 encodings.
Thus  'a' LIKE 'A' would be true.
Thus for NULL and zero-length we are quite efficient.
Thus it is very simple, we remove it.
Thus it won't extend and rehash the hash constantly.
Thus it's ok to return here.
Thus null data
Thus the characteristics of the randomization are the same
Thus the default max embedded payload fraction is 64.
Thus the following two ALWAYS.
Thus we can not use strlen.
Thus we can skip this part of the runtime check for non-internal functions.
Thus we check manually for _get_module.
Thus we need to do part of what it does or Zend will report leaks.
Thus we need to resend the types, if any such values occur, and force resend for the next execution.
Thus, a log line is always one line long
Thus, a proactive measure like this self-test is needed.
Thus, a test for both these conditions is necessary to ensure we correctly detect the start of the pattern in both phases.
Thus, correcting target_len so it's suddenly don't overflown.
Thus, detecting the absence of a lookahead is sufficient to determine that there is no unexpected or expected token to report.
Thus, it is only those at the end that need unsetting here.
Thus, the name is size - 1.
Thus, the safety measure is unlikely to cause much annoyance, and is a reasonable tradeoff to use when authenticating against existing hashes that are not reliably known to have been computed with the correct algorithm.
Thus, this function itself never impersonates, but does use the identity of the thread.
Thus, using it as a generic allocator is not suggested.
Thus, we cannot look for specific key values if we want to build binaries that run on both systems.
Thus, we determine the type by iterating through the entire array and figuring out each element.
Thus, we do these hacks.
Thus, we need another opcode here.
Thus, we optionally deviate from the correct algorithm just enough to avoid such collisions.
Thus, we resort to this not so clever hackery.
Ticket 2ea2425d34be
Tiebreaker hash
Tile-part lengths
TileGX architecture.
Time encode/decode
Time interval, in microseconds
Time when Sun is at south
Time when query started - used for profiling
Time zone support
TimeZone functions
Timezone offset in minutes
Timezone struct
Tishri           The first month of the Jewish year.
Tishri 1 must never be Sunday, Wednesday or Friday.
Title: Affine transformation
Title: Matrix Group: Affine Matrix
To "or" REQ_VARY
To avoid losing the reference in that case we work on a copy.
To be implemented when we have more image formats.
To check alignment gcc has an appropriate operator.
To cope with both ways of handling this, I had resort to some messy hackery that does a test at run time.
To correct this error in the length of the year and to bring the vernal equinox back to March 21, Pope Gregory XIII issued a papal bull declaring that Thursday October 4, 1582 would be followed by Friday October 15, 1582 and that centennial years would only be a leap year if they were a multiple of 400.
To decrease the number of length checks, we try to concatenate the fixed length character sequences.
To delete, insert a NULL pointer.
To detect forward reference we have to scan up the list that is kept in the workspace.
To do everything in integer math, we must use integer scale factors.
To do not bloat normal filling code I added a 2nd private function.
To do this, we maintain a count of executed SKIP_ARGs.
To ensure unique results if UNION
To fully unlock the database, delete the lock file
To get around these problems, we apply Thomas' method to compute the nearest colors for only the cells within a small subbox of the histogram.
To get stack address.
To guarantee multiple calls generate unique names even if the file is not created.
To improve the visual quality of the results, we actually work in scaled RGB space, giving G distances more weight than R, and R in turn more than B.
To include callout length
To iterate through builtin functions
To iterate through levels
To maintain a certain BC, we allow anything for the second parameter and return original string
To many cells for a single page.
To please picky compilers
To prevent these separators from being replaced with a space, we use the SKIP_LONG_HEADER_SEP to skip over them.
To prevent these separators from being replaced with a space, we use the SKIP_LONG_HEADER_SEP_MBSTRING to skip over them.
To reset column cache
To save initial string length after scanning to first variable
To shut up GCC
To the end of n1 and n2.
To this end, it stores xml elements, their sub-elements, and their attributes in an in-memory tree.
To update on each new cURL release using src/main.c in cURL sources
To verify that a date is valid, convert it to SDN and then back and compare with the original.
To work around them, add a dummy OP_Variable here.
ToDos  See if example images from http://www.exif.org have illegal thumbnail sizes or if code is corrupt.
Token argument.
Token associated with this expression
Token at end of string
Token counter
Token identifying trigger
Token number of previous deferred token
Token pList/nList corresponds to
Token that describes the complete CREATE TRIGGER
Token to add or remove to or from index
Token to defer
Token to query for
Token type.
Token value.
Token with unqualified schema object name
Tokenization callback context object
Tokenize return code
Tokenizer argument strings
Tokenizer creation arguments
Tokenizer cursor
Tokenizer cursor open on zDoc/nDoc
Tokenizer for this cursor.
Tokenizer for this table
Tokenizer functions
Tokenizer hash table
Tokenizer implementation
Tokenizer implementations will typically add additional fields
Tokenizer module
Tokenizer module methods object
Tokenizer name
Tokenizer object
Tokenizer to add exceptions to
Tokens are also used as part of an expression.
Tokens as defined by rfc 2616.
Tokens count up to end of this phrase
Tokens to the left of first highlight
Tokens to the right of last highlight
Too lazy to use getconf
Too short of an encoded string generated
Top and bottom range constraints
Top of a loop checking foreign keys
Top of insert loop.
Top of the IN loop
Top of the co-routine
Top of the delete loop
Top of the index fill loop
Top of the input loop
Top of the loop
Top of the loop body
Top of the loop for inserting rows
Top of the rowid change constraint check
Top of the update loop
Top-level operator.
Total bytes of space to allocate
Total cache hits, misses and writes
Total cost of this path
Total cost of this path ignoring sorting costs
Total internal fragmentation
Total leaves written to level 0
Total length of blob
Total length of file in bytes
Total number of I/O Errors
Total number of allocations
Total number of arguments
Total number of blocks read
Total number of bytes in the record
Total number of bytes on a page
Total number of calls to malloc
Total number of columns in the index
Total number of ordered columns in the index
Total number of pages in apHash
Total number of pages in database file
Total number of pages restored from journal
Total number of pages to copy
Total number of phrase instances
Total number of rows in FTS table
Total number of segments
Total number of segments on level
Total number of tokens in cluster
Total number of tokens in row
Total of all malloc calls - includes internal frag
Total overflow pages used by doclists
Total pages involved in the balance
Total segments in this structure
Total size in bytes of journal file pJrnl
Total size of allocated shared memory
Total size of allocation
Total size of iBestCol in tokens
Total size of one pcache line
Total size of the database file
Total size: 72576 bytes, block size: 128.
Total sizes of each column
Total space in bytes required on leaf
Total term size
Total time spent executing this instruction
Trace function
Tracing routines for the RtreeSearchPoint queue
Trailing values to read from sorter
Trangle filter, default radius 1
Transaction state
Transfer the next row in Queue over to Current
Transfer-Encoding: chunked
Transform as many times as possible.
Transform this into an alias to the result set
Transforms state based on block.
Transient list of dirty pages
Transient storage for serial_type in OP_MakeRecord
Transitive constraints
Translate JSON formatted string into raw text
Translate from this opcode to the end
Translate the return values from the Source object: 0 is EOF, -1 is error
Transliterator functions
Trash all content in the buffer being freed
Traverse it, filling the return array.
Traverses linked list.
Treat ORA-1010 as a successful Ping
Treat as a non-capturing bracket.
Treat empty input file as fatal error
Tree contains a TK_COLLATE operator
Tree contains a TK_SELECT operator
Tries to expand a single brace.
Trigger Name    Table Name
Trigger being finished
Trigger definition to return
Trigger name for error reporting
Trigger opcode
Trigger this program was coded from
Trigger to code
Trigger under construct by a CREATE TRIGGER
Trim off trailing whitespace characters
True : This month, day, year arguments are valid
True after i'th new page is populated
True after initialization has finished
True after malloc is initialized
True after mutexes are initialized
True after snippet is shifted
True after xBegin but before xCommit/xRollback
True anomaly
True at EOF
True exponent is either not used or is well-formed
True for "ORDER BY rowid DESC"
True for "ORDER BY rowid DESC" queries
True for 'notindexed' columns
True for B-Tree.
True for DESC.
True for DESCENDING sort order
True for FTS4, false for FTS3
True for ORDER BY ASC
True for SQLITE_PRINTF_SQLFUNC
True for UPDATE that affects rowid
True for UPDATE, False for INSERT
True for a "natural" join
True for a SEARCH.
True for a freelist.
True for a leaf node
True for a lookup only
True for a prefix iterator
True for a prefix search
True for a prefix term
True for a read-only database
True for a read-only page
True for a root-only reader
True for a savepoint rollback
True for a write lock
True for an UPDATE or DELETE
True for an ephemeral table
True for an infix function: LIKE, GLOB, etc
True for an update, false otherwise
True for descending docids
True for descending rowid order
True for final fragment in snippet
True for first term on page
True for first term on the node
True for highlighted terms
True for native byte-order checksums
True for native byte-order, false for non-native
True for one-pass algorithm without the FIFO
True for recursive reference in WITH
True for reverse-order IN operations
True for statements that do not write
True for statements that read
True for threadsafe connections
True for unindexed columns
True for without rowid
True for write lock.
True for xCreate, false for xConnect
True global
True global resources - no need for thread safety here
True globals
True globals, no need for thread safety
True globals, written only at process startup
True if " " flag is present
True if "-" flag is present
True if "l" flag is present
True if EXPLAIN present on SQL command
True if I/O errors persist
True if IDLIST is in table order
True if OP_Affinity has been run already
True if ORDER BY rank
True if REPLACE conflict resolution might happen
True if REPLACE is used to resolve INT PK conflict
True if RHS must be unique
True if RTree holding integer coordinates
True if RTree holds integer coordinates
True if RowSet.pEntry is sorted
True if SQLITE_BUSY has been encountered
True if UNIQUE and NOT NULL for all columns
True if WAL file exists
True if a header read failed
True if a journal file is present
True if a leaf page
True if a locking error has occurred
True if a lookup of a single entry.
True if a m-j name has been written to jrnl
True if a new wal-index header is loaded
True if a non-constant constraint is seen
True if a periodic sample
True if a shared lock has ever been held
True if a table requiring integer keys
True if a temp table was used
True if a transaction is opened
True if a warnning has been issued
True if a write cursor
True if aOverflow is valid
True if all rows are being deleted
True if all terms are at the same rowid
True if an IN operator is seen
True if an error has been encountered
True if an incremental I/O handle
True if analyzing arguments to an agg func
True if any page has PGHDR_NEED_SYNC
True if any part of database file changed
True if argument iFrom is valid
True if arguments are desc
True if at End Of Results
True if at end of search
True if attempting to append
True if attempting to delete from a view
True if attempting to insert into a view
True if auto-vacuum is enabled
True if blob 'hint' has been modified
True if buffer zTerm must be copied
True if cache is purgeable
True if cache must be reset
True if callback data is initialized
True if cell coverage checking should be done
True if checksums in WAL are big-endian
True if column-filter already applied
True if constraint checking is deferred till COMMIT
True if constraints are supported
True if copy of key made on insert
True if current operation is a delete
True if cursor is at EOF
True if db currently has pBt locked
True if decimal point should be shown
True if docids are descending
True if doclist is loaded incrementally
True if doclists are in reverse order
True if entry is not a match
True if error has occurred, else false
True if errors are benign
True if field width constant starts with zero
True if for internal use only
True if foreign key processing is required
True if fts5yymajor has invoked an error
True if holding a checkpoint lock
True if holding the unixShmNode mutex
True if holding the winShmNode mutex
True if iDocid is valid
True if iPrev is valid
True if iRoot is the root of an index b-tree
True if in a normal write operation
True if in a write transaction
True if incr-vacuum is enabled
True if info.nKey is valid
True if initialized
True if integer overflow seen
True if is an aggregate function
True if iterator is "rowid DESC"
True if journal file exists
True if journal page is synced
True if last 0x00 counts
True if last operation was a delete
True if looking for a VIEW rather than a TABLE
True if low on PAGECACHE memory
True if next rowid is first in doclist
True if next rowid is first in page
True if next term will be first in leaf
True if no such function exists
True if non-integer value was input to the sum
True if not checked out
True if offset overflows
True if one or more PMAs created
True if opening an ephemeral, temporary database
True if outer SELECT uses aggregate functions
True if output is already ordered
True if p is a compound select
True if pDest has a UNIQUE index
True if pPage is a leaf of a LEAFDATA tree
True if pParent is a root-page
True if pWith should be freed with parser
True if pages are on backing store
True if pointing to a row with no data
True if previously initialized.
True if read-only
True if reading to end of data
True if rerunning after an auto-reprepare
True if resolved to a trigger column
True if resolving a partial index WHERE
True if resolving columns of CREATE INDEX
True if resolving names in a CHECK constraint
True if rev is known
True if rowid is UPDATEd
True if rowid is modified by this update
True if sPoint is valid
True if satisfies ORDER BY
True if some process holds a RESERVED lock
True if sorter record includes seq.
True if sqlite3_interrupt has been called
True if src db requires unlocking
True if statement may modify/insert multiple rows
True if statement may throw an ABORT exception
True if sub-query is correlated
True if table b-trees.
True if table-valued-function syntax
True if the "ll" flag is present
True if the AUTOINCREMENT keyword is present
True if the DISTINCT keyword is present
True if the EXPLAIN flag is found on the query
True if the GROUP BY and ORDER BY are the same
True if the NOT keyword is present
True if the OP_Affinity operation has been run
True if the TEMPORARY keyword is present
True if the VM needs to be recompiled
True if the conversion to IN is valid
True if the delete flag is set
True if the doclist is desc
True if the insert is likely to be an append
True if the leaf of an intKey table
True if the loop has UNIQUE NOT NULL columns
True if the node needs to be written to disk
True if the outermost savepoint is a TS
True if the output segment is the oldest
True if the previous character was uEsc
True if the subquery uses aggregate functions
True if the terms are equal
True if the transaction counter changed
True if the underlying table is BTREE_UNORDERED
True if the value to convert is signed
True if there are either triggers or FKs
True if there are one or more Incrblob cursors
True if there exists a MATCH constraint
True if there exists a hot journal-file
True if there is a NOT INDEXED clause
True if there is a doclist-index
True if there is an INDEXED BY clause
True if this call is part of a bulk load
True if this constraint is on docid
True if this constraint is usable
True if this cursor is at EOF
True if this expression is entirely deferred
True if this expression is reusable
True if this frame is valid
True if this is a TEMP table
True if this is a VIEW
True if this is a VIRTUAL table
True if this is a commit
True if this is a covering index
True if this is a read-only file
True if this is an OUTER join
True if this is an UPDATE operation
True if this is an in-memory file
True if this is likely an append
True if this is likely to be an append
True if this is the first term written
True if this op is a delete
True if token must appear at position 0
True if trailing zeros should be removed
True if uppercase is equivalent to lowercase
True if uses a statement journal
True if vacuuming a :memory: database
True if value is extracted from pExpr
True if we acquired a PENDING lock this time
True if we are at the end of input
True if we can share pBt with another db
True if we have seen a malloc failure
True if we need to scan in reverse order
True if we use the index only
True if wrong number of arguments
True if yymajor has invoked an error
True if zBuf is static space
True if zTerm/nTerm is transient
True in "cleanup" state
True once a write-transaction is open on pDest
True once an index has been found
True once backup has been registered with pager
True once iDelta has been written
True otherwise.
True solar longitude
True this expression is at EOF already
True to allow FTS4-only syntax
True to cause the name to be dequoted
True to copy SQL text into the sqlite3_stmt
True to count changes
True to count the table
True to dequote
True to dequote pCollName
True to disable the incremental doclist optimization.
True to disable triggers
True to enable core mutexing
True to enable full mutexing
True to enable memory status
True to enable tracing
True to enable triggers
True to extend file if necessary
True to flush contents of memory to PMA
True to grab the global stats
True to ignore delete-keys
True to ignore empty segments
True to ignore xSavepoint invocations
True to inhibit all file I/O
True to interpret filenames as URIs
True to iterate in reverse order
True to omit locking primitives
True to omit the xSync on the db file
True to omit this if found
True to reset page prior to first page rollback
True to run in heap-memory mode
True to run the ORDER BY search loop
True to save SQL text into the sqlite3_stmt
True to scan from zTerm to EOF
True to seek past initial nulls
True to set lock.
True to skip deleted entries
True to sort in descending order
True to store descending indexes
True to trace VDBE execution
True to trace changes
True to truncate WAL file on commit
True to truncate db on commit
True to unlink wal and wal-index files
True to update the change-counter
True to use a bg thread for this object
True to use background threads
True to use in-memory sub-journals
True to use onepass strategy
True to use prefix-indexes
True when processing first term on page
True while initialization in progress
TrueType font
Truecolor brush.
Truecolor tile.
Truncate WAL to this size on reset
Truncate WAL to this size upon reset
Truncate file if the amount of new data is smaller than the existing data set.
Truncate name to next format code or end of string
Try 3 times to get the pending lock.
Try all three types of maps, but start with the specified one
Try and cache the script and assume that it is returned from_shared_memory.
Try and get headers again
Try and guess for non-wsdl clients and servers
Try convert to number.
Try it as a keyword type.
Try object's handlers.
Try read-only.
Try the directory given as parameter.
Try to ORDER BY the result set to make distinct processing easier
Try to allocate huge pages first to reduce dTLB misses.
Try to avoid checking for flags, width or precision
Try to back-off and guess if this is the last block allocated
Try to catch bad usage without preventing flexibility
Try to determine whether text is in some character code we can identify.
Try to expand the master using the newly freed chunk
Try to fetch class and then find static method.
Try to fetch find static method of given class.
Try to find class directly
Try to find out if this is an anchored regular expression.
Try to flatten subqueries in the FROM clause up into the main query
Try to get by with floating-point arithmetic.
Try to get the dll name from the environment
Try to get the file to memory map
Try to get the list of substrings and display a warning if failed.
Try to hit the cache first
Try to iterate over the tree until we find item with description/mimetype.
Try to keep nFreeSlot above this
Try to load demoin.png and paste part of it into the output image.
Try to load the dll from the PATH...
Try to look in the scope instead
Try to lookup the cached regex entry, and if successful, just pass back the compiled pattern, otherwise go on and compile it.
Try to match one more.
Try to open file
Try to pull the page from the write-ahead log.
Try to recycle a page.
Try to restore access, modification times if read it.
Try to return memory used by the pcache module to the main memory heap
Try to set CURSOR_TYPE to dynamic.
Try to use OP_ReopenIdx
Try to use old VS_PROFILER variable
Try to use the specified logging location.
Try to write in a value to indicate that the data is being written.
Trying to clean up the stack may not be safe in this case.
Trying to read or write past the end of the data is an error
Tuneable horizontal and vertical resolution in dots per inch
Turn to branch.
Turns out that wasn't a keyword after all.
Twelve of these alternating 29-30 day months gives a year of 354 days, which is about 11 1/4 days short of a solar year.
Two byte sequence.
Two copies of the header content
Two elements in the vector are set for each substring: the offsets to the start and end of the substring.
Two lots of padding:  Pad the first block to 64 bytes
Two or more AND-connected terms
Two or more OR-connected terms
Two or more indexes share the same root page.
Two problems why we throw exceptions here: PHP is typeless and hence passing one argument that's not an array could be by mistake and the other way round is possible, too.
Two salt values copied from WAL header
Two-byte-character lead-byte followed by a trail-byte.
Type Inference
Type code for object to destroy
Type of RHS table.
Type of error
Type of expression node pExpr
Type of file to open
Type of join between this able and the previous
Type of lock currently held on this file
Type of node in this tree
Type of test to make on this file
Type of the RHS
Type of the array "element" for the bitmap representation.
Type of the container - used for error messages
Type of token
Type of top-level element
Type values for all entries in the record
Type-library stuff
Type2: ldrsb, ldrh, ldrsh
Typecast byte array
Typehinting
Types and lists for handling lists of case mappings.
Typo: kept for backward compatibility.
UColAttribute constants
UColAttributeValue constants
UDA part 1,2
UDateFormatStyle constants
UID validity value
ULocDataLocaleType constants
UNIQUERYWITHOUTERELEASEATTACHAVINGROUPDATEBEGINNERECURSIVE
UNSIGNED LONG
UNSIGNED SHORT
UNUSED_DEST is not set when no flags should be set.
UNumberFormatAttribute
UNumberFormatPadPosition
UNumberFormatRoundingMode
UNumberFormatStyle constants
UNumberFormatSymbol
UNumberFormatTextAttribute
UPTO, MINUPTO
UPTOI, MINUPTOI
URI args to copy
URI parameter sought
URL encode session_name and id because they might be user supplied
US-ASCII case folding still applies.
USE_BACKREF_WITH_LEVEL
USE_CAPTURE_HISTORY
USE_COMBINATION_EXPLOSION_CHECK
USE_FIND_LONGEST_SEARCH_ALL_OF_RANGE
USE_MATCH_RANGE_MUST_BE_INSIDE_OF_SPECIFIED_RANGE
USE_MONOMANIAC_CHECK_CAPTURES_IN_ENDLESS_REPEAT
USE_NAMED_GROUP
USE_POSIX_API_REGION_OPTION
USE_SHARED_CCLASS_TABLE
USE_SHM_OPEN
USE_ST_LIBRARY
USE_SUBEXP_CALL
USE_UNICODE_PROPERTIES
USE_VARIABLE_META_CHARS
UTF-16 encoded SQL statement.
UTF-8 character
UTF-8 encoded SQL statement.
UTF-8 has been restricted to max 4 bytes since RFC 3629
Unable to edit this page.
Unable to flatten compound queries
Unable to open the database file
Unable to register shutdown function, presumably because of lack of memory, so flush the session now.
Unable to resolve the real path, return -1
Unaligned read is supported.
Unaligned read is unsupported or in 32 bit mode.
Unaligned space available
Unary operations
Unary operator
Unbuffered queries should not be a problem as we won't allow sending COM_CHANGE_USER.
Uncommitted Hash table changes
Uncommon, but possible.
Unconditional branch.
Unconditionally destroy existing array -- possible dirty data
Undefine sljit macros.
Undefine some potentially clashing cpp symbols
Undefined hues always match...
Under BSD, emulate fopencookie using funopen
Under the assumption that input will be rounded nearest, mode 0 renders 1e23 as 1e23 rather than 9.999999999999999e22.
Underlying VFS
Underlying file handle
Underlying file is readonly
Underscore is covered by ucp_P or ucp_Po.
Undo the local locks
Undo the speculative increase.
Unfortunate limitations on integers makes
Unfortunately it does not seem to correspond exactly to any of the five variants of EBCDIC documented in IBM's _Enterprise Systems Architecture/390: Principles of Operation_, SA22-7201-06, Seventh Edition, July, 1999, pp.
Unfortunately we cannot tell whether a name is a duplicate in the first pass, so we have to allow for more memory.
Unfortunately, PCRE requires 3 ints of working space for each captured substring, so we have to get and release working store instead of just using the POSIX structures as was done in earlier releases when PCRE needed only 2 ints.
Unfortunately, both are within their rights.
Unfortunately, there's no clean and portable way in C to pass arguments to a variadic function if you don't know the number of arguments at compile time.
Unicode BMP
Unicode character database.
Unimplemented version 3 methods
Uninstall ocaml's segfault handler.
Union of locks held by connections other than "p"
Unique file ID
Unique file ID for vxworks.
Unique index on parent key columns in pTab
Unix Pthreads
Unix Standard tar archive
Unix cannot, but some systems may return SQLITE_FULL from here.
Unix file with file desc used in the key
Unix passed away at the age of 11 1/2 on September 14, 1996, 12:18 PM PDT, after a two-month bout with cirrhosis of the liver.
Unix socket
UnixWare and Netware define shutdown to _shutdown, which causes problems later on when using a structure member named shutdown.
Unknown encode/decode
Unknown family
Unknown growth direction.
Unknown values
Unless an error has occurred, register numbers are always positive.
Unless disabled, check whether any single character iterators can be auto-possessified.
Unless it is a skip-scan.
Unless it is empty, flush the hash table to disk
Unlike in the positive case, where we can set appropriate starting bits for specific high-valued UTF-8 characters, in this case we have to set the bits for all high-valued characters.
Unlikely, but possible
Unlimited UTF-8 repeat
Unlink a file within a phar archive
Unlink generator call_frame from the caller and backup vm_stack_top
Unlock a mutex.
Unlock it and stuff it into our variant
Unlock notify callback
Unlock the system-level locks
Unlock-notify cb to invoke
Unmap any pages of the existing mapping that cannot be reused.
Unmap the database file.
Unoptimized, but clear version
Unpacked index key
Unpacked record to return
Unpacked version of key
Unqualified name of the index to create
Unqualified name of the table to create
Unread parts of the buffer must be zero-filled
Unrecognized argument
Unrecognized escapes are faulted if PCRE is running in its strict mode.
Unroll 1 to 3 byte UTF-8 sequences, use loop to handle longer ones.
Unset ignore SKIP-with-argument.
Unsigned for byte-order conversions
Unsigned integer types.
Unsigned loop counter
Unsigned right shift.
Unsorted entry count
Unsuccessful match
Unsupported
Until IE's user base drops to nill or problem is fixed this code must remain enabled for all systems.
Unused dest is possible here.
Unused file descriptors to close
Unused parameter
Up to three columns left of 'term'
Updata extra data pointer
Update a row in a main table b-tree
Update all nested paths
Update all the previous opcodes to use the same variable
Update allocator performance statistics.
Update any backup objects copying the contents of this pager.
Update bitcount
Update bitmap
Update box volume.
Update checksum -- must be after transform to avoid fouling up last message block
Update cksum3 with the results.
Update context to reflect the concatenation of another buffer full of bytes.
Update contexts for converter error handlers
Update current hash item with the converted value.
Update digest
Update hit_start only in the first time.
Update mtime
Update nBackfill
Update number of bits
Update only applies if a base register exists.
Update opcode
Update opcodes
Update opcodes to use new literals table
Update or delete the input segments
Update our pos pointer
Update output hash depending on key type
Update session data modification/access time stamp.
Update statement to modify idx values
Update statements used while promoting segments
Update stats for boxes
Update the .nOut value of this loop
Update the Fts5PageWriter.term field.
Update the Fts5Structure.
Update the PCache1.pSynced variable if necessary.
Update the count of rows that are inserted
Update the database size and return.
Update the db file change counter via the direct-write method.
Update the global lock state and do debug tracing
Update the lockless linked list of events
Update the offset.
Update the ovector.
Update the page-size to match the value read from the journal.
Update the pager's copy of the change-counter.
Update the pointer-map and meta-data with the new root-page number.
Update the private copy of the header.
Update the savepoint values to match.
Update the schema version field in the destination database.
Update the string pointer to point  just after the number read.
Update the timestamp
Update the write-counter.
Update: I talked with Cokus via email and it won't ruin the algorithm
Upload progress
Uploaded file exceeded MAX_FILE_SIZE
Uploaded file exceeded upload_max_filesize
Upon success, SQLITE_OK will be returned.
Upper bound on the range.
Usable bytes per page
Usable size of mapped region
Usable size of mapping at pMapRegion
Usable size of the page
Usage Paradigm: The user of this library will typically be implementing either an XMLRPC server, an XMLRPC client, or both.
Use "sqlite3_extension_init" if 0
Use 1 byte of input
Use 2 bytes of input
Use 2 if more than 6 X's.
Use 4 bytes of input
Use 8 bytes of input
Use EXIT_SUCCESS as a witness for stdlib.h.
Use ExprList.u.x.iOrderByCol
Use Go to start 4 goroutines each of which handles 1/4 of the board.
Use HTTP/1.1 with "Connection: close" by default
Use OCIPing instead of OCIServerVersion.
Use OCIServerVersion for Pre-10.2 clients
Use OP_RealAffinity to make sure it is really real.
Use PCRE to trim the header into the right format
Use STAT3 or STAT4 data
Use SorterOpen instead of OpenEphemeral
Use U_MULTIPLE_DECIMAL_SEPARATORS
Use a full-text search.
Use a new PGroup for each PCache
Use a recursive mutex if it is available
Use a rollback journal on this file
Use a slightly smaller number to allow for a few compiler-allocated temporary stack slots.
Use a tmpfile and copy the old streams contents into it
Use access macros to learn colors.
Use as many args as specified
Use at least one from xtra.
Use at your own risk.
Use big enough power of 2
Use c to hold the length of the character in bytes, plus UTF_LENGTH to flag that it's a length rather than a small character.
Use class name
Use comparisons
Use covering indices for full-scans
Use custom function to get replacement string and its length.
Use default temporary directory.
Use double for large zend_long values that were serialized on a 64-bit system
Use for looping over pSrcList items
Use full fsync for checkpoint
Use full fsync on the backend
Use http wrapper to proxy ftp request
Use index only - omit table
Use libxml functions otherwise its memory deallocation is screwed up
Use mutex below for variable that follow.
Use native byte order
Use of ONEPASS not allowed
Use of a hash implementation is OK
Use of hexdig_init omitted 20121220 to avoid a
Use of this source code is governed by a BSD-style license that can be found in the LICENSE file.
Use only function parameters passed from session module.
Use parse_url - if it returns false, we return NULL
Use same C function for all methods
Use strategy 1.
Use strict check to verify return value of internal function
Use the VAX insv instruction to insert each code in turn.
Use the built-in recursive mutexes if they are available.
Use the columns affinity.
Use the common basic header info to make the image object.
Use the entire master
Use the foreground thread for this operation
Use the incremental approach.
Use the initial line loop to position children in the cross axis for as long as they are relatively positioned with alignment STRETCH or FLEX_START.
Use the key from the main database
Use the line loop to position children in the main axis for as long as they are using a simple stacking behaviour.
Use the original text of the column expression as its name
Use the standard default temporary directory.
Use the standard inner loop.
Use the standard library for separate compilation
Use this as a general "out of stream" error
Use this buffer to store the file name in.
Use this case if we have ANSI headers
Use this for commenting out debug-print statements.
Use this for the table cursor, if there is one
Use this text encoding
Use traditional smaller size: non-PL/SQL errors should fit and it keeps the stack smaller
Use type opcodes
Use up some stack space.
Use write-ahead logging
Use xsi:type if it is defined
Used by OP_Delete
Used by PRAGMA temp_store_directory
Used by TK_AGG_COLUMN and TK_AGG_FUNCTION
Used by extra internal tests only run if NDEBUG is not defined
Used by fts3.c only.
Used by incr-vacuum.
Used by reverse iterators
Used by the fts5vocab module.
Used by the master to efficiently transfer a blob of data to the workers.
Used by this thread only
Used during OR-clause processing
Used for accessing the elements of the stack.
Used for debugging.
Used for non-textual disassembly into structs.
Used for peer verification in windows
Used for rounding floating point values
Used for seeking on a phar directory handle
Used for sorting directories alphabetically
Used for testing and analysis only
Used for testing and debugging only.
Used for the dependency hashtable
Used for the shared hashtable
Used for writing to a phar file
Used in mysqlnd_debug.c
Used internally - xBestIndex should ignore
Used internally as comparison routine passed to zend_list_del_element
Used locally for exec options
Used only to suppress a compiler warning
Used only when debugging GIF compression code
Used reduced-size Expr nodes
Used to accumulate return value
Used to allocate unique cursor ids
Used to be a conditional
Used to block signals during execution of signal handlers
Used to build up list of table cols
Used to build up table PK declaration
Used to catch return codes
Used to check DES salts to ensure that they contain only valid characters
Used to detect hash collisions.
Used to divy up the pSpace memory
Used to full index in sorted order
Used to get maximum path name length
Used to iterate from pExpr to root
Used to iterate name contexts
Used to iterate through FKs
Used to iterate through VMs
Used to iterate through aAll
Used to iterate through attached dbs
Used to iterate through cells
Used to iterate through columns
Used to iterate through constraint array
Used to iterate through deferred tokens
Used to iterate through entire index
Used to iterate through indexes
Used to iterate through instances
Used to iterate through levels
Used to iterate through memory cells
Used to iterate through non-root layers
Used to iterate through pTrigger list
Used to iterate through phrase terms
Used to iterate through phrase tokens
Used to iterate through samples
Used to iterate through schemas
Used to iterate through segment-readers
Used to iterate through segments
Used to iterate through table columns
Used to iterate through tokens
Used to iterate through zArg
Used to loop through N hash tables
Used to loop through terms
Used to loop thru the element list
Used to save work done on a writeable phar
Used to store transient return codes
Used to test for reference loops
Used to verify lookaside not used for schema
Used to walk the replacement string
Used to write the new, merged, segment
Used when bit MEM_Zero is set in flags
Used when p4type is P4_COLLSEQ
Used when p4type is P4_FUNCCTX
Used when p4type is P4_FUNCDEF
Used when p4type is P4_INT64
Used when p4type is P4_INTARRAY
Used when p4type is P4_KEYINFO
Used when p4type is P4_MEM
Used when p4type is P4_REAL
Used when p4type is P4_SUBPROGRAM
Used when p4type is P4_VTAB
Useful debugging logic when panicmem is broken.
Useful to add assertions
User authentication failed
User authentication information
User data for aux.
User data parameter
User functions
User hasn't sent anything, we will send empty string.
User name used to authenticate
User save handlers may end up directly here by misuse, bugs in user script, etc.
User semantic actions sometimes alter yychar, and that requires that yytoken be updated with the new translation.
User storage begins just after header.
User supplied function is used for comparing the keys.
User-data pointer
Userid for the file
Users functions
Userspace Filters using ambiguous wildcards could cause problems.
Uses C-style conventions
Uses ICU ucol_getSortKey for performance.
Uses OS features not supported on host
Uses an ephemeral index
Uses the OpenEphemeral opcode
Uses the skip-scan algorithm
Using both tmp register is better for instruction scheduling.
Using mod_proxy_fcgi and ProxyPass, apache cannot set PATH_INFO As we can extract PATH_INFO from PATH_TRANSLATED it is probably also in SCRIPT_NAME and need to be removed
Using non-empty tag
Using the cache.
Using the values generated by patch_pc_relative_loads.
Using these size values we can go forward or backward on the block chain.
Using zend_long would truncate a 64-bit var on Win64, so the exact long datatype fits everywhere, as long as there's no 32-bit int overflow.
Usually needs to flush buffer.
Usually only a few pages are meet either condition.
Usually overwrite previous item
Usually the path zFilename should not be a relative pathname.
Usually used in a tight spot.
Utility Functions
Utility Functions for Extensions
Utils can still be used even if SLJIT_CONFIG_UNSUPPORTED is set.
VACUUMVIEWINITIALLY
VALID RANGE  4713 B.C.
VALID RANGE  4714 B.C.
VAX exponent range is so narrow we must worry about overflow here...
VDBE cursor for the canonical data source
VDBE cursor number of the pSub result set temp table
VDBE cursor that is the main data repository
VDBE has already been allocated
VDBE has completed execution
VDBE instruction address of the start of the loop
VDBE is ready to execute
VDBE under construction
VDBE under constrution
VERIFY: F13021
VFS containing this as the xDelete method
VFS flags to open journal file
VFS to use for this b-tree
VFS to use with this b-tree
VIRTUAL_DIR
VM being constructed
VM being reprepared
VM this frame belongs to
VVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVVV
Valid but no results
Valid for 1st elem only
Valid operators for constraints
Validate domain
Validate index entries for the current row
Validate the CRC32 of a file opened from within the phar
Value at start of group
Value being transferred
Value configured by 'automerge'
Value extracted from pLower
Value extracted from pUpper
Value extracted from record
Value for "end_block" field
Value for "from" column of output
Value for "idx" field
Value for "leaves_end_block" field
Value for "level" column of output
Value for "start_block" field
Value for Fts3Phrase.iColumn
Value for integer types
Value for real types
Value for the stat column of sqlite_stat1
Value from parent table row
Value inserted into rank column
Value is NULL
Value is a BLOB
Value is a RowSet object
Value is a VdbeFrame object
Value is a real number
Value is a string
Value is an integer
Value is undefined
Value might be numeric
Value of 'mx_payload' column
Value of 'name' column
Value of 'ncell' column
Value of 'pageno' column
Value of 'pagetype' column
Value of 'path' column
Value of 'payload' column
Value of 'pgOffset' column
Value of 'pgSize' column
Value of 'unused' column
Value of P1 operand
Value of RBU_STATE_STAGE field
Value of a host parameter
Value of each argument
Value of k is out of range.
Value of nPos field
Value of pOp at the top of the loop
Value of the next token
Value passed to FCNTL_SIZE_HINT call
Value returned by authorization callback
Value returned by system call
Value to append
Value to append to data
Value to be popped
Value to be returned
Value to be set
Value to compare to current sorter key
Value to destroy
Value to return
Value to return from this function
Value to search for
Value to write to hash-table slot
Value type.
Values  between 268435456 and 34359738367
Values allocated/calculated once only
Values between 0 and 127
Values between 128 and 16383
Values between 16384 and 2097151
Values between 2097152 and 268435455
Values for TAG_PHOTOMETRIC_INTERPRETATION
Values for each of the nCol matchable columns.
Values for key types
Values for parameters to the SQL function
Values for the OP_Variable opcode.
Values of cookies to verify
Values of mode other than 0-9 are treated as mode 0.
Values to bind to statement
Values to return.
Vararg list
Variable DUMMY1 is initialized to a negative value above.
Variable end
Variable iNewStart now contains the first valid leaf node.
Variable initialization
Variable is not live, certainly won't benefit from pi
Variable name
Variable skew offset
Variable start
Variable to be pushed
Variable used as the phrase counter
Variables for Floyd-Steinberg dithering
Variables for accumulating image statistics
Variables populated based on current entry.
Variables related to SQLITE_CONFIG_PAGECACHE settings.
Variables with IN
Variables without IN
Variant is modified "in-place"
Variant/ Extlang/Private etc.
Varint that may be written to pOut
Various flags
Various flags.
Various register numbers
Vdbe being configured
Vdbe is guaranteed to have been allocated by this stage.
Vdbe to add code to
Vdbe to add scanstatus entry to
Vdbe to iterate through the opcodes of
VdbeCursor row cache generation counter
Vector of values to consider
Vector size is maintained by queue during add/remove ops.
Vector type accessor
Verb not recognized
Verify correct alignment of TK_ and OP_ constants
Verify it with cpp.
Verify that all NOT NULL columns really are NOT NULL
Verify that all of the variable were assigned exactly once.
Verify that an index entry exists for the current table row
Verify that constants are precomputed correctly
Verify that no lookaside memory was used by schema tables
Verify that the MergeEngine is assigned to a single thread
Verify that the WAL header checksum is correct
Verify that the depth of all children is the same.
Verify that the page list is in accending order
Verify the affinity and collating sequence match
Verify the peer against using CA file/path settings
Verify the validity of the current character as a base-2 digit.
Verify this guarantee.
Verify this routine is never called again
Verify we have enough data to match magic type
Version 1 of the callout block
Version 3 cert
Version 3.7.16 and later
Version 3.8.11 and later
Version 3.8.7 and later
Version 3.9.0 and later
Version, Passes, and Digest Length
Very simple SMTP Send-mail program for sending command-line level emails and CGI-BIN form response for the Windows platform.
Very slow on a palette destination.
View definition
Virtual current working directory support
Virtual machine being coded
Virtual machine under construction
Virtual stack - the struct is used as a virtual stack for each thread.
Virtual table configuration
Virtual table cursor handle
Virtual table handle
Virtual table implementations will typically add additional fields
Virtual table object to return
Virtual table of this cursor
Virtual tables must be handled separately
Virtual tables with open transactions
Virtual terms from the LIKE optimization
Visibility of parent node
Visit blocks immediately dominated by i.
Visit join edges.
Visual Studio 2013 removed all the _POSIX_ defines, but we depend on some
Vowels are kept
W before a vowel, else dropped
WAITIING_ORACLE_BUG_16695981_FIX
WAL connection
WAL magic value.
WAL savepoint context
WAL to write to
WAL_RDWR, WAL_RDONLY, or WAL_SHM_RDONLY
WARNING: If the above line is changed for any reason, you must also change the code that abstracts option settings at the start of the pattern and makes them global.
WBMP Type 0: B/W, Uncompressed bitmap
WBMP may be smaller than 12 bytes, so delay error
WH becomes W, WR becomes R W if followed by a vowel
WHEN clause
WHEN clause for the trigger
WHEN_WE_NEED_TO_CHECK_WHETHER_COMPRESSION_WORKS_CORRECTLY
WHERE analyse context
WHERE analysis context
WHERE clause for partial indices
WHERE clause information
WHERE clause of the UPDATE statement
WHERE clause of trigger step
WHERE clause on PK columns
WHERE clause processing context
WHERE clause term to check
WHERE clause terms
WHERE clause to scan with
WHERE rowid ..
WHERENAMEAFTEREPLACEANDEFAULTAUTOINCREMENTCASTCOLUMNCOMMIT
WHERE_ONEROW would have been helpful
WIN32 always set ISREG flag
WITH clause attached to this select.
WITH clause that pCte belongs to
WRITEPOSLISTSIZE
WRITE_BACK must be the first, since it is a flag.
Wagner All rights reserved.
Wait Constants
Wait a little before trying again
Wait for sem 1 to be zero .
Wait for writers, then checkpoint
Wait to finish sending buffer
Wait until the signal has been delivered.
Waiting connection
Waiting for read-locks to clear
Wal connection
Wal file descriptor for this main db
Wal filename for this main db file
Wal frame containing data for iDbpage
Wal handle to write to
Wal iterator context
Wal to close
Wal-index header for current transaction
Wal-index version
Walk queue putting pointers into array
Walk through config hash and alter matching ini entries using the values found in the hash
Walk through each directory in path and apply any found per-dir-system-configuration from configuration_hash
Want to do one-pass UPDATE/DELETE
Want to return HTTP 500 but apache wants to over write our fault code with their own handling...
Warn if set.
Warning message sent already, just bail out
Warning, empty strings need to be passed as stream
Was INSERT, UPDATE, DELETE, etc.
Was SELECT query
Was just an apostrohpe
We accumulate in a local variable to save frequent testing of lenthptr for NULL.
We aggregate the total dimensions of the container in those two variables
We allocate new temporaries for values that need to relive FAST_CALLs.
We allocate them with 2MB size granularity, to avoid many  reallocations when they are extended by small pieces
We allow very simple pattern matching for filter factories: if "convert.charset.utf-8/sjis" is requested, we search first for an exact match.
We already checked for plain function before.
We also have to invert to match PNG's convention in which 255 is opaque.
We also know that the highest bit is set.
We also set ZEND_ACC_USER_ARG_INFO flag to prevent invalid usage by Reflection
We also set the "follows varying string" flag for subsequently encountered reqchars if it isn't already set and we have just passed a varying length item.
We always double in size
We are allocating ocaml values.
We are currently listing subprograms.
We are done.
We are finished with this character class
We are forced to roll back the active transaction.
We are not necessary in utf mode even in 8 bit mode.
We are now at the branch that is to be obeyed.
We are only willing to ignore this for internal functions because extensions don't always define arg_info.
We are therefore ready to move on.
We are unlikely to get much useful information out of the shared heap in a core file.
We asked for one row, the next one should be EOF, eat it
We assume a 10-byte page header.
We assume that other escapes have more than one character in them, so speculatively set both class_has_8bitchar and class_one_char bigger than one.
We assume that right shift corresponds to signed division by 2 with rounding towards minus infinity.
We assume the buffer is at least ndigit long.
We break the return address cache here, but this is a really rare case.
We build the map in a temporary bit of memory, in case the class contains fewer than two 8-bit characters because in that case the compiled code doesn't use the bit map.
We calculate argc ourselves in order to be on the safe side, even though it is also available from the symbol table.
We can "compress" the constant pool by discarding these literals.
We can also consider a regex to be anchored if OP_SOM starts all its branches.
We can compute an upper bound for the size of the result in advance and so we can prepare the buffer we pass to `sha256_crypt_r'.
We can compute an upper bound for the size of the result in advance and so we can prepare the buffer we pass to `sha512_crypt_r'.
We can easily detect direct recursion, but not mutual recursion.
We can get the item's length from the table, but for those that can match zero occurrences of a character, we must take special action for UTF-8 characters.
We can however report it back to PHP.
We can ignore the temporary data store on the stack from caching point of view.
We can ignore word boundary tests.
We can just ignore the repeat in JS case.
We can never assign a width smaller than the padding and borders
We can not return long strings from ICU functions, so we won't here too
We can return right away for a truecolor image as deallocating colours is meaningless here
We can save the cost of a memory load.
We can still let the OS do its job and be sure that each process gets the same address if desired.
We can thus ignore the first parameter.
We can use true global even for ZTS because its usage is wrapped with exclusive lock anyway
We can use unsafe because we know the codepoint is in valid range and that 4 bytes is enough for any unicode point
We can't allow to set connection options for persistent connections.
We can't count on the environment variables TEMP or TMP, and so must make the Win32 API call to get the default directory for temporary files.
We can't just fail here, because of the possibility of quantifiers with zero minima.
We can't just unset them all at the start of the whole thing because they may get set in one branch that is not the final matching branch.
We can't return from hh_add until we know that hh_mem would succeed, which is to say that addr is no longer null.
We cannot do this by looking at the value of code at the start and end of each alternative, because compiled items are discarded during the pre-compile phase so that the work space is not exceeded.
We cannot get connection as NULL or as a stub in this function.
We cannot open it, but we were able to stat it.
We cannot use TMP3 because of this allocate_stack.
We cannot use this for other roundtrip calls as there is no way the user can access this error
We chain together the bracket offset fields that have to be filled in later when the ends of the brackets are reached.
We change the repeat type to the non-default.
We check the name first, and then check that we have reached the end of the name in the table.
We check to see if this is a left recursion that could loop for ever, and diagnose that case.
We come here from BRAZERO with allow_zero set TRUE.
We compact the heap when it gets twice as large as its initial size.
We compute the squared-c0-distance term, then add in the other two.
We consumed the data
We could handle PHP_MODE_PROCESS_STDIN in a different manner
We could just call the php method directly ourselves at this point, but we do this with a C callback in case the xmlrpc library ever implements some cool usage stats, or somesuch.
We could link this with -Wl,-no_pie, but it is easier to just open the binary and read it from disk.
We could not find a matching RBRACKET.
We could not restore it to the original state in case of error.
We could probably use something smarter, but this is fast enough.
We could try and emulate this by casting to a FD and fstat-ing it, but since the fd might not represent the actual underlying content this would give bogus results.
We count parameters from 1
We count row_count, but will return 0
We create always persistent, as if the user want to connecto to p:somehost, we can't convert the handle then
We create an anonymous memory file, whose `handle` might be inherited by slave processes.
We currently do not have stub support for non-persistent conns.
We currently don't early-bind classes that implement interfaces
We define IPV6_RECVPKTINFO to be IPV6_PKTINFO, so assume the assume user used IPV6_RECVPKTINFO
We did A already case 'A': case 'a':
We do a little bit-flipping magic, repeating the MSB as the LSB, to ensure that 0 maps to 0 and 127 maps to 255.
We do a prop-set using the first dimension as the property name, all subsequent dimensions and offset as parameters, with value as the final value
We do have to hash non-persistent connections, and reuse connections.
We do it this way so that the user's traceback function will be called by a C function with proper unwind info.
We do it this way to save on using another stack variable, as stack usage is to be discouraged.
We do not give errors for those.
We do not intend to support this case.
We do not need to ping brand new connections.
We do not need to select pcre16_printint.c specially, because the COMPILE_PCREx macro will already be appropriately set.
We do not use XMLWRITER_FROM_OBJECT, xmlwriter init function here
We do not use ZIP_FROM_OBJECT, zip init function here
We do not use zend_compile_binary_op for this because we want to retain the left-to-right evaluation order.
We do not want to create it again.
We do nothing here, this function is needed to prevent that the fallback header handling is called.
We do the ping in php_oci_create_session, no need to ping again below
We do this by setting the "end of previous match" offset, because that is picked up at the top of the loop as the point at which to start again.
We do this in the real compile phase, not in the pre-pass, where the whole group may not be available.
We do this now since it is FAR storage and may affect the memory manager's space calculations.
We do this unconditionally so that out-of-scope pconnects are now consistent with oci_close and out-of-scope new connect semantics.
We don need to copy the data from the buffers which we will clean.
We don't actually need data yet, leave this filter in a feed me state until data is needed.
We don't handle 3.23 authentication
We don't have 'http://' so we use docref_root
We don't have control whether max_length will be used, unfortunately.
We don't have specialized opcodes for this, do nothing
We don't have to destroy all zvals if they cannot call any destructors
We don't have to free each allocated block separately, but we like to call all the destructors and callbacks in exactly the same order.
We don't have to restore the control head in case of a failed match.
We don't need no stinkin' parameters...
We don't need the workspace here.
We don't need to alloc unless we are in a meta tag
We don't need to check for buffer overflow any more.
We don't need to handle soft partial matching case.
We don't need to keep the STR_PTR, only the previous private_data_ptr.
We don't need to repeat the search if we haven't yet reached the place we found it at last time.
We don't perform any cleanup, if dirdepth is larger than 0.
We don't support _C with pdo because it uses the data in a different way - just references it.
We don't want to have an arbitrary limit in the size of the password.
We don't want to leave sensitive data from our actual password hash computation on the stack or in registers.
We duplicate the file descriptor, because fclose on a tmpfile will delete the file, but any open descriptors can still access the phantom inode.
We ended up on Saturday, but there's still work to do, so move to Sunday and continue from there.
We explicitly don't support UTF-8 delimiters for now.
We failed long ago if this is not so
We first check for the minimum number of characters.
We first get a primary token and then create a duplicate impersonation token.
We get back the length of the reference string explicitly rather than passing the address of eptr, so that eptr can be a register variable.
We get this from the beginning of htab.
We give an explicit error.
We gonna have a smaller or equally long string, estimation is almost neglecting
We got already an error.
We got an illegal character so we are done accumulating.
We got here because we got a timeout signal, so we are in a signal handler at this point.
We got the info we needed
We got the key we wanted.
We got the time
We had 3 instrs of which the first 2 can't live in the same bundle.
We have a data character whose value is in c.
We have a fixed-length byte sequence.
We have a match.
We have advanced in ps_fetch_from_1_to_8_bytes.
We have already reached the end of this doclist.
We have an equality constraint on the rowid.
We have asked for CURSOR but got no cursor, because the condition above is not fulfilled.
We have created a converted copy of op1.
We have flags too
We have found a candidate table and column.
We have found a character range, so single character optimizations cannot be done anymore.
We have found the first match within the subject string.
We have no native chgrp on Windows, nothing left to do if stream doesn't have own implementation
We have no native chown on Windows, nothing left to do if stream doesn't have own implementation
We have not grown past twice the size of the initial size
We have reached the end of the string.
We have successfully halted and closed the VM.
We have therefore abandoned that approach.
We have to adjust the value or repeat_max, since one less copy is required.
We have to call shutdown callback it to free TS resources
We have to do a hash_del but need to preserve the resource if there is a positive refcount.
We have to fetch all data to clean the line
We have to free the previous contents of user's bound vars
We have to make it ASCIIZ temporarily
We have to realloc the buffer.
We have to remember that there was XCLASS data, however.
We haven't enough information to catch that case precisely.
We ignore it.
We ignore non-ASCII first chars in 8 bit mode.
We include pcre.h before pcre_internal.h so that the PCRE library functions are declared as "import" for Windows by defining PCRE_EXP_DECL as "import".
We invoke it once here to suppress a compiler warning.
We iterate through all the arrays at once.
We iterate through the pattern, searching for the matching ending delimiter.
We just adjust the length as if we had.
We just cut a block from the end of the free block.
We just have to import the definition.
We just have to record the current subject position and start match pointer and give a MATCH return.
We just return the 'wrong' day of week to be consistent.
We just skip it
We keep the original size of the heap to estimate how often we should garbage collect.
We know ALT_SIGN_EXT is set if it is an SLJIT_INT_OP on 64 bit systems.
We know nothing about other code points, because we have no tables.
We know that STR_PTR was stored on the top of the stack.
We know that there is at least one byte left in the subject.
We know that we have a mysqli object, so this failure should be emitted
We know there is enough place on the stack.
We layout non flexible children.
We make a simple difference and add the needed elements
We make it a bit less than INT_MAX to allow for adding in group terminating bytes, so that we don't have to check them every time.
We may call a private function if: 1.
We may eventually want to use this information, but def it out for now
We may have half-cooked connections to clean up
We might decide to remove the regex at all though and let the server side to handle it.
We must not advance Generator if we yield from a Generator being currently run
We must not request TSRM before being booted
We must re-initialize function again
We must try the original host and port information.
We mustn't change the current values of the data slot, because they may be set from a previous iteration of this group, and be referred to by a reference inside the group.
We need 4 characters
We need a : prefix to resolve a name to a parameter number
We need a loop in order to check for more white space and more comments after a comment.
We need an extra instruction in any case.
We need both SetEnvironmentVariable and _putenv here as some dependency lib could use either way to read the environment.
We need only a few extra variables to hold the errors immediately around the current column.
We need some execute_data placeholder in stacktrace to be replaced by the real stack trace when needed
We need the conn because we are doing lazy zval initialization in buffered_fetch_row
We need the length of the year to figure this out, so find Tishri 1 of the next year.
We need the length of the year to figure this out, so find Tishri 1 of this year.
We need the orinal image with each safe neoghb.
We need to advance the start offset, and continue.
We need to allocate more memory
We need to check both the hash and the address of the data.
We need to check for finiteness, because INF, -INF and NAN must not have a decimal point added.
We need to copy the data from the buffers which we will clean.
We need to do slightly different things based on client/server method so lets remember which method was selected
We need to do so explicitly for 10.2 and earlier.
We need to do this after normalisation otherwise we can't get "24H"
We need to figure out the left/right padding lengths.
We need to finalize an internal statement
We need to find their position.
We need to fixup the parameter numbers on the parameters.
We need to iterate through the pattern, searching for the ending delimiter, but skipping the backslashed delimiters.
We need to know how many there are in order to distribute the space.
We need to manually convert to a pg native boolean value
We need to preserve the counter.
We need to release the end pointer to perform the backtrack for the zero-length iteration.
We need to store the 'pos' since we'll modify it in the functions we're going to call and which do not support 'pos' as parameter.
We need to use TMP_REG3.
We now have ecode pointing to the condition or callout.
We now know closest, but first try to allocate exact
We now know the quotient digit.
We now use tmp_rsa_cb to generate a key of appropriate size whenever necessary
We only allow comparing string to prevent unexpected results.
We only care about the first newline character.
We only distinguish the MS extensions to ISO-8859-1.
We only do this check while compiling, or if any of the magic files were not compiled.
We only have types for characters less than 256.
We only know the exact method that is being called if it is either private or final.
We only need to give a dimension for the text if we haven't got any for it computed yet.
We only remove the hash entry.
We only run if there's a width or height defined
We only search for a middle character if there is no range check.
We only want positive step values.
We only want to know if the last command was successful.
We optimize the result set, so we don't convert all the data from raw buffer format to zval arrays during store.
We overwrite the high bits of source.
We pass this on to our PHP listeners, if any
We point D at C and try to atomically set events to point at D if and only if events still points at C.
We prefers register and simple consts.
We put the version info first, so future versions can easily change header info.
We re-read metadata for PS
We re-use the histogram space as an "inverse color map", essentially a cache for the results of nearest-color searches.
We realloc the non-arena memory.
We really can't afford the risk of producing incompatible hashes e.g. when there's something like gcc bug 26587 again, whereas an application or library integrating this code might not also integrate our external tests or it might not run them after every build.
We recommend keeping 6 bits for G and 5 each for R and B.
We remove common factors of powers of 2 from relevant quantities.
We remove rsrc_dtor because we want the enclosing stream to be deleted from the resource list
We replace the
We reset the empty-input-file flag for each image, but we don't clear the input buffer.
We scan the pattern to check that they are fixed length, and set their lengths.
We see the next array, so we update the sort flags of the previous array and reset the sort flags.
We set headers_sent to 1 here to avoid an infinite loop in case of an error situation.
We set its representation in the length/buffer, and then handle it as a data character.
We should already hold a lock on the database connection
We should check properly.
We should go back because later in this function there will be an advancement.
We should keep an reference to return_value to prevent it from being dtor in case nesting calls to unserialize
We should look and see if we can fix that somehow
We should never get here.
We should restore the flags before the label, since other taken jumps has their own flags as well.
We should still be on the same signal stack.
We shouldn't have unconstructed objects in the first place
We store the result in the private property string so we can access the result in uncaught exception handlers without memleaks.
We take the approach of translating immediately before every use of yytoken.
We then add that zval to the array.
We think we might have a free slot, try to atomically grab it.
We try EPSV first, needed for IPv6 and works on some IPv4 servers
We try to avoid this by setting our own value first
We unset it here so as to allow assertions later in the group to be quantified.
We use a chained sequence of blocks that actually live on the stack.
We use a do-while loop so that we write at least 1 digit
We use a small timeout which should encourage the OS to send the data, but at the same time avoid hanging indefinitely.
We use an approach that tries to minimize side-channel leaks of password information - that is, we mostly use fixed-cost bitwise operations instead of branches or table lookups.
We use justifyContent to figure out how to allocate the remaining space available
We use non-nested macros with expansion, as VC has problems
We use select rather than sleep because in older versions of glibc the sleep function does some signal fiddling to handle SIGCHLD.
We use the Indirection-following version of the API since we want to clone as much as possible
We use the last block on the worklist, because predecessors tend to be located before the succeeding block, so this converges faster.
We use this return value to alloc the final buffer.
We use this to detect if a variable is multiply assigned or left unassigned.
We used the pathname directly.
We used to just set a dummy reference number, because it was not used in the first pass.
We used to use IDispatch for this, but it would not always work.
We want all entries from offset to the end if length is not passed or is null
We want at least one event or timeout
We want to avoid using a modulus because that simply tosses the high-order bits and might skew the distribution of random values over the range.
We want to break any ties in favor of green, then red, blue last.
We want to capture the peer cert even if verification fails
We want to check the current branch of the current pattern to see if it could match the empty string.
We want to execute the next two loops one per line with flex-wrap
We want to iterate through all of the segments.
We want to preserve the original bind type given by the user.
We want to shift the pointer pSpace up such that it is 8-byte aligned.
We we pretend that the query was positional even if it was named so that we fall into the named rewrite case below.
We will allocate the table only if there are any named subpatterns.
We will either leak or give nirvana pointers
We will just sit and wait forever on the IO operation.
We will make a new file ID
We will need an XCLASS if data has been placed in class_uchardata.
We won't apply some optimization patterns for such variables.
We won't convert it into_DO_FCALL to emit error at run-time
We won't ever encounter XCL_PROP or XCL_NOTPROP when UCP support is not compiled.
We won't handle XLBoxes
We won't handle run-time pass by reference
We won't recieve unused arguments
We won't try to free something of we don't have loop variable.
We work around this by registering a thread-level mach exception handler and intercepting EXC_BAD_ACCESS.
We wrap the execute function to have fire the execute-entry/return and function-entry/return probes
We'll change its size and try creating palette versions of it.
We'll clear 'no' once we know the user has made a reasonable request.
We'll fall back to strtol, since that's what we used to do anyway.
We'll follow strategy 2.
We'll increment it after all that finishes.
We'll just look for the first codestream at the root of the box structure and handle that.
We'll just refuse to handle such a path.
We'll set 'write' once we know the user's request requires that the image be written back to disk.
We'll use this partial information, which represents the smallest possible size for the child, to compute the remaining available space.
We're at the end of the level "cont_level" continuations.
We're done with the handle, so close it if we just opened it.
We're in a PHP_INI_SYSTEM context, no restrictions
We're missing the last padding at this point to get the final dimension
We're on a weekday, but we're going past Friday, so skip right over the weekend.
We're only supposed to get here when destructing the used_files hash, which doesn't really contain open files, but references to their names/paths
We're returning a pointer to ocaml land.
We've flushed the data far enough
We've run out of replacement strings, so use an empty one
We've run out of replacement strings, so use an empty one.
Websites and infrastructure
Welsh parabolic windowing filter
What happens is that after this destruction any use of the network will mean usage of the context, which means usage of already freed memory, bad.
What operation to perform
What to do in case of uniqueness conflict on iPKey
What to do in state STATE-NUM.
What to do with a uniqueness conflict
What to do with query results
What to do with the lock
What to do with the query results
What to ideally do for truecolor images depends, alas, on the image.
What version of GCC is being used.
Whatever is the last value is what should be set
When EXIF_DEBUG is defined the module generates a lot of debug messages that help understanding what is going on.
When FETCH_SIMPLE then buf wasn't allocated together with buf and we have to free it.
When KEY_USER, the last parameter is always the callback
When MATCH_CBEGROUP is set, add the current subject pointer to the chain of such remembered pointers, to be checked when we hit the closing ket, in order to break infinite loops that match no characters.
When Pack_32 is not defined, we store 16 bits per 32-bit Long.
When UTF-8 is enabled, a positive value greater than 255 may be returned in chptr.
When a block is freed, the new free block is connected to its adjacent free blocks if possible.
When a database instance goes down, it can leave several bad connections that need to be flushed out before getting a good one.
When a name is one of a number of duplicates, a different opcode is used and it needs more memory.
When a newline is found, its length is returned.
When a pattern with bad UTF-8 encoding is compiled with NO_UTF_CHECK, it may compile without complaining, but may get into a loop here if the code pointer points to a bad value.
When a write operation exceeds that limit the content is written to a temporary file.
When actually compiling, we need to check whether this was a forward reference, and if so, adjust the offset.
When all uses of a phar have been concluded, this frees the manifest and the phar slot
When an allow string is passed in we keep track of the string in state 1 and when the tag is closed check it against the allow string to see if we should allow it.
When converting floating-point integers less than 1e16, we use floating-point arithmetic rather than resorting to multiple-precision integers.
When decompressed_size is 0, then the data is not compressed, and we have wasted 3 bytes
When deep is false Element nodes still require the attributes Following taken from libxml as xmlDocCopyNode doesnt do this
When deferred constraints are used the commit could fail, and a ROLLBACK implicitly ran.
When dftables is run, it creates these tables in the current locale.
When easy handle is cleaned up, if the handle was previously used by the curl_multi_api, the connection remains open un the curl multi handle is cleaned up.
When expat is done parsing, the tree can be walked, thus retrieving the values.
When finished, drop the ephemeral table.
When floating-point is omitted, double and int64 are the same thing
When gd 1.x was first created, floating point was to be avoided.
When in doubt return FALSE.
When later compared with the data, the sign extension must have happened.
When listen.users and listen.groups not configured, continue with standard right
When no string data is being returned, or no vector has been passed in which to put it, ensure that nmatch is zero.
When not in UTF-8 mode, load a single-byte character.
When not in UTF-8 mode, the length is always 1.
When open_basedir is NULL, always return 0.
When passing the backup file as isc_spb_dbname and the destination db as bpk_file, things work well.
When people have lines longer than 8K, we waste 1 byte per additional 8K or so.
When playing back page 1, restore the nReserve setting
When recursion is being used, local variables are allocated on the stack and get preserved during recursion in the normal way.
When reg can be unused.
When reg cannot be unused.
When running from an .apk, /dev/stderr and /dev/stdout redirect to /dev/null.
When sending the next command, which expects response we will read the unexpected data and error message will look weird.
When the assertion is part of a condition, we want to return immediately afterwards.
When the buffer fills up empty it and start over.
When the check function is first in the linked objects, it is ambiguous.
When the constructor gets called the object is already created by the engine, so we must only call 'additional' initializations.
When the first call occurs and the request is not set up, flush fails on FastCGI.
When the minimum is greater than 1, there will be earlier copies of the group, and so we still have to wrap the whole thing.
When the schema cookie changes, record the new cookie internally
When the stmt will again be executed then the result set will be cleaned, the bound variables will be separated before that.
When the user specifically sets a value for width or height
When there are any characters after the first NUL
When there is no more expansion invoke the standard globbing routine to glob the rest of the magic characters
When this file is linked to a DLL, it sets up a delay-load hook that intervenes when the DLL is trying to load 'node.exe' or 'iojs.exe' dynamically.
When this happened, the server abends when tsrm_tls_table is accessed since it is NULL.
When this is NULL, apache won't override the hard-coded default php.ini path setting.
When this is the case, the nmatch and pmatch arguments are ignored, and the only result is yes/no/error.
When this list is changed, the code at HEAP_RETURN below must be updated in sync.
When we already have some bits in our internal buffer concatenate both inputs first.
When we are actually compiling, find the bracket that is being referenced.
When we choose to "support" invalid salts, nevertheless disallow those containing characters that would violate the passwd file format.
When we come from outside, private_data_ptr contains the previous STR_PTR.
When we find the nearest color for a cell, its colormap index plus one is recorded in the cache for future use.
When we have a match and the offset vector is big enough to deal with any backreferences, captured substring offsets will already be set up.
When we hit a repeat whose minimum is zero, we may have to adjust these values to take the zero repeat into account.
When we reach the first optional character position, we can save stack by doing a tail recurse.
When working with UTF-8 we move back a number of characters, not bytes.
Where 0 stands for Sunday, 1 for Monday, etc.
Where clause to locate temp triggers
Where return pointer will be stored
Where the SELECT should store results
Where the new search starts
Where to coninue if an alternative is successfully matched.
Where to continue from afterwards
Where to get hi to lo bytes from
Where to get lo to hi bytes from
Where to jump back to
Where to jump to continue with the next IN case
Where to put an error message
Where to resume
Where to send the data
Where to start scanning
Where to write results
Where to write the extracted value
Where to write the frame
Where we start to search
WhereClause currently being scanned
WhereLoop describes the algorithm.
WhereLoop.u.btree.pIndex is valid
WhereLoop.u.vtab is valid
WhereTerms used
Whether machine is little endian
Whether this speeds things up or slows things down depends on the machine and the number being converted.
Whether to preserve keys while copying to the new array or not
Whether to quote additional delim char
Whether to return non-matching entries
Which column of pTab is desired
Which column to return
Which columns are used by this index.
Which cookie to read or write
Which coordinate to extract
Which db file is being initialized
Which entry in the FROM clause
Which is undesirable.
Which level of the tree we are on
Which metric to return
Which nested loop of the FROM we are coding
Which read lock is being held.
Which tables are currently available
While basic arithmetic operators always produce numeric string errors, bitwise operators don't produce errors if both operands are strings
While doing so, set nWork.
While it is not likely in practical situations to have strings longer than INT32_MAX, these are different types and need to be handled carefully.
While this is technically valid in an email address, these parts aren't actually part of the address itself.
While this sounds somewhat
White space is ignored
Whole-pattern recursion is coded as a recurse into group 0, so it won't be picked up here.
Width of the current field
Wildcard characters
Will become the return value of this function
Win XP specific, Unicode
Win XP specific, Unicode, not to be confused with SubjectDistance and SubjectLocation
Win32 Threads
Win32 last error
WinCE has no concept of a relative pathname, or so I am told.
WinRT has no way to convert a relative path to an absolute one.
Windows "version" 6.2 could be Windows 8/Windows Server 2012, but also Windows 8.1/Windows Server 2012 R2
Windows 8.1/Windows Server 2012 R2
Windows Big5
Windows Sjis
Windows Symbol
Windows Unicode
Windows and Netware use the internal mail
Windows build boxes and such things
Windows newline
Windows only implements a limited amount of fields from the rusage struct
Windows sys/types.h does not provide these
With IEEE arithmetic, ties are broken by the IEEE round-even rule.
With a style, so they won't overprint each other.
With blending turned off, the browser or viewer will composite against its preferred background, or, if it does not support an alpha channel, we will see the original colors for the pixels that ought to be transparent or semitransparent.
With the PECL OCI 1.3.x extensions, we release pconnections when oci_close takes the refcount to zero.
With the flag set, NULL and false should be returned, respectively.
With the main loop
With the other traits, we are more permissive.
Without a decimal point, PHP treats a number literal as an int.
Without such a constraint, the table cannot operate.
Without the funny casting for sizeof, a Windows compiler gave this error: "unary minus operator applied to unsigned type, result still unsigned".
Without truecolor this results in far too many color indexes.
Won't be implemented.
Won't happen, but set to NULL
Won't overflow
Word boundary assertions
Work around a bug in headers on Digital Unix.
Work around that by making the main executable pass the callback function pointer to us.
Work factor for compression algorithm
Work out number of chunks.
Work out start/end chunks
Works for both absoulte and relative addresses.
Works for compilers other than LLVM
Works for true color and palette based images
Works for true colour and palette based images
Worst case size.
Wrap around.
Wraps around at the maximum value of an ocaml int, which is something like 30 or 62 bits on 32 and 64-bit architectures respectively.
Write 'message' to syslog.
Write 'message' to the given file.
Write IM to OUTFILE as a JFIF-formatted JPEG image, using quality QUALITY.
Write JSON here
Write a frame or frames to the log.
Write a pointer to the page here
Write a single frame for this page to the log.
Write a temporary byte count which will be calculated as the decompositions are written out.
Write all frames into the log file exactly once
Write an Image separator
Write and decode big-endian 32-bit integer values
Write any data remaining in the buffer
Write any error message here
Write back is not used.
Write cell size here
Write content into this buffer
Write current value here
Write error here if one occurs
Write error message here
Write error messages here
Write head of the output list here
Write high-water mark here
Write it out
Write it out to the database.
Write it to the segdir table.
Write minimum integer primary key here
Write new cell into this node
Write new cursor here
Write new file
Write new index here
Write number of errors seen to this variable
Write out a word to the I/O context pointer
Write out extension for transparent colour index, if necessary.
Write out the Background colour
Write out the Global Colour Map
Write out the byte count to maintain header size.
Write out the initial code size
Write out the page data.
Write out the screen width and height
Write out whether or not the image is interlaced
Write output here
Write result boolean here
Write result here
Write result into this Mem object
Write results here
Write search results here
Write session data.
Write tail of the output list here
Write the BLOB here
Write the GIF file terminator
Write the Image header
Write the Magic header
Write the MergeEngine here
Write the SQLite file handle here
Write the averages record
Write the byte count.
Write the bytes into this buffer
Write the case mapping tables.
Write the combining class ranges out.
Write the comparison result here
Write the contents of the page out to the database file.
Write the current in-memory list to a PMA.
Write the database source cursor number here
Write the decompositions themselves.
Write the extra pages and truncate the database file as required
Write the file descriptor here
Write the first index cursor number here
Write the folded case of the last character read to the output
Write the hash value here
Write the header.
Write the index of a new slot here
Write the integer values
Write the list of decomp nodes.
Write the list of kdecomp nodes.
Write the lower case table.
Write the master journal data to the end of the journal file.
Write the master journal name into the journal file.
Write the nRec value into the journal file header.
Write the new IncrMerger here
Write the new PNG.
Write the new column list here
Write the new expression node here
Write the new value here
Write the next key to the output.
Write the node here
Write the node-id here
Write the number of available bytes here
Write the number of columns here
Write the number of columns of result here
Write the number of rows in the result here
Write the output into this preallocated buffer
Write the page data
Write the page out to disk
Write the page pointer here
Write the path here
Write the payload into the local Cell and any extra into overflow pages
Write the property list counts.
Write the property lists.
Write the record
Write the referenced table column number here
Write the referenced table cursor number here
Write the result here
Write the result table here
Write the resulting vtab structure here
Write the revised row estimate here
Write the rowid.
Write the sentinel index as the last decomp node.
Write the size of the Cell here
Write the socket ACL
Write the sorted results here
Write the specified cookie value
Write the standard header.
Write the term for this entry to disk.
Write the title case table.
Write the unqualified object name here
Write the upper and lower case table sizes.
Write the upper case table.
Write this value to the list
Write to both stderr and logcat.
Write to the last byte of each newly allocated or extended page
Write to the unixFile structure here
Write transactions are not possible on a read-only database
Write up to this many output leaves
Write-ahead log connection
Writer context
Writer object
Writers of suspendable-input applications must note that skip_input_data is not granted the right to give a suspension return.
Writes a buffer directly to a stream, using multiple of the chunk size
Writes are in the reverse order.
Writes the data in one of the slots of the hashtable.
Writing separate code for cased/caseless versions makes it go faster, as does using an autoincrement and backing off on a match.
Written 2004, Phil Knirsch.
Written/Modified 1999, Philip Warner.
Wrong number of arguments means "no match"
X 0201 kana
X 0201 latin
X 0208 : ISO-2022-JP-2004
X 0208 first char
X 0212 first char
X 0213 plane 1
X 0213 plane 1 first char
X 0213 plane 2
X 0213 plane 2 first char
X 0213 plane 2 second char : EUC-JP-2004, ISO-2022-JP-2004
X becomes S
X costs more than Y
X format has only two instructions.
X is not a subset of Y
X3.64/ECMA-43 "next line" character
X: X, etc to allow for multiple instances
XAP: Extensible Authoring Publishing, obsoleted by XMP: Extensible Metadata Platform
XCLASS is used for classes that cannot be represented just by a bit map.
XISTSAVEPOINTERSECTRIGGEREFERENCESCONSTRAINTOFFSETEMPORARY
XML_XINCLUDE_END node will be a sibling of XML_XINCLUDE_START
XML_XINCLUDE_START and XML_XINCLUDE_END nodes need to be removed as these are added via xmlXIncludeProcess to mark beginning and ending of xincluded document but are not wanted in resulting document - must be done even if err as it could fail after having processed some xincludes
XXX - The 16-bit string compare probably needs to be done differently, especially if the flags are to be supported.
XXX - optimize
XXX - the actual Single UNIX Specification says that "L" means "long", as in the C data type, but we treat it as meaning "4-byte integer".
XXX - the actual Single UNIX Specification says that "long" means "long", as in the C data type, but we treat it as meaning "4-byte integer".
XXX - these two should not need
XXX 5.14 at least introdced 100 ns intervals, this is to do
XXX FIXME we should really check out SQLSTATE with SQLError in case rc is SQL_SUCCESS_WITH_INFO here.
XXX Free Connection
XXX Stupid subtraction for the Cray.
XXX Use flags
XXX add LFCR case if it's gonna be needed
XXX all the crypt related APIs work with int for string length.
XXX and one more X - the above comment is true if no manifest is used for two cases: - if the PHP build doesn't use the correct manifest - if PHP DLL loaded under some binary that doesn't use the correct manifest  So keep the handling here as is for now, even if we know 6.2 is win8 and nothing else, and think about an improvement.
XXX avoid warning in debug mode
XXX check for already bound parameters
XXX chunk size itself is of size_t, that might be ok or not for a particular case
XXX completely not sure it is done right here
XXX disabling default magic loading so the compiled in data is used
XXX error checks
XXX if that's a real multibyte string, olestring is obviously allocated excessively.
XXX passing NULL means the default timer queue provided by the system is used
XXX possible buffer overflow if VCWD_REALPATH does not know size of resolved_path
XXX raise exception
XXX set signaled flag to the caller thread, question is - whether it's needed
XXX should be INT_MAX and fetched by pieces
XXX should go in the loop if size exceeds UINT_MAX
XXX this doesn't look right.
XXX this functionality is excluded in php, enable it in apprentice.c:340
XXX this is a complete mess here with FILE/fd/SOCKET, we should let only one to survive probably.
XXX this might be not the end, restart handling with REPARSE_GUID_DATA_BUFFER should be implemented.
XXX this might need an additional fix so it uses size_t, whereby unsigned is quite big so leaving as is for now
XXX this probably can be improved with some number of retries
XXX this should fit "most" NLS date-formats and Numbers
XXX this will fail again if encoding_converter returns on error something different than SIZE_MAX
XXX this will need to change later when threaded fastcgi is implemented.
XXX value should be parsed in the loop to exhaust size_t
XXX we assume that zend-zval len has 4 bytes
XXX: Approx
XXX: Crash avoidance.
XXX: Should be fine to always read chunk_size
XXX: This will crash, because we will null also the methods.
XXX: const castaway, via strchr
XXX: should do something better here
XXX: shouldn't this be the parent not the 'prev'
XXX: the constant "20" was determined purely on the heuristics.
XXX: this is horrible memory-usage-wise, but we only expect to do this on small pieces of form data.
XXX: this needs to be optimized to work with blocks of 'safe' chars
Xfer function arguments to here
Xps is POSIX space, but from 8.34
Xsp is Perl space, but from 8.34, Perl
Y format has three instructions.
Y if followed by a vowel
YYCHAR is either YYEMPTY or YYEOF or a valid lookahead symbol.
YYERROR is fine as it does not invoke this function.
YYERRORSYMBOL is not defined
YYERROR_VERBOSE
YYFINAL -- State number of the termination state.
YYINITDEPTH -- initial size of the parser's stacks.
YYLAST -- Last index in YYTABLE.
YYLEX -- calling `yylex' with the right arguments.
YYNNTS -- Number of nonterminals.
YYNOERRORRECOVERY
YYNRULES -- Number of rules.
YYNRULES -- Number of states.
YYNSTATES -- Number of states.
YYNTOKENS -- Number of terminals.
YYRHS -- A `-1'-separated list of the rules' RHS.
YYSTR is taken from yytname.
Year, month, and day
Yes, there is a color map
Yet, the previous php_rand only returns 31 at most.
Yield from root references
You MUST NOT use this function for any other weird games, or call it at any other time after the object is constructed.
You are always considered to have a copy of TIFF6.0 and EXIF2.10 standard.
You are responsible for making sure that it is not linked into the TSRM hash, and not marked as the current interpreter
You can not trust the state of target if this function returns failure.
You can only stretch if the dimension has not already been defined previously.
You can pass a non-zero value as second argument to force the embedded PHP engine to re-initialise.
You can specify a range like 'a..z', it needs to be incrementing.
You can use php_stream_memory_open to create a readonly stream from an existing memory buffer.
You cannot change create_object
You cannot change from static to non static and vice versa.
You never want to go smaller than padding
You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License along with this program.
You will notice that the lengths alternate between 30 and 31 days, except for three anomalies: both July and August have 31 days, both December and January have 31, and February is less than 30.
Z Zlib error
Z will strip everything after the first null character
ZEND_ADD_CHAR
ZEND_ADD_STRING
ZEND_CASE is an exception, that keeps operand unchanged, and allows its reuse.
ZEND_CLASS_DTOR may be used by standard PHP compiler
ZEND_FAST_CALL can not share temporary var with others since the fast_var could also be set by ZEND_HANDLE_EXCEPTION which could be ahead of it
ZEND_OVERLOADED_FUNCTION
ZEND_SIGNALS
Zend Engine
Zend-optimized Extended functions
Zenkaku hirangana to Zenkaku katakana
Zenkaku hirangana to hankaku kana
Zenkaku kana to hankaku kana
Zenkaku katakana to Zenkaku hirangana
Zenkaku katakana to hankaku kana
Zero disables auto-merge altogether.
Zero extended number.
Zero extra digits made by scale_min.
Zero from this point onwards on cursor reset
Zero if no overflow
Zero is returned when the input date is detected as invalid or out of the supported range.
Zero is returned when the input date is detected as invalid.
Zero is the default.
Zero means the default is an error.
Zero or more PragFlag_XXX values
Zero or more repeats of character types set the bits and then try again.
Zero out context
Zero potentially sensitive variables
Zero tells OP_Found to use a composite key
Zero terminated and dequoted
Zero the contents of pRoot.
Zero the histogram or inverse color map
Zero the histogram or inverse color map, if necessary
Zero the key
Zero the newly allocated slots
Zero the structure before returning.
Zero values greater than this
Zero width assertions.
Zero-length table names are allowed
Zeroize sensitive information.
Zip64 mismatch between preliminary file header written before data and final file header written afterwards
_FTS3_HASH_H_
_FTS3_TOKENIZER_H_
_OS_SETUP_H_
_SC_CLK_TCK
_SHM_UNLCK, _SHM_RDLCK, or _SHM_WRLCK
_SQLITE3EXT_H_
_SQLITE3RBU_H
_SQLITE3_H_
_SQLITEINT_H_
_SQLITE_HASH_H_
_SQLITE_OS_H_
__X accessors explanation: if we have __get and property that is not part of the properties array is requested, we call __get handler.
__cplusplus
__function_entries_here__
__function_stubs_here__
__get handler is called with one argument: property name it should return whether the call was successful or not
__header_here__
__isset handler is called with one argument: property name it should return whether the property is set or not
__set handler is called with two arguments: property name value to be set it should return whether the call was successful or not
__unset handler is called with one argument: property name
_bc_rm_leading_zeros just moves the data "value" pointer to the correct place and adjusts the length.
_xmlreader_get_valid_file_path and _xmlreader_get_relaxNG should be made a common function in libxml extension as code is common to a few xml extensions
_xmlwriter_get_valid_file_path should be made a common function in libxml extension as code is common to a few xml extensions
_zip_checkcons: Checks the consistency of the central directory by comparing central directory entries with local headers and checking for plausible file and header offsets.
_zip_dirent_write Writes zip directory entry.
_zip_headercomp: compares a central directory entry and a local file header Return 0 if they are consistent, -1 if not.
_zip_readcdir: tries to find a valid end-of-central-directory at the beginning of buf, and then the corresponding central directory entries.
`count` is actually the length of the payload data.
`safe' read for sockets and pipes.
`safe' write for sockets and pipes.
`yyvs': related to semantic values.
a DBA handler must have specific routines
a GNU extension
a SET TRANSACTION statement should be executed with a NULL trans handle
a bit of a hack this, but it's needed for COM array access.
a certificate to use for authentication
a character width specification, to be more consistent with
a chunk of whitespaces
a column type code
a file or directory exists in a sub-directory of this path
a little bit of black magic here: we're creating a new array and swapping it for the zval that's already stored in the hash under the name we want.
a number that is not Phar::GZ or Phar::BZ2
a numbered reference must not be zero
a period parameter
a pointer to a SrcList
a pointer to a Token structure
a single certificate
a space or some other separator character, we simply skip over
a true global for initialization
a will not strip any trailing whitespace or null padding
a xor reg, reg operation would overwrite the flags.
aCell array
aDistance array
aOrder array
aSpare array
abNotindexed
above funcs modify queue
absolute file uris - libxml only supports localhost or empty host
absolute index to relative offset
abstract name
accelerated scripts
accept both formats
accept string type since Oid is unsigned int
accept string type since Oid type is unsigned int
accepts the data connection, returns updated data buffer
access allowed
access mode
access rights defaults to other
access.log, access.format
accommodate a string that needs to be fully quoted bind placeholders are at least 2 characters, so the accommodate their own "'s
accommodate valid FQDN entries ending in "."
according to error handling mode, suppress error, throw exception or show it
according to exif2.1, the thumbnail is not supposed to be greater than 64K
accumulated errors
acquire usage lock
activate the converter
actor, used in conjunction with must understand.
actual extraction done later
actual string length in ps_buffer
actually execute the regular expression
actually this should be return by ref but atm cannot be
actually used only by LOAD DATA.
actually, only want this if static is defined as "" -- this is for usg, in which emacs must undefine static in order to make unexec workable
actually, ucal_setDateTime cannot fail
add " E" for escaping slashes
add 1 for trailing slash
add 1 to the number b.
add a byte for minus sign
add a database handle to the TEB with the most recently specified set of modifiers
add a reference for the caller
add a reference for the hash
add a reference for the hash table
add ability to load xpm files to gd, requires the xpm library.
add another "key" for the same bucket
add back the caller
add character
add character and check
add custom envelope headers
add decimal point
add each central directory item to the manifest
add final zero blocks
add header to collection
add header to table
add it to the array
add it to the hash
add it to the list
add method call/response to body element
add new watchpoints if necessary
add one for NULL
add one for string terminator
add roots into list to free
add second quote
add serialized data to method call/response.
add shutdown function, removing the old one if it exists
add signature for executable tars or tars explicitly set with setSignatureAlgorithm
add stock items
add the FD if not already in
add the embedded line end to the field
add the event to epoll internal queue
add the event to port
add the event to the internal queue
add the extension if it is set in ini
add the key elements
add the last one to the list
add the mappings
add the second quote
add the various elements to the array
add these numbers, I'll let the C compiler do it for me.
add to the appropriate hash
add to the manifest, and then store the pointer to the new guy in entry
add types for this signature
add user-supplied index
add value elements
add variable to symbol table
add.c: bcmath library file.
add_assoc_resource automatically creates a new zval to wrap the "resource" represented by the current pz_ch
add_data writes dirent
add_property_zval increments the refcount which is unwanted here
added by gerrit thomson to fix ldap_add using ldap_mod_add
added to fix use of ldap_modify_add for doing an ldap_add, gerrit thomson.
added: support for xml escaping
additional filters to go here
additional functions for attribute based modifications, Gerrit Thomson
additional term is there to amortize the cost of compaction
address of first matching command
address of start of instruction
address of the table
adjust early binding list
adjust exponent
adjust exponent by d, and update sign
adjust exponent for shifting decimal point
adjust how many args we have left and restart loop
adjust jump targets
adjust so point is on the right boundary
adjust the sign of significand
adjust the value
adjust timeout for next attempt
advance a whole UTF-8
advance errorptr to current column
advance to first character of hostname
after T_HALT_COMPILER collect the next three non-dropped tokens
after argnum comes modifiers
after encoded block
after excluding deleted files, calculate manifest size in bytes and number of entries
after match is SEPARATOR
after modifiers comes width
after our pointer arithmetic jump back to the first element
after this call, bucket is owned by the brigade
after this point, we can't free env without breaking the environment
after width and argnum comes precision
ah illegal: char after COM section not 0xFF
alert if user is not set only if we are not root
aliases for downwards compatibility
aliases from array.c
align to SIMPLESTRING_INCR increments
all IS_TMP_VAR and IS_VAR variable numbers have to be adjusted
all charsets are compiled in
all data in a persistent bucket must also be persistent
all elemens are free
all negative values become -1.
all other styles use the locking context to store the db file path
all other types have corresponding php types
all persistent connactions are in use, fallback to non-persistent connection creation
all remaining bits on the current unsigned char are set to zero.
alloc and clear active_pollfds
alloc and clear pollfds
alloc the data structure
alloc the ftp structure
alloc'ed ai free'd below.
allocate a buffer and convert to UTF8
allocate a buffer for reading chunks
allocate a minimal descriptor area
allocate a new stream for a particular ops
allocate a smaller buffer to keep around for smaller "long" columns
allocate an array for return
allocate an environment
allocate and prepare query
allocate and prepare statement
allocate array of modifications
allocate buffer for double
allocate buffer for query with expanded binds, ptr is our writing pointer
allocate buffer for reading data
allocate describe handle
allocate enough memory
allocate fds
allocate memory and copy
allocate memory and copy string
allocate output buffer
allocate server data.
allocate space for the PNG image data
allocate space for the values as part of this modification
allocate sqlda and output buffers
allocate storage for the column
allocate storage for the parameter, keyed by its "canonical" name
allocate the data struct
allocate the event resource
allocate the field for the result
allocate the input descriptors
allocate the modification struct
allocate the parameter
allocate the statement
allocate the structure
allocate/fill the buffer
allocated even if there is no FROM clause
allocated with pestrdup
allocates a new interpreter context
allocates a new thread-safe-resource id
allocating function to make programming errors due to uninitialized fields less likely
allow as the extension has been found
allow conditional breakpoints and initialization to access the vm uninterrupted
allow double quoted indentifiers
allow duplicate file names, because the file will be removed directly afterwards
allow enclosed elements
allow extension to proclaim compatibility with any Zend version
allow extra chars in the format
allow faster access by updating key read into next
allow for arrays with one element, no allowance for arrays with none but probably not required, gerrit thomson.
allow for thousand separators
allow multiple '/' for readability
allow optional initial 0x or 0X
allow output
allow readable non-descriptor based streams to participate in stream_select.
allow room for NUL terminator
allow room for a NUL.
allow self-signed certs
allow string to handle large OID value correctly
allow this to be set as parameter
allow to run as root
allow_string - is_a default is no, is_subclass_of is yes.
allowed by default
allowed node types in look-behind
alnum - word without underscore
alpha 0 is opacity, so be sure to invert at the end
already an empty val.
already closed
already connected, we should close the connection
already did
already in progress - just ignore duplicate signal
already newly created, truncate
already processed
already read 0xff in filetype detection
already stored
also used as column name list in a VIEW
always above
always append newline and null terminate
always below
always copy the var, because we do many conversions
always fail if not implemented
always free the CV's, in the symtable are only not-free'd IS_INDIRECT's
always propagate the error code back up to the dbh, so that we can catch the error information when execute is called via query.
always succeeds
amai: Darrel Hankerson did the changes described here.
amalgamator: dontcache
amalgamator: keep
amd64 rex extension byte
amount of allocated memory for data
amount of valid data
an impossible branch was found if:
an instruction
analyze mime type
anchor optimize: resume search range
and 32 bit regs EAX,EBX,ECX,...
and 6 stands for Saturday.
and B by this much
and a minus sign, if needed
and a resource for the private key
and any continuations that match
and baskslash itself
and build the query
and choose the highest possible branch in the branch containing only branches lower than idx
and exit because they do not present in at least one of
and fetch it now
and have been modified to work with PHP.
and how many extracts were taken
and increment it so it becomes non-zero .
and increment the usage count.
and instruct fetch to fetch waiting piece into our buffer
and it might not be supposed to work at all
and make it a warning in the exif_process_IFD_TAG which is called
and no error propagated to row below yet
and now call the implementing handlers
and others.
and our own private error handle
and recompute its volume and population
and remove it
and replace it with persistent one
and return an error if we've taken too long.
and send 1 for iteration count
and the Swift project authors Licensed under Apache License v2.0 with Runtime Library Exception
and the parameters, if any
and then skip on to the
and update the cache
anonymous open of newsgroup
another quickie macro to make defining similar functions easier
another server.
any old docroot will do
any other problem is a fatal error
anychar '.'
anychar anytime
anychar repeat
anything else isn't interesting
anything other than 0 is considered to be a valid timestamp
apparently some systems don't have this one
apparently, GetBindOptions will only ever return a regular BIND_OPTS structure.
append NULL element
append a '1'-bit:
append bit length of hashed data:
append bytes to the end of a dynamic pointer
append input
append mini-header
append signature
append the "-conch" suffix to the file
append the calling scripts' current working directory as a fall back case
append to linked list
apple gaiji area 0x8540 - 0x886d
apply aliases which are qualified with a class name, there should not be any ambiguity
apply aliases which have not alias name, just setting visibility
apply modification if it's not the first iteration
apply strip_high and strip_low filters
apply the GMT offset
apply the Miyaguchi-Preneel compression function:
apply the r-th round transformation:
apply values from the dn hash
apprentice - make one pass through /etc/magic, learning its secrets.
archive alias found
are lower case letter, but can't convert.
arg1 goes to TMP_REG1 or src reg arg2 goes to TMP_REG2, imm or src reg TMP_REG3 can be used for caching result goes to TMP_REG2, so put result can use TMP_REG1 and TMP_REG3.
arg1 goes to TMP_REG1 or src reg.
arg2 goes to TMP_REG2, imm or src reg.
arg3 is possible option offset name
argument is a UID
argument is a UID sequence
argument not null
arguments after the file are considered script args
arguments type
arithmetic table
arr must be an array at this point
array again
array for GETALL, SETALL
array of possible signatures.
array to check in
array's are _very_ special in soap.
array_udiff
arrival date
as a modified form of the old Roman republican calendar which was based on lunar cycles.
as appropriate.
as error, use the values for now...
as far as streams are concerned, we are now at the start of the stream
as is the end, so the line misses the window
as is the end, so the line never cuts the window
as it is not really public, duplicate declaration here to avoid pointless warnings
as long as we don't support non-seekable output, clear data descriptor bit
as soon as someone touches the stdio layer, buffering may ensue, so we need to stop using the fd directly in that case
as the original contributor of this module by leaving this note intact in the source code.
ask for a passive connection if we need one
ask streams to give us a buffer of an appropriate size
ask the driver to perform any normalization it needs on the parameter name.
ask the event module to add the fd from its own queue
ask the event module to remove the fd from its own queue
assume "index.php" is starting point
assume all is good
assume all params have been bound
assume it works if the file doesn't exist yet
assume ping is successful
assume positive
assume success, we would have failed before
assume tar format, PharData can specify other
assume tar-based phar
assume that create isn't overwritten, so when clone depends on the overwritten one then it must itself be overwritten
assume that it might be a progid instead
assume the type gid_t is the same as uid_t:
assume zip-based phar
assumes there are no single-char entities
assuming no autoloader call is necessary, class should have been loaded if it's in backtrace ...
assuming that no internal functions will silently swallow exceptions ...
async message function
at an instant given in d, number of days since
at least one 0xff is needed before marker code
at this point path_translated will be set if: 1.
attach to the service manager
attempt reconnect if the first Post fail
attempt to bind
attempt to connect with mail host
attempt to get the lock
attempt to handle extremely small/large numbers better
attempt to hide zero division from gcc
attempt to reduce exponent
attempt to set security impersonation for fastcgi will only happen on NT based OS, others will ignore it.
attributeDecl
attributes don't have attributes
auth header if it was specified
auth_plugin_data is split into two parts
authentication error
authentication-required
auto compile
auto detect
auto globals hash keys and names
auto-convert to phar://
auto-detect line endings, looks like unix-lineendings, not to spec, but it is seem in the wild, a lot
auto-detect soft line breaks, found mac line break
auto-detect soft line breaks, found network line break
auto-generated portions of this file are also subject to the php license
autodetected values should be removed if these vars specified in config
autoload_extensions is not initialized, set to defaults
automagically determine output serialization type from request type
automatic allocateable buffer for additional header
automatically defined by SQLITE_ENABLE_FTS4
autoseek for resuming
available free spot.
average number of chunks allocated per request
average string length
avoid BC break, if functions list is empty, will return an empty array
avoid buffering issues while reading header
avoid division by zero
avoid driver auto-translation: we'll do it ourselves
avoid empty string
avoid infinity recursion, by taking handler from nested closure
avoid libc5 readdir problems
avoid many reallocs by allocating a good sized chunk to begin with, if we can.
avoid problems if someone mis-uses the stream
avoid reference counting in debug mode, thus do it manually
avoided by normal-POP
bLocaltimeFault
back to ascii
back to blocking mode
back to latin
backtrack one byte, the 0x0 at the end of the scramble in 5.1 and previous
backup current state
backup globals when cleaning
backup options
backup the fcall info and cache
backup things and jump back
backward search
bad error in module startup - no way we can live with this
bad new size
bad signature
bare string - nothing to do
base register must be R0
base register must be R1
baseline strength
be compliant with libmysql - NULL will turn
be ignored on reading because it is being generated anyways.
be like libmysql
be sure calculation temps are big enough
be sure we didn't leave cache locked
because of COM_SLEEP
become process group leader
before beginning of unix epoch or behind end of unix epoch
before unloading, display all remaining bad function in the module
begin element
begin encoding
begin phpdbg options
beginning of struct, see main/streams/plain_wrapper.c line 111
beginning-of-error-codes
below the horizon, and also selects whether this altitude should
between A4 and 0xBE
between prefix and suffix
beyond end of buffer
big immediate
binary file LOB
binary operation with constant operands
binary test if pattern is not text
binary-safe version
bind handle
bind support
bind the classname to the actual class
bind to a local address
bind/listen
bits 0-2 of SIB
bits 3-5 of SIB
bits 3-5 of mod r/m field
bits 6-7 of SIB
bits 6-7 of mod r/m field
bits are left-justified on b.
bits of precision in B/R histogram
bits of precision in G histogram
bits of precision in R/B histogram
bizarre LEAVE
black magic lies herein.
blank - a GNU extension
blob id only
block compression parameters -- after all codes are used up, and compression rate changes, start over.
block interruptions
blocks are atomic
body transfar encoding
bold on/off has zero print width so line count is unchanged
bom or wchar detection is prior to 'script_encoding' option
both goto the same one - it's JMP
both numeric
both script and internal encodings are incompatible w/ flex
both strings
both values are integers overflown to the same side, and the double comparison may have resulted in crucial accuracy lost
bottom edge
bottom stack
boundary case -- decrement exponent
boundary case -- increment exponent
boundary info
bounded by numentries, so no overflow
bounds check
brackets nesting level
break case NT_QTFR:
break for leave
break intentionally missing
break intentionally missing again
break intentionally not missing
break intentionally omitted
break is left intentionally
break is missing _intentionally_
break is missing intentionally
break is omitted intentionally
break missing intentionally
break missing intentionally here too
break omitted intentionally
break possible cycles
brig_in will always be empty here, as the filter MUST attach any un-consumed buckets to its own brigade
brig_out becomes brig_in.
bring php repository up to date with xmlrpc-epi version 0.51  Revision 1.22  2002/03/09 23:15:44  danda add fault interrogation funcs  Revision 1.21  2002/03/09 22:27:41  danda win32 build patches contributed by Jeff Lawson  Revision 1.20  2002/02/13 20:58:50  danda patch to make source more windows friendly, contributed by Jeff Lawson  Revision 1.19  2001/10/12 23:25:54  danda default to writing xmlrpc  Revision 1.18  2001/09/29 21:58:05  danda adding cvs log to history section  10/15/2000 -- danda -- adding robodoc documentation 08/2000 -- danda -- PHP C extension that uses XMLRPC 08/2000 -- danda -- support for two vocabularies: danda-rpc and xml-rpc 09/1999 -- danda -- Initial API, before I even knew of standard XMLRPC vocab.
bring php repository up to date with xmlrpc-epi version 0.51  Revision 1.4  2002/02/13 20:58:50  danda patch to make source more windows friendly, contributed by Jeff Lawson  Revision 1.3  2001/09/29 21:58:05  danda adding cvs log to history section  10/15/2000 -- danda -- adding robodoc documentation PORTABILITY Coded on RedHat Linux 6.2.
bring php repository up to date with xmlrpc-epi version 0.51  Revision 1.9  2001/09/29 21:58:05  danda adding cvs log to history section  4/10/2001 -- danda -- initial introspection support TODO NOTES
bring php repository up to date with xmlrpc-epi version 0.51  Revision 1.9  2002/07/03 20:54:30  danda root element should not have a parent.
bring the palette colors in im2 to be closer to im1
browser data defined in activation phase, lazily loaded in get_browser.
browser data defined in startup phase, eagerly loaded in MINIT
btreeParseCell method
buf may be NULL, if flags are set to indicate a flush.
buffer for IPC_INFO
buffer for IPC_STAT, IPC_SET
buffer in which to construct conch name
buffer is not long enough to hold full output, double it
buffer isn't completely full, fail
buffer overflow
buffer size
buffer to store 'indexes' which will be passed to 'qsort'
buffer to store sort keys
buffer to transmit
buffered result sets don't have a connection
buffering converter
buffering is off by default
buffering wasn't enabled, there is nothing to flush
bug for bug compatible with Unix
build an array of handles for non-sockets
build message
build properties hash table
build soundex string
build the array of objects
build the output buffer
build up a the new array of objects
build up the params
build up the reverse mapping
build with dtrace support
bump the pointer
but it's a shadow of private
but not needed for now
but that could cause some E_NOTICE and also damn long lines.
but this case seems very unlikely.
but we are not supposed to change this
but we do need to know the file size.
but we now allow attributes on nodes with no value...
but we only want the offset.
but, it's not error
but, unknown error code
by default, use the existing format
by number tokens inserted
by subtracting or adding even multiples of 360.0 until the
by the way: some of those companies changed their code now...
by-ref constraints on arguments are invariant
by-ref constraints on return values are covariant
byte length
bytecnt checks are to be kept for PHP, see cve-2014-3538.
bytes allocated for WhereInfo struct
byteswap a single magic entry
c-level get_iterator cannot be changed
cURL destructors should be invoked only by last curl handle
cURL info constants
cache full - replace least-recently-used
cache lookup for absolute path
cache since only current is always required
cache still growing - add new elem
cache the mapping
cache where we started so we can parse after validating
cached element
cainfo holds information about trusted CAs
calc checksum
calc offset from ku
calculate and check number of parameters
calculate elements count
calculate hash
calculate how long we need to wait in milliseconds
calculate how many required args are at the end of the specifier list
calculate length after match
calculate strlen, which can be no longer than 100
calculate the free space in the buffer
calculate the length of the return buffer
calculate the possible padding factor due to quoting
calculate the slope of the line
calculating length is more complicated here.
call a function to parse all the text, so that we can use the same function no matter where the headers are from
call a function to parse all the text, so that we can use the same function to parse text from other sources
call ap_set_content_type only once, else each time we call it, configured output filters for that content type will be added
call dtor on the old element as in spl_ptr_llist_pop
call failed, pass internal buffer along
call func with error notice
call it's dir_open method - set up params first
call it's stat_url method - set up params first
call it's stream_open method - set up params first
call me pedantic
call php's original import as a catch-all
call request shutdown for all modules
call standard dtor
call the callback provided by the user
call the mkdir method
call the rename method
call the rmdir method
call the unlink method
call to the handler for mbstring.language is done after mbstring.internal_encoding is handled.
call_method
callback can use this, if desired
callback for documentation generation should it be requested
callback to used to report database server info
callback...
called by PDO to clean up a statement handle
called by PDO to close a db handle
called by PDO to commit a transaction
called by PDO to execute a prepared query
called by PDO to execute a statement that doesn't produce a result set
called by PDO to fetch the next row from a statement
called by PDO to get a driver-specific dbh attribute
called by PDO to prepare an SQL query
called by PDO to retrieve driver-specific information about an error that has occurred
called by PDO to retrieve information about the fields being returned
called by PDO to rollback a transaction
called by PDO to set a driver-specific dbh attribute
called by PDO to start a transaction
called by the C server when it first receives an introspection request.
called by the PDO SQL parser to add quotes to values that are copied into SQL
called by xmlrpc C engine as method handler for all registered methods.
called by zip_discard to avoid operating on file from closed archive
called when SUPPORT_UTF is not defined.
called when server is being destructed.
callee - removing ourselves
caller is responsible for cleanup.
caller will handle out of memory
calling fclose on an fopencookied stream will ultimately call this very same function.
caml_alloc_string might trigger the GC, when that happens, the GC needs to scan the stack to find the OCaml roots.
can be done before mapping, they're invariant
can be splitted.
can happen when calling eval from a custom sapi
can jump an entire leap year period quickly
can pass to optimization
can pass to part 2
can't copy a meta file
can't handle paths that contain nul bytes
can't kill it
can't nuke structs until done with palette
can't read low
can't read nothing or invalid format
can't read nothing.
can't use hash table
cancel server side resources for the statement if we didn't fetch it all
cannot be null.
cannot end in : without previous :
cannot put the data - skip
canonicalize lang_tag
canonicalize loc_range
carriage returns
case 0x00: ASCII
case 0x10: KSC5601
case 1 trumps case 3
case IS_LONG:
case IS_TRUE
case NORMALIZER_NONE: not allowed - doesn't make sense
case PHP_ICONV_ENC_SCHEME_BASE64:
case PHP_ICONV_ENC_SCHEME_QPRINT:
case PragTyp_BUSY_TIMEOUT
case TAG_FMT_BYTE: case TAG_FMT_SBYTE:
case ZEND_ASSIGN_BW_XOR: case ZEND_ASSIGN_CONCAT:
case ZEND_BW_XOR:
case ZEND_FETCH_CLASS_CONSTANT:
case ZEND_INIT_NS_FCALL_BY_NAME:
case_exprlist
case_operand
cast count to signed value to avoid possibly negative n being cast to unsigned value
cast of constant operand
cast to avoid gcc-warning
cast to size_t OK as the quantity is always non-negative
cast_object
category zero
caution: the Hebrew format produces non unique result.
cdb 0.75's default for PROTOless systems
cdb doesn't support delete
cdb/cdb_make and ini are no option here
cdb_free does not close associated file
cdb_make dosn't know replace
cdir spans past EOCD record
cellSizePtr method
centralised open stream for builtin
certain schemas like mailto: and zlib: may not have any / after them this check ensures we support those.
certainely useless but proper
chPtr is the int for the result
change T only if we have _EX opcode there
change class
change directories
change passed value type to string
change sapi name
change status
char did not match
char-class expanded multi-char only compare with string folded at match time.
character LOB
character appears in ISO-8859 text
character appears in plain ASCII text
character encoded in 1 code unit
character never appears in text
character-set, transfer-encoding
charset convert filter
charset is indifferent, used cs_8859_1 for efficiency
charset not used
charset shouldn't matter, use ISO-8859-1 for performance
chartable partial dup
check again, to ensure that the cache wasn't already cleaned by another process
check backslashes
check blacklist right after ensuring that file was opened
check bounds
check cache
check empty loop.
check end position
check flag to see if do_mod was called to perform full add , gerrit thomson
check for ".phar" in extension
check for 1st char of combining characters
check for 2nd char of combining characters
check for NULL buffer in case of memory error in xmlEncodeEntitiesReentrant
check for NULL parameters
check for __COMPILER_HALT_OFFSET__
check for a cached persistent socket
check for a dotted-IP address string
check for an octal
check for any file with .ini extension
check for arg spec
check for bundled IPv4
check for contiguous argv strings
check for contiguous environ strings following argv
check for copy on write
check for copy-on-write
check for curl-wrappers that provide headers via a special "headers" element
check for data descriptor
check for end-of-central-dir magic
check for error set during request parsing / generation
check for existing interned string
check for fault, in which case, there is no intermediate element
check for fault, which is a rather special case.
check for https://...:443/
check for invalid chars inside login/pass
check for invalid dates
check for invalid redirection URLs
check for its validity, if its valid pass it unchanged
check for japanese chars in BMP
check for jumps into the middle of try block
check for limits of field_ind if the field parameter was an int
check for login and password
check for mounted directories
check for overflow by comparing sign bits
check for port
check for repeated errors to be ignored
check for soft line break according to RFC 2045
check for sortKeyBuf overflow, increasing its size of the buffer if needed
check for the old child and whether the new child is already a child
check for the same interned string
check for uncaught exceptions
check for url like http:// or phar://
check for use of reserved method IDs
check for vality of named entity
check force_cgi after startup, so we have proper output
check handles
check if a NULL should be inserted
check if array
check if bound parameter is already available
check if callback is called from include_once or it's a main request
check if caller says we must understand something in a header.
check if comparison function is valid
check if connection has timed out
check if declare failed
check if entity is valid
check if hash is modified during iteration
check if long can be safely casted to int
check if original array has numeric keys
check if prefix
check if request_method has been sent.
check if result is null.
check if shm is already initialized
check if size_t can be safely casted to int
check if size_t can be safely casted to unsigned int
check if some watchpoint was hit
check if static properties were destoyed
check if the called method has been previous registered
check if the cert is self-signed
check if the char.
check if the connection is still there
check if the data we get is a port this allows us to correctly parse things like a.com:80
check if the event has been triggered
check if the library is already in the cache by getting its name
check if the requested function exists
check if the same interned string was already stored
check if the stylesheet is using xsl:key, if yes, we have to clone the document _always_ before a transformation
check if there are only NOPs under the branch
check if there is already more data
check if we can reuse exisiting connection ...
check if we can write more data
check if we got a 229 response
check if we have Proxy-Authorization header
check if we have a valid host, if we don't reject the string as url
check if we have any param
check if we load xsd from the same server
check if zval was removed
check in calling scripts' current working directory as a fall back case
check in provided path
check invalid code point
check length, crc32
check liveness
check number of arguments
check only.
check open_basedir
check out BOM
check persistent connections, move used to free
check position in the src image
check possible overflow
check redundant double repeat.
check size limitation
check sortKeyIndxBuf overflow, increasing its size of the buffer if needed
check status.
check that class_type is traversable at c-level or implements at least one of 'aggregate' and 'Iterator'
check that offset is within range
check that we have a string
check the depth
check the highest numbered descriptor
check the indicator to ensure that the data is intact
check the integer part and the equal length part of the fraction.
check to make sure that the year does not exceed 4 digits in length
check to make sure we are dealing with a regular file
check to see if the connection is still valid
check to see if this is going to
check to see if we are the last parent's last_child, if so repoint so hash table inserts will go to the right place
check unicode characters
check we are at the beginning of the stack, but after argument RECV
check whether it is actually a private key if requested
check whether its last access was more than maxlifetime ago
check whether the trait method fulfills the inheritance requirements
check whether the user has write access
check whether we have meta data, zero check works regardless of byte order
check which states can be overridden
check_liveness
check_liveness: not needed
checking whether the following line is part of a folded header
child elements will not be freed.
child to parent column mapping
children process
children: return listening socket parent: never return
choice point, seeing what to do next.
choose an efficiently fread'able size
choose an efficiently fwrite'able size
choose default ports
chunk has to be aligned
chunked buffering
chunked encoding - ignore Content-Length header
churn through str, generating array entries as we go
class DOMXPath
class table hash keys, class names, properties, methods, constants, etc
class type hinting...
classes don't have to be destroyed
clean before putting into the cache, since clean could call dtors, which could use cached hash
clean path without cwd
clean seek state
clean up a bit
clean up all the child ends and then open streams on the parent ends, where appropriate
clean up all the descriptors
clean up anything allocated.
clean up for bigendian systems
clean up from last execution
clean up notice messages
clean up on big-endian systems
clean up persistent connection
clean up persistent sdl
clean up the data block and return it
clean up the fetch buffers if they have been used
clean up the input descriptor
clean up the params
clean up varargs array if it was used
cleanup after ourselves.
cleanup handled in sxe_object_dtor as we dont always have an iterator wrapper
clear all flags
clear authentication credentals
clear cache
clear cached chunks
clear compression method specific flags
clear error
clear event in pollfds
clear hash table
clear http input identification.
clear kerning flag
clear overloaded function.
clear permissions
clear sign bit
clear sign bit, which we ignore
clear text under SSL
clear the ready status
clear unnecessary ZEND_FETCH_CLASS opcode
clear_history is the only function where rl_initialize is not call to ensure correct allocation
clearing the array
client error: yellow
clip if out of bounds
clock ticks
clone error information into the db handle
clone formatter object
clone formatter object.
clone internal object
clone standard parts
close - the streams themselves know how
close /dev/poll if open
close control connection
close data connection
close down the ini config
close files opened earlier
close open file handle - allows removal or rename of the file on windows, which has greedy locking only close if the archive was not already compressed.
close the read side of the pipe
close the statement handle
close the statement here, the connection has been closed
close the transaction
close the write side of the pipe
close those descriptors that we just opened for the parent stuff, dup new descriptors into required descriptors and close the original cruft
close unused sockets that was inherited
close winsock
closes the data connection, returns NULL
cmsghdr passed
coalesce per file arrays into a single one
code in this file relies on the path being nul terminated, even though this is not required, at least on linux for abstract paths.
code in trail, and vowels unless they separate
code is not necessarily a unicode code point
code ripped off from fopen_wrappers.c
code_ptr can be affected above.
collapse adjacent stars to one, to avoid exponential behavior
collation for column
collator functions
colormap allocated at init time
colorspace of input image
column information
column is NULL
column list if this is an UPDATE OF trigger
column names.
column number to retrieve
columns already in colset object
com_object_get,
com_object_set,
combine the others
command apr_table_t
command table to be scanned
comment, do not parse
comment: pass
commit if we're in auto_commit mode
common functions
common pagesize
common part to res_context ends here
commonly used constructor and destructor
compact table
compare element names
compare element numerically
compare.c: bcmath library file.
compare_objects
compares opcodes with allowing oc1 be _EX of oc2
comparison function
comparison match reduce strength
compatibility with older versions of libtidy
compilation failed
compile the regular expression from the supplied regex
compiler warns about "non-constant" initializer.
compiler-defined memory barrier
complain if this field doesn't allow NULL values
complete detecting
complete initialization of trait strutures in ce
completely fill the hash, then just add it without
complex var
component-wise summing-up of color values
composite PRIMARY KEY value
compound constant name
compress and rehash as necessary
compress as necessary, calculate crcs, serialize meta-data, manifest size, and file sizes
compress consecutive CONCATs
compress consecutive ECHO's.
compressed images only
compressed phar
compression flag already set
compression is better then 2:1, need to allocate more memory
compute the length of the result string
compute the line's height and find the endIndex
compute the number of idle process to spawn
computed, since it's always very near 0.
concatenate all adjacent text and cdata nodes
conch file header length
conch file host id length
conch host and lock path match
conditional group contains more than two branches
configuration
connect the neighbours to this new element
connect the neightbors
connect to the neighbours
connection functions
connection has timed out
conservative
consider as 0
consider the connection closed
consonant letters
constant - can be shared among threads
constant arrays can't contain references
constant conditional JMPs
constant expression should be always read context ...
constant hash keys
constants are declared in transliterator_register_constants, called from MINIT
constants for Jewish date formatting
constants for easter calculation
constants for jddayofweek
constants for jdmonthname
constants table
constraints of fp refcount were not met
constraints when stmt started
construct actual offset to file start - local extra_len can be different from central extra_len
construct the spb, hack the service name into it as well
constructor
consume nbits
consume the dot
consume the remainder first
content length
content table
content-length
context in which to report errors
context pointer
continue as a child
continue looping
continue resolution anyway but don't save result in the cache
continuing from the previous line
contradictory, it is very practical:  instead of computing
controllen should be an unsigned with at least 32-bit.
convd has encoding info.
conversion for BMP
conversion for combining characters
conversion map
convert HTML numeric entity
convert ID back to base cell indexes
convert JMP L1 ...
convert XMLRPC_REQUEST to soap xml dom.
convert XMLRPC_VALUE to soap xml dom.
convert a palette image to true color
convert and set
convert angle to radians
convert args into zvals.
convert buffercontents to zip_dirent
convert chars to upper case and strip non-letter chars
convert constant operands to strings at compile-time
convert encoding
convert escape sequences
convert input array if needed
convert it to unsigned d.
convert justwrote to an integer, since normally it is unsigned
convert ms to timespec struct
convert native php type to xmlrpc type
convert palette to libpng layout
convert string to ascii printable format.
convert the 7-bit alpha channel to an 8-bit alpha channel.
convert the array data into something IB can understand
convert the array to lowercase , also replace hyphens with the underscore and store it in cur_arr
convert the string to UTF-16.
convert the strings to UTF-16.
convert the timestamp into a string
convert timeout into timespec_t
convert to PHAR_UFP
convert to lower and replace hyphens
convert to microseconds
convert to the encoding number and check encoding
convert to time_t
convert to unix epoch
convert xmlrpc data to native php types
convert xmlrpc to native php types
convert_to_null calls destructor
converted string is longer than out buffer
copied data, thus also the ownership.
copied from php-src/main/snprintf.c and slightly modified
copied from sapi/cli/php_cli.c cli_register_file_handles
copied upon generator creation
copies functions, applies defined aliasing, and excludes unused trait methods
copy "." as well
copy a maximum of nBuf chars to output buffer
copy all elements of first array that are not in exclude set
copy arguments
copy arguments back, they might be changed by references
copy call frame into new stack segment
copy central directory header
copy content
copy contents uncompressed rather than lose them
copy digits to exponent
copy escaped character
copy file data from an existing to a new phar_entry_info that is not in the manifest
copy first array
copy functions
copy indices from proxy
copy max significant digits to significand
copy mb char without escaping it
copy members
copy message
copy new prompt
copy non escaped character
copy old config
copy old contents in entirety
copy out the dir from response
copy out the pwd from response
copy over any stragglers
copy part up to the brace
copy real values from CV slots into symbol table
copy real values from symbol table into CV slots and create INDIRECT references to CV in symbol table
copy reference back
copy replacement and backrefs
copy scrambled pass
copy that value
copy the argument array
copy the data
copy the decimal places.
copy the details from the first item
copy the local files, central directory, and the zip comment to generate the hash
copy the numbers before the decimal point, adding thousand separator every three digits
copy the old data into it
copy the part of the string before the match
copy the remainder
copy the rest of p, the NUL is NOT copied
copy the scoreboard not to bother other processes
copy the standard object handlers to you handler table
copy the style values in the stylearr
copy the type
copy the updated results into the result buffer
copy the value string for work
copy to image, mapping colors
copy underlying tcp fields
copy what we already have
copy: enforce read only access
corrected date of the Paschal full moon
corrupted entry
could be POLLERR or POLLHUP but can't tell without probing
could be Windows 8/Windows Server 2012, could be Windows 8.1/Windows Server 2012 R2
could be a separate func.
could not create description
couldn't convert to string and back
couldn't grok it
count after serializing name, since php_var_serialize_class_name changes the count if the variable is incomplete class
count does not include NUL
count least amount of arguments
count number of elements
count single quotes
count the max number of necessary fds for polling
count the number of ' characters
count the number of listed encoding names
count the users and groups configured
count_elements
counted is 0 - meaning we had to readlock manually, release readlock now
counted means we are holding read lock for SHM, so that nothing bad can happen
counting static methods
counting static properties
create a certificate store and add those certs to it for use in verification.
create a copy of the lock path _only_ if the conch is taken
create a copy of the lock path if the conch is taken
create a fake palette and check for single-shade transparency
create a linked list of elements from 1 to last
create a mapping
create a new cache
create a new empty value and pass that along to be init'd, then add it to our current vector.
create a new path by replace the trailing '-conch' with '-break'
create a new phar data holder
create a new pointer
create a service context
create a socket for this address
create all required sockets
create an OCI statement handle
create an automation SafeArray from a PHP array.
create an entry, this is a new file
create an environment using the character set id
create an image just big enough for the string
create an instance of our class
create and sort array with pointers to the target_hash buckets
create and use new entry, used by zip_add
create any needed directories if the creation of the 1st directory worked
create cached prompt
create convert filter
create converter
create directorie
create directory
create exclude map
create filter to decode response body
create filters
create foreground color
create hash
create initial children in all pools
create list of files with index into original archive
create new backup in a directory specified by DBBackupPath
create new file that holds the compressed version
create new interning string in shared interned strings buffer
create new local directory entry
create new multipart_buffer structure
create our return value element
create packed array
create per-directory config structure
create per-server config structure
create regex pattern buffer
create shutdown function
create the DB if it's not already present
create the WBMP
create the argument array
create the background color
create the file if it doesn't exist already
create the full path..
create the ib_link
create the link
create the object
create using the client-side session pool
create/truncate
creates the object by - allocating memory - initializing the object members - storing the object - setting it's handlers called from - clone - new
creating segment here
critical conditions
cross your fingers...
ctor call not really needed for non-ZTS
ctors only have a prototype if it comes from an interface
curN holds the error propagated from the previous pixel on the current line.
curl-wrappers don't load data until the 1st read
current address
current distance in inner loop
current error or pixel value
current memory usage
current offset
current position for traversing
current position in pInput
current position in zInput
current reading position
current size of allocated pages
current status is unusable
currently everything is a string here
currently letting libxml2 set the version string
currently not supported.
currently processed item of input hash
cut off on NULL byte ...
cut off trailing spaces, linefeeds and carriage-returns
cut out bogus OID and retry
d is denormalized
data at last
data available
data has alreade been converted to long
data must be last element
data passed to C callback
data phars need only contain a single non-"." to be valid
database name - used by the update hook
database was opened readonly
database was opened writeonly
date parser's scan function too large for VC6 - VC7.x drop the optimization solves the problem
day of week
day suffix, ignored, nor checked
db info arguments
dbSize before the current transaction
dbcs first byte
dbcs first char
dbcs lead byte
dbcs second byte
dbcs/qbcs 2nd byte
dbcs/qbcs lead byte
dbcs/qbcs second byte
dblib do not return more than this length from text/image
dbm/ndbm original
dbsize field from frame header
deactivate - common for server/client
dead - kill it
deadman switch
deallocates all occurrences of a given id
deallocates structure as well
debug functions
debug protocol negotiations
debug.c: bcmath library file.
debugging option
dec  jan  feb  mrt  apr  may  jun  jul  aug  sep  oct  nov  dec
decalre the class entry
decimal n on sybase
decimal output
decimal point
decision variable
declaration nodes
declare the class handlers
declared in this class, done
declares can only be preceeded by other declares
decode Modified Base64
decode filter
decode input character
decode input string
decode the data from the array
decode the strings first
decompress this file indirectly
decrease the stack.
decrypt next byte
dedicated implementation for increased performance: - Make the content type lowercase - Trim descriptive data, stay with the content-type only
def could be empty, thus don't allocate on the root.
def is not on the root, if allocated at all
default behavior: return first-matching result.
default behaviour is different, as 'is_a' used to be used to test mixed return values and there is no easy way to deprecate this.
default compile-time values
default event source
default gregorian
default location of JIT profiling agent on Android
default macros
default options
default post reader
default security
default size is approx 4 bytes
default to 'openssl.cnf' if no environment variable is set
default to ASSOC
default to BY_COLUMN
default to cached value
default transaction is not a registered resource: clean up
default value
default value for FF DBUG
defaults to UTF-8
defensive coding
defensive copy
defer MT decisions to system malloc
deferred flush
define CAML_NAME_SPACE to ensure all the caml imports are prefixed with 'caml_'
define an overloaded iterator structure
define ini entries on command line
define the base filter class
define this to check semantics
defined in browscap.c
definitely not in open_basedir..
delay deletion
delay signal handling
delete all bucket blocks except the first one
delete all data segments except the first one
delete any other parameter registered with this number.
delete descriptor from the hash
delete from source after copying
delete newline
delete old call_frame from previous stack segment
delete old value
delete parent
delete previous stack segment if it becames empty
delete the collation from the handle
delete the converter if it is the last feed.
delete the converter just in case.
delete the event
delete the file
delete the function from the handle
delete this event from the link struct
depending on the source EOL the out str will have all CR/LF duplicated
deprecated names
deprecated, for BC only
depth in bits
des submitted this bugfix: gdFree the memory.
describe TDO
describe the column
descriptor bind
deserialize bindings
deserialize functions
deserialize requests
desired becomes what we consumed this round through
desired fd number in child process
desired position before position or error on tell
dest on static area
dest_reg is the absolute name of the register Useful for reordering instructions in the delay slot.
destroy array
destroy dummy values from before
destroy everything else
destroy old array and add new one
destroy resource
destroy the ast here, it might have been replaced
destroys stack frame, therefore makes core dumps worthless
destruct old filter
destruct the function also, then - we have allocated it in get_method
destructor for json_each virtual table
destructor for the manifest hash, frees each file's entry
detach from original tty.
detect end position
detect if this is a pipe
determine blocking mode
determine family
determine if a string represents a soap type, as used in element names
determine if the file is a local file or remote URL
determine length
determine magic associated with soap array type.
determine segment size we _really_ need: no more than to include requested_size
determine soap array type.
determine the bounds
determine the classname/class entry
determine the key value for the array
determine the statement type
determine the status for the current cert
determine whether we have a socket
determining element's name is a bit tricky, due to soap semantics.
did anyone steal our installed handler
didn't find Implicit Result Sets
didn't find any
didn't find boundary, abort
didn't find the boundary
didn't get correct response from EPSV/PASV
didn't get correct response from PASV
didn't get, must be busy
different classes
different names for subpatterns of the same number are not allowed
direct conversion
direct request
directly encode characters
directly encoded characters
directly set the option
directory already mounted
directory exists, or is a subdirectory of an existing file
directory found
disable certain classes and functions as requested by php.ini
disable multi statements/queries
disable ssl
disable this handler
disabled functionality
disabling when it's already off
discard any output
discard created blob
dismiss it for now
displacement
display html formatted or only show the additional links
display/log the error if necessary
distance increments
div.c: bcmath library file.
divide different length alternatives in look-behind.
division by zero
divmod.c: bcmath library file.
dll was already loaded, no need to do it for the second time
do backpatching here
do extra field for perms later
do first-time-only definition of bind/mapping stuff
do funky checking whether the parsed date was valid date
do funky checking whether the parsed time was valid time
do not PHAR_GET_16 either on the next line
do not add any magic entries to this directory
do not add/delete without changing size define
do not allow unsetting in runtime
do not break here
do not close
do not close stdout and stderr
do not create any child at startup
do not generate HTTP headers
do not generate default content type header
do not inform about in debug
do not install sigint handlers for remote consoles
do not log errors for .lck file while in read ony mode on .lck file
do not output errors as values
do not output the error message to the screen, this helps us to to avoid "information disclosure"
do not process defaultEncoding's here
do not really flush buffer, but report success to suppress OCI error when flushing not used buffer
do not recompute length here
do not recurse into
do not use PHAR_GET_16 on either field of the next line
do not use gdFree here, in case gdFree/alloc is mapped to something else than libc
do not use the reference to itself in json
do nothing to keep BC
do nothing, ignore these characters in the count
do nothing, mptr already set
do nothing, the iterator always points to the top element
do nothing.
do regular substitution
do some sanity checking
do some specialized cleanup
do some transliteration
do strict comparison
do the actual work
do the best we can to inform about the inner exception
do the stuff needed for OCIDefineByName
do utf16 part of the strpos
do we have a direct access
do we have a direct free slot
do_operation
doaddsub.c: bcmath library file.
does not exist in dest, copy from source
does not happen for round-near
doesn't match pattern
don't allow multi_queries via connect parameter
don't allow output
don't allow strange buffer overruns due to bogus return
don't assign closure_object since we only reflect the invoke handler method and not the closure definition itself
don't assign closure_object since we only reflect the invoke handler method and not the closure definition itself, even if we have a closure
don't bother doing an extended regex with just a number
don't break the lock if the host id doesn't match
don't break the lock on short read or a version mismatch
don't care if loses
don't catch our signals
don't chdir to the script directory
don't clear allowed_clients as it will create an "open for all" security issue
don't colllect constants after any other function call
don't colllect constants after unknown function call
don't create zip files with no entries
don't do non-secure authentication
don't do server-based sort
don't evaluate division by zero at compile-time
don't evaluate numeric string error-producing operations at compile-time
don't ever resolve to the color that has been designated as the transparent color
don't extend sign
don't free the string
don't include : before ipv4 unless it's a ::
don't initialize buffer and buffer_length because we use ecalloc
don't initialize is_null and length to 0 because we use ecalloc
don't initialize to 0 : 1.
don't inline this, want to debug it easily, will inline when done
don't join to the previous if because it won't work if mysql_stmt_prepare_fails
don't keep searching
don't let the child inherit the parent side of the pipe
don't log that function
don't merge other types
don't optimise if it should produce a runtime numeric string error
don't parse directories
don't rearm
don't return on failure, since not closing the default handler could result in memory leaks or other nasties
don't return results
don't return the generator value as a string unless it doesn't fit in a long
don't run the output handler if it's disabled
don't schedule twice
don't separate references for __call
don't set FALSE because that's not the way it was before...
don't set U_ILLEGAL_ARGUMENT_ERROR to allow fetching of inner error
don't set is_closure since is the invoke handler, not the closure itself
don't store transfer-encodeing header
don't think so...
don't try and seek
don't try to allocate more than possible - mnd_XXalloc expects size_t, and it can have narrower range than uint64_t
don't try to initialize JIT agent the second time
don't try to write the data twice
don't want usernames and passwords floating around
done already - skip here
done completeley
done if matches up to capacity of buffer
dont allow leading : without another : following
dos or unix endings
double byte character
double limits
doubly linked
downscaling using the fixed point implementations are usually much faster than the existing gdImageCopyResampled while having a similar or better quality.
draw_bitmap - transfers glyph bitmap to GD image
drawing large  ellipses problematic...
driver object
drop the temporary formatter
drop usage lock
dropped if after C else K
dst may be the same as src1 or src2.
dst must be register, TMP_REG1 arg1 must be register, TMP_REG1, imm arg2 must be register, TMP_REG2, imm
dtor required to cleanup iterator related data properly
dtor the old value
dtors should be called in reverse order
due to implicit delete...
dummy addr.
dummy function defined by PS_MOD
dummy zval to pass to transliterator_object_construct
dump class if it is not an alias
duplicate this into a new chunk of emalloc'd memory, since the engine will efree it
during shutdown the symbol table table can be still null
dust, sweep, and mop
e.g. "NOT FOUND" we are not humans so just ignore this
eCreate defines what to do if the page does not exist.
eMode is always INCRINIT_NORMAL in single-threaded mode
each BER value
each method can have its own parameters and visibility
eat up the passed in storage even if it won't be filled in with varargs
eat whitespace
effectively, no limit
eg: when describing a table that contains an enum column.
eidlist_opt
either e or E
either e or E format
either newly created or already modified
either or both operands are NULL...
either the conch didn't match or we need to create a new one
either when xmlrpc_server_destroy is called, or when request ends.
element doesn't exist
element value is not a string
element's type
elementDecl
else USE_NAMED_GROUP
else USE_ST_LIBRARY
else continue
else fall through
else fall through for endonly
else for SELECT with OCI_NO_AUTO_COMMIT, leave "rb_on_disconnect" at its previous value.
else ignore
else no access log are set
else we need to continue via utf16
else, check for single value
emit_op inp_flags.
empty and too long paths are invalid
empty environment
empty length - we've validated start, we can return "" now
empty line marks end of headers
empty loop founded, skip next instruction
empty string
empty string behaves like NULL on windows implementation of getservbyname.
empty string means default builtin value to allow "/foo/php.d:" or ":/foo/php.d"
empty variable name, or variable name with a space in it
empty, but position changed
empty, do not parse
emulate above via a query
emulate ceil
emulate flex constructs
emulate forward moving seeks with reads
emulate it by fetching and discarding rows
enable SSL transport layer
enable data conn encryption
enable extended info output
enabling when it's already on
enclose a field that contains a delimiter, an enclosure character, or a newline
encode Modified Base64
encode data
encode input character
encode input string
encoded block
encoded block filter
encoded text rotation...
encoded word
encoding code set
encoding converter
encoding detector
encoding filter
encoding handled by property on doc
encoding name resolver
encoding resolver
encoding structure
encrypt data etc
end Loop over all index columns
end Olympus specific tags
end additional , gerrit thomson
end argument parsing/validation
end collector dll part.
end gjt mod
end loop over pSrcList
end must not be NULL.
end of "metachar.h"
end of "metaphone.h"
end of args
end of big loop
end of else
end of fastcgi loop
end of fetch
end of if fromParse
end of if isCanonical
end of output buffer
end of repeat.
end of request line
end of search region
end of switch
end of table marker
end of temporary locals
end of the 'extern "C"' block
end of the phoned phrase
end of token
end of virtual stack.
end of while
end offset of data to read, 0 for up to EOF
end parse extra config
end provided path
end the array with NULL in order to parse it
end-if not one-row
end-of-error-codes
endDocument
endif aggregate query
endif pGroupBy.
enforce ZEND_MMAP_AHEAD trailing NULLs for flex...
enforce end state
enlarge the arrays for the already active threads
ensure 2 pools do not use the same listening address
ensure everything was compile-time evaluated at least once
ensure heartbeat is not lower than FPM_PCTL_MIN_HEARTBEAT
ensure signature set
ensure that the link did not die
ensure that we cancel the cursor from a previous fetch
ensure that we free any previous unfetched results
ensure the header is only sent if user_agent is not blank
ensure to close syslog not to interrupt with PHP syslog code
ensure we only return 0 for FILE_DEFAULT
enter CLI mode
entire file is bzip-compressed, uncompress to temporary file
entire file is gzip-compressed, uncompress to temporary file
entity size is unbounded, we may need more memory
entries changed by initialize
entry and update the cache
entry exists as a file
entry in directory not found
entry is deleted, but has not been flushed to disk yet
enum UConverterCallbackReason
enum UConverterType
enumerate all the arguments: assume every non-resource argument specifies modifiers for the link ids that follow it
enumerate functions and properties of the object and assign dispatch ids
enumerate implemented interfaces and pick the one as indicated by sink
enums need to be treated like strings
env exists, but it is empty
eof if we are out of bytes, or if we hit the final boundary
epoch seconds
eptr is now past the end of the maximum run
equal final and static qualifier
errno isn't checked since we allow HUGE_VAL/INF overflow
erroffset passed as NULL
error - print best error message possible
error already emitted, but let's emit another more relevant
error already set
error and cleanup
error at c-level
error condition
error consistently about invalid DES fallbacks
error during read occurred
error for below/prev col
error for pixel below cur
error handle
error handler
error in fetch
error in file descriptor
error invalid column
error is set by writeheaders
error levels
error message
error message functions
error occurred
error or pipe is closed
error or unsupported command
error set by comp_impl
error supposedly already shown
error, but message already emitted
escape gcc warning.
escape username and password, if provided
escaped char
escaping options
eslint-disable
eslint-enable
esstsett, thorn, n-tilde, c-cedilla, s-caron, ...
estimate each message at 20 bytes
estimate number of entries, can't be certain with tar files
estrdup would sometimes allocate more memory and does not return length
estrndup does not return length
etfs cluster size writes are atomic
evaluate constant expression
evaluate constant expressions
evaluate constant unary ops
even if on_modify bails out, we have to continue on with restoring, since there can be allocated variables that would be freed on MM shutdown and would lead to memory corruption later ini entry is modified again
even though it is the conch
even though lval is declared as unsigned, the value may be negative.
event identifier
event log handle
events have been triggered
events have been triggered, let's fire them
eventually we'll want to enable this in the absence of an explicit dh_param.
every method just calls our standard callback, and it then dispatches to php as necessary
evil cast, but we know they are the same
exact match
exact result
exactly half-way between
examine cache to see if we have a match
examine the available interfaces
exception already thrown
exception are IFD pointers
exception or call failure
exception thrown during comparison
exclude CP936 extension
exclude UHC extension area
exclude from ctime.c
excluding these two
exclusive lock
executable location
execute arbitrary ftp command
execute query with parameters
execute serverside command
execute statement
execute the query
execute the statement
executor is already inactive
existing file only
expand ignore-case in char class.
expand repeated string.
expand string
expand tilde from the passwd file.
expand to 1 byte per pixel
expat char data handler
expat end of element handler
expat specific errors
expat start of element handler
expat will not expand internal entities if default handler is present otherwise it will expand and pass them to cdata handler
expect a single value
expected a stream resource
expected failure
expected success
expecting a charset name
expecting a chunk of whitespaces
expecting a delimiter
expecting a encoding scheme specifier
expecting a non-encoded word
expecting an encoded portion
expecting any character
expects a language specifier.
expects interface to be contained in ce's interface list already
explicit IPK column
explicit resource number
exponent has 7 bits, but 8 is the right value in b2d
exponent of real numbers
export the PHP object using our COM wrapper
export to a var
expunge silently
ext/mbstring
ext/mysql or ext/mysqli are responsible to clean, whatever they have to.
ext/phar has to load phar's metadata into memory
ext/statdard
extend modrm r/m, sib base, or opcode reg
extend modrm reg
extend sib index
extend the sign bit if the comparison is to be signed
extended error code
extended fcall begin handler
extended fcall end handler
extended statement handler
extension function list
extension info
extension name
extension not found: not allowed
extension version
extension-wide shutdown function
extension-wide startup function
externalSubset
extra bit of validation for instances when same params are bound more than once
extra paranoid
extract API version, lowest nibble currently unused
extract alias
extract header name
extract header value
extract key from cert, depending on public_key param
extract public key from X509 cert
extract the number of entries
f is numeric, s is not
f2/f3 could introduce media
fIgnoreCase
f_ignore_case
facility: type of program logging the message
failed to convert string to date
failed to decompress the file, will try reading the rest of the file
failed to dup
failed to generate bind struct
failed to get memory
failed to open/create the lock directory
failed to parse
failure in get_current_data
failure means that they don't get a stream to play with
failure, but notice already emitted
fake request startup
fall back on IDispatch direct
fall back on regular file access
fall back to PASV
fall through
fall through to real
fall-back judge
fall-through
fallback judge
fallback to read_property
falls back to UTF-8 if an unknown encoding name is given
fallthrough
fallthrough -- Non-serializable object
fast_calls don't have to be destroyed
fastcgi env
fatal error
fatal errors are real errors and cannot be made exceptions
fault_string   application specific error string.
fci.size is used to check if it is valid
fds for pipes in parent/child
feed it to the parser
feed the string
fetch a blob into a fetch buffer
fetch blob contents into hash
fetch default locales list
fetch error
fetch superglobals
fetch the GUID and add the version numbers
fetch the relevant data
fetch the rest into a T_INLINE_HTML
fetch to be able to get the number of tuples later, but don't advance the cursor pointer
fetch zend object from zval "object" into "to"
fetch_lengths
fetches the requested resource for the current thread
field name is too long
figure out docroot SCRIPT_FILENAME minus SCRIPT_NAME
figure out how big a chunk to map to be able to view the part that we need
figure out how many UTF-8 characters are in zName
figure out the GMT offset
figure out the result set format, if any
figure out what we're doing
figure out where the context is coming from exactly
file creation failed
file desc to assoc this lock with
file does not exist
file error after info
file exists, but is either corrupt or not a phar archive
file extension must contain "phar"
file handle
file is on command line, but not in -f opt
file not found
file to open
file to read from
file type markers
file-mapping handle
filenames are empty for stdin
fill buffer if needed
fill epoll struct
fill in data
fill in the basic info
fill in the remote server info.
fill level in output buffer
fill pollfd with event informations
fill pollfd with the same informations as fpm_event_devpoll_add
fill struct timeval with timeout
fill the child arg vector
fill the output sqlda with information about the prepared query
fill the param buffer
fill up the WBMP structure
filled arc - circle
filled arc - ellipse
filled in if error occurs and not NULL.
fills the required data structure with information about the events
filter out the response code
filter resources are cleaned up by the stream destructor, keeping a reference to the stream resource here would prevent it from being destroyed properly
filter_args is the filter_flags
filtered streams can only be cast as stdio, and only when fopencookie is present
finally, close the temp file, rename the original phar, move the temp to the old phar, unlink the old phar, and reload it into memory
finally, delete the element
find 1st tag
find a top level directory we need to create
find a user-set define
find address and figure out binding type
find antialised color
find cached prompt
find cookie
find decimal point, if expected
find first 0 bit
find first 1 bit
find first accessed one
find first signature
find invalid patterns in look-behind.
find leaked huge blocks and free them
find method breaks here
find nearest watchpoint
find next line
find out how many rows were affected
find out what kind of statement was prepared
find out which event occurred
find previous value
find the corresponding event
find the end point of the string to return
find the entry in the array
find the full real path
find the largest array index, and assert that all keys are integers
find the number of actually passed arguments
find the number of extensions
find the original easy curl handle
find the table and ensure it's an array
find total length of blob's data
find type of descriptor
find type of named file
find used one
find value for entry in hash, -1 if not found
finds a boundary
finish req body
finished if we found the boundary
finishes the string
fire the event
fire triggered events
fire up the host and get the domain object
first 2 bits are reserved
first 256 bits for first character, and second 256 bits for the next
first arg is 1 because we want to identify valid named entities even if we are only encoding the basic ones
first body part
first call without setting to initialize the timer
first call without setting which to initialize the timer
first care about all methods to be flattened into the class
first character cannot be ' or -, unless explicitly allowed by the user
first check for alias in first segment
first check if we have any arrays at all
first code of JIS-8 pair
first copy each file's uncompressed contents to a temporary file and set per-file flags
first digit of major HTTP version
first digit of minor HTTP version
first element is the function name
first fetched OID is out of subtree, fallback to GET query
first get the unmangeld name if necessary, then check whether the property is already there
first initialization
first letter of a non-encoded word
first letter of an encoded chunk
first lock byte
first look for argnum
first of two- or four-byte char or second of two-byte char
first open readonly so it won't be created if not present
first rowid on page
first section exactly as php_fgetss
first time around -- clear initial gl_offs items
first try the slot which is supposed to be free
first try to open an existing file
first type is the return value
first unused entry
first we add the date and time in ISO format
first we check the hash for the hashed_details key.
first, deal with the crazy/stupid fault format
first, iterate over the manifest and close all PHAR_TMP entry fp handles, this prevents unnecessary unfreed stream resources
first, second...
first, try interpreting the address as a numeric address
first, we check if the handler is defined
first, we have to get the size of all the elements in the hash
fix docroot
fix for Opera 6.01
fix for bug 69882
fix jumps to point to new array
fixed size pattern node only
fixup stuff set in motion in oci_bind_output_cb
flag ASCII delimiters
flag allowed here
flag as unknown
flag for full add operation so ldap_mod_add can be put back into oper, gerrit THomson
flag optional arrays not allocated
flag to remember which row we are on
flag unnecessarily.
flag values passed to the btree insert
flags are identical, now the value needs to be checked
flags controlling this file
flags field of new pages before shuffling
flags fit in 8 bits
flags for S/MIME
flags is 4 bytes, we store just 1
flags match what we are looking for
flip for next time
flist is an array of mbfl_identify_filter instances
floating point string
floor it just in case
flush and reset filter
flush filter cache
flush fragments
flush if necessary
flush only when SAPI was started.
flush overflow and terminate region
flush the file handle, so any remaining data is synched to disk
flush the shift-out sequences
flush the stream
fold-1, fold-2, fold-3
follow branch according to bits in idx until having found an impossible branch
follow branch according to bits in idx until the last lower branch before the impossible branch
font cache functions
for "big boy" drivers, we need to allocate memory to fetch the results into, so lets do that now
for AFP simulated shared lock
for ATTACHed
for CLOCK_MONOTONIC
for FD_CLOSEXEC to work
for OCIFetchStatement
for OCIWriteTemporaryLob
for ONIG_MAX_ERROR_MESSAGE_LEN
for PHP_RAND_MAX
for PIPE_BUF
for RAND_MAX
for S/MIME handling
for SHOW/DESCRIBE and others the column/field count is not available before execute
for __halt_compiler lexing.
for ancillary registry
for both handlers above, when we are inside __get/__set, no further calls for __get/__set for this property of this object will be made, to prevent endless recursion and enable accessors to change properties array.
for calendar calculation purposes.
for ctype node hash table
for current row
for downwards compatibility
for each argument, create and sort list with pointers to the hash buckets
for each chunk
for each modification
for each part
for each value
for error message
for error offset
for exceptional circumstances
for exponent conversion
for fill a blank
for heb_number_to_chars
for imagefilledarc
for import/export functions
for links to relative location, prepend cwd of the entry
for messages
for mysqli_fetch_assoc
for mysqli_query
for mysqli_stmt_set_attr
for now fetch only one row
for now interned strings are supported only for non-ZTS build
for now, just ignore it - __set should take care of warnings, etc.
for old BSD
for older versions of libxml2, allow correct detection of charset in documents with a BOM:
for our return value, we are interested in the number of bytes consumed from the first filter in the chain
for parsing
for pointers to histogram cells
for private and protected we need to unmangle the names
for read-mode only
for recursive call
for resulting hash we'll assign new hash keys rather then reordering
for safety - avoid loop
for sanity checking
for self::B
for shadow table
for single byte encodings
for some reasons phar needs to be flushed even if there is no write going on
for strerror
for systems that need to override reading of environment variables
for the 'x'
for the args parentheses
for the curly braces
for the modification hashtable...
for the right-hand
for the sake of BC to old damaged code
for these types, an empty string can be handled like a NULL value
for this perpouse we allocate additional PHP_IMAP_ADDRESS_SIZE_BUF bytes by default this buffer is 10 bytes long
for urls like "phar://alias/oops" it instead sets ext_len to -1 and returns FAILURE, which tells the calling function to use "alias" as the phar alias  the last parameter should be set to tell the thing to assume that filename is the full path, and only to check the extension rules, not to iterate.
for zip comments that are strings
force OCI8 to update cached size
force close
force creation
force empty string
force failure exit
force into an fd
force it to be a string and check if it refers to a file
force lock on db file or lck file or disable locking
force out a line while stepping so the user knows what is happening
force stderr even on non tty
force truncate
force values-only output
forced from command line options
forces fill_input_buffer on first read
fork again, to avoid blocking because both pipes filled
form is optional, defaults to FORM_C
format and language are NULLs, so format is "DD-MON-YY" and language is the default language of the session
formatter functions
forward declaration
forward declarations
forward search
found a valid block
found an open connection.
found connection
found explicit alias
found match
found one, register it for use
found parameter ...
found phar://
found position
found protocol
found something and it's not a parent's private
found something, but it's not a connection, delete it
found the 1st tag - initialize the return array
found, done
four byte character
four digit year
fourth parameter
fpm has not started yet, let use stdout instead of fcgi
fpm has started, let use fcgi instead of stdout
free active_pollfds
free all cached chunks
free buffers
free cached manifests
free epollfds
free formatted prompt
free huge blocks
free lists for small sizes
free mysql structure
free new object
free old prompt
free only hashes
free pollfds
free request-bound globals
free search program after finished
free some cached chunks to keep average count
free sort program after finished
free string
free tail pages
free temporary bind buffer
free the UTF8 buffer
free the allocated space for passing field values to the db and back
free the buffer storing the error
free the bvalue struct
free the data bytes
free the first chunk
free the handle
free the query if trans handle was released
free the resource
free the system buffer allocated by FormatMessage
free unused memory
free virtual CWD memory
free wrapper
freeing vars
frees all resources allocated for all threads except current
frees all resources allocated for the current thread
frees an interpreter context.
frees uresult even on error
french month
from GNU regex
from here on, only map the possible characters in the ASCII range.
from path and restrict it to be under dest directory
from postgresql/src/include/catalog/pg_type.h
from spl_directory
from this point further, shared memory is supposed to be OK
fsmagic - magic based on filesystem info - directory, special files, etc.
fsync'ing is something completely different.
ftp dirstreams only need to support read and close operations, They can't be rewound because the underlying ftp stream can't be rewound.
ftp proxy is read-only
fts3 query parse context
fts3_expr.c
fts3_snippet.c
fts3_tokenize_vtab.c
fts3_tokenizer.c
fts3_write.c
fts5YYERRORSYMBOL is not defined
fts5YYFALLBACK
fts5YYNOERRORRECOVERY
fts5YYWILDCARD
full bitset of atomics from max sector size and smaller
full date/time
function arguments array
function as defined by PS_MOD
function breakpoint
function implementation
function list
function names with ::
function table hash keys
function to free pUser
functions from array.c
functions from assert.c
functions from browscap.c
functions from crypt.c
functions from dir.c
functions from dns.c
functions from file.c
functions from filestat.c
functions from fsock.c
functions from ftok.c
functions from lcg.c
functions from mail.c
functions from metaphone.c
functions from output.c
functions from pack.c
functions from syslog.c
functions from type.c
functions from versioning.c
further blocks will not be relevant...
further checks, we could have .......
gd 1.2 is copyright 1994, 1995, Quest Protein Database Center, Cold Spring Harbor Labs.
gd 2.0.11: gdSeek returns TRUE on success, not 0.
gd 2.0: true color images can use freetype too
gd 2.0: we now support truecolor.
gd 2.0: we support this rather thoroughly now.
gd has only 7 bits of alpha channel resolution, and 127 is transparent, 0 opaque.
gd interface to freetype library
gd is intentionally imperfect and doesn't spend a lot of time fussing with such things.
gdAffineexpansion: Find the affine's expansion factor.
gdAntiAliased passed as color: use the much faster, much cheaper and equally attractive gdImageAALine implementation.
gdDPExtractData is the exception to this: it will return the pointer to the internal data, and reset the internal storage.
gdIOCtx JPEG data sources and sinks, T.
gdImageStringFT -  render a utf8 string onto a gd image
gdMalloc'd storage for the above
gdTcl_UtfToUniChar is borrowed from Tcl ...
gd_gd2.c  Implements the I/O and support for the GD2 format.
gd_security.c  Implements buffer overflow check routines.
gdcache.c  Caches of pointers to user structs in which the least-recently-used element is replaced in the event of a cache miss after the cache has reached a given size.
gen fault from xmlrpc style fault codes notice that we get a new node, which must be freed herein.
generate XMLRPC_REQUEST from raw xml
generate an XMLRPC_REQUEST from the raw xml input
generate crc on compressed file
generate highlighted HTML from source
generate raw xml from xmlrpc data
generate the SELECT expression tree.
generate unique inode number for alias/filename, so no phars will conflict
generate xml
generator at the root had stopped
generic file lister
generic user level
generic versions
get "a" byte
get "b" byte
get "c" byte
get "d" byte
get "size" byte
get 4 bytes of the instruction
get OCI_ATTR_SERVER_STATUS
get REF of the TDO for the type
get a byte of the instruction
get a lock on the array itself
get a number of args
get a pointer to the haystack taking into account the offset
get a working link
get all status information
get arguments
get character set form
get character set id
get class name
get collection element handle
get color values of neighbouring pixels
get column datatype
get column meta
get current working directory and prepend it to the path
get driver methods
get error text into buffer and escape for html if necessary
get field index if the field parameter was a string
get file metadata
get file mod time
get file size
get first parameter handle
get ht from ce
get its type-info
get lines of text, or CRLF_CRLF
get list of files
get marker byte, swallowing possible padding
get memory map allocation granularity
get name of the column
get number of columns
get offset, then skip over it
get output encoding and check MIME charset name
get passphrase
get perdir ini entries
get pixel location in gd buffer
get pixel value and index into the cache
get pixel value and index into the histogram
get precision of the column
get raw directory listing
get response from server and update upsert values
get response header
get rid of decimal places
get rid of newlines
get rid of old values
get rid of the context.
get rid of the trailing newline
get scale of the column
get serialized variable from shared memory
get sign of exponent
get sign of significand
get size of the column
get something useful out of it
get statement type
get sure it won't exceed max_children
get system ini entries
get the callback
get the collection type code of the attribute
get the converter output, and return it
get the default value for this key and compare
get the fd NB: Most other code will NOT use the PHP_STREAM_CAST_INTERNAL flag when casting.
get the fd.
get the id from a specified key or create new shared memory
get the length of the true salt
get the public keys we are using to seal this data
get the response
get the significant edge points affecting the pixel
get the value
get two bytes of the instruction
get type handle by name
get typecode
get variable source
getParameterEntity
get_class_name
get_closure
get_column_meta_func
get_constructor
get_debug_info
get_driver_methods
get_iterator implementation
get_properties
get_property_ptr_ptr
getput_arg_fast returned true.
give it a chance to die
give it a reference to me
give them back the address of the start offset they requested
given a zval which is either a stream or a context, return the underlying stream_context.
glibc refused to add ioprio_set, sigh.
global pattern matching
global representing whether the BistroJavaCollector can't be loaded
globals ctor
globals descriptor
globals dtor
go ahead and serialize first...
go back to fetch "A" byte
go through the lists and look for common values
go through the sorted array and delete duplicates from the copy
goal position
goes to tmp_shared_globals.shared_free
got 0x8e : EUC-JP-2004 kana
got 0x8e,  first char
got 0x8e,  third char
got 0x8e, X0201 kana
got 0x8f,  X 0212 first char
got 0x8f,  X 0212 second char
got a match
got first half
got it, set the type and return ok
got lead byte
got the key - return it
got the lock, unlock it
grab a uint32_t from a possibly unaligned address, and return it in the native host order.
grab an exclusive lock
grab element attributes up front to save redundant while loops
gradient of line
grapheme functions
gregorian or julian month
group name must start with a non-digit
groupby_opt
grow buffer if needed
grow buffer to hold this bucket TODO: this can fail for persistent streams
grow the buffer if required TODO: this can fail for persistent streams
guarantee we have at least 40 bytes to write.
guaranteed to return NULL if it fails
guard against freeing invalid types
guard against putting value of unknown type into vector
guard flags
h points to the first
hack to clean up the stack
hack to fix use of initialized value
hackish cache in php_stat needs to be cleared
halakim          1/1080th of an hour or 3 1/3 seconds.
handle HEAD
handle MySQL options
handle SOFn block
handle a buffer containing a compiled file.
handle a compiled file.
handle an mmaped file.
handle any left overs of files without new lines
handle at runtime
handle enclosure delimited field
handle error
handle for the server
handle generic PDO-level attributes
handle hex numbers
handle mixed syntax declaration or nested namespaces
handle modules / extensions
handle old style win smtp sending
handle re-open of snmp session
handle scalar types
handle setting attr first
handle situations where user turns the engine off
handle the case where we are in the buffer
handled by normal-POP
handler ate all
handler for array apply
handler for situations where there is no source file, ex.
hankaku kana to zenkaku hirangana
hankaku kana to zenkaku hirangana and glue voiced sound mark
hankaku kana to zenkaku kana
hankaku kana to zenkaku katakana
hankaku kana to zenkaku katakana and glue voiced sound mark
has been removed between the two calls
has custom handler
has placeholders
hasExternalSubset
hasInternalSubset
has_dimension
has_property
hash all oid's
hash as used in CA directories to lookup cert by subject name
hash by namespace
hash sqlstate to error messages
hash value of key
hash values are always pred-calculated here
hash_apply functions
have a value
have already seen the -
header `titles' can be lower case, or any case combination, according to the various RFC's.
header handler
header output
header transfar encoding
header_offset unused in tar
headers lists plain text headers to exclude from the signed portion of the message, and should include to, from and subject as a minimum
headers_lc is only created if we've a header at all
help aliases executes a canned routine
helper function to open an internal file's fp just-in-time
hence this mess.
here accelerator is active but we do not hold SHM lock.
here but this would make things only more complicated.
here we get if not all are equal
here we need to compress the data and then write it, first comes the compressed header
hex character table "0123456789ABCDEF"
hh_server doesn't need this at the moment.
hide banner
highlight source
histogram cell c0/c1/c2.
histogram is garbage now
holder for the second property
horizontal segment of scan line y
host might contain binary characters
host names are case-insensitive.
how far we've computed the CRC
how many dimensions we are indirecting to get into this element
how many output handlers the stack contains
how much room do we need to store the field
how to format output
http authentication options
http://www.clearsilver.net/license.hdf
http://xmlrpc-epi.sourceforge.net/specs/rfc.fault_codes.php.
i is the position of .
i know this is kinda ugly, but i'm trying to avoid extra cycles in the main execution loop
i.e. Check session data if new sid exists already.
i.e. It deletes all of Set-Cookie headers.
i.e. if the character is a lower-case ASCII character.
i386-specific debugger interface also amd64 extensions
iColumn matches a term of the ORDER BY clause
iIdxCur is always set if to a positive value if ONEPASS is possible
iLevel value for root of the tree
iMaster is 0 if there is not master chunk.
iPrevTrunk is initially 1.
iReg is a temp register that needs to be freed
iStart is zero based.
ib_result and ib_query point at each other to handle release of statement handle properly
iconv supports errno.
icu default locale - locale has no effect on this iterator
id that may be used to recursive triggers
ideas from comp.graphics discussions.
identify charset
identify encoding
identify filter
identity mapping of code points to unicode
idiotic CWD or CDQ
if "from" position is negative, count start position from the end of the string
if "length" position is negative, set it to the length needed to stop that many chars from the end of the string
if -r is on the command line more than once just quit
if 0 significand
if ACL configured
if DOCUMENT_ROOT is set, this is easy, otherwise, we have to play the game of hide and seek to figure out what SCRIPT_NAME should be
if HAVE_ISNAN
if JSON_OBJECT_AS_ARRAY is set
if PHP_FILEINFO_UNCOMPRESS
if SQLITE_OMIT_LOAD_EXTENSION is defined:
if SQLITE_THREADSAFE
if SQL_ARRAY
if a match is found it is set to 1
if a password is required, send it
if a stream is created without encryption, check to see if SSL method parameter is specified and use proper encrypyion method based on constants defined in soap.c
if allow_self_signed is set, make sure that verification succeeds
if already sorted free memory for tag array
if any open call is a locking call: check if we already habe a locking call open that should block this call the problem is some systems would allow read during write
if autoresume is wanted ask for remote size
if autoresume is wanted seek to end
if buff is 0 then set to non-buffered
if buffer already read in, use it
if buffered, pre-fetch all the data
if cgi, or fastcgi and not found in fcgi env check the regular environment
if cgi, or fastcgi and not found in fcgi env check the regular environment this leaks, but it's only cgi anyway, we'll fix it for 5.0
if content-type is not yet set, set it and activate the converter
if decimal point is present
if defined SQLITE_OMIT_AUTOVACUUM
if entry needs expading ifd cache and entry is at end of current ifd cache.
if eocd values are 0xffff, we have to use eocd64 values.
if exponent is present
if fg is specified by a negative color idx, then don't antialias
if first character, init BB corner values
if for some reason PDO borks something
if fpm has not started yet, use std env
if fpm has started, use fcgi env
if he does not there is no way to determine the libmysql does not allow us to allocate 0 bytes for a buffer so we try 1
if i is odd
if instantiating a remote object, either directly, or via a moniker, fill in the relevant info
if it doesn't fit in a long send it as a string.
if it doesn't, open a new pgsql link, add it to the resource list, and add a pointer to it with hashed_details as the key.
if it exists, it should point us to the right offset where the actual pgsql link sits.
if it is 0, no modifieres has been changed
if it is a column containing "long" data, perform late binding now
if it is a space, check if it is at the line boundary, copy and insert a break, or just keep track of it
if it is already byref, "move" it into the vargs array, otherwise make vargs a reference to this value
if it is already set, skip this
if it is inside the docroot, we scan the tree up to the docroot to find more user.ini, if not we only scan the current path.
if it is there, and if the haystack is ascii, we are all done
if it isn't there the we are done
if it starts with file:// interpreted as path to key file 4.
if it starts with file:// then it will be interpreted as the path to that cert .
if it's a child, stop here without creating the next event this event is reserved to the master process
if it's a response, we append "Response".
if it's a shadow - go to access it's private
if it's allowed, then the autoloader will be called if the class does not exist.
if it's been killed because of dynamic process management don't restart it automaticaly
if it's changed into a warning
if left is 0 then there is nothing more to send, but if the last packet was exactly with the size MYSQLND_MAX_PACKET_SIZE we need to send additional packet, which has empty payload.
if main entry matches, print it...
if multiple encodings specified, detect automagically
if name is an absolute filename then test directly
if needle was ascii too, we are all done, otherwise we need to try using Unicode to see what we get
if new_value is string "NULL" and field has default value, remove element to use default value
if no children, then must be a scalar value.
if no script_encoding specified, just leave alone
if non zero missing dirs will be created
if non-existent field
if non-null, this is the path to a temporary file that is to be deleted when the stream is closed
if none available it's simply forgotton
if not __APPLE__
if not already most-recently-used
if not background
if not long we're operating on lzval
if not valid serialized data, it is a regular string
if not, it's certainly not an HTTP over fcgi request
if opened for append, we need to revise our idea of the initial file position
if our parent node, by definition a vector, is not an array, then our element name must be our key identifier.
if pLimit is null, pOffset will always be null as well.
if param_type is PDO_PARAM_ZVAL the driver has to provide correct data
if parts of the stream can't be written, purge it completely
if phar_get_or_create_entry_data returns a sub-directory, we have to free it
if save path is an empty string, determine the temporary dir
if securityPrefs is set to NONE, we don't have to do any checks, but otherwise...
if signature matched, no need to check CRC32 for each file
if socket was created from a stream, give the stream a chance to take care of the operation itself, thereby allowing it to update its internal state
if something found
if subject is an array
if subject is not an array
if that failed, assumed that the GUID is actually a CLSID and attempt to get the library via an instance of that class
if the caller asked for a persistent stream but the wrapper did not return one, force an error here
if the caller put us in the middle of a grapheme, we can't detect it in all cases since we can't back up.
if the conch has data compare the contents
if the conch isn't writable and doesn't match, we can't take it
if the content length is zero.
if the current word puts us over the linelength, copy back up until the last space, insert a break, and move up the laststart
if the dll wasn't loaded - exit.
if the file doesn't exist, try to extract PATH_INFO out of it by stat'ing back through the '/' this fixes url's like /info.php/test
if the given filename is an EGD socket, don't write anything back to it
if the global prefix is not set
if the needle was ascii too, we are done
if the offset of the resulting string exceeds the length, then restore the state
if the opened path is set, copy it out
if the param is NULL, then we assume that they wanted to bind a lob locator into it from the query
if the pointers match then only subtract the length of the path
if the query isn't supported by the protocol, fallback to emulation
if the script we've got is stored in SHM
if the socket is in non-blocking mode and there's no data to read, don't output any error, as this is a normal situation, and not an error
if the status code did not change, we do not want to change the status line, and no need to change the code
if the stream doesn't directly support stat-ing, return with failure.
if the stream is a stdio stream let's give it a chance to respond first, to avoid doubling up the layers of stdio with an fopencookie
if the stream was wrapped, allow the wrapper to stat it
if the type is however not long, then we will do a goto in the next switch.
if the user has configured who they are, send a From: line
if the user has configured who they are, send that as the password
if the user stream was registered as local and we are in include context, we add allow_url_include restrictions to allow_url_fopen ones
if the value's type is known...
if the value's type is not known...
if the wp prefix is not set
if there are different types
if there is at least on idle child, it will handle the connection, stop here
if there is data in the buffer, it's not EOF
if there is no path name after the file, do not bother
if there was an error in the fetch then don't cache
if there wasn't a hash collision, and this doesn't
if there's no ob active, ob has been stopped
if there's no sa_len, assume the ifr_addr field is a sockaddr
if this code fails to work, check main/streams/streams.c, _php_stream_stat_path
if this was byref, update the zval
if turned on - check the compiled script ADLER32 checksum
if we already have a lock, it is exclusive.
if we are applying case conversions on column names, do so now
if we are beyond our limit, then the loop is done
if we are cutting, and we've accumulated enough characters, and we haven't see a space for this line, copy and insert a break.
if we are making a request, we want to use the methodname as is.
if we assign referenced variable, we should separate it
if we couldn't destruct cleanly, mark all objects as destructed anyway
if we did not manage to read the seed file, we should not write a low-entropy seed file back
if we don't have a user defined error handler
if we don't stop an array/iterator yield from, the exception will only reach the generator after the values were all iterated over
if we failed to get the lock then someone else must have it
if we filled their buffer, return
if we get here, we can be sure that we have enough bytes to copy safely
if we get here, we don't have a numeric string
if we have __call and method which is not part of the class function table is called, we cal __call handler.
if we have __set and property that is not part of the properties array is set, we call __set handler.
if we have called include in the frame above - this is the file we have included.
if we just compared std.properties, don't do it again
if we make it to this point, we must provide a value for the parameter
if we neither have an explicit nor an implicit alias, we use the filename
if we read any data...
if we still have memory then format the origin
if we stripped out all the '/' and still didn't find a valid path...
if we talk to an old ftpd-ssl
if we want to call 16 bit regs AX,BX,CX,...
if we're setting ourselves to ourselves...
if we're started on command line, check to see if we are being started as an 'external' fastcgi server by accepting a bindpath parameter.
if you pass a listen port, we will read and write on listen port
if you prepare and then execute passing an array of params keyed by names, then this will trigger, and we don't want that
if you want to remove following line,  you should check in parse and compile time.
ifdef SQLITE_DEBUG
ifdef SQLITE_ENABLE_STAT4
ifdef SQLITE_NO_SYNC elif HAVE_FULLFSYNC
ifdef ZIP_OPSYS_DEFAULT
ifndef Bad_float_h
ifndef HAVE_STRPTIME
ifndef IEEE_Arith
ifndef NDEBUG
ifndef SQLITE_AMALGAMATION
ifndef SQLITE_DISABLE_FTS3_UNICODE
ifndef SQLITE_OMIT_AUTOVACUUM
ifndef SQLITE_OMIT_FOREIGN_KEY
ifndef SQLITE_OMIT_SHARED_CACHE
ifndef SQLITE_OMIT_TRIGGER
ifndef SQLITE_OMIT_WAL
ifndef _SQLITE3RTREE_H_
ignorableWhitespace
ignore 'n', 't' or other stuff
ignore .phpdbginit
ignore SIG_IGN
ignore ZEND_EXT_STMT and ZEND_TICKS
ignore autoresume if autoseek is switched off
ignore directories
ignore errors
ignore errors here, just return failure
ignore handle parameter in procedural interface
ignore if the new value equals the old one
ignore leading spaces in the variable name
ignore partial string matches
ignore return code
ignore sequences of consonants with same soundex
ignore the response
ignore this call
ignore trailer
ignore whitespace
iid that we "implement" for event sinking
illegal character
illegal character or end of buffer
illegal character output function for conv-filter
illegal sequence
im, points, num_points, col
im1 must be True Color
im2 must be indexed
imap_thread, stealing this from header cclient -rjs3
imm constraints when stmt started
immediate action required
impact perf a bit, but not that much.
implementation
implicit result set statement handle
import inherited sockets
in IEEE arithmetic.
in MSVC.NET these are available but only for __cplusplus and not _MSC_EXTENSIONS
in case it's a tables-only JPEG stream
in case of SSL_ERROR_WANT_READ/WRITE, do not retry in non-blocking mode
in case of unhandled exception return to upward catch block
in case of unhandled exception return to upward finally block
in case value is never init'd, we don't dtor to think it is a string or something
in case we need to try again for an :auto: named lock file
in concatenated header, don't include Layout.h it's already at the top
in event loop
in event_loop
in hash, if not, try to find a spot for it
in most cases bz2 offers at least 2:1 compression, so we use that as our base
in non-OOP version, accept both a transliterator and a string
in non-debug mode we have no problem with 0-length files
in order to avoid signed/unsigned problems
in soap, types may be specified in either element name -or- with xsi:type attribute.
in the "dark" zone
in the "light" zone
in the beginning of the dialog
in this case no array_key_compare is needed
in this case we don't want to pop anything of the argument-stack
in this function we have to jump through some loops because we're getting the translated table from data structures that are optimized for random access, not traversal
in this situation, we are passing the brig_in brigade into the stream read buffer
in transaction
in-memory cache entry is expired
in-memory cache overflow
in/out data
in/out data type
in1:   P1 is an input
in2:   P2 is an input
in3:   P3 is an input
in: a NULL terminated string like "abc,def,ghi"  returns: an emalloced buffer or NULL on failure.
in_event_loop
in_free will let streams code skip destructing - big HACK, but STREAMS suck big time regarding persistent streams.
include case folding data generated from the official UnicodeData.txt file
include_filename always points to the last filename of the last last called-function.
includes SQL_NO_DATA
includes handler to validate object state when retrieving methods
includes vector types.
includes zlib.h and setjmp.h
incompatible nullability
inconsistent NEWLINE options
increment entry count
increment pen position
increment recursion depth gauge
increment the cell count
increment the result length by how much we've added to the string
increment, check for overflow and undo increment if so.
incremental initialization of empty Buckets
index b-tree
index entries counter
index internal
index of current array for PL/SQL or row index for SQL
index of next token to be returned
index pointer
indicate that there are no more items
indicate that we have element 0
indicate that we want to copy from the current position to the end of the LOB
indicates pending connection
indicator value
inet_ntop should be used instead of inet_ntoa
info about users requires an action first
info position
information function
inheritance ensures the class has necessary userland methods
inheritance ensures the class has the necessary userland methods
inherited members are overridden by members inserted by traits
inherited socket
init cursor
init empty string in case we don't find any char data
init handler: allocate read buffer and open file
init kqueue and stuff
init the filter class ancestor
init to max poss dist
init value containers
init.c: bcmath library file.
init_working_dir sets the current working directory to the app root.
initial distance values
initial estimate
initial hash size
initial resource fetch
initial values for increments
initialise MIME type to none
initialization part - the functions have not been loaded yet.
initialize a few bytes in the case the next function fails
initialize a phar_archive_data's read-only fp for existing phar data
initialize converter
initialize filter and collector data
initialize font library and font cache on first call
initialize from file
initialize global variables
initialize internal state
initialize local variables
initialize new range
initialize next
initialize static members of internal class
initialize string
initialize the defaults
initialize the stack.
initialize vararg mechanism
initialize_result_set_rest
initialized array
initializing something before the DLL even is available to be called.
initializing the special array for the return values
inittls allocates a thread-local storage slot for g.
input address
input we are tokenizing
input: an XMLRPC_VALUE representing a fault struct in xml-rpc style.
insert a NULL value into the column
insert into hash, return error on existence or memory issues
insert serialized variable into shared memory
inside the message body.
inspired from ext/standard/info.c
instance not created by PDO object
instr prefix
instruction types
insufficient memory
int2num.c: bcmath library file.
intact value
integer string
intentional fall-through
intentionally empty
intentionally using str_find here, in case the hash value is set, but the string val is changed later
interactive mode
interfaces aren't really implemented, so we create a new table
internal error
internal error: code overflow
internal error: overran compiling workspace
internal error: previously-checked referenced subpattern not found
internal error: unexpected repeat
internal xml-rpc error"
internalSubset
interned empty string
internetwork: UDP, TCP, etc.
intersection
intersitial
interval is required
invalid MB sequence
invalid UTF-8 string
invalid character for encoding"
invalid character in count
invalid character in salt
invalid escape sequence in character class
invalid eucjpms character
invalid euckr character
invalid fd, unless during file system support introspection, in which  it actually means what it says
invalid length
invalid mb character
invalid method parameters"
invalid multibyte header
invalid php://thingy
invalid range in character class
invalid search type, but no need to complain here
invalid socket
invalid ujis character
invalid utf8 character
invalid xml-rpc.
invalidate cached format types
invalidate lineno
invalidate phar cache
invalidate the buffer contents
invert src image
invoke the constructor
io.c  Implements the simple I/O 'helper' routines.
io_dp.c  Implements the dynamic pointer interface.
io_file.c  Implements the file interface.
io_ss.c  Implements the Source/Sink interface.
is a child, nothing to do here
is also accessible.
is consitent with the way -R works where the stdin file handle
is correcct.
is easy to generalize ...
is it already missing...
is not POSIX bracket
is not in hashtable, thus, function is not to be excluded
is re-populated each EXEC_PRE
is subdirectory
is upper range
isCommit flag passed to sqlite3PagerMovepage
isMainJrnl is 0 or 1
isMallocInit
isMutexInit
isPCacheInit
isSavepnt is 0 or 1
isStandalone
isn't NULL terminated
isolation level
it appears that the username is always first
it doesn't matter that we do some hash traversal here, since it is done only in an error condition arising from a network connection problem
it is a standalone directory, job done
it is always safe to cast an interface to IUnknown
it is really faster to scan twice and allocate mem once instead of scanning once and constantly reallocing
it probably did bail out already
it then calls the corresponding PHP function to handle the method.
it was stored perfectly
it was truncated
it will be interpreted as the cert data If you supply makeresource, the result will be registered as an x509 resource and it's value returned in makeresource.
it's a new pool
it's a private property, so it can't be inherited
it's a timer event
it's a triggered event on incoming data
it's an X509 file/cert of some kind, and we need to extract the data from that
it's copied from xpath.c
it's not private anymore
it's ok to convert str_len to in32_t since if it were too big intl_convert_utf8_to_utf16 above would fail
it's possible pemalloc returns NULL instead of causing it to bail out
items are slightly special
iter through params, adding to types array
iterate over all rounds:
iterate through element attributes, pick out useful stuff.
iterate through first character matches
iterate through sigs
iterate throught triggered events
iterate_upper_bound points beyond the last expected entry
iterates through a list of structs and finds the one with key "name" matching needle.
iterates through docs callbacks and calls any that have not yet been called
iterator handler table
iterator interface, c-level functions used by engine
ither by passing in the already created xmlnode or passing in the node name
its maximum squared-distance to any point in the update box.
jan  feb  mar  apr  may  jun  jul  aug  sep  oct  nov  dec
jan  feb  mrt  apr  may  jun  jul  aug  sep  oct  nov  dec
jewish month
joaat_buf - perform a Jenkins's one-at-a-time hash on a buffer  input: buf - start of buffer to hash len - length of buffer in octets  returns: 32 bit hash as a static hash type
json error constants
judge input/output filter
jump here if parent key found
jump over anon class declaration
jump, in1, in3
jump, in1, out3
jump:  P2 holds jmp target
jumping to next on NZ - can follow to it and jump only on Z
jumping to next on Z - can follow to it and jump only on NZ
jumps if either operand is NULL
just break anyway, to avoid greedy read
just call php_addslashes quotes
just created
just ignore this shit.
just in case long path gets truncated and not null terminated
just in case pstr points in the middle of a character, move forward to the start of the next char
just in case there's a class with a zillion characters in it.
just leave things as-is - an empty variant
just make it available
just no more data ready
just return 0 if we hit the end-of-file
just return if the converter is not activated.
just two strings: use maximum performance version
kana first char
kanji first char
kanji second char
keep NOP to support ZEND_VM_SMART_BRANCH
keep compiler quiet
keep going until we have less than 24 bits
keep group or make empty if not existent
keep in mind that image_info does not store editor value
keep it somewhat sane
keep non-persistent sdl and return it
keep src so discard does not get rid of it
keep stmt when free query
keep the allow-NULL flag
keep the arg as binary, since the encoding is not known
keep the compiler happy
keep them as 32bits
keep track of last marker
keepwalking
key is stored withOUT NUL val is stored WITH    NUL
key to check for
key1 must be present.
key2 must be free.
keylen not needed here
kids will inherit the env, don't let them spawn
kill the object
kill the object handle for the stmt here
l_in, r_in, l_out, and r_out are in pseudo-"big-endian" format.
language resolver
large object functions
largest prime smaller than 65536
last character cannot be -, unless explicitly allowed by the user
last ditch default.
last error information
last error message
last insert id
last intentionally missing break
last member
last one is beyound our start offset
last parent, last node
lastErrno set by seekAndRead
lastErrno set by seekAndWrite
last_id not supported
last_op is the last opcode of the current block
latin or kana
latin, CTLs
lazy init metadata
lazy loading of introspection data
lc holds the last significant character read and br is a bracket counter.
ldap_init does not support URLs.
leading '..' must not be removed in case of relative path
leave a empty object, will be dtor later by CLONE handler
leave previous item in place
leave the variant slot empty to simplify cleanup
leave yield from mode to properly allow finally execution
leaves_end_block
len       length of id string if known, or 0 if unknown.
len       length of val string if known, or 0 if unknown.
length excluding ipv4
length includes itself
length is never 0
length of converted string
length of entry
length of input
length of state vector
lengthptr         NULL during the real compile phase points to length accumulator during pre-compile phase Returns:            TRUE on success
lenp is 32 bit because converted comment can be longer than ZIP_UINT16_MAX
less restrictive than unicode_cp_is_allowed
less than 1 is an error
let IB parse it as a string
let STDOUT function as STDERR, just in case writing to STDOUT directly
let mktime decide if DST is in effect
let release_sysvsem_sem know we have removed the semaphore to avoid issues with releasing.
let see if the path already exists
let's crypt buffer now
let's hope the pointer is aligned
let's keep the nul-terminate tradition
let's quote all the values
let's search
let's see if this string has a matching dsn in the php.ini
let's see if we have one cached....
lets allow NIL
lfchars must be encoded in ASCII here
libcurl expects long datatype.
libedit don't need this call which set the tty in cooked mode
libmysql API docs say it should be so for SELECT statements
libmysql just moves to the end, it does traversing of a linked list
libmysql's documentation says it should be so for SELECT statements
library is already initialized, now init our request
libxml is segfaulting in versions up to 2.6.8 using xmlTextReaderClose so for now we will free the whole reader when close is called as it would get rebuilt on a new load anyways
libxslt uses _private, so we must copy the imported stylesheet document otherwise the node proxies will be a mess
like INTL_CHECK_STATUS, but as a function and varying the name of the func
limit is at least -1 therefore no need of bounds checking : i will be always less than found
limit output to these functions
limit text/image from network
linear interpolation between w and v
link field is null-terminated unless it has 100 non-null chars.
link in the cram-md5 authenticator
link in the dummy driver
link in the gss authenticator
link in the imap driver
link in the log authenticator
link in the mbx driver
link in the mh driver
link in the mmdf driver
link in the mtx driver
link in the news driver
link in the nntp driver
link in the phile driver
link in the plain authenticator
link in the pop3 driver
link in the tenex driver
link in the unix driver
link key to the same persistent script in hash table
link object
link properties
link the transaction into the connection-transaction list
linux wants this when XOPEN mode is on
list compiled in modules
list of event
list of huge allocated blocks
list of tokens used in vocab
list of unused chunks
literal 0x0a byte
literals are assumed to not be manipulated during executing of their op_array and as such async safe
little bits about characters for metaphone
little mini hack so that we can use this code from the dbh ctor
little-endian
load PHP extension
load Zend extension
load a magic file
load directory or file
load dynamic symbol
load extension file
load the Function from the DLL
load up the library from the named file
loaded module, but not needed
loaded plugins
local consoles cannot disconnect, ignore EOF
local filename, need to perform open_basedir check
locale specifies a codeset
locale_get_default has a conflict since ICU also has a function with the same  name in fact ICU appends the version no.
localeconv doesn't return an error condition
localeconv mutex
lock resolution
lock semaphore now but bail out when already locked.
lock the RESERVED byte
log to email
log to stderr
logic above is as follows: If an explicit alias was requested, ensure the filename passed in matches the phar's filename.
logic copied from _php_stream_stat, but we only want to fail if the wrapper supports stat, otherwise, figure it out from the open.
logic hacked from ext/standard/datetime.c
logical database name
long long available
longest sane line length
look ahead for the line break chars to make a right decision how to consume incoming characters
look for LF in the data
look for a potential boundary match, only read data up to that point
look for byref params
look for more extensions
look it up from the cp1252 table
look up for a delimiter
lookbehind assertion is not fixed length
looking for 'Connection: close'
looking for 'Connection: keep-alive'
looking for 'Transfer-Encoding: chunked'
looks like we'll need to resolve it
lookup bind by index
lookup bind first via hash and then index
lookup by "not-real" path
lookup by real path
lookup_cv may be using another zend_string instance
loony ENTER
loop chunks to find BMHD chunk
loop counter
loop through all the provided arguments and set dpb fields accordingly
loop thru lines
loop to search the first not undefined element...
lower left corner of update box
lowercased unqualified constant name
lru page list
mach_clock also should be re-initialized in child process after fork
macosx clock
macro generates multiple statements
magic already verified
magic isset
magic unset
magic/hack.
main entry didn't match, flush its continuations
maintain backwards compatibility
major HTTP version or dot
major problem re-opening, so we ignore this file and the error
make a connection attempt
make a copy and push that on the stack instead
make a dbname
make a fresh copy each time - strtok corrupts it.
make a new tweenColorCache on every call because caching colormappings between calls is not safe.
make best effort if BOM is missing
make block empty
make core report what it should
make empty directory for .phar magic directory
make empty root directory for empty phar
make encoding list
make immutable array
make it lowercase
make it zero-based internally
make our hash too "full".
make path point to the drive letter
make php call us to get _ENV vars
make room for NUL
make stream not being closed when the zval is freed
make sure everything is saved
make sure original values are remembered in ORIG_ copies if we've changed them
make sure path_info/translated are empty
make sure that the PGSQL_CONNECT_FORCE_NEW bit is not part of the hash so that subsequent connections can re-use this connection.
make sure that the temporary file is removed
make sure that the trait method is not from a class mentioned in exclude_from_classes, for consistency
make sure the DN contains no NUL bytes
make sure the top level is a normal array
make sure this sorts last
make sure to process initialized vars only
make sure we are at the right location to read the manifest
make sure we got a 227 response
make sure we have enough memory
make sure we've consumed all request input data
make the encoding description string  exp.
make the length even
make the path lowercase on Windows, for case insensitivity.
make the stdio mode be binary
make values string
make zend_get_property_info silent if we have getter - we may want to use it
makes no representations concerning either the merchantability of this software or the suitability of this software for any particular purpose.
makes no sense
malloc the extension array
malloc was used to store value
malloc.c filters out 0 byte requests
manage options
map        - contains service information for each page.
map a string to an xmlrpc type
map a string to an xmlrpc vector type
map an ID to a name
map an xmlrpc type to a string
map as safe array
map driver specific error message to PDO error
map number to name
map parser errors to standard xml-rpc errors
map the buffer to a block:
map the low 64 bits of `n' to the modified-base64 characters
map the modification type
map the modified-base64 character `c' to its 64 bit value
mark all possible sources as used
mark as outside range and get buffer
mark as unused
mark end of table
mark first pages as allocated
mark initialized
mark instruction as JUMP or RET
mark pointer as "special" using low bit
mark run as allocated
mark the beginning of varargs
mark the descriptor close-on-exec, so that it won't be inherited by potential other children
mark the event as not registered
mark the event as registered
mark the old one for deletion
mark the vent as not registered
mark this name as used
marking buffer as enabled and not used
marking buffer as used
mask     the highest   bit of u
mask all but highest   bit of u
mask all but lowest    bit of u
masking bits, we could count them too
match full, case insensitive, command name
match single letter alias
match with empty at end
matched it and printed type
matched position
matches almost anything penalize
matches anything penalize
matching region of POSIX API
max 8 bytes for size
max byte length
max depth of stack
max enc length
max packet size used internally by BIND
max size of input/output data
maximum code, given n_bits
maximum depth of the parser stack
maximum length of string
maximum length of the destination buffer
maximum number of bytes we are reading
maximum size before value is interpreted as a LONG value
maximum size of colormap
maximum string length, worst case situation
maxlen can never be smaller than 128
may be called.
may be negative.
may need more than 16 bits
may not be initialized if file could not be created
may or may not have Implicit Result Set children
may overflow
may warning, and return FALSE
maybe a number
maybe it would be better to create one for this purpose
maybe it's better to use weak name instead
maybe shutdown method call exit, we just ignore it
mbcs first byte
mbcs fourth char
mbcs second byte
mbstring.language directive is processed in per-dir or runtime context and 3.
measures length
medial whitespaces
mem: OP_REPEAT ID
mem: null check id
members from the current class override trait methods
memory device output functions
memory limit
memory overflow flag
memrchr is a GNU specific extension Emulate for wide compatibility
merge new config
merge per-directory config structures
merge per-server config structures
message body
message handler
metadata functions
metonic cycle    A 19 year cycle which determines which years are leap years and which are common years.
mfischer, 20020514: I commented this out because it really seems bogus.
microseconds
might be JIT
might not work for EBCDIC
miliseconds
min and max variables can't be used together
min byte length
min distance to colormap entry i
min enc length
min/max aggregates seen.
minimum number of decimal digits to distinguish double values
minor HTTP version or end of request line
mips 32-bit arch dependent functions.
mips 64-bit arch dependent functions.
misc function
miserable CBW or CWDE
mix of names and numbers
mixed is probably closest thing we have to compound type.
mixed use named group and no-named group
mnHeap, mxHeap
mnd_free will reference LOCK_access and crash...
mnd_free will reference LOCK_access and might crash, depending on the caller...
mod r/m byte.
mod_data contains data required by PS modules.
mode can be ignored, maximum depth is 1
mode flags for opening fds
mode for proc_open code
modify type to prevent indirect destruction
module init
modulus by zero
mop things up if we ended on a boundary
more general version: calc cost by ins/rep/del weights
more methods live here
more than just our fp resource is open for this file
most general version: calc cost by user-supplied function
motorola is easier to read
mount an absolute path or uri to a path internal to the phar archive
mount the file just in time
mount the file/directory just in time
move after the comma, to the next string
move all chunks except of the first one into the cache
move early ranges to make a room
move extra args into separate array after all CV and TMP vars
move hi bit of u to hi bit of v
move on to first character in field
move past hostname and port
move roots into list to free
move shared_segments and shared_free to shared memory
move the environment out of the way
move the memory buffer by the size of the window
move the non-benign sign extension flag to bit 16
move things back
move to 'e'
moved CSE1 up
moved CSE2 up
multi char folded code is not head of another folded multi char
multi-byte op code - auxiliary table chosen by prefix
multi-line assignment
multiple values allowed.
multiply by m and add a
must be always last
must be called
must be called ONLY after SUCCESSFUL accelerator_shm_read_lock
must be error since parameters are only allowed after mediatype
must be free before because references the memory pool
must be stdin, stderr or stdout
must come prior to the oniguruma header
must copy previous value because MSVCRT's putenv can free the string without notice
must have a valid element
must recompute y
must start with 1..9
must understand, sometimes present in headers.
mxParserStack
mysql lied about the column width
mysql_native_password only works with SCRAMBLE_LENGTH scramble
mysql_stmt_init
mysqli_options
mysqli_real_connect flags
mysqlnd extension - profile calls
mysqlnd extension - trace memory functions
n - The block is used at the moment, and the value contains its size.
n - The size of the previous block.
n1 has the longer scale
n1 is less than n2, subtract n1 from n2.
n2 has the longer scale
n2 is less than n1, subtract n2 from n1.
nArg of -2 is a special case
nByte must be a positive
nChar must be non-negative.
nCol rounded up for alignment
nCol values
nOffset is set to 0.
nRefInitMutex
nRoot is the number of entries in aRoot.
nSize is ensured to be in the valid range, fall back to it rather than using an undefined bis scan result.
name is not merged, since zip_stat_t doesn't own it, and src may not be valid as long as dst
name l_type l_whence l_start l_len
name of file to read from
name of the database file
name requires runtime resolution, need to check non-namespaced name
name too long, protect from CVE-2015-0235
name_ast should be evaluated only.
named entity
named or open cursors should be closed first
named pipe in socket
names for regular year
names of methods
nbits determines X.
nbr of 1st byte locked if successful
nbr of bytes to lock
nbytes passed for regularity, maybe need later
nearphrases
nearzero.c: bcmath library file.
need a brand new pdbh
need a change to trigger a new backup
need an explicit buffer to hold result
need more data before we can push data through to the stream
need space for variable name and value
need to convert the first parameter from int constant to string algorithm name
need to copy here since setlocale may change it later
need to copy to strip leading "/", will get touched again
need to ensure these go away now
need to just run handler if we're inactive and getting a signal
need to kill it
need to re-scan if input filter changed
need to use EPRT
need to use a PHPAPI function here because it is external module in windows
need to work in utf16
needed because recv doesnt set null char at end
needed because recv/read/gzread doesnt put a null at the end
needed for PG_VERSION
needed for context stuff
needed for is_url
needed for ssize_t definition
needle is converted into wchar
needle pointer
needs to be cleared, since any returned value is valid
needs to be first
neg.c: bcmath library file.
negative value to tell zlib not to write a header
negative value to tell zlib that there is no header
negative values are not supported
network path
network socket operations
never come here.
never reached
never returns
never use a timeout with non-blocking sockets
neverCorrupt
new element, call ctor as in spl_ptr_llist_push
new encoding
new entry, add the old one to the list
new line/NUL character safety check
new style delimiter: locale id follows
new style, using connection string
new version has inf
new-style file upload
new_num allocates a number and sets fields to known values.
newline before label will be subtracted from returned text, but yyleng/yytext will include it, for zend_highlight/strip, tokenizer, etc.
next UID to be assigned
next block is only NOP's
next char should be a hexadecimal digit
next character
next child is bigger
next ifd pointer
next relevant character.
next request should be able to restart it
next triggered event
next try to create a new file
next: check for conflicts with current class
next_rowset
next_rowset_func
no / detected, restore arch for error message
no DBG_RETURN please
no HAVE_LIBPNG
no LF found
no SQL error
no break - intentionally
no break for short-cut
no changes were made
no coercion for array types
no color needed
no controls right now
no copy ctor - get already copied it
no copy needed
no creating magic phar files by mounting them
no ctor no args is also ok
no current element on first call
no decimal point was found
no digits, fcvt style
no domain name may exceed this
no double encode
no effective name change
no entity on this position
no error set in the handle
no exact match.
no extension detected - instead we are dealing with an alias
no extra data - we didn't study the pattern
no formatting on logging output
no free slot
no further memory to expand hash table
no interest in caching and no information already present that is needed later inside zend_call_function.
no interpolation needed here
no length supplied or length is too big, return the rest of the string
no link found, so we have to open one
no link opened yet, implicitly open one
no mapping to unicode required
no memory, return the same non-interned string
no metadata info
no more buffered data
no more data avail
no more data to decompress, and nothing was spat out
no more data to fetch
no more elements
no more rex prefixes
no more than 15 events
no need in atomicity here
no need of looping because indexes are unique
no need to add source
no need to calloc it, we overwrite all pxl anyway
no need to check for length - re2c already did
no need to check ignore case.
no need to check, include_path not even specified in fopen/ no active phars
no need to close the transliterator manually on construction error
no need to destroy/free zres -- it's NULL in this circumstance
no need to perform a real lock at this point
no need to rethrow the exception
no need to return exit_status of the last request
no need to test the var 'full'
no new line found, let's read some more
no non-delimiter characters
no notify message
no other chars left
no overflow possible
no overflow possible up to now
no post handler registered, so we just swallow the data
no prompt command found so try help topic
no properties
no references
no result set - not a SELECT
no result set is being returned
no search prefetching
no space allocated, yet.
no statistics
no statistics , will be filled later if there are some
no supported SAPI found - disable acceleration and stop initialization
no text, so print child elems
no user security identifier
no value for mbstring.internal_encoding is given, 2.
no yyoverflow
no zend_refcounted metadata info
no, haven't placeholders at all
no, really unlock.
no, really, unlock.
no-op if possible
no_read becomes 2 in the second pass, and if this is nonblocking, we should return..
nodaemonize
non encoded block
non persistent
non public cannot be dynamic
non representable in this charset
non-ASCII codepoint read from input
non-class constant
non-default trans might have been rolled back by other call of this dtor
non-persistent
non-shortest form
non-shortest form or outside range
non-statable stream
non-static since it needs to be referenced
non-zero to write.
none of the modes present, use the default one
none of the path components exist.
none of these are real files, so they don't exist
nop is not necessary here, since the sub operation has no side effect.
nope, or yep
normal char
normal delimiter: encoding scheme follows
normal file
normal not found
normal string: do it fast
normal text without encoding
normalize and expand path
normalizer functions
not CRAY_STACK
not GCC version 2
not a X509 certificate, try to retrieve public key
not a broken symlink, move along..
not a directory
not a real definition
not a relative path after all
not a system error
not a transliterator object as first argument
not allowed
not allowed, so fall through
not be updated before SCHECK_PARTIAL.
not compressed
not conforming to spec."
not control_len, which may be larger
not currently used
not defined elsewhere
not enough bytes left for comment
not enough memory
not exif_iif_add_str : this is a buffer
not found or X 0212
not found, use initial value
not from 0..nMem-1
not handled
not in event loop yet
not increasing anymore
not initialized but needed for several options
not initialized yet
not lang or grandfathered tag
not loaded module
not much we can do if chmod fails except make the whole commit fail
not necessary
not officially supported
not part of this subtree
not possible
not reachable
not representable in target charset
not required
not supported
not supported now
not sure, if we need this...
not the same when in for-loop
not there yet
not use_cwd
not used    0x0010   // Was: SQLITE_IdxRealAsInt
not used for array binds
not used for now
not well formed",
not while in conditionals
not yet implemented
note new location within tar
note that changes here should be reflected in main/streams/streams.c::php_stream_fill_read_buffer
note that the quality of the randomness doesn't matter that much
note that the returned value is a completely new value, and must be freed.
note we assume that fill_input_buffer will never return FALSE, so suspension need not be handled.
note: EOF makes readline write prompt again in local console mode - and ignored if compiled without readline
note: this only works on strings, and only for date and base64, which do not have native php types.
nothing can override 'terminating' state
nothing for now
nothing found
nothing has been found if we got here
nothing to be done
nothing to check
nothing to destroy
nothing to do
nothing to do currently
nothing to do here
nothing to do if the path is NULL, :auto: or matches the existing path
nothing to do with the callback
nothing to do.
nothing to free
nothing to repeat
nothing to write, fail silently
notices are no errors and are not treated as such like E_WARNINGS
now an error
now attemmpt to get the exclusive lock range
now block until an event occurs
now call the function
now catch the FreeBSD style of "no matches"
now convert to seconds
now copy the actual file data to the new phar
now copy the chars after the point
now correctly move the decimal point
now deal with the tail end of things
now determine where we are
now enable ssl if we need to
now everything should be fine and an added ZEND_ACC_IMPLICIT_ABSTRACT_CLASS should be removed
now execute the statement
now extract the public key
now fetch that element
now fetch the value
now fill it in
now generate the new WHERE rowid IN clause for the DELETE/UDPATE
now insert a "." before the last / character
now keep track of the actual new text length
now parse all OIDs
now ping it
now process the tags
now pull out members of data and set them in the stat buffer
now register the events with the Interbase API
now remove this transaction from all the connection-transaction lists
now run through properties that are only going to be returned from a server, not text headers
now see what we need
now set val to be the key param and continue
now start the backup/restore job
now start the job
now store the name of the lock
now suck data from the stream and stick it into the database
now the PHP stuff
now the rest, first see if it becomes an array
now try to find an appropriate POST content handler
now walk the charset map and look for the codeset
now we are dealing with regular files, so look for metadata
now we are good to go
now we can add our information
now we can safely use proper decompression
now we expect to find a type specifier
now we have no pool memory
now we have non-pool memory
now we have the "connection" lets call the DataSource object
now we have the directory we can look how long it should be
now we know exactly how long it is
now we need to find the end of the chunk the user wants us to return
now write the manifest
now, draw to our target surface
now, perhaps, adjust the end of the line
now, perhaps, adjust the far end of the line as well
now, scan the list of persistent Phar objects referencing this phar and update the pointers
now, start over
nuke trailing whitespace
nul-terminated term
null blob, all values to zero
null by default
null is converted to 0
null line, garbage, etc
null terminate
null terminate buffer
num dir entries
num1 is set if str1 and str2 are strings.
num2long.c: bcmath library file.
num2str.c: bcmath library file.
numVars    The number of variables passed to the scan command.
number conversion flags checks
number is too big
number of allocated fragments
number of alocated chunks
number of antialias color lookups cached
number of antialised colors for indexed bitmaps
number of arguments not including unpacks
number of backrefs
number of bind variables doesn't match number of elements in type definition string
number of bits/code
number of bytes in instruction
number of bytes read from a datafile
number of cached chunks
number of candidate colors
number of cdir-entries
number of cdir-entries on this disk
number of distinct keys less than this sample
number of elements in the output vector
number of fonts cached before least recently used is replaced
number of free connections in the pool
number of free pages
number of free pages at the end of chunk
number of messages
number of named columns in virtual table
number of named substrings
number of recent messages
number of rows in the table
number of rows to fetch
number of rows where key is less than this sample
number of rows where the key equals this sample
number of unseen messages
number printable chars on current line
number too long
numbers with leading zeros
numelems can not be 0, we checked above
numeric entity
numeric index
numeric indices
numeric key
numeric n on sybase
numeric string
numerical entity
numero sign
object handles are identical, apparently this is the same object
object is alreay initialized
object properties should include no integers
obsoleted by ExtraSamples
obsoleted by SampleFormat
obtain a resource id
obtain brect so that we can size the image
occur in pairs
occurrences
octal overflow
of 'magick'.
of 'sortKeyBuf' may be changed due to realloc.
of 1.1.1970
of ORDER BY terms
of ORDER BY terms satisfied.
of coordinates
of course we would have failed anyway...
of elements allowed
of reg prior to regData available for use
of the TK_xx values...
of the default ASCII testing.
offset and amt determine what portion of the data or key to retrieve.
offset for ifd values outside ifd directory
offset to first byte to lock
offset/index must be an integer
okay, the connection is open and the server is still alive
old calling convention, deprecated since PHP 4.2
old data descriptors have no signature
old non-POSIX version
old pixel value
old/new mapping.
omit notice if resource doesn't exist anymore
on PARENT EXEC we want socket fds to be inherited through environment variable
on a walk, an empty string means top of tree - no error
on either side of the input string.
on error in the hash iterator above, error is set
on no results, return an empty array
on success "arg" is converted to IS_STRING
on zvals: handle references, if recursive also objects and arrays ...
once added, assume that classes are stable...
one company doing so is very much envolved in JPEG...
one day, we could fill in the details based on Date: and Content-Length: headers.
one id was passed, could be db or trans id
one of TK_DELETE, TK_INSERT, TK_UPDATE
one or two bytes
one past the end
one substitution string
one to three bytes
one-byte char
one-byte or second of two-byte char
one-byte or second or fourth of four-byte char
only "r" and "rb" are supported
only allow abbreviating commands that can be aliased
only bother to open temp file if we have data
only check openbasedir for files, not for phar streams
only fastcgi will get here
only for ocifetchinto BC
only free decode if it was allocated by rfc822_qprint or rfc822_base64
only free if exists
only free local errors
only free up to i - 1
only get here if both points are inside the window
only if need brect
only non-blocking reading, avoid non-blocking writing
only one FD is necessary at startup for the master process signal pipe
only one character
only one row at a time is supported for now
only perform the check if the msgno is a message number and not a UID
only re-establish the shared lock if necessary
only run this once
only scheme is available
only set script_file if not set already and not in direct mode and not at end of parameter list
only set the sqlite return value if we are a scalar function, or if we are finalizing an aggregate
only the files, directories are ignored
only the master can store
only these are allowed
only these two are allowed
only used here, let do a generic fixed point integers later if required by other part of GD
only used if flags includes ENT_HTML_IGNORE_ERRORS or ENT_HTML_SUBSTITUTE_DISALLOWED_CHARS
only when DIFF_ASSOC
only when DIFF_KEY
only when INTERSECT_ASSOC
only workers reach this point
ooo, a real large object
oops, too many signals for us to track, so we'll forget about this one
op_array ctor
op_array dtor
op_array handler
op_arrays are allocated on arena, so we don't have to free them
open /dev/poll for future usages
open Backup Engine that we will use for backing up our database
open a directory resource
open a new temp file for writing
open and decompress a compressed phar entry
open basedir check
open default transaction
open file object for the database file
open file pointers refer to this fp, do not free the stream
open file to resolve the path
open for reading
open the data channel
open things up
open_basedir not set yet, go ahead and give it a value
opens up a data stream
openssl recommends a buffer length of 80
operand of unlimited repeat could match the empty string
opline where T is first used
optimize buffer size
optimize each basic block separately
optimized single assignment
option only
optional error    - error result data.
options for json_decode
options for json_encode
options not implemented case LDAP_OPT_SERVER_CONTROLS: case LDAP_OPT_CLIENT_CONTROLS: case LDAP_OPT_API_INFO: case LDAP_OPT_API_FEATURE_INFO:
options with boolean value
options with control list value
options with int value
options with string value
or COPY, CHECKOUT
or HTTP_PROPPATCH
or MOVE, MKCALENDAR, MKACTIVITY, MERGE, M-SEARCH
or PROPFIND or PROPPATCH or PUT
or UNSUBSCRIBE
or a persistent one
or anything at all really, so long as its got some text.
or by looking in the input descriptor
or if the multiplier is zero
or if the sub-request environment differs from the main-request.
or invalid singleton at start of language
or the birth of Jesus Christ, did not come into use until several centuries later when Christianity became a dominant religion.
or the load of functions from the DLL failed
or uint, ubigint, usmallint Sybase AS12
orderby_opt
ordinary characters
origin and buffer available, so lets come up with the error message
original unqualified constant name
other end is outside to the left
other end is outside to the right
other error
other headers
other strings
other system daemons
other times than 0h UT as well.
other types could be used here - eg: file pointers and read in the data from them
otherwise just skip those entries
otherwise not freed from memory
otherwise the optab entry captures it
otherwise there may be huge holes between two entries
otherwise we already did this
otherwise we just have one last element to add to the array
otherwise, default to generic "item"
otherwise, default to sending all methods
otherwise, print element contents
otherwise, the filename of the script will be retreived later via argc/argv
otherwise, use the type as the name.
otherwise, we are going to bypass the buffer
our types are not unsigned
out of memory
out of range for timestamps
out2:  P2 is an output
out3:  P3 is an output
outofmem.c: bcmath library file.
output a little shorter than "length"
output address
output any remaining alerts at E_NOTICE level
output any remaining errors at their original error level
output code filter
output cookie, mini-header, and contents
output functions return int, so pass in int max
output in hex format
output line info
output options
output readable address
output trailing cookie
output variables in select, select for update
output vector for substring information
output.c: bcmath library file.
output: an XMLRPC_VALUE representing a fault struct in soap style, with xmlrpc codes mapped to soap codes, and all other values preserved.
overflow check
overflow or past end of file
overflow, refuse to do anything
overjump leading space
overlay becomes quite opaque.
overlong MARK name
override file_exists
override original function.
override path_translated if -f on command line
override the default tcp socket provider
overriden for garbage collection
overwrite Windows GDI define in case of windows build
p cannot be part of a CHECK constraint
p1 is smaller
p2 is smaller
pBuf is normally NULL.
pCell might point to some temporary storage.
pContext from when function registered
pCrsr NULL on PseudoTables
pCur is always valid so KeySize cannot fail
pDestIdx has no corresponding index in pSrc
pDestructor
pDone always used on sub-journals
pDone never used on non-savepoint
pE has not.
pE is a term in an ORDER BY or GROUP BY clause.
pExpr is original.
pFrom will be left pointing to that path
pIdx is a covering index.
pIdx is not a UNIQUE index
pIdx is usable
pOrderBy is really a GROUP BY
pOrderby is really a DISTINCT clause
pPage and up to NB siblings after balancing
pPage and up to two siblings
pPage is a leaf node.
pRec is unchanged.
pSelect is correlated, not constant
pText may or may not be nul-terminated.
pVbeBranchArg
pWLoop is a winner.
pWriter has an exclusive lock
paBlob may be NULL or non-NULL.
pad unused memory
pad with '0's
page-size bytes of space for parent ovfl
pairwise merge only.
parameter was not defined
parent handle
parent process
parentheses nested too deeply
parentheses too deeply nested
parse extended info
parse extra config from args array, promote this to an extra function
parse headers
parse out the IP and port
parse out the port
parse out the timestamp
parse scheme
parse the XML
parse the address
parse the data source name
parse the return value from one of the stat functions and store the relevant fields into the statbuf provided
parse the string and save the extension in the array
parses soap arrayType attribute to generate an array_info structure.
part before the match
partial header
pass 10: - remove NOPs
pass 11 - compact literals table
pass 11: - Compact literals table
pass 2: - convert non-numeric constants to numeric constants in numeric operators - optimize constant conditional JMPs - optimize static BRKs and CONTs
pass 2: - convert non-numeric constants to numeric constants in numeric operators - optimize constant conditional JMPs - optimize static BRKs and CONTs - pre-evaluate constant function calls
pass 4 - optimize INIT_FCALL_BY_NAME to DO_FCALL
pass 5: - CFG optimization
pass 6: - DFA optimization
pass 9: - Optimize temp variables usage
pass all data in one go
pass back a key resource
pass back its IDispatch directly
pass input along, if it's the last handler in the stack
pass output along
pass the entire chunk through the converter
pass the underlying object
pass the variant by reference
pass the xml_elem_data struct along
passing non string values leaks, object uses toString, it returns NULL See bug38255.phpt
passive connection handler
password message is to long
path for the new unixFile
path is fine
paths on windows should be case-insensitive
pattern matching function for filenames.
pc is measured in bits for monochrome images
pce now contains the compiled regex
pcre_get_compiled_regex_cache has already sent error
pcre_maketables.c notices this
pcre_printint.c should not include any headers
peak memory usage
peak number of allocated chunks for current request
peak size of allocated pages
peek at data
peek at next char
per RFC 3629, UTF-8 can only represent 21 bits
per server data
per-request shutdown function
per-request startup function
per-script activation
per-script deactivation
perform a fetch.
perform dirname
perform final modification of zip contents for each file in the manifest before saving
perform rename magic
perform sanity check.
perform seek operation
perform the conversion and then pass the request on to the innerstream
perform validation
performance optimizations by Phong Tran
performs heuristics on an xmlrpc_vector_array to determine appropriate soap arrayType string.
performs registration of introspection methods
persist bucket and key
persist the data itself
persistent connections
persistent_id
pg_attribute.atthasdef
pg_attribute.attlen
pg_attribute.attname
pg_attribute.attndims
pg_attribute.attnonull
pg_attribute.attnum
pg_convert options
pg_description.description
pg_insert/update/delete/select options
pg_type.typname
pg_type.typtype
phar_wrapper_close
phar_wrapper_stat,
phase 1: look for args
phonize one letter We don't know the buffers size in advance.
php arrays have no distinction between array and struct types.
php functions
php specific
php.ini ignore
php.ini path override
php.ini support
php_dom_xmlSetTreeDoc is a custom implementation of xmlSetTreeDoc needed for hack in appendXML due to libxml bug - no need to share this function
php_getopt want to identify the last param
php_magic_database is a const, performing writes will segfault.
php_signal using sigaction is derived from Advanced Programing in the Unix Environment by W.
php_stream_close segfaults on NULL
phpdbg options
phpdbg_lexer.l
phpext_mysql_ptr,
phpext_odbc_ptr,
phpext_xml_ptr, phpext_wddx_ptr
pid_t is signed
ping connection
ping_interval is -1
pjw 2.0.12.
placeholder length
placeholder name
plain sockets only - let winsock handle the whole thing
please do not add coverage here: the segment would be leaked and impossible to delete via php
plug in our gets
plugin shutdown
pm.max_children
pm.start_servers, pm.min_spare_servers, pm.max_spare_servers
pn prints the number NUM in base 10.
pnBlob must be non-NULL.
point at our new starting point
point in the phonization we're at.
pointer and length of key
pointer into main cache array
pointer to array entry
pointer to data
pointer to globals allocated in SHM and shared across processes
pointer to mbfl string for return value
pointer to next byte to read/write
pointer to sort key
pointer to string array
pointer to the histogram
pointers to fragments
points to another variant
pop it off the stack
port cannot be longer then 5 characters
port release number
port update number
pos in buffer to store sort key
pos is one past the last UChar - and represent the number of code units to advance in the utf-8 buffer
position in new buffer of last blank char
position-list size field value
posix monotonic clock - preferred source of time
possible request loss
possibly not being initialized.
post deactivate
post-process REQUEST_URI and retrieve the actual request URI.
ppc 32-bit arch dependent functions.
ppc 64-bit arch dependent functions.
pre 4.3 behaviour, shouldn't be used but provides BC
pre-allocate for string length plus 2 quotes
pre-conversion encoding
pre-fetch the element
pre-readonly check, we need to know if this is a data phar
preceding read
preferred MIME name
preferred is buffered read
preferred is unbuffered read
prepare argc
prepare for the next iteration
prepare the statement
prepare the timeout value for use
prepare to output
prepared query: set the query name and defer the actual prepare until the first execute call
prepared statement under construction
prereq always non-zero
preserve ratio
preserve the next character
pretend we don't support this hash type
pretty much apache specific.
pretty name
prevent CRLFCRLF
prevent NaN
prevent a event race condition when child process have not set up its own event loop
prevent a signal race condition when child process have not set up it's own signal handler yet
prevent any ".phar" without a stub getting through
prevent circular getting
prevent circular setting
prevent circular unsetting
prevent double free if following loop is interrupted
prevent duping if logging to syslog
prevent infinite redirects
prevent leak if variables are already bound
prevent more data from coming in
prevent null-byte poisoning
prevent overflow in openssl
prevent overflows
prevent recursion
prevent recursive invocation
prevent serious memory issues
prevent serious memory issues by limiting manifest to at most 100 MB in length
prevent unnecessary test
preveprev becomes new end of list
previous does not change
previous namespace declarations were bracketed
previous namespace declarations were unbracketed
previously SQLITE_CONFIG_CHUNKALLOC 12 which is now unused.
prime candidate for hash improvements.
print blurb
print buf to file
print buf to simplestring
print silly verbose header for USG compat.
print text, if any
print xml declaration if at root level
print.c - debugging printout routines
printable char offset of last blank char
printable text
printf arguments
private or protected property access outside of the class
private subtag start found
probably a corrupted tar - so we will pretend it is one
probably less
problem - cc
proceed to remaining data:
process data block:
process printable character
process run of digits
process shutdown
process startup
process the remaining bits:
process this byte:
process uses file cache fallback
procmask to protect handler_defer as if it were called by the kernel
produces numeric string E_NOTICE/E_WARNING
prop-get using first dimension as the property name, all subsequent dimensions and the offset as parameters
properties_info
property not found, so lets add it
protocol version we are speaking
provide correct default value
proxy locking.
proxy object
proxy-connection
ps_buffer here is a static const array of size PS_BUFFER_SIZE
psession is being called when the connection is freed - explicitly or implicitly
ptr is NULL means it already be freed
ptrdiff_t is not portable
public fields
public/private key functions
pull data buffer into tmpfile
pull out the LSB of the port
pull out the MSB of the port
pull out the port
purposes for cert purpose checking
push some data through the write filter chain.
push the normal char to the output buffer
put `null` bytes
put back non-standard SNMP port
put it back the way it was.
put parsing code here
put the implicit return on the really last line
put the real path into the path buffer
put the value into byref_vals instead
pv prints a character array as if it was a string of bcd digits.
qbcs 3rd byte
qbcs 4th byte
qbcs fourth byte
qbcs third byte
qualify the filename to prevent extraneous searches
query an agent with GET method
query an agent with GETNEXT method
query an agent with SET method
query functions
query generation
query matches native syntax
query string
query was re-written
query was rewritten
query_string
quick check to see if the string might be there I realize that 'offset' is 'grapheme count offset' but will work in spite of that
quit if init says so
quote the bind value if necessary
quoted length of value
quoted value
race condition when multiple threads are used.
raise default handler
raise error if it's not null and cannot be ignored
raise.c: bcmath library file.
raisemod.c: bcmath library file.
random NFS retry error, unless during file system support  introspection, in which it actually means what it says
random char
random/urandom equivalent on Windows
range out of order in character class
raw instruction
rbu VFS shim methods
rbu database handle
re-calculate the manifest location to simplify later code
re-enable writing
re-index like it did before
re-negotiate
re-negotiation, or perhaps the SSL layer needs more packets: retry in next iteration
re-open internal file pointer just-in-time
re-open just in time for cases where our refcount reached 0 on the phar archive
re-populate after copy-on-write
re-populate entry after copy on write
re-populate with copied-on-write entry
re-register the event
re-use the same initial timeout.
reached end of iteration
reached end-of-string.
read BC flag
read Cookies
read POST data
read UID, GID from specialEnv
read a chunk into a bucket
read all PNG info up to image data
read all the app marks...
read and parse this file
read any remaining data, it may be omitted
read block.
read buffer
read cert from the named file
read country code
read data for next iteration
read in archive comment, if any
read in central directory
read in manifest
read in the key name
read in the length of the key name
read in the length of the value
read in the oids
read in the value
read only FS/ lockless
read only funcs for iterating through queue.
read past HTTP headers
read requested data from SAPI
read the conch content
read the existing conch file
read the required number of bytes
read the response
read until EOF
read until a boundary condition
read until we hit the position in which we were before
read values not stored in directory itself
read whole image...
read-only access is allowed to magic files in .phar directory
read-only across the board
read-only open
read_dimension
read_property
reads a line the socket , returns true on success, false on error
reads an ftp response, returns true on success, false on error
ready to do some actual de-serialization.
real and other
real enclosure
realloc if the estimate was way overill Arbitrary cutoff point of 4096
reallocate buffer
really close the zip will break BC :-D
really convert the utf8 string
really should not happen: We don't return a float here as that violates function contract
reasonable circa 2006
rebinding to internal class is not allowed
recall how many parameters have been provided
recall that PATH_INFO won't exist
receive Server welcome message
recipcert is a CERT for one of the recipients.
recipkey specifies the private key matching recipcert, if recipcert does not include the key
recmul.c: bcmath library file.
reconstuct argv
record current glyph index for kerning
recurrrences
recurse through sub-elements
recurses    chain of recurse_check to catch mutual recursion Returns:      TRUE if what is matched could be empty
recursion here
recursion protection
recursive call could loop indefinitely
recursively convert php values into xmlrpc values
recursively convert xmlrpc values into php values
redirect stdin/stdout/stderr if requested
redirect.so and installation instructions available from http://www.koehntopp.de/php.
reduce buffer memory consumption if possible, to avoid a realloc
reduce size if needed
refer to the Sun's center or its upper limb.
reference lines
reference to non-existent subpattern
references within a phar filename
refuse to return an empty string just because by accident we knew of EOF in a read that returned no data
regBase itself holds the rowid.
regex cache
regex search
register additional functions
register alias
register holding first column to insert
register hooks
register in the persistent list etc.
register our php method
register rebind procedure
register server variables
register system methods
register the constant
register the event
register the standard data types
register the transaction in our own data structures
register this guy so we can modify if necessary
register with C engine.
register_im:
registered already, so we insert that first
registers holding insert rowid
regular directory
regular expression too large
regular file
regular string bind
reinitialize the first chunk and heap
reinstate the default tcp handler
relative extended_value don't have to be changed
relative-scheme URL
release all output handlers
release arguments
release current cached element
release kqueue stuff
release number
release the statement
release variants
relink remaining roots into list to free
relink to top of list
remeber the last restart time in the process memory
remember control stream
remember first valid char
remember just offset, cause address
remember possible key length
remember root OID
remember stream position for restoration
remember the event place in the fd list and suppose next slot is free
remember the mapping
remember this slot as free
remember we modified this variant
remember whether this entire phar was compressed with gz/bzip2
remote IP address
remote client disconnected
remote user
remove '..' and previous directory
remove Proxy-Authorization header
remove already sent session ID cookie
remove compression from old_flags
remove directorie
remove directory
remove double slashes and '.'
remove entry from hash, error if not found
remove error handlers before destroying classes and functions, so that if handler used some class, crash would not happen
remove from cache
remove last ', '
remove last CRLF from tmp
remove leading NOPs
remove non-garbage from the list
remove non-persitent sdl structure
remove shutdown function
remove some insecure options
remove specific
remove the client bit
remove the event from epoll internal queue
remove the event from port
remove the fd if it's in
remove the key
remove this from the new phar
remove this from the new phar if deleted, ignore if mounted
remove trailing '.'
remove useless type check
remove watchpoint here from btree, zval watchpoint will remove it via remove_watch_collison
remove xinclude processing nodes from recursive xincludes
removes all empty text, comments and other insignoficant nodes
rename on windows will fail if newname already exists.
rename the file
render the string, offset origin to center string
renegociate connections
renegotiation rate limiting triggered
repair options
repeat SPACE
repeat until result is exhausted
repeated subpattern is too long
repeating a DEFINE group is not allowed
replace HashTable data
replace any in-string NUL characters with spaces
replace numeric entities
replace the colon with the drive letter
replace the path info with the real path of the opened file
replace unicode code point
replace with all named entities
report errors via handler rather than stderr
report system errors
report the event
request URI
request shutdown
request startup
request startup only after we've done all we can to get path_translated
request_slowlog_timeout
requested method not found"
required_num_args
res might be negative because the table is empty.
reserve space for arguments, local and temorary variables
reserve workspace for building each individual field
reserved for extensions
reset all bind stuff to a normal state...
reset all fields to default
reset all fields to default when not set
reset bits from "0" to "end"
reset bits from "bit" to "end"
reset bits from "bit" to ZEND_MM_BITSET_LEN-1
reset bits from 0 to "bit"
reset buffer:
reset buffers
reset code table
reset connection if it's broken
reset counter
reset define-list for refcursors
reset descriptor's length
reset errno and errstr
reset file size
reset filter
reset format
reset hit counters
reset internal php_getopt state
reset it...
reset length for all piecewise columns
reset libxml generic error handling
reset macro
reset rest opcodes
reset rfc1867 callbacks
reset so we can copy the compressed data over
reset state
reset the state
reset these because despite the error the filter may be used again
reset to default
reset variables
reset zend_try
resize buffer if it's much larger than the result.
resize output buffer and reassemble block
resolve class references
resolve nth opline breakpoints
resolve parameter name to rewritten name
resolve relative path
resolveEntity
resource lists
resource passed in
respect inheritance, don't use spl_ce_RecursiveIterator
restart segment
restore after zeroing
restore compiler and scanner global states
restore error information
restore error messages
restore error reporting
restore filter
restore flag
restore forced restart request
restore memory limit
restore mode
restore my env
restore options
restore previous error_reporting value
restore the fcall info and cache
restore the in-string key, doesn't need null-termination here
restore the original handler
restore the original locking context and pMethod then close it
restore the users auto-detect-line-endings setting
restrict to the server/db in the .ini if in safe mode
restricted ASYNC_SAFE
restriction 5
result IS_BOOL, it does't have to be destroyed
result functions
result goes to TMP_REG2, so put result can use TMP_REG1 and TMP_REG3.
result object
result of eval
result properties
result set is empty
result variable
result was truncated
retain backwards compat with OCI8 1.4
retrieve a phar_entry_info's current file pointer for reading contents
retrieve file
retrieve information on a file contained within a phar, or null if it ain't there
retrieve information on a file or directory contained within a phar, or null if none found allow_dir is 0 for none, 1 for both empty directories in the phar and temp directories, and 2 for only valid pre-existing empty directory entries
retrieve kerning distance and move pen position
retrieve requested file within phar
retrieve the cached session pool
retrieve the stub
retrieving a file defaults to within the current directory, so use this if possible
retrieving a file within the current directory, so use this if possible
return 0 if we couldn't read enough data
return JS objects as PHP objects by default
return NULL
return SQLITE_OK.
return a NULL
return a PHP control object
return a string matching a given xmlrpc type
return a timestamp
return another proxy
return array with the text's bounding box
return byte length of converted char to lower
return byte length of converted to lower char
return class name and "::" or "".
return code
return data as a dynamic pointer
return driver prototype
return empty string to denote no match found
return entire buffer as a partial line
return first element
return id here
return if parameter is missing
return info as a struct, to make expansion easier
return offset of next part of the string
return old context, so caller can restore it when they're done
return our new hash value
return preferred tag
return resource when executed
return signal mask to previous state
return string to free storage
return the allocated string, not a duplicate
return the completed message digest:
return the days after March 21
return the locator
return the module configuration
return the next free module number
return the number of affected rows
return the original string
return to NORMAL mode
return to central directory parsing
return true if number and no extra non-whitespace chracters after
return value
return value form SQLITE_FCNTL_PRAGMA
return value should be a string
return whatever type we got back from the callback: let DB handle conversion
return xmlrpc type of a php value
return_value is IS_NULL for no more data and an array for data.
returned buffer
returning data as a string
returns -1 if not present
returns 0 for ok, 1 for error
returns TRUE if a is an ID separator FALSE otherwise
returns a documentation string, or empty string
returns a failure code and creates an exception if there was an error
returns a new XMLRPC_VALUE representing a soap fault, comprised of a struct with four keys.
returns a new string that must be freed
returns a new string, possibly decoded
returns a pointer to the byte after the last valid character in out
returns handlers buffer
returns out of this function
returns true for "1", "true", "on" and "yes" returns false for "0", "false", "off", "no", and "" null otherwise.
reuse the same op_array structure
ridiculous size not allowed for index.php startup filename
right now this function is used for non static method lookup too
right-hand side of IN is SELECT
rmzero.c: bcmath library file.
rollback any outstanding work
rollback failed
rollback outstanding transactions
root directory
root directory requested
root has special perms on plain_wrapper But we don't know about root under Netware
root user should not do that
rotate bounding rectangle
rough mapping of xmlrpc fault codes to soap codes
round the temp value
round to next pixel row
round up to prime number
rounded down...
rounding up occurred
rounding values: same as FLT_ROUNDS
routines to handle JPEG data
row_decoder
rownumber will hold the number of rows over which the aggregate was performed.
rows selected by each column
rt.c: bcmath library file.
run code from command line
run event loop forever
run through the whole string, converting as we go
run to finish
run to next line
running position of non-rotated string
running position of rotated string
runtime failure is OK
s is numeric, f is not
s is the default suffix
sa_family_t is unsigned
safe for 16 bit ints
safety first.
same as TK_AND, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_BITAND, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_BITNOT, in1, out2
same as TK_BITOR, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_CONCAT, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_EQ, jump, in1, in3
same as TK_FLOAT, out2
same as TK_GE, jump, in1, in3
same as TK_GT, jump, in1, in3
same as TK_ISNULL, jump, in1
same as TK_LE, jump, in1, in3
same as TK_LSHIFT, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_LT, jump, in1, in3
same as TK_MINUS, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_NE, jump, in1, in3
same as TK_NOT, in1, out2
same as TK_NOTNULL, jump, in1
same as TK_OR, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_PLUS, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_REM, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_RSHIFT, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_SLASH, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_STAR, in1, in2, out3
same as TK_STRING, out2
same height, copy it
same opcode and same var as this opcode
same width, just copy it
sanity check
sanity check for the case where the constant is already defined
sanity check parameter number range
sanity check the cipher
sanity check the stream: it can be either read-only or write-only
sanity check we must use a value between MIN_ACCEL_FILES and MAX_ACCEL_FILES
sanity check we must use at least 8 MB
sanity checks for include/require.
sapi has not started, output to stdout instead of fcgi
sapi has started which means everyhting must be send through fcgi
sapi_update_response_code doesn't free the status line if the code didn't change
saproxy_object_get,
saproxy_object_set,
sar reg, 24
sas: Works for me on Linux 2.0.36 and FreeBSD 3.0-current
save absolute path in the cache
save away the results
save for later use
save for potential restore on error
save in cache any value we found
save modified files to the zip
save php://input
save some memory
save start of file within tar
save the encoder, decoder state and the pointer
save the new offset location within ufp
save this method in the cache
save to a file
save_hwm_offset   the hwm forward reference offset at the start of the group Returns:     nothing
saves one function call if zend_execute_internal is not used
say "no" to other stream forms
sb is valid
scale G distances by this much
scale R distances by this much
scale each column
scale, round and offset brect
scan over it and pull out the certs
scan pattern methods
scan through modifiers
scan through our columns for a piecewise column with a matching handle
scanf.c -- This file contains the base code which implements sscanf and by extension fscanf.
schame.table should be "schame"."table"
scope argument was given
scratch is large enough, since it was made large enough for the whole URL
script is not going to be saved in SHM
script_path_translated being set is a good indication that we are running in a cgi environment, since it is always null otherwise.
scummy sib byte
search active scope if begins with period
search end position
search for breakpoints
search for directory
search for the end of the boundary
search for the file this metadata entry references
search in the timeout queue for the next timer to trigger
search key and new file ID
search start position
search start-position only
search str-position only
search the list of easy handles hanging off the multi-handle
search through the manifest of files, and if we have an exact match, it's a file
searching for UTF-32 specific byte orders, so this will do
sec to msec
second call
second immediate operand
secondary op code
section sign
sections_str DOES start with , and SPACES are NOT allowed in names
security is 0 here so that we can get a better error message than "entry doesn't exist"
security.limit_extensions
see XML_ELEM_OUTPUT_OPTIONS buf_len - length of returned buffer, if not null.
see Zend/tests/generators/aborted_yield_during_new.phpt
see comments below
see getput_arg below.
see if it has TypeInfo available
see if it makes sense to use simple division to round the value
see if this is a closure
see if we encountered an error
see: tests/classes/__call_004.phpt
seek before start of file on my machine
seek to central directory
seek to just past the path separator
seek to offset
seek to start of internal file and read it
seems to allow surrogate characters, then
seems to be allright
seems to be the convention in this lib to return false instead of null on bad parameter types, except on constructors and factory methods
segdir.end_block
segdir.leaves_end_block
segdir.root
segdir.start_block
segment of far address
segment override
selectNodeIsConstant will disallow
selectnowith
semi-arbitrary, "sensible default"
send an email
send common headers
send empty packet for eof
send header handler
send headers handler
send headers, output file contents
send message contents in 1024 chunks
send message header
send termination dot
send the AUTH TLS request name
send the PORT
send the site command
send the user name
send to SAPI
send to an address
send/recv family on windows expects int
sending SIGINT then provides a decent way of shutting down the server
sends an ftp command, returns true on success, false on error.
separate freeing to not dtor the symtable too, just the container zval...
separation symbol
separator may contain multiple separator chars.
sequence is too large
sequences are properly displayed in the message body.
serch MIME charset name
serch aliases
serial type
serial type of first record field
serialize bindings
serialize functions
serialize requests
server died
server error: red
server info arguments
set NULL element
set PBSZ to 0
set SAPI name
set a given value to a particular type.
set a lower artificial limit on this in the interest of security and resource friendliness 255 arguments should be more than enough.
set accurate value
set all bits
set all fd to -1 in order to ensure it's not set
set bind address
set bits from "0" to "end"
set bits from "bit" to "end"
set bits from "bit" to ZEND_MM_BITSET_LEN-1
set bits from 0 to "bit"
set charset for old servers
set colours off
set data connection protection level
set default colors
set default prompt
set default timeout values
set exec if present on command line
set execution context
set file metadata
set flag for new, improved array of objects list
set flag for new, improved array of objects mailbox list
set flag for normal, old mailbox list
set flags from command line
set hash code range bound
set hi 16 bit if needed.
set init file
set link flag
set listen ports
set low 16 bits, set hi 16 bits to 0.
set memory status bit flags.
set new location of file contents
set new value
set notice processor
set oplog output
set options
set overflow bit
set permissions
set phar metadata
set protection buffersize to zero
set quietness off
set remote flag to stop service shutting down upon quit
set resume position if applicable
set rotation transform
set server handle into service handle
set sign for everything, including 0's and NaNs
set signalled only when not interactive
set skip map for Boyer-Moor search
set some required options
set some required request hoojum
set specified type
set streams
set strict flag
set the __exposed flag.
set the callback for the GET_ACL function
set the callback for the GET_QUOTA function
set the callback for the GET_QUOTAROOT function
set the connection to be ascii
set the connection to be binary
set the error anyway, in case in the future we decide not to throw an error.
set the filter property, this will be used during cleanup
set the incoming values for the calendar
set the individual row_pointers to point at the correct offsets
set the maximum number of bytes we're allowed to read from buffer
set the message type
set the return value for pclose
set the server handle into service handle
set the string mask
set the thumbnail stuff to nothing so we can test to see if they get set up
set this link pointer to NULL in the transaction
set this slot as free to avoid search on next alloc
set this to 1 so that we know, it was set through this method.
set to largest number
set to the operand type for jump/ret/call
set underflow bit
set up HOME and USER anyway
set up a NULL value
set up error in case error handler is interested
set up hash pointers table
set up hash values table
set up our manifest
set up the cursor library, if needed, or if configured explicitly
set up the passive connection
set up version
set whole-archive compression and type from parameter
set wrapper data to be a reference to our object
setDocumentLocator
sets default for file streams to binary
sets the ftp transfer type
setting UTF is disabled by the application
setting string is too short
setting string is too short for its type
setup /dev/poll
setup data hoojum
setup io here
setup remote server if necessary
setup some data to pass to the callback function
setup standard CGI variables
setup string-variable and serialize
setup the function table
setup the version number: version 1
setup_tree does the following work.
sha224/sha256
sha384/sha512
sha512 crypt has the maximal salt length of 123 characters
share for reading
shared can just be set because we always have an exclusive
shared memory and mmap are enabled
shared memory is disabled
shared mode is known to be bad for PHP
sharedCacheEnabled
shift by negative number
shift the existing data if necessary
shift the extra to the front
shl reg, 24
shortcut - if no Ts, nothing to do
shortcut for empty string
shortcut for most common case
should NEVER generate this code
should be 'R98' or 'THM'
should be 8 byte aligned
should be ELEM_ARRAY, but there is an extra level.
should be a multiple of 3
should be a power of 2
should be a stream - try and dup the descriptor
should be after 0x8 because swedish_ci is the default collation
should be after 0x9 because general_ci is the default collation
should be always readable if not NULL
should be before push mem-end.
should be big enough for most date formats and numbers
should be pattern encoding.
should have filtered bar, but not foo
should include the header
should never be happen
should never happen
should not be possible
should not happen
should not happen...
should raise exception
should return NULL, but for BC we return ""
should stop here...
shouldn't happen
shouldn't happen either
shouldn't happen, but let's be ready for it
shouldn't happen...
shrink the allocated block
si_code for SIGCHILD
si_code for SIGPOLL
si_code for SIGTRAP
sigh, breaking the encapsulation, there aren't any functions manipulating the llist at the place of the zend_llist_position
sign of exponent
sign of significand
signal is blocked
signal that we're cleaning up
signature algorithm constants
signature checked out, let's ensure this is the last file in the phar
significand
sigtimedwait and sigwaitinfo can return 0 on success on some platforms, e.g. NetBSD
silence a warning
silence erroneous "gcc -Wall" warning.
silently expunge recycle stream
silently fail, there is nothing to copy
silently ignore mounted entries
silently skip any files that would be added to the magic .phar directory
silly namespace stuff
simple checks for the mailto address
simple stores are atomic
simple way to get necessary buffer of required size
simplestring is, as the name implies, a simple API for dealing with C strings.
simply skipping this new line
simulate multiple hosts by creating unique hostid file paths
simulate output of libmysql
simulate the append mode by fseeking to the end of the file this introduces a potential race-condition, but it is the best we can do, though
since 5.0.3, the default for this option is 0 if not specified.
since Zend auto allocates space for vars, this is no
since the user stream has no way of setting the eof flag directly, we need to ask it if we hit eof
since tm_wday starts from 0 whereas ICU WDAY start from 1
since tm_year is years from 1900
since zend_llist_del_element only remove one matched item once, we should remove them by ourself
single byte character
single byte stuff
single pattern matching
single- and double-quoted strings
single-byte charsets
singleton at some position except at start strip off the singleton and rest of the loc_name
singleton at start of script, region , variant etc.
singleton found but not a private subtag , hence check further in the string for the private subtag
size after value/piece has been read
size buffer down to actual length
size of buffer
size of constant database
size of data in bytes
size of each entry in the table
size of each fragment
size of entire array in bytes
size of the BLOB
size of the input
size should be between HT_MIN_SIZE and HT_MAX_SIZE
skip "last day of" or "first day of"
skip DRIVE name
skip UNC name
skip VOLUME name
skip all leading spaces
skip all private and protected properties
skip allocated blocks
skip already copied 0xFF byte
skip any other marker silently.
skip blank stuff
skip comments
skip continuation bytes
skip current call region
skip empty block
skip empty live range
skip extension
skip first entry since it has a , or paren
skip free blocks
skip header
skip internal handler
skip leading newlines
skip leading newlines and spaces
skip leading spaces
skip leading zero
skip leading zeroes
skip long patterns
skip newline
skip non-significant digits
skip non-valid multibyte characters
skip null bits
skip over leading zeros
skip over the "227 Some message " part
skip over the host ip, to get the port
skip over the rest and go directly to additional records
skip past protocol and :/, but handle windows correctly
skip possible breakpoints
skip rest of preamble
skip some predefined headers
skip special constants
skip symlink filename - we may add this support in later
skip the header
skip the slash
skip to end of line
skip to next header
skip trailing dots
skip trailing spaces
skip unimportant stuff
skip version made by/needed
skipping the padded spaces
sljit_set_label is clever enough to do nothing if either the jump or the label is NULL.
slow, would benefit from a struct key hash.
so can index -MAXJSAMPLE ..
so don't accept the 'l' modifier
so newtcb will be memory leaks.
so next time we won't get an error
so point to rightmost pixel
so stop the looping
so that entry is created in realpath cache
so that other process won't try to force while we are busy cleaning up
so we accept too
so we don't call the same callbacks ever again
so we don't do this when the string is sufficiently long.
so we don't get warnings under debug
so we know what to cleanup
soft hyphen
soft line break
soft line feed
softmagic - interpret variable magic from MAGIC
sol_socket options and general case
some broken servers do not have script_filename or argv0 an example, IIS configured in some ways.
some defines for the different JPEG block types
some drivers might need to describe the columns now
some fatal error.
some files have their values in other parts of the file
some headers may occur more than once, therefor we need to remake the string into an array
some leading directories may be unaccessable
some other error
some prototypes for local functions
some records are fetched already, shut down further lookup
some resolver error
some sanity checks
some schemas allow the host to be empty
some servers don't open a ftp-data connection if the directory is empty
some software does not count the length bytes of COM section
some tar programs store directories with trailing slash
some zip-files have different values in local and global headers for the bitflags
somebody registered a zone first
somehow some gcc release builds will play a bit around with order in combination with setjmp..., hence volatile
someone else has the lock when we are in NO_LOCK
someone else might have it reserved
someone needs to make this look more like stream_socket_select
something broke
something fishy, but allow it to come back as binary
something to hold errors
something went caca
something went terribly awry, unless during file system support  introspection, in which it actually means what it says
something went wrong.
something wrong
sometimes we may need to free 'node' variable
source and destination must both be WITHOUT ROWID or not
source is palette based
source stream
source, target
sources for mcrypt_create_iv
space allocated at zToken
space allocated to zToken buffer
space and POSIX space are the same.
space determined at run time
space if previous printed
space in the beginning means same header
space padding, the default
space, open, close, NullS
sparc 32 does not support SLJIT_KEEP_FLAGS.
spare error
special ascii to symbol
special case -- power of FLT_RADIX to be
special case ...
special case for Jewish calendar
special case for trailing space
special case for when root element is not an array
special case, perform operations on result
special case: value near underflow-to-zero
special colours for gd
special handling for zero-size allocation
special nodes
special symbol to ascii
specify array kids type and array size.
speculative
spent a frustrating day finding this out.
spit all out
spit it out.
spit out the first library error message, at least
spki functions
split and decode the query
split archives not handled
split up input parameter
sql NULL flag
sql variables union used for convert and binding input variables
sqlite3GetVdbe cannot fail: VDBE already allocated
sqlite3_create_collation only
sqlite3_file methods
sqlite3_int64, sqlite3_int64
sqlite3_io_methods object name
sqlite3_pcache Methods
sqlite_stat4.nDLt
sqlite_stat4.nEq
sqlite_stat4.nLt
sqlstate is following.
sqrt.c: bcmath library file.
src and dest get the same subst chars set, so it doesn't really matter which one we read from
src, dst are registers.
src2 and src1 are swapped.
src2_r is 0.
stack of filled segments
stack type check mask
standard format
standard format 0.
start Zend extensions
start a new transaction implicitly if auto_commit is enabled and no transaction is open
start additional PHP extensions
start after the header
start at beginning
start at offset 0 in the subject
start guessing
start of FAST CGI loop
start of buffer
start of buffer or start of line
start of line is left of window
start of line is right of window - complement of above
start of search region
start offset of data to read
start phase only
start the transaction
start tokenizing at the beginning
start up winsock services
startDocument
startElement
start_block
starting a new format specifier, reset variables
starting offset in the subject
starting position in str in bytes
startup after we get the above ini override se we get things right
startup extensions statically compiled in
stat - the streams themselves know how
stat failed, skip password validation
stat information passed in
stat is used, if it made here then the link is broken
statement handle
statement id
statement properties
statement returns a result
statement that will be fetched from
statement this function was invoked with
statement, then this stores a pointer to the SELECT statement.
statement, then this stores the column-names to be inserted into.
statement, then this stores values to be inserted.
static functions
static member functions
static members
static methods
static properties
static variable use is safe here since simple store or fetch operations are atomic and because the actual probe process is not in danger of collisions or race conditions.
stdio buffers data in user land.
stdout of parent is always /dev/null
stepping through eval on
stick that last bit of string on our output
stick the string into the LOB
still zero iff exact match
stmt object
stop before hitting compressed data
stop processing.
stop skipping 0 for M_COM
stop skipping non 0xff for M_COM
storage for current token
store away errors and/or any intermediate output
store charset string
store cleartext
store for later use
store it away
store persistent connection
store reference to allow cross-references between different elements
store request init time
store script structure in the hash table
store the error if it has changed
store the new resource type in the resource sizes table
store the result
store the value into "lVal" member of the variant.
stores our calculations
stores the lock state
str is array of strings
str is the UTF8 next character pointer
str1 is string but not numeric string just convert it to utf8.
str2num.c: bcmath library file.
strange header bug problem here...
stream operation already wrote an error message
stream.chunk_size is actually a size_t, but php_stream_set_option can only use an int to accept the new value and return the old one.
stream_close
stream_seek is not implemented, so disable seeks for this stream
strict comparison or not
string index
string indices
string is of the form x-avy or a-prv1
string object
strings with special characters will need to be quoted, as a safety measure we add 2 bytes for the quotes just in case.
strip POST headers on redirect
strip brackets from address for getaddrinfo
strip it down to the working directory "/path/to".
strip leading "/"
strip of the target if any
strip off the colon
strip the inside NOPs
strip trailing /
strip trailing whitespaces
strip trailing whitespaces if we have not done so already
strip xml namespace crap.
strtod for IEEE-, VAX-, and IBM-arithmetic machines.
strtol allows whitespace and other stuff in the beginning we're not interested
struct Trigger
struct sockaddr_in/sockaddr_in6
structure info
stupid keys need to be null-terminated, even though we know their length
sub.c: bcmath library file.
subpats_order is pre-set to pattern mode so we change it only if necessary.
subpattern name expected
substitute __COMPILER_HALT_OFFSET__ constant
substitute persistent constants
substr_count
subtraction must be done.
success: green
successful command that did not return rows
successful termination
successor block number if a condition is false
successor block number if a condition is true
summon memory to hold the row
summon the aggregation context
supply a name and default to call by parameter
support for custom memory allocator
support for custom memory storage
support for fault spec
support for introspection spec
support for user-defined memory limit
support needs to be added for snefru 128
support some of the 1999 data types
support windows drive letters as in: file:///c:/somedir/file.txt
suppose binary format
supposed next slot is free
suppress warning if this stream is not explicitly closed
swap a quad
swap a short
swap an int
swap buffers, unless this is the last handler
swap contexts buffers, unless this is the last handler in the stack
swap elements between two levels
swap list1, list2
switch array_desc_type
switch back to the context that was in use prior to our creation of the new one
switch break
switch over to the persistent one
switch stepping back on
switch the drain direction
switch to double
switch to global conf
synopsis: Start at P2
syntax check mode
system method returns a const
system time
system time of children
system unusable
szLookaside
tab1 and tab2 may not be the same table
tab1 must not be a virtual table
tab1 must not have triggers
tab2 may not be a view
tab2 must be NOT NULL if tab1 is
tab2 must not be a virtual table
table clear for block compress
table for clamping the applied error
table internal
table of a LEFT JOIN
table_name is escaped by php_pgsql_meta_data
tack on extra headers
take INT32 on 32-bit, int64 on 64-bit
take a byte from the source:
take care of head/tail
take from the read buffer first.
takes a cmsghdr, not a msghdr like from_zval_write_control
tally the length of the added data:
target database handle
target stream
tclUtf.c --  Routines for manipulating UTF-8 strings.
tell ODBC to put it straight into our buffer, but only if it isn't "long" data, and only if we haven't already bound a long column.
tell the driver that it is going away
tell the driver we just created a parameter
tell the engine we're in non-html mode
temp copy for duplicated docref
temp for arithmetic coding
temporary locals
temporary manifest entry
temporary streams are never persistent
temporary variable
tentative returned length
term sans prefix-byte
term_tok: TK_EOT or TK_SUBEXP_CLOSE
terminate list using NULL
terminate the string temporarily.
terminate the string, remove CRLF
terminator address
test arg for null
test if it works
test multiple returns
test string
test.bash looks for "PASS" to ensure this program has reached the end.
testing basic case with no iterate_upper_bound and no prefix_extractor
testing iterate_upper_bound and forward iterator to make sure it stops at bound
tests `c' and returns true if it is a special character
tests for file existence
text can be internal strings
text encoding
text not set in global iterator
text of name of TABLE
that array should only be manipulated during init, so safe for async access during execution
that didn't work, so try and get something from the network/wrapper
that's OK even for ZE2, since opline_num's are resolved in pass 2 later
thats good enough - wait for a newline
the "Domincal number"
the "Dominical number" - finding a Sunday
the "target" block doesn't had any followed block
the "target" block is not followed by current "block"
the -15 is to account for any padding CMSG_SPACE may add after the data
the BER value array
the FROM clause
the FROM clause -- which tables to scan
the GROUP BY clause
the Golden number
the HAVING clause
the LHS of the IN operator
the ORDER BY clause
the SafeArray case
the WHERE clause
the WHERE clause to be analyzed
the assertion has failed.
the behavior here differs from INTERSECT_KEY in php_intersect since in the "diff" case we have to remove the entry from return_value while when doing intersection the entry must not be deleted.
the buffer we actually used
the caller has apparently passed a connection-string
the caller has set this
the cast is safe
the cast is safe, we are in the range
the cipher state
the compiled pattern
the compiler choked when i tried to make this a macro
the complete WHERE clause
the core of COM
the corresponding mbstring globals needs to be set according to the ini value in the later stage because it never falls back to the default value if 1.
the count using a callback.
the counterpart did properly shutdown
the create/append check will be done on the lock when the lib opens the file it is already created
the cursor may advance
the cursor was declared correctly
the data is not the same
the data we have buffered will be lost to the third party library that will be accessing the stream.
the default relation
the destination weighting is substantially reduced as the
the directory to be watched
the driver-specific PDO handle constructor
the entry has a path separator and is a subdirectory
the false case was done earlier
the final case - the start of the line is inside the window
the first item in the connection-transaction list is reserved for the default transaction
the flags are not identical, thus, we assume properties are not compatible
the following options deal with files, therefore the open_basedir check is required.
the function is meant to process only entries from same group
the function pointers
the gets we use
the hash of the key modulo hash table size
the hash table
the head check is important, as the tick handler cannot atomically clear both the head and tail
the headers define the proto without the flags parameter.
the human readable status.
the images are meant to be the same dimensions
the input is near, e.g., twice the smallest denormalized number.
the input value is untouched.
the length of currently processing key
the length of the subject
the length of utf16_buf
the length will increase by length of xml escape - the character length
the link died
the link is not in the persistent list
the list of changed files
the lock-less list of events
the method table
the modification
the modifications array
the name context cannot be NULL.
the next line seems false but here IFDlength means length of all IFDs
the number of slots taken in the table
the object exported
the offset is 'grapheme count offset' so it still might be invalid - we'll check it later
the offset might have been incremented, but without further successful matches
the open file object
the other arguments
the pattern
the pipe to wakeup the OCaml program
the points are on different parts of the curve...
the prepared statement
the qualifiedName has a prefix and the  namespaceURI is null
the qualifiedName is a malformed qualified name 2.
the qualifiedName or its prefix is "xmlns" and the namespaceURI is different from  "http://www.w3.org/2000/xmlns/" 5.
the registry of PDO drivers
the rest are parameters
the rest is only used by PM_STYLE_DYNAMIC
the root directory
the round key
the same check, but with a call to DBA_ID_DONE before returning
the slow way: restart and seacrch
the solar and lunar corrections
the specified URI holds connection details
the specified altitude altit:
the standard pack utilities do not accept standard input
the statement is 'CREATE DATABASE ...' if the link argument is IBASE_CREATE
the status code isn't changed by a fatal error, so fake it
the steam_context resource will be released by resource list destructor
the string was already proved to be valid UTF-8
the subject string
the supposed free slot is not, let's search for a free slot
the svc api seems to get confused after an error has occurred, so invalidate the handle on errors
the table into which we are inserting
the unix way
the usefulness of padding with zeroes eludes me, it might even cause problems
the userfilter object probably doesn't exist anymore
the wrapperdata is an array zval containing the headers
the younger chunks have bigger number
then do not bother with notifications
then flatten the properties into it, to, mostly to notfiy developer about problems
then the message
then they do more broken stuff and set path_translated to the cgi script location
then use that to figure out the offset for day 1 of week 1
there are cases where the length reported by mysql is too short.
there has to be at least one pair
there is a mime type
there is no 'right' char
there is no conn handle in this function thus we can't set OOM in error_info
there is no data
there is no guarantee that this ITypeInfo instance has any relation to this IDispatch instance...
there is only a mime type
there might be messages to stderr from other parts of the code, we need to log them all
there should be no retval to clean up
there was a collision, check to see if it's already
there was an unrecoverable error
there was no 'left' char
there was no change ...
there's always room for 1 byte
there's no lower branch than idx
these actions all expect different types of arguments
these are for the Data Source type
these are not needed.
these are promoted to int, so no break
these are the actallay a integer
these are used to get the standard arguments
these functions operate on in-memory dynamic pointers
these globals used for forking children on unix systems
these names depend on the values of the PHP_STREAM_AS_XXX defines in php_streams.h
these opcode use the op2 as result
these opcodes are handled separately
these opcodes use the result as argument
these should force the client to close the file and reconnect
these three are allowed
these three kids are about equivalent
these two are dummies and will be destroyed later
these two are real and will be copied over cached_phars/cached_alias later
these variables are true statics/globals, and have to be mutex'ed on every access
they both have to be long's
they even allow mixed.
they gave us a string, but LOBs are represented as streams in PDO
they passed in a string
this "PARAMS" concept is silly.
this IS_FALSE actually means it's a BOOL type
this a jis kanji char
this algo is the only one known to me that works well on all systems
this allows support for RecursiveDirectoryIterator of subdirectories
this archive has no open references, so emit an E_STRICT and remove it
this block is nothing but NOP now
this block will not be used, delete all constants there
this can happen if you use a connection pooling software line pgpool which doesn't close the db-connection once php disconnects.
this can happen with rewrite rules - and we have no idea what to do then, so return
this code borrowed from here: http://lists.apple.com/archives/Darwin-development/2002/Mar/msg00746.html
this complies with system.listMethods as defined at http://xmlrpc.usefulinc.com/doc/reserved.html
this complies with system.methodHelp as defined at http://xmlrpc.usefulinc.com/doc/sysmethhelp.html
this complies with system.methodSignature as defined at http://xmlrpc.usefulinc.com/doc/sysmethodsig.html
this constructor shouldn't be called as it's private
this could be problematic - alias should never be different from manifest alias for cached phars
this file is not in the current directory, use the original path
this file is not in the phar, use the original path
this fp is in use by a phar_entry_data returned by phar_get_entry_data, it will be closed when the phar_entry_data is phar_entry_delref'ed
this function does no rollback on error
this function doesn't check for too many parameters
this function is called asynchronously by the Interbase client library.
this function is itchin for a re-write
this global stores the global cached pre-parsed manifests
this happens for a comment or white-space
this is a new phar that has perhaps had an alias/metadata set, but has never been flushed
this is a poor fit, but it's all we have
this is a small sample script to use libmbfl.
this is a url like "phar://blah.phar" with no directory
this is already an interned string
this is bad
this is by default
this is defined in zlib's zconf.h
this is either a brand new phar or a default stub overwrite
this is exactly what we requested
this is fine by us
this is for sure not allowed
this is host:port pair
this is implicitly required
this is long, cast to unsigned int
this is much more efficient with C99 snprintfs...
this is necessary to make it able to work with default array properties, returned to user
this is not a constructor call
this is not a leave, so skip it
this is not an error here
this is not an error, we're returning NULL here
this is not good enough - seek succeeds even on truncated tars
this is not really an error, so it is allowed.
this is now the new location of the file contents within this fp
this is orphaned metadata, erase it
this is padding to get CreateInstance into the correct position
this is passed down as we recurse, so our children have access to the info.
this is port
this is read-only
this is read-only, so it's ok
this is so callers can decide if they should free the X509
this is specific to PM_STYLE_ONDEMAND
this is the case where we have less data than planned
this is the child process
this is the first execute
this is to add backwards compatibility
this is to allow a different env var to be configured in case some server does something different than above
this is too tricky to try to handle, so divide and conquer:
this is used for creating images in main memory
this is where the match starts
this is where the match starts as size_t
this link doesn't have a default transaction
this live range already removed
this long winded copy allows compatibility with older PHP versions
this looks nasty to me
this may not be safe to do, but could work and be useful
this means string, not array
this mode only use cageFS, does not use suEXEC
this must be forced
this must never happen
this object should not be pre-initialised at compile time, as the order of members may vary
this only looks like magic, it isn't
this order must match the conversion table below
this setting may be not accurate
this short-circuits us out of the recursion.
this should be a thumbnail IFD
this should be compatible with the standard zenderror
this should modify object only if it's empty
this should not happen ever
this state is used after a 'Connection: close' message the parser will error out if it reads another message
this sucks for threaded environments
this timeout is used by standard stream funcs, therefor it should use the default value
this used to be "metachar.h"
this used to be "metaphone.h"
this version of PCRE is not compiled with PCRE_UCP support
this version of PCRE is not compiled with PCRE_UTF8 support
this will create an exception if needed
this will happen once per process, and will un-globalize mem_write_lock
this will have changed for all files that have either changed compression or been modified
this will read in php.ini, set up the configuration parameters, load zend extensions and register php function extensions to be loaded later
those constants/functions are only available in libzip since 0.11.2
though not all OSes support sockaddr_in used in IPv6 sockets
thread-safe memory manager mutex
three functions for attribute base modifications, gerrit Thomson
three letter day
three letter month
threshold was rounded to zero
throw an exception if we are in EH_THROW mode but DO NOT overwrite a pending exception
throw away any blocked signals
throw away any rows it might have returned
throw out return value and write the signature
thus only knows soap pre-defined types.
thus we need to keep the pointer to the hashtable for safety
time and interval
time of last change
time of the day.
time, imposing no runtime or code overhead.
timeout constants
timeout requested
timestamp is just the timestamp when this was added to the phar
timezone is called _timezone in LibC
timezone is optional
tiny hack for delete_implicit_parents
tiny version
tm_year is years since 1900
tmp buffer to hold current processing string in utf-16
to 10000 A.D.
to advance to next matching row
to at least 10000 A.D.
to avoid U_STRING_NOT_TERMINATED_WARNING
to avoid potential workspace
to copy anything, but do anyway.
to force garbage collection.
to guarantee that the cleanup is not made twice and compomise the rest of the application if sockets are used elesewhere
to have the same reference count to src as in the case where it's not stored
to improve support here, it's a matter of building the unicode mappings.
to is after p.
to it also Hence the following undef for ICU version Same true for the locale_set_default function
to properly compress, we have to tell zlib to add a zlib header
to properly decompress, we have to tell zlib to look for a zlib or gzip header
to provide context for calling into the next filter from user-space
to silence an erroneous warning about bc.nd0
to store the wrongly-typed keys
to the following byte
to try open the directory
todo: throw an error, we don't support embedded
token.z was originally in "..."
token_sid will be freed in tsrmwin32_dtor
tokenize on the "_" or "-" and stop  at singleton if any
tokenizer for inserts and queries
too complex
too few parameter bound
too long charset string
too many dimensions
too many forward references
too many levels of nesting
too many links or broken symlinks
top level elements don't actually represent values, so we just pass the current value along until we are deep enough.
total space to allocate
totalSubs  The number of variables that will be required.
toward -infinity
towards -infinity
track current and peak memory usage
trailing ', ' except for last element
transaction was released by the query and was a registered resource, so we have to release it
transactions
transfar text charset
transfer all data over to the new entry
transfer encode filter
transfer this metadata to the entry it refers
transfer-encoding
transform glyph image
transform the db path to a unique cache name
transitive constraints
translate UNIX type into NT type
translate the tag
translates data structures to soap/xml.
translates xml soap dom to native data structures.
treat empty files as empty archives
treat null value as empty string in xmlrpc.
trick to control varargs functions through cpp
tricky little algorithm for backward compatibility
trigger POLLIN events
trigger callback hook for parameters
trigger error unless signal interrupt
trigger error unless signal interrupt or timeout
trigger timers
trigger_cmd
trigger_cmd_list
trigger_event
triggered also if DIFF_KEY
triggered also when DIFF_KEY
triggered also when INTERSECT_KEY
trim pointer so that its real and logical sizes match
trim spaces
triple byte character
true global
true global environment
true globals
true globals, no need for thread safety
true if it's ZEND_SEND_BY_VAL or ZEND_SEND_PREFER_REF
true if shared-cache mode enabled
true multithread-shared globals
true/false constants
truncate for error message
try EPSV first
try a wildcard
try a wrapper
try allocating this much, if not - try shrinking
try and open it directly first
try it anyway
try looking at the first HOWMANY bytes
try lowercase
try memory handlers in order
try normalize again
try soft magic tests
try text properties
try the next binding
try to allocate tail pages after this block
try to avoid breaking words
try to avoid the bug of testing an 8087 register value
try to create all the intermediate directories
try to detect the charset for the locale
try to determine the index by looking in the named_params hash
try to evaluate if thumbnail data is present
try to figure out the charset from the locale
try to find an idle connection and kill it
try to find cached script by full real path
try to find cached script by key
try to find if we already have this link in our persistent list
try to find if we already have this link in our persistent list, no matter if it is to be persistent or not
try to handle signal
try to lookup the table name in the resource list
try to lookup the type in the resource list
try to make sure that the OS sends all data before we close the connection.
try to map tail right after this block
try to map the name to the column
try to match the buffer mode as best we can
try to match the database file R/W permissions, ignore failure
try to open source file, then create internal phar file and copy contents
try to read up to maxlen length bytes while we don't find the delim
try to reuse a connection
try to see if the element already exists in the hash
try to use it as a moniker
try with a non-escaped URI this may be a strange filename
trying to compute the length
ts management functions
turn auto-commit back on again
turn off high bit in final byte
turn off proxy locking - already off - NOOP
turn off proxy locking - not supported.
turn on Unix98
turn on proxy file locking
turning on auto_commit with an open transaction is illegal, because we won't know what to do with it
tweencolor cache functions
two digit day, with leading zero
two digit day, without leading zero
two digit hour, with leading zero
two digit hour, without leading zero
two digit minute, with leading zero
two digit month, with leading zero
two digit month, without leading zero
two digit second, with leading zero
two digit year
two named subpatterns have the same name
two traits can't define the same non-abstract method
two unicode code points in UTF-8
type compat
type for the 2nd-level pointers
type for top-level pointer
type numbering.
type of the next token
type of the previous token
typedefs for the array
typically of type xmlrpc_request_response.
uPattern is to be handled as an ordinary character
uchar_pos is the 'nth' Unicode character position of the needle
ucol_getSortKey is exception in that the key length includes the NUL terminator
ugh, we don't really like .ini stuff in PDO, but since ODBC connection pooling is process wide, we can't set it from within the scope of a request without affecting others, which goes against our isolated request policy.
ultra-compact, newlines, pretty/level indented.
un-describe
unary operation on constant operand
unblock interruptions
unbuffered write
uncompressed only
unconditionally keep this for later reference
uncorrected date of the Paschal full moon
undefine AIX-specific macro
undefined behavior
undefined public property
underlying file descriptor
uninitialized
union magic ensures that this works out
uniqueidentifier is a 16-byte binary number
unix3 header found
unixFile created and returned by ref
unixFile.pInode is always valid here.
unixInodeInfo that owns this SHM node
unixify the path back, otherwise non zip formats might be broken
unknown POSIX class name
unknown datatype
unknown mode
unknown or unsupported join type
unknown type
unknown version specified
unload prev errs into array
unlock failed with an error
unmatched parentheses
unparsedEntity
unreachable code
unregister functions, so that they don't linger for the next request
unregister rebind procedure
unsafe character
unsed literal
unset the associated relaxNG context and schema if one exists
unset user-defined handler
unset_dimension
unset_property
unsigned int szPma
unspecified in function call, use session-wise
unsuported by Unicode 6.0
unsupported
unsupported encoding"
unsure this signal is not blocked
unterminated string
until buffer loaded
until here it is not a copy
until shutdown.
unused parameter
unwrapped is now the dispatch pointer we want
up to six digit millisecond
update JMPs
update SSA variables
update branch targets
update brk/cont array
update call graph
update early binding list
update keys
update last errors and warnings
update methods
update number
update our pointer in the original UTF-8 buffer by as many characters as ubrk_next iterated over
update previously generated FREE/FE_FREE opcodes
update prototype
update ptrs to point to valid keys.
update referens to live-ranges from stack
update status structure for all PMs
update the buffer
update the buffer length
update the column index on named bound parameters
update those bound column variables now
update try/catch array
update xtra for next call.
update zval string data
updete next root that is going to be freed
upper or lower case string in place if required.
uppercase equivalent to lowercase
url is of the form "file:///path/to/Info.plist".
usage checks
use 'FIELD' if name is empty
use 'int' for calculation temps
use E-style
use NLS_LANG if no or invalid charset specified
use Net-SNMP value translation
use SEEK_CUR to allow emulation in streams that don't support seeking
use UTF-8 mapping from ASCII
use _ui function
use a 0 second timeout when checking if the socket has already died
use a newly define parameter into the do_modify so ldap_mod_add can be used the way it is supposed to be used , Gerrit THomson
use another var because type of cmsg_len varies
use builtin print for GEN_OTHERNAME, GEN_X400, GEN_EDIPARTY, GEN_DIRNAME, GEN_IPADD and GEN_RID
use chunk size
use default character tables
use default method
use dummy scope if we're binding an object without specifying a scope
use fg color directly.
use first character from string
use lowercase names, case insensitive
use new entry
use non-persistent if allowed number of persistent links is exceeded
use now the lower branch of which we can be sure that it contains only branches lower than idx
use our fopencookie emulation
use our proxy position
use pclose instead of fclose
use port 21 if one wasn't specified
use prepared stmts for that
use scope of passed object
use separate timeout for our private funcs
use some stack space
use the buffer directly
use the configured timeout when checking eof
use the global environment
use the numeric one for calculations.
use the original file or directory name as it wasn't found
use the same stream for locking and database access
use the temp stream as our base
use to specify stdin.
use user-supplied OID names for keys in array output mode in GET method
use wid for horizontal stroke
use wid for vertical stroke
use_realpath is 0 in the call below coz path is absolute
usec to msec, and half the configured delay
used as any purpose.
used by normal-POP
used by prepare and exec to allocate a statement handle and prepare the SQL
used directly
used in return_value then
used indirectly
used only in main chunk
used to check if script restored to SHM or process memory
used to close fd's in the 3..255 range here, but it's problematic
used to close fd's in the range 3.255 here, but it's problematic
used when POP-POS
user cannot instantiate
user func failed
user handler may have returned TRUE
user output options
user requested a directory, we must return one
user requested cancel of current operation
user specified file, perform open_basedir checks
user specified key
user specified redirect code
user time of children
user_stub and len should be both 0 if the default or existing stub should be used
uses constants declared in soap.c to determine ssl uri protocol
uses mmap if possible
using a prepared statement
usual case: not a fault.
utility func to generate a new attribute.
utility function for xi_system_describe_methods_cb
utility functions
val        The desired new boolean value.
val        The desired new string val.
val now holds the lower bound of the coordinate pair
val now holds the upper bound of the coordinate pair
valid as single byte character or leading byte
valid characters are a..z,A..Z,0..9
validate UTF-8 string first
validate a modified-base64 character
validate and compute length of output string
validate parameters
validate scheme
validate the parameters
validation was successful
value and typeDescription behave about the same
value extracted
value for SETVAL
value found
value handled in browscap.c's MINIT
value of function parameters
value ptr of tiff directory entry
value to check for
value types
value, key, retval, values
variable number or class name literal number
variant is not a string
varint containing prefix size
varint containing suffix size
verbosity of generated xml
verify checksum
verify header
verify local file header
verify local header
verify that all abstract methods from traits have been implemented
verify that it is suitable
verify the host name presented in the peer certificate
verify the number of args
verify this - cc
verify timestamp
version byte at the front, and a null at the end
version information
version number
version of xml to output
very important.
very unlikely
vfs module to open wal and wal-index
view the wbmp on stdout
virtual codepoint values for invalid encoding byte 0xfe and 0xff
virtual table
virtual table name
volatile so we can gdFree it on return from longjmp
volatile so we can gdFree them after longjmp
wait 0.5 sec and try the lock again
wait 10 sec and try the lock again
wait for 10s before exiting with error the child is supposed to send 1 or 0 into the pipe to tell the parent how it goes for it
wait for events or timeout
wait for incoming event or timeout
wait for inconming event or timeout
wait for inconming event or timeout.
wait until something interesting happens in the socket.
walk the assoc array
walk the descriptor spec and set up files/pipes
walk the mib
walk through the ACLLIST
warn if we computed outlen incorrectly
warning object
warning, and returns NULL
warnings sent, bailing out
wchar filter
we allocate from here
we allow load data local infile by default
we already changed the value, free the changed value
we already duplicated this pointer
we already have an opened zip, free it
we already have it, free it then
we already know we can retrieve the phar if we reach here
we already read the 8 signature bytes
we already were inside restart this means it's not safe to touch shm
we also support IPV6_TCLASS, but that can be handled by the default integer optval handling in the caller
we always consume all the data passed to us.
we are adding a reference to the underlying php_curl resource, so we need to add one to the resource's refcount in order to ensure it doesn't get destroyed when the underlying curl easy handle goes out of scope.
we are at CRLF,
we are at the end of the string, so we fail
we are checking for existence of a file within the relative path.
we are completely hosed now
we are done
we are going to the break
we are going to write a new APP13 marker, so don't output the old one
we are in include_once or FastCGI request
we are in the global section
we are leaving group now: that means we cannot find the key
we are not interested in gc and flags
we are pretending it came from the environment
we are running as cgi or fastcgi
we are running from shell and got filename was there 2.
we are still using a memory based backing.
we assume that LOBs are binary and don't need charset conversion
we assume that any glob pattern will match files from one directory only so checking the dirname of the first match should be sufficient
we botched the k estimate
we can achieve this without allocating more memory
we can avoid the key_type check here, because we tested it in the other loop
we can change the type so long as nothing is currently stored.
we can create an io context
we can keep this entry, the file that refers to it exists
we can not fit this string
we can return a real value
we can't delete this in-memory until it is closed
we cannot use strlcpy - here the problem is that we have to copy NUL chars up to byte_count, we also have to add a single NUL character to force end of string.
we checked that it will fit:
we convert numbers to integers and treat them as a string
we copy original hostname for further processing
we correct SCRIPT_NAME now in case we don't have PATH_INFO
we could also reopen the file in "rb" mode but there is no need for that
we could do a binary search but it's not worth it since we have at most two entries...
we could have it if we want it
we deny permission to open it
we did not find an entity for this char.
we didn't find it in the hash.
we differ here with the TCL implementation in allowing for
we do have getter - fail and let it try again with usual get/set
we do not know the order of sections
we do not ping non-persistent connections
we do not want to process defaultEncoding's here
we do our own reading directly from the phar, don't change the next line
we don't care about the first
we don't care about the server's credentials
we don't care if the function name is longer, in fact lowercasing only the beginning of the name speeds up the check process
we don't handle this well for now.
we don't have complete unicode mappings for these yet in entity_decode, and we opt to pass through the octet sequences for these in htmlentities instead of converting to an int and then converting back.
we don't know the socket until we have determined if we are binding or connecting
we don't need external character sets, all character sets are compiled in.
we don't need run-time check
we don't need that
we don't support 64-bit offsets
we don't support JIS X0213
we don't use strtol because we don't want to allow negative values
we don't want headers to be sent
we don't want resource id 0
we don't want resource type 0
we don't want to count the null byte.
we either have a query that returned a result set or an error occurred lets see if we have access to a result set
we end up here if none of the switch cases handled the field
we expect at least one parameter in varargs
we first rewind
we force PHP_STREAM_CALL_DTOR because that's from where the enclosing stream can free this stream.
we forked/spawned and this is the parent
we found another match put a newline and '-' to do some simple formatting
we get here when the last filter in the chain has data to pass on.
we got a persistent guy from our cache
we got objid array
we got our dispatchable object
we got position already from last fetch
we have 5 32-bit items plus 1 byte at least
we have a docref for a function AND - we show errors in html mode AND - the user wants to see the links
we have a non-valid entry...
we have desired string in buffer, just use it
we have everything we need in psal, flush peername and fill it properly
we have no blacklist to talk about
we have no mappings outside the BMP
we have to initialize the rest to get the updated max length
we have to initialized the rest to get the updated max length
we have to iterate through the set of code points for this encoding and map them to unicode code points
we have to rebuild HashTable with numeric keys
we have to return NULL on error here to avoid memleak because of ZE duplicating uninitialized_zval_ptr
we have to return original length here
we have to save error information, cause MYSQLI_DISABLE_MQ will reset error information
we have to test if path is part of DOCUMENT_ROOT.
we have unprocessed OIDs
we have valid persistent_script, so it's safe to free op_array
we haven't created a lazy object yet
we haven't initialized our ctx yet, oh well
we interpret 0x5C as the Yen symbol.
we just handle 3 octets of data
we look for directory separator from the end of string, thus hopefuly reducing our work load
we must first to copy all classes and then prepare functions, since functions may try to bind classes - which depend on pre-bind class entries existent in the class table
we must have at the very least phar://alias.phar/
we must have at the very least phar://alias.phar/internalfile.php
we must initialize our wrapper in pthread_create, because it is valid to call pthread_create in a static constructor, and in fact, our test for issue 9456 does just that.
we must reuse the old SSL session id
we need filename and lineno for both execute and function probes
we need this since some servers refuse to accept SIZE command in ASCII mode
we need to "flush" the stream to save the newly deleted file on disk
we need to allocate more memory
we need to be binary safe on systems that support an abstract namespace
we need to check if the ctor is the ctor of the class level we we looking at since we might be looking at an inherited old style ctor defined in base class.
we need to copy the additional fields that the underlying tcp transport doesn't know about
we need to create an object and load using OleLoadFromStream
we need to decompress the data
we need to determine if the enclosure is 'real' or is it escaped
we need to disable auto-commit now, to be able to initiate a transaction
we need to do this every time since GLOB_ONLYDIR does not guarantee that all directories will be filtered.
we need to handle xml: namespace specially, since it is an implicit schema.
we need to prune the list - cc
we need to reset the sse here as unixtime2gmt modifies it
we need to save the state.
we never should have no matching child
we only really care about strings because they can represent base64 and datetime.
we only support VARRAYs and TABLEs
we only take string arguments
we output 'no input file' now.
we pass additional args to the respective handler
we processed messages
we quit remote consoles on recv SIGINT
we release the columns at the end of a fetch
we return nothing for disable breakpoints
we should also need to replace the object store entry, since it was created with emalloc
we should be already be in non blocking mode for network socket
we should introduce something like PARAM_PASSTHRU...
we should never have mapping in persistent encoder
we should print if no more data to come
we should print if no more space in the buffer
we should set it to -1 to know, that it's just not initialized
we should still add element even if it's not OK, since we already wrote the length of the array before
we shouldn't free this particular cert, as it is a resource.
we store the signature followed by the signature length
we track data dependencies only insight a single basic block
we use "jmp_hitlist" to avoid infinity loops during jmp optimization
we use persistent resources for the driver connection stuff
we use this to allow the child to inherit handles
we use this to calculate API version, 1.1.1 is used for phars with directories
we want the private key
we want to create a copy of this zval that we store in the multihandle structure element "easyh"
we want to serve more requests if this is fastcgi so cleanup and continue, request shutdown is handled later
we we're looking for a private prop
we we're looking for a private prop but found a non private one of the same name
we we're looking for a private prop but found a private one of the same name but another class
we were opened as a plain file descriptor, so we need fdopen now
we will collect all possible key lengths
we will fail, badly.
we work backwards so that we can use atoi more easily
we would result in an instable executor otherwise
we'll flush them at the end
we'll let any ol element with children through
we'll let it go this time
we'll only need this when we have persistent statements, if ever
we'll recompress
we'll use a siginfo handler
we're about to hit image data, or are at EOF.
we're executing the stub, which doesn't count as a file
we're going to insert a NULL column
we're here courtesy of longjmp
we're no longer executing anything
we're not going to free these
we're okay to be zero based here
we're only interested in parameters for prepared SQL right now
we've found an extension that ends at a directory separator
we've found this file, don't re-check include_path or run realpath
we've got an unterminated enclosure, assign all the data from the start of the enclosure to end of data to the last element
we've got at least 1 byte to read less than 1 is an error AND read bytes match written
we've got at least 1 byte to read.
we've reached here - the phar exists and is a regular phar
we've started allocating resources, goto from now on
web server need set this
weighted value
when PCRE_UCP is set.
when a HashTable is freed, we can safely assume the other zvals all were dtor'ed
when a filter needs feeding, there is no brig_out to deal with.
when in read only mode try to use existing .lck file first
when not in read mode or failed to open .lck file read only.
when num_commands is 0, then realloc will be effectively a malloc call, internally
when php is started by mod_fastcgi, no regular environment is provided to PHP.
when reading file, it must exist
when reading the whole file, check for CRC errors
when removing this a lot of handlers need to be redone
when we handle prop put and get, this will look nicer
when we hit an existing break, copy to new buffer, and fix up laststart and lastspace
when we request only the header, don't fail even on error codes
when_clause
where new box will go
where to put the answer
where to store the events.
wherecode.c:
whereexpr.c:
whether CRC was computed for complete file
whether to check CRC on EOF and return error on mismatch
whether to preserve keys
which columns to include in the result
which function caused the problem if any at all
which has its own performance penalties...
which piece
whoops: sockfd has disappeared
wildcard, if present, must only be present in the left-most component
will be filled in on fetch
will be filled later
will be freed by Zend, thus don't use the mnd_ allocator
will be redefined
will point to argv area
will shrink, also we discover if strtext
wind the handle...
windows has no IPV6_RECVPKTINFO, and uses IPV6_PKTINFO for the same effect.
with Oracle, there is nothing special to be done
with curl 7.17.0 and later, we can use COPYPOSTFIELDS, but we have to provide size before
with ioctlsocket, a non-zero sets nonblocking, a zero sets blocking
with the special exception on linking described in file LICENSE.
within cell range so no contribution to min_dist
without SUPPORT_UCP
won't happen but makes compiler happy
word - a Perl extension
work around inability to specify freedom in write and strictness in read count
work is handled by EVT_NORMALIZE
work left to right in this row
work out remaining time
work right to left in this row
work-around for longtext and alike
workaround for ICU bug
worring about sub-dividing and re-hashing.
wrap internal function handler to avoid memory leak
wrapper around send/recv to handle timeouts
write attrs, if any
write contents
write empty packet to server
write failed
write header
write it out to the temporary break file
write out manifest pre-header
write the WBMP to a gd file descriptor
write the encrypted data
write the manifest header
write the signed data
write to the gets stream if it is set, otherwise forward to c-clients gets
write_dimension
write_property
write_property will add 1 to refcount
writes error
writes error on fail
wrong integer format
wrong order
www., wiki., windows., master., and others, I guess pecl.
x is the INTEGER PRIMARY KEY
x, y coordinates in orbit
x.509 cert funcs
x0 x1 x2 x3 x4 x5 x6 x7 x8 x9 xA xB xC xD xE xF
x86 32-bit arch dependent functions.
x86 64-bit arch dependent functions.
xBegin - begin transaction
xBestIndex - Determine search strategy
xCheckReservedLock
xCheckReservedLock method
xClose - close a cursor
xClose method
xColumn - read data
xCommit - commit transaction
xConnect - connect to an existing table
xCreate - create a table
xCreate/xConnect argument array
xCurrentTime
xCurrentTimeInt64
xDestroy - Drop a table
xDeviceCapabilities
xDeviceCharacteristics
xDisconnect
xDisconnect - Disconnect from a table
xEof - check for end of scan
xFetch, xUnfetch
xFileControl
xFilter - configure scan constraints
xFindFunction
xFindFunction - function overloading
xFindMethod
xFullPathname
xGeom and xQueryFunc argument
xGetLastError
xGetSystemCall
xLanguageid
xLock method
xNext - advance a cursor
xNextSystemCall
xOpen - open a cursor
xOpen flags
xRandomness
xRename - rename the table
xRollback - rollback transaction
xRollbackTo
xRowid - read data
xSectorSize
xSetSystemCall
xShmBarrier
xShmMap method
xSync - sync transaction
xTestCallback
xUnlock method
xUpdate - write data
xVdbeBranch
xfer opt does not play well with PRAGMA count_changes
xml_elem_entity_escape  Purpose: escape reserved xml chars and non utf-8 chars as xml entities Comments: The return value may be a new string, or null if no conversion was performed.
xmlrpc "faults" are not directly represented in this xmlrpc API or data structures.
xmlrpc the latter.
xmlrpc_none if not a value.
xor hashing
xor the bottom with the current octet
xpath query from xpath_array
xpgSize is guaranteed to be at least one larger than objIndex.
y is bound safe at this point
yes this is correct.
yes, tlsbase from mrc might not be correctly aligned.
yes, tlsbase from mrs might not be correctly aligned.
yet another hack for the "fault" crap
yield from was used, try another resume.
yucky default
yup, this break isn't here on purpose too
yymore_restart:
yyn is the number of a rule to reduce with.
zFilename encoded in UTF-8 instead of UTF-16
zFilename is a temporary or immutable file
zMasterName is the name of the master table.
zName is the "A"
zNum is a 19-digit numbers.
zNum is exactly 9223372036854775808.
zNum is greater than 9223372036854775808 so it overflows
zNum is less than 9223372036854775808 so it fits
zNum must be decimal.
zPath is a path to a WAL or journal file.
zSpan holds DB.TABLE.COLUMN
zend_alloc allocates memory from OS by CHUNKs, these CHUNKs and huge memory blocks are always aligned to CHUNK boundary.
zend_alloc is designed to be a modern CPU cache friendly memory manager for PHP.
zend_call_function may change args to IS_REF
zend_hash_quick_update does not check, as add_assoc_zval_ex do, whether the index is a numeric and convert it to it.
zend_long alligment
zend_object_store_set_object: It is ONLY valid to call this function from within the constructor of an overloaded object.
zend_stack_push returns stack level
zend_str_tolower_copy won't necessarily set the zero byte
zenkaku to hankaku
zero before decimal point
zero for the background color, nothig gets outside anyway
zero iteration count
zero to read.
zero-terminate the buffer for safety.
zero.c: bcmath library file.
zip or tar-based phar
zip_discard: frees the space allocated to a zipfile struct, and closes the corresponding file.
zip_file_get_offset.c -- get offset of file data in archive.
zip_file_set_mtime.c -- set modification time of entry.
zip_open is a macro for renaming libzip zipopen, so we need to use PHP_NAMED_FUNCTION
zip_stat_init.c -- initialize struct zip_stat.
zlib include files can define the following preprocessor defines which rename the corresponding PHP functions to gzopen64, gzseek64 and gztell64 and thereby breaking some software, most notably PEAR's Archive_Tar, which halts execution without error message on gzip compressed archivesa.
zmsg should be passed by ref
zval type decode
